WASHINGTON — In a long-awaited interpretation of the new health care law , the Obama administration said Monday that employers must offer health insurance to employees and their children, but will not be subject to any penalties if family coverage is unaffordable to workers.The requirement for employers to provide health benefits to employees is a cornerstone of the new law, but the new rules proposed by the Internal Revenue Service said that employers' obligation was to provide affordable insurance to cover their full-time employees. The rules offer no guarantee of affordable insurance for a worker's children or spouse. To avoid a possible tax penalty, the government said, employers with 50 or more full-time employees must offer affordable coverage to those employees. But, it said, the meaning of "affordable" depends entirely on the cost of individual coverage for the employee, what the worker would pay for "self-only coverage."The new rules, to be published in the Federal Register, create a strong incentive for employers to put money into insurance for their employees rather than dependents. It is unclear whether the spouse and children of an employee will be able to obtain federal subsidies to help them buy coverage — separate from the employee — through insurance exchanges being established in every state. The administration explicitly reserved judgment on that question, which could affect millions of people in families with low and moderate incomes.Many employers provide family coverage to full-time employees, but many do not. Family coverage is much more expensive, and the employee's share of the premium is typically much larger.In 2012, according to an annual survey by the Kaiser Family Foundation, premiums for employer-sponsored health insurance averaged $5,615 a year for single coverage and $15,745 for family coverage. The employee's share of the premium averaged $951 for individual coverage and more than four times as much, $4,316, for family coverage.Starting in 2014, most Americans will be required to have health insurance. Low- and middle-income people can get tax credits to help pay their premiums, unless they have access to affordable coverage from an employer.In its proposal, the Internal Revenue Service said, "Coverage for an employee under an employer-sponsored plan is affordable if the employee's required contribution for self-only coverage does not exceed 9.5 percent of the employee's household income."The rules, though labeled a proposal, are more significant than most proposed regulations. The Internal Revenue Service said employers could rely on them in making plans for 2014.In writing the law, members of Congress often conjured up a picture of employees working year-round at full-time jobs. But in drafting the rules, the I.R.S. wrestled with the complex reality of part-time, seasonal and temporary workers.In addition, the administration expressed concern that some employers might try to evade the new requirements by firing and rehiring employees, manipulating their work hours or using temporary staffing agencies. The rules include several provisions to prevent such abuse.The law says an employer with 50 or more full-time employees may be subject to a tax penalty if it fails to offer coverage to "its full-time employees (and their dependents)."Employers asked for guidance, and the Obama administration provided it, saying that a dependent is an employee's child under the age of 26."Dependent does not include the spouse of an employee," the proposed rules say.Thus, employers must offer coverage to children of an employee, but do not have to make it affordable. And they do not have to offer coverage at all to the spouse of an employee.The administration said that the rules — which apply to private businesses, nonprofit organizations and state and local government agencies — would require changes at many work sites."A number of employers currently offer coverage only to their employees, and not to dependents," the I.R.S. said. "For these employers, expanding their health plans to add dependent coverage will require substantial revisions to their plans."In view of this challenge, the agency said it would grant a one-time reprieve to employers who fail to offer coverage to dependents of full-time employees, provided they take steps in 2014 to come into compliance. Under the rules, employers must offer coverage to employees in 2014 and must offer coverage to dependents as well, starting in 2015.The new rules apply to employers that have at least 50 full-time employees or an equivalent combination of full-time and part-time employees. A full-time employee is a person employed on average at least 30 hours a week. And 100 half-time employees are considered equivalent to 50 full-time employees.Thus, the government said, an employer will be subject to the new requirement if it has 40 full-time employees working 30 hours a week and 20 half-time employees working 15 hours a week.
ORLANDO, Fla. — Hispanic women in the United States, who have generally had the highest fertility rates in the country, are choosing to have fewer children. Both immigrant and native-born Latinas had steeper birthrate declines from 2007 to 2010 than other groups, including non-Hispanic whites, blacks and Asians, a drop some demographers and sociologists attribute to changes in the views of many Hispanic women about motherhood.As a result, in 2011, the American birthrate hit a record low, with 63 births per 1,000 women ages 15 to 44, led by the decline in births to immigrant women. The national birthrate is now about half what it was during the baby boom years, when it peaked in 1957 at 122.7 births per 1,000 women of childbearing age.The decline in birthrates was steepest among Mexican-American women and women who immigrated from Mexico, at 25.7 percent. This has reversed a trend in which immigrant mothers accounted for a rising share of births in the United States, according to a recent report by the Pew Research Center. In 2010, birthrates among all Hispanics reached their lowest level in 20 years, the center found.The sudden drop-off, which coincided with the onset of the recession, suggests that attitudes have changed since the days when older generations of Latinos prized large families and more closely followed Roman Catholic teachings, which forbid artificial contraception.Interviews with young Latinas, as well as reproductive health experts, show that the reasons for deciding to have fewer children are many, involving greater access to information about contraceptives and women's health, as well as higher education.When Marucci Guzman decided to marry Tom Beard here seven years ago, the idea of having a large family — a Guzman tradition back in Puerto Rico — was out of the question."We thought one, maybe two," said Ms. Guzman Beard, who gave birth to a daughter, Attalai, four years ago.Asked whether Attalai might ever get her wish for a little brother or sister, Ms. Guzman Beard, 29, a vice president at a public service organization, said: "I want to go to law school. I'm married. I work. When do I have time?"The decisions were not made in a vacuum but amid a sputtering economy, which, interviewees said, weighed heavily on their minds.Latinos suffered larger percentage declines in household wealth than white, black or Asian households from 2005 to 2009, and, according to the Pew report, their rates of poverty and unemployment also grew more sharply after the recession began.Prolonged recessions do produce dips in the birthrate, but a drop as large as Latinos have experienced is atypical, said William H. Frey, a sociologist and demographer at the Brookings Institution. "It is surprising," Mr. Frey said. "When you hear about a decrease in the birthrate, you don't expect Latinos to be at the forefront of the trend."D'Vera Cohn, a senior writer at the Pew Research Center and an author of the report, said that in past recessions, when overall fertility dipped, "it bounced back over time when the economy got better.""If history repeats itself, that will happen again," she said.But to Mr. Frey, the decrease has signaled much about the aspirations of young Latinos to become full and permanent members of the upwardly mobile middle class, despite the challenges posed by the struggling economy.Jersey Garcia, a 37-year-old public health worker in Miami, is in the first generation of her family to live permanently outside of the Dominican Republic, where her maternal and paternal grandmothers had a total of 27 children."I have two right now," Ms. Garcia said. "It's just a good number that I can handle.""Before, I probably would have been pressured to have more," she added. "I think living in the United States, I don't have family members close by to help me, and it takes a village to raise a child. So the feeling is, keep what you have right now."But that has not been easy. Even with health insurance, Ms. Garcia's preferred method of long-term birth control, an IUD, has been unaffordable. Birth control pills, too, with a $50 co-payment a month, were too costly for her budget. "I couldn't afford it," she said. "So what I've been doing is condoms."According to research by the National Latina Institute for Reproductive Health, the overwhelming majority of Latinas have used contraception at some point in their lives, but they face economic barriers to consistent use. As a consequence, Latinas still experience unintended pregnancy at a rate higher than non-Hispanic whites, according to the institute.And while the share of births to teenage mothers has dropped over the past two decades for all women, the highest share of births to teenage mothers is among native-born Hispanics."There are still a lot of barriers to information and access to contraception that exist," said Jessica Gonzáles-Rojas, 36, the executive director of the institute, who has one son. "We still need to do a lot of work."
Energy drinks are the fastest-growing part of the beverage industry, with sales in the United States reaching more than $10 billion in 2012 — more than Americans spent on iced tea or sports beverages like Gatorade.Their rising popularity represents a generational shift in what people drink, and reflects a successful campaign to convince consumers, particularly teenagers, that the drinks provide a mental and physical edge.The drinks are now under scrutiny by the Food and Drug Administration after reports of deaths and serious injuries that may be linked to their high caffeine levels. But however that review ends, one thing is clear, interviews with researchers and a review of scientific studies show: the energy drink industry is based on a brew of ingredients that, apart from caffeine, have little, if any benefit for consumers."If you had a cup of coffee you are going to affect metabolism in the same way," said Dr. Robert W. Pettitt, an associate professor at Minnesota State University in Mankato, who has studied the drinks.Energy drink companies have promoted their products not as caffeine-fueled concoctions but as specially engineered blends that provide something more. For example, producers claim that "Red Bull gives you wings," that Rockstar Energy is "scientifically formulated" and Monster Energy is a "killer energy brew." Representative Edward J. Markey of Massachusetts, a Democrat, has asked the government to investigate the industry's marketing claims.Promoting a message beyond caffeine has enabled the beverage makers to charge premium prices. A 16-ounce energy drink that sells for $2.99 a can contains about the same amount of caffeine as a tablet of NoDoz that costs 30 cents. Even Starbucks coffee is cheap by comparison; a 12-ounce cup that costs $1.85 has even more caffeine.As with earlier elixirs, a dearth of evidence underlies such claims. Only a few human studies of energy drinks or the ingredients in them have been performed and they point to a similar conclusion, researchers say — that the beverages are mainly about caffeine.Caffeine is called the world's most widely used drug. A stimulant, it increases alertness, awareness and, if taken at the right time, improves athletic performance, studies show. Energy drink users feel its kick faster because the beverages are typically swallowed quickly or are sold as concentrates."These are caffeine delivery systems," said Dr. Roland Griffiths, a researcher at Johns Hopkins University who has studied energy drinks. "They don't want to say this is equivalent to a NoDoz because that is not a very sexy sales message."A scientist at the University of Wisconsin became puzzled as he researched an ingredient used in energy drinks like Red Bull, 5-Hour Energy and Monster Energy. The researcher, Dr. Craig A. Goodman, could not find any trials in humans of the additive, a substance with the tongue-twisting name of glucuronolactone that is related to glucose, a sugar. But Dr. Goodman, who had studied other energy drink ingredients, eventually found two 40-year-old studies from Japan that had examined it.In the experiments, scientists injected large doses of the substance into laboratory rats. Afterward, the rats swam better. "I have no idea what it does in energy drinks," Dr. Goodman said.Energy drink manufacturers say it is their proprietary formulas, rather than specific ingredients, that provide users with physical and mental benefits. But that has not prevented them from implying otherwise.Consider the case of taurine, an additive used in most energy products.On its Web site, the producer of Red Bull, for example, states that "more than 2,500 reports have been published about taurine and its physiological effects," including acting as a "detoxifying agent." In addition, that company, Red Bull of Austria, points to a 2009 safety study by a European regulatory group that gave it a clean bill of health.But Red Bull's Web site does not mention reports by that same group, the European Food Safety Authority, which concluded that claims about the benefits in energy drinks lacked scientific support. Based on those findings, the European Commission has refused to approve claims that taurine helps maintain mental function and heart health and reduces muscle fatigue.Taurine, an amino acidlike substance that got its name because it was first found in the bile of bulls, does play a role in bodily functions, and recent research suggests it might help prevent heart attacks in women with high cholesterol. However, most people get more than adequate amounts from foods like meat, experts said. And researchers added that those with heart problems who may need supplements would find far better sources than energy drinks.
A century ago, Elsie Scheel was the perfect woman. So said a 1912 article in The New York Times about how Miss Scheel, 24, was chosen by the "medical examiner of the 400 'co-eds' " at Cornell University as a woman "whose very presence bespeaks perfect health."Miss Scheel, however, was hardly model-thin. At 5-foot-7 and 171 pounds, she would, by today's medical standards, be clearly overweight. (Her body mass index was 27; 25 to 29.9 is overweight.)But a new report suggests that Miss Scheel may have been onto something. The report on nearly three million people found that those whose B.M.I. ranked them as overweight had less risk of dying than people of normal weight. And while obese people had a greater mortality risk over all, those at the lowest obesity level (B.M.I. of 30 to 34.9) were not more likely to die than normal-weight people.The report, although not the first to suggest this relationship between B.M.I. and mortality, is by far the largest and most carefully done, analyzing nearly 100 studies, experts said.But don't scrap those New Year's weight-loss resolutions and start gorging on fried Belgian waffles or triple cheeseburgers.Experts not involved in the research said it suggested that overweight people need not panic unless they have other indicators of poor health and that depending on where fat is in the body, it might be protective or even nutritional for older or sicker people. But over all, piling on pounds and becoming more than slightly obese remains dangerous."We wouldn't want people to think, 'Well, I can take a pass and gain more weight,' " said Dr. George Blackburn, associate director of Harvard Medical School's nutrition division.Rather, he and others said, the report, in The Journal of the American Medical Association, suggests that B.M.I., a ratio of height to weight, should not be the only indicator of healthy weight."Body mass index is an imperfect measure of the risk of mortality," and factors like blood pressure, cholesterol and blood sugar must be considered, said Dr. Samuel Klein, director of the Center for Human Nutrition at Washington University School of Medicine in St. Louis.Dr. Steven Heymsfield, executive director of the Pennington Biomedical Research Center in Louisiana, who wrote an editorial accompanying the study, said that for overweight people, if indicators like cholesterol "are in the abnormal range, then that weight is affecting you," but that if indicators are normal, there's no reason to "go on a crash diet."Experts also said the data suggested that the definition of "normal" B.M.I., 18.5 to 24.9, should be revised, excluding its lowest weights, which might be too thin.The study did show that the two highest obesity categories (B.M.I. of 35 and up) are at high risk. "Once you have higher obesity, the fat's in the fire," Dr. Blackburn said.But experts also suggested that concepts of fat be refined."Fat per se is not as bad as we thought," said Dr. Kamyar Kalantar-Zadeh, professor of medicine and public health at the University of California, Irvine."What is bad is a type of fat that is inside your belly," he said. "Non-belly fat, underneath your skin in your thigh and your butt area — these are not necessarily bad."He added that, to a point, extra fat is accompanied by extra muscle, which can be healthy.Still, it is possible that overweight or somewhat obese people are less likely to die because they, or their doctors, have identified other conditions associated with weight gain, like high cholesterol or diabetes."You're more likely to be in your doctor's office and more likely to be treated," said Dr. Robert Eckel, a past president of the American Heart Association and a professor at University of Colorado.Some experts said fat could be protective in some cases, although that is unproven and debated. The study did find that people 65 and over had no greater mortality risk even at high obesity."There's something about extra body fat when you're older that is providing some reserve," Dr. Eckel said.And studies on specific illnesses, like heart and kidney disease, have found an "obesity paradox," that heavier patients are less likely to die.Still, death is not everything. Even if "being overweight doesn't increase your risk of dying," Dr. Klein said, it "does increase your risk of having diabetes" or other conditions.Ultimately, said the study's lead author, Katherine Flegal, a senior scientist at the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, "the best weight might depend on the situation you're in."Take the perfect woman, Elsie Scheel, in whose "physical makeup there is not a single defect," the Times article said.This woman who "has never been ill and doesn't know what fear is" loved sports and didn't consume candy, coffee or tea. But she also ate only three meals every two days, and loved beefsteak.Maybe such seeming contradictions made sense against the societal inconsistencies of that time. After all, her post-college plans involved tilling her father's farm, but "if she were a man, she would study mechanical engineering."
What did happen to Elsie Scheel, the "perfect" woman mentioned in an article in Wednesday's New York Times that described how people considered overweight had a slightly lower risk of dying than those of normal weight?A century ago, at age 24, Miss Scheel was the subject of a spate of news media coverage after the "medical examiner of the 400 'co-eds' " at her college, Cornell University, described her as the epitome of "perfect health," according to a 1912 New York Times article. That article and others also gave her dimensions: 5-foot-7 and 171 pounds, which would have corresponded to a body mass index of 27, putting Miss Scheel in the overweight category. Miss Scheel, it turns out, lived a long life, dying in 1979 in St. Cloud, Fla., three days shy of her 91st birthday.But though it may be tempting to conclude that Miss Scheel's longevity exemplifies the benefits of a not-too-low B.M.I, her case is only one anecdote, of course. And, according to family members and to hints provided in early articles, she was a person who valued being active and athletic, had a strong and confident attitude, and, as a daughter of a doctor and a mother of a doctor, may have been steeped in healthy habits that were much more relevant to her survival than her weight."She never took an aspirin or a Tylenol," a granddaughter, Karen Hirsh Meredith, of Broken Arrow, Okla., said in an interview Wednesday. She kept up hobbies like stamp collecting and wrote pieces for the St. Cloud newspaper. And, Ms. Meredith said, "she was still driving late in life."Ms. Meredith said she did not recall her grandmother having any illnesses or being hospitalized except for shortly before she died, when she went into the hospital with stomach pain. She ended up having surgery for a perforated bowel and died the next day, Ms. Meredith said.A death notice said Miss Scheel, who was Mrs. Hirsh when she died, had been a "practical nurse," although Ms. Meredith said the family believed she did not work after she had children. In 1918 she married Frederick Rudolph Hirsh, an architect who supervised the building of the New York Public Library and who was a widower with two children, Frederick Jr. and Mary. He died in 1933 at 68, leaving his wife to raise a son, John, and a daughter, Elise. She moved to Florida from Mount Vernon, N.Y., in the 1940s and never remarried.Miss Scheel's mother, Sophie Bade Scheel, a physician educated at New York Medical College, maintained an active medical practice at a time when relatively few women did. And Miss Scheel may have benefited from good genes: her three siblings were 79, 88 and 93 when they died.Published reports from 1912 and 1913 provide glimpses of the type of person Miss Scheel was and of her immediate-post-"perfect" experience.She participated in many sports, playing basketball at Cornell. "I play a guard, where my weight helps," she told a newspaper. She was a suffragette and, the Times article said, "doesn't know what fear is."She ate only three meals every two days, loved beefsteak and shunned candy and caffeine. An article in The Oregonian asked her about her advice for healthy living, reporting that "Miss Scheel feels that the average girl does too much of the wrong sort of thing — too many dances and not enough good bracing tramps. I just got back from a 25-mile tramp to Enfield Falls."Some of the news media coverage was catty, even brutal. And it was extremely detailed. Her particulars — the size of her chest, waist and hips — were compared to the Venus de Milo.A day after the Times article, The New York Herald ran a story about Miss Scheel above the fold on its front page: "Brooklyn Venus Much Too Large is Verdict of Physical Culturists." These "physical culturists" claimed that Miss Scheel's weight and height "cannot be reconciled with the accepted ideal of female beauty."
WACO, Tex. — With free pregnancy tests and ultrasounds, along with diapers, parenting classes and even temporary housing, pregnancy centers are playing an increasingly influential role in the anti- abortion movement. While most attention has focused on scores of new state laws restricting abortion, the centers have been growing in numbers and gaining state financing and support.Largely run by conservative Christians, the centers say they offer what Roland Warren, head of Care Net, one of the largest pregnancy center organizations, described as "a compassionate approach to this issue."As they expand, they are adding on-call or on-site medical personnel and employing sophisticated strategies to attract women, including Internet search optimization and mobile units near Planned Parenthood clinics."They're really the darlings of the pro-life movement," said Jeanneane Maxon, vice president for external affairs at Americans United for Life, an anti-abortion group. "That ground level, one-on-one, reaching-the-woman-where-she's-at approach."Pregnancy centers, while not new, now number about 2,500, compared with about 1,800 abortion providers. Ms. Maxon estimated that the centers see about a million clients annually, with another million attending abstinence and other programs. Abortion rights advocates have long called some of their approaches deceptive or manipulative. Medical and other experts say some dispense scientifically flawed information, exaggerating abortion's risks.Jean Schroedel, a Claremont Graduate University politics professor, said that "there are some positive aspects" to centers, but that "things pregnant women are told at many of these centers, some of it is really factually suspect."The centers defend their practices and information. "Women who come in are constantly telling us, 'Abortion seems to be my only alternative and I think that's the best thing to do,' " said Peggy Hartshorn, president of Heartbeat International, which she described as a "Christ-centered" organization with 1,100 affiliates. "Centers provide women with the whole choice."One pregnant woman, Nasya Dotie, 21, single, worried about finishing college and disappointing her parents, said she was "almost positive I was going to have an abortion."A friend at her Christian university suggested visiting Care Net of Central Texas. She met with a counselor, went home and considered her options. She returned for an ultrasound, and though planning not to look at the screen, when a clinician offered, she agreed. Then, "I was like, 'That's my baby. I can't not have him.' "Thirteen states now provide some direct financing; 27 offer "Choose Life" license plates, the proceeds from which aid centers. In 2011, Texas increased financing for the centers while cutting family planning money by two-thirds, and required abortion clinics to provide names of centers at least 24 hours before performing abortions. In South Dakota, a 2011 law being challenged by Planned Parenthood requires pregnancy center visits before abortions.Cities like Austin, Baltimore and New York have tried regulating centers with ordinances requiring them to post signs stating that they do not provide abortions or contraceptives, and disclosing whether medical professionals are on-site. Except for San Francisco's, the laws were blocked by courts or softened after centers sued claiming free speech violations. Similar bills in five states floundered. Most legal challenges to "Choose Life" license plates failed, although a North Carolina court said alternate views must be offered.Some observers say harsh anti-abortion statements from the 2012 elections may also benefit pregnancy centers."Do you want some individual politician talking about rape, or some woman who says, 'I care about you'?" Dr. Schroedel said.Conservatives like Rick Santorum, during his presidential campaign, and the Texas governor, Rick Perry, have praised pregnancy centers.Some centers use controversial materials stating that abortion may increase the risk of breast cancer. A brochure issued by Care Net's national organization, for example, says, "A number of reliable studies have concluded that there is an association between abortion and later development of breast cancer."Dr. Otis Brawley, the American Cancer Society's chief medical officer, who calls himself a "pro-life Catholic," said studies showing abortion-breast cancer links are "very weak," while strong studies find no correlation.Other claims include long-term psychological effects. The Care Net brochure says that "many women experience initial relief," but that "women should be informed that abortion significantly increases risk for" clinical depression, suicidal thoughts and behavior, post-traumatic stress disorder and other problems. An American Psychological Association report found no increased risk from one abortion.With largely volunteer staffs and donations from mostly Christian sources, centers usually offer free tests and ultrasounds, services that clinics like Planned Parenthood charge for. They offer advice about baby-rearing or adoption, ask if women are being pressured to abort, and give technical descriptions of abortion and fetal development. Many offer prayer and Bible study.
Around the world, up to 2,000 cases of plague are still reported to the World Health Organization every year, and the ancient disease remains a fearsome threat in many countries, especially in Africa. The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention recently developed a quick test to help diagnose plague that has shown promising results.The test kit consists of a plague "dipstick" that works much like a pregnancy test. A blood sample infected with Yersinia pestis turns an indicator color, enabling a rural clinician to begin administering the antibiotics that are effective in controlling the disease. Without this quick test, it might take days for a blood sample to get to a laboratory to be analyzed, delaying the start of treatment.The plague dipstick is being field-tested in Uganda, where plague is endemic and can spread quickly. The C.D.C. has worked with local clinicians and traditional tribal healers to identify plague. In one case last October, a 27-year old farmer came down with high fever and the telltale swelling, or bubo, linked to plague. A tribal healer trained by the C.D.C. referred him to a local clinic, and the dipstick test administered there confirmed the plague. He was treated immediately and within a day, his fever was gone."The difference between life and death for someone with plague can be a matter of hours," said Dr. Thomas R. Frieden, director of the C.D.C.A single dipstick costs less than a dollar to make. Dr. Frieden said the instrument was in trials, but if approved by the Food and Drug Administration it could be used here in the United States as well as in Africa.
It was November 2002, little more than a year after planes had been flown into the World Trade Center and anthrax mailings had killed five Americans. New York City was still on edge, in a state of high alert for suspected terrorists.Suddenly all eyes were on a middle-aged married couple from Santa Fe, N.M., on a brief vacation to New York, who had the remarkably ill luck to come down with the city's first case of bubonic plague in more than a century. Television news trucks surrounded Beth Israel Medical Center North, where they had dragged themselves after being stricken in their hotel room with rampaging fevers, headaches, extreme exhaustion and mysterious balloonlike swellings.It took just over a day for public health officials to dispel fears about bioterrorism; there had been no unusual rise in the number of very high fevers that could have suggested an attack.It turned out that the couple, Lucinda Marker and John Tull, had been bitten by fleas infected with Yersinia pestis, the bacterium that causes plague. Their home state, New Mexico, accounts for more than half of the average seven cases of plague in the country every year. (In 2012, just one case was reported in the state.)"It was an absolute fluke," Ms. Marker, now 57, said during a recent visit to New York. "Just rotten luck."Like most people who contract the disease and are quickly treated with antibiotics, she recovered in a few days. But 10 years later, her husband is still badly scarred.In the days after they were bitten, Mr. Tull, a burly, athletic lawyer — a former prosecutor who volunteered with search-and-rescue teams — developed septicemic plague, as the infection spread throughout his body.His temperature rose to 104.4, his blood pressure plummeted to 78/50. His kidneys were failing, and so much clotted blood collected in his hands and feet that they turned black.Mr. Tull was put into a medically induced coma. When he was brought out of it, nearly three months later, he found out that both his legs had been amputated below the knee to drain the deadly infection. The surgery that saved his life radically changed it, but did not dampen his resilient spirit.Even before he was released from the hospital to begin a long rehabilitation, he vowed he would once again be hiking on the rustic trails above his home.Today Mr. Tull, 63, drives his own car, sometimes takes over the controls of a private plane, and goes on an annual trout-fishing trip to Colorado with friends. But he has not been able to hike that trail."That is one of the things I miss most," Mr. Tull, now retired and receiving a disability pension, said in a telephone interview from his home. "Every single hour of every single day, the plague affects our lives, but about the only time I really get angry these days is when, because of my physical condition, there is something I want to do but can't."He has appeared in several television documentaries, speaking to medical researchers around the world and dealing with a posse of journalists as his very private ordeal has been played out in public."Basically Lucinda and I surrendered our privacy to the press and the people who make documentaries," Mr. Tull said. "But you know what? That didn't bother us a bit. Lucinda had been an actress and I had been a trial lawyer. We were used to it."Ms. Marker, who has started to write about their ordeal, says that after 10 years she is coming to terms with it emotionally and psychologically. Yet many aspects of their case still puzzle medical experts.In particular, no one knows why she was so easily cured while he nearly died.Bubonic plague is transmitted by fleas that feed off pack rats, ground squirrels and prairie dogs in the mountains of New Mexico and several other states. According to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, the disease probably came to the United States around 1900, in Asian rats that escaped from ships in the port of San Francisco.Initially, plague was restricted to cities. The worst outbreak came in 1907, after the San Francisco earthquake. Vermin control programs prevented further outbreaks, but fleas hitched onto other animals in the wild.Dr. Paul Ettestad, public health veterinarian for the New Mexico Department of Health, said prairie dogs became an "amplification host," carrying the disease to their burrows and spreading it throughout their territory. Today, the easternmost limit of the plague roughly corresponds to the 100th meridian, which passes through central Texas. Known as the plague line, is it also the extent of the prairie dog population.
Most adolescents who plan or attempt suicide have already received at least some mental health treatment, raising questions about the effectiveness of current approaches to helping troubled youths, according to the largest in-depth analysis to date of suicidal behaviors in American teenagers.The study, in the journal JAMA Psychiatry, found that 55 percent of suicidal teenagers had received some therapy before they thought about suicide, planned it or tried to kill themselves, contradicting the widely held belief that suicide is due in part to a lack of access to treatment.The findings, based on interviews with a nationwide sample of more than 6,000 teenagers and at least one parent of each, linked suicidal behavior to complex combinations of mood disorders like depression and behavior problems like attention-deficit and eating disorders, as well as alcohol and drug abuse.The study found that about one in eight teenagers had persistent suicidal thoughts at some point, and that about a third of those who had suicidal thoughts had made an attempt, usually within a year of having the idea.Previous studies have had similar findings, based on smaller, regional samples. But the new study is the first to suggest, in a large nationwide sample, that access to treatment does not make a big difference.The study suggests that effective treatment for severely suicidal teenagers must address not just mood disorders, but also behavior problems that can lead to impulsive acts, experts said. According to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, 1,386 people between the ages of 13 and 18 committed suicide in 2010, the latest year for which numbers are available."I think one of the take-aways here is that treatment for depression may be necessary but not sufficient to prevent kids from attempting suicide," said Dr. David Brent, a professor of psychiatry at the University of Pittsburgh, who was not involved in the study. "We simply do not have empirically validated treatments for recurrent suicidal behavior."The report said nothing about whether the therapies given were state of the art or carefully done, said Matt Nock, a professor of psychology at Harvard and the lead author, and it is possible that some of the treatments prevented suicide attempts. "But it's telling us we've got a long way to go to do this right," Dr. Nock said. His co-authors included Ronald C. Kessler of Harvard and researchers from Boston University and Children's Hospital Boston.Margaret McConnell, a consultant in Alexandria, Va., said her daughter Alice, who killed herself in 2006 at the age of 17, was getting treatment at the time. "I think there might have been some carelessness in the way the treatment was done," Ms. McConnell said, "and I was trusting a 17-year-old to manage her own medication. We found out after we lost her that she wasn't taking it regularly."In the study, researchers surveyed 6,483 adolescents from the ages of 13 to 18 and found that 9 percent of male teenagers and 15 percent of female teenagers experienced some stretch of having persistent suicidal thoughts. Among girls, 5 percent made suicide plans and 6 percent made at least one attempt (some were unplanned).Among boys, 3 percent made plans and 2 percent carried out attempts, which tended to be more lethal than girls' attempts.Over all, about one-third of teenagers with persistent suicidal thoughts went on to make an attempt to take their own lives.Almost all of the suicidal adolescents in the study qualified for some psychiatric diagnosis, whether depression, phobias or generalized anxiety disorder. Those with an added behavior problem — attention-deficit disorder, substance abuse, explosive anger — were more likely to act on thoughts of self-harm, the study found.Doctors have tested a range of therapies to prevent or reduce recurrent suicidal behaviors, with mixed success. Medications can ease depression, but in some cases they can increase suicidal thinking. Talk therapy can contain some behavior problems, but not all.One approach, called dialectical behavior therapy, has proved effective in reducing hospitalizations and suicide attempts in, among others, people with borderline personality disorder, who are highly prone to self-harm.But suicidal teenagers who have a mixture of mood and behavior issues are difficult to reach. In one 2011 study, researchers at George Mason University reduced suicide attempts, hospitalizations, drinking and drug use among suicidal adolescent substance abusers. The study found that a combination of intensive treatments — talk therapy for mood problems, family-based therapy for behavior issues and patient-led reduction in drug use — was more effective than regular therapies."But that's just one study, and it's small," said Dr. Brent of the University of Pittsburgh. "We can treat components of the overall problem, but that's about all."Ms. McConnell said that her daughter's depression had seemed mild and that there was no warning that she would take her life. "I think therapy does help a lot of people, if it's handled right," she said.
The Pap test, which has prevented countless deaths from cervical cancer , may eventually help to detect cancers of the uterus and ovaries as well, a new study suggests.For the first time, researchers have found genetic material from uterine or ovarian cancers in Pap smears, meaning that it may become possible to detect three diseases with just one routine test.But the research is early, years away from being used in medical practice, and there are caveats. The women studied were already known to have cancer, and while the Pap test found 100 percent of the uterine cancers, it detected only 41 percent of the ovarian cancers. And the approach has not yet been tried in women who appear healthy, to determine whether it can find early signs of uterine or ovarian cancer.On the other hand, even a 41 percent detection rate would be better than the status quo in ovarian cancer, particularly if the detection extends to early stages. The disease is usually advanced by the time it is found, and survival rates are poor. About 22,280 new cases were expected in the United States in 2012, and 15,500 deaths. Improved tests are urgently needed.Uterine cancer has a better prognosis, but still kills around 8,000 women a year in the United States.These innovative applications of the Pap test are part of a new era in which advances in genetics are being applied to the detection of a wide variety of cancers or precancerous conditions. Scientists are learning to find minute bits of mutant DNA in tissue samples or bodily fluids that may signal the presence of hidden or incipient cancers.Ideally, the new techniques would find the abnormalities early enough to cure the disease or even prevent it entirely. But it is too soon to tell."Is this the harbinger of things to come? I would answer yes," said Dr. Bert Vogelstein, director of the Ludwig Center for Cancer Genetics and Therapeutics at Johns Hopkins University, and a senior author of a report on the Pap test study published on Wednesday in the journal Science Translational Medicine. He said the genomes of more than 50 types of tumors had been sequenced, and researchers were trying to take advantage of the information.Similar studies are under way or are being considered to look for mutant DNA in blood, stool, urine and sputum, both to detect cancer and also to monitor the response to treatment in people known to have the disease.But researchers warn that such tests, used for screening, can be a double-edged sword if they give false positive results that send patients down a rabbit hole of invasive tests and needless treatments. Even a test that finds only real cancers may be unable to tell aggressive, dangerous ones apart from indolent ones that might never do any harm, leaving patients to decide whether to watch and wait or to go through surgery, chemotherapy and radiation with all the associated risks and side effects."Will they start recovering mutations that are not cancer-related?" asked Dr. Christopher P. Crum, a professor at Harvard Medical School who was not involved in the research.But he also called the study a "great proof of principle," and said, "Any whisper of hope to women who suffer from endometrial or ovarian cancer would be most welcome."DNA testing is already performed on samples from Pap tests, to look for the human papillomavirus, or HPV, which causes cervical cancer. Dr. Vogelstein and his team decided to try DNA testing for cancer. They theorized that cells or DNA shed from cancers of the ovaries and the uterine lining, or endometrium, might reach the cervix and turn up in Pap smears.The team picked common mutations found in these cancers, and looked for them in tumor samples from 24 women with endometrial cancer and 22 with ovarian cancer. All the cancers had one or more of the common mutations.Then, the researchers performed Pap tests on the same women, and looked for the same DNA mutations in the Pap specimens. They found the mutations in 100 percent of the women with endometrial cancer, but in only 9 of the 22 with ovarian cancer. The test identified two of the four ovarian cancers that had been diagnosed at an early stage.Finally, the team developed a test that would look simultaneously for cancer-associated mutations in 12 different genes in Pap samples. Used in a control sample of 14 healthy women, the test found no mutations — meaning no false-positive results.Dr. Luis A. Diaz, the other senior author of the report and an associate professor of oncology at Johns Hopkins, called the research a step toward a screening test that at first blush appears very effective at detecting endometrial cancer, though obviously less so at finding ovarian cancer."Probably one of the most exciting features of this approach," Dr. Diaz said, "is that we wanted a test that would seamlessly integrate with routine medical practice that could be utilized with the same test that women get every day all over the world, the Pap smear."But, he added: "We can't say it's ready for prime time. Like all good science, it needs to be validated."He and other members of the team said it might be possible to improve the detection rate for ovarian cancer by looking for more mutations and by changing the technique of performing Pap tests to increase the likelihood of capturing cells from the ovary. The change might involve timing the test to a certain point in a woman's monthly cycle, using a longer brush to collect cells from deeper within the cervix or prescribing a drug that would raise the odds of cells being shed from the ovary.The technique also needs to be tested in much larger groups of women, including healthy ones, to find out whether it works, particularly at finding cancers early enough to improve survival. And studies must also find out whether it generates false positive results, or identifies cancers that might not actually need to be treated.Michael H. Melner, a program director in molecular genetics and biochemistry for the American Cancer Society, called the research "very promising," in part because it is based on finding mutations."It tells you not just that cancer is there, but which mutation is there," Dr. Melner said. "As we learn more and more about which mutations are associated with more or less severe forms of cancer, it's more information, and possibly more diagnostic."
It is not your imagination — more people you know are sick this winter, even people who have had flu shots.The country is in the grip of three emerging flu or flulike epidemics: an early start to the annual flu season with an unusually aggressive virus, a surge in a new type of norovirus, and the worst whooping cough outbreak in 60 years. And these are all developing amid the normal winter highs for the many viruses that cause symptoms on the "colds and flu" spectrum.Influenza is widespread, and causing local crises. On Wednesday, Boston's mayor declared a public health emergency as cases flooded hospital emergency rooms.Google's national flu trend maps, which track flu-related searches, are almost solid red (for "intense activity") and the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention's weekly FluView maps, which track confirmed cases, are nearly solid brown (for "widespread activity")."Yesterday, I saw a construction worker, a big strong guy in his Carhartts who looked like he could fall off a roof without noticing it," said Dr. Beth Zeeman, an emergency room doctor for MetroWest Medical Center in Framingham, Mass., just outside Boston. "He was in a fetal position with fever and chills, like a wet rag. When I see one of those cases, I just tighten up my mask a little."Massachusetts General Hospital in Boston started asking visitors with even mild cold symptoms to wear masks and to avoid maternity wards. The hospital has treated 532 confirmed influenza patients this season and admitted 167, even more than it did by this date during the 2009-10 swine flu pandemic.At Brigham and Women's Hospital, 100 patients were crowded into spaces licensed for 53. Beds lined halls and pressed against vending machines. Overflow patients sat on benches in the lobby wearing surgical masks."Today was the first time I think I was experiencing my first pandemic," said Heidi Crim, the nursing director, who saw both the swine flu and SARS outbreaks here. Adding to the problem, she said, many staff members were at home sick and supplies like flu test swabs were running out.Nationally, deaths and hospitalizations are still below epidemic thresholds. But experts do not expect that to remain true. Pneumonia usually shows up in national statistics only a week or two after emergency rooms report surges in cases, and deaths start rising a week or two after that, said Dr. Gregory A. Poland, a vaccine specialist at the Mayo Clinic in Minnesota. The predominant flu strain circulating is an H3N2, which typically kills more people than the H1N1 strains that usually predominate; the relatively lethal 2003-4 "Fujian flu" season was overwhelmingly H3N2.No cases have been resistant to Tamiflu, which can ease symptoms if taken within 48 hours, and this year's flu shot is well-matched to the H3N2 strain, the C.D.C. said. Flu shots are imperfect, especially in the elderly, whose immune systems may not be strong enough to produce enough antibodies.Simultaneously, the country is seeing a large and early outbreak of norovirus, the "cruise ship flu" or "stomach flu," said Dr. Aron J. Hall of the C.D.C.'s viral gastroenterology branch. It includes a new strain, which first appeared in Australia and is known as the Sydney 2012 variant.This week, Maine's health department said that state was seeing a large spike in cases. Cities across Canada reported norovirus outbreaks so serious that hospitals were shutting down whole wards for disinfection because patients were getting infected after moving into the rooms of those who had just recovered. The classic symptoms of norovirus are "explosive" diarrhea and "projectile" vomiting, which can send infectious particles flying yards away."I also saw a woman I'm sure had norovirus," Dr. Zeeman said. "She said she'd gone to the bathroom 14 times at home and 4 times since she came into the E.R. You can get dehydrated really quickly that way."This month, the C.D.C. said the United States was having its biggest outbreak of pertussis in 60 years; there were about 42,000 confirmed cases, the highest total since 1955. The disease is unrelated to flu but causes a hacking, constant cough and breathlessness. While it is unpleasant, adults almost always survive; the greatest danger is to infants, especially premature ones with undeveloped lungs. Of the 18 recorded deaths in 2012, all but three were of infants under age 1.That outbreak is worst in cold-weather states, including Colorado, Washington, Wisconsin, Minnesota and Vermont.Although most children are vaccinated several times against pertussis, those shots wear off with age. It is possible, the authorities said, that a new, safer vaccine introduced in the 1990s gives protection that does not last as long, so more teenagers and adults are vulnerable.And, Dr. Poland said, if many New Yorkers are catching laryngitis, as has been reported, it is probably a rhinovirus. "It's typically a sore, really scratchy throat, and you sometimes lose your voice," he said.Though flu cases in New York City are rising rapidly, the city health department has no plans to declare an emergency, largely because of concern that doing so would drive mildly sick people to emergency rooms, said Dr. Jay K. Varma, deputy director for disease control. The city would prefer people went to private doctors or, if still healthy, to pharmacies for flu shots. Nursing homes have had worrisome outbreaks, he said, and nine elderly patients have died. Homes need to be more alert, vaccinate patients, separate those who fall ill and treat them faster with antivirals, he said.Dr. Susan I. Gerber of the C.D.C.'s respiratory diseases branch, said her agency has not seen any unusual spike of rhinovirus, parainfluenza, adenovirus, coronavirus or the dozens of other causes of the "common cold," but the country is having its typical winter surge of some, like respiratory syncytial virus "that can mimic flulike symptoms, especially in young children."The C.D.C. and the local health authorities continue to advocate getting flu shots. Although it takes up to two weeks to build immunity, "we don't know if the season has peaked yet," said Dr. Joseph Bresee, chief of prevention in the agency's flu division.Flu shots and nasal mists contain vaccines against three strains, the H3N2, the H1N1 and a B. Thus far this season, Dr. Bresee said, H1N1 cases have been rare, and the H3N2 component has been a good match against almost all the confirmed H3N2 samples the agency has tested.About a fifth of all flus this year thus far are from B strains. That part of the vaccine is a good match only 70 percent of the time, because two B's are circulating.For that reason, he said, flu shots are being reformulated. Within two years, they said, most will contain vaccines against both B strains.Joanna Constantine, 28, a stylist at the Guy Thomas Hair Salon on West 56th Street in Manhattan, said she recently was so sick that she was off work and in bed for five days — and silenced by laryngitis for four of them.She did not have the classic flu symptoms — a high fever, aches and chills — so she knew it was probably something else.Still, she said, it scared her enough that she will get a flu shot next year. She had not bothered to get one since her last pregnancy, she said. But she has a 7-year-old son and a 5-year-old daughter, "and my little guys get theirs every year."
WASHINGTON — For two decades, millions of Americans have taken Ambien to help them sleep at night. But for years, the Food and Drug Administration has gotten complaints that people felt drowsy the morning after taking the medicine or its successors, and sometimes got into car accidents.On Thursday the agency said that women should be taking half as much, after laboratory studies and driving tests confirming the risks of drowsiness.The new recommendation applies to drugs containing the active ingredient zolpidem, by far the most widely used sleep aid. Using lower doses means less of the drug will remain in the blood in the morning hours, and will reduce the risk that people who use it will be impaired while driving.Sleeping pills have boomed in popularity with the increasingly frantic pace of modern American life. According to IMS, a health care information and technology company, about 60 million prescriptions were dispensed in 2011, up about 20 percent since 2006. About 40 million were for products containing zolpidem.The agency's announcement was focused on women because they take longer to metabolize the drug than men. An estimated 10 percent to 15 percent of women will have a level of zolpidem in their blood that could impair driving eight hours after taking the pill, while only about 3 percent of men do, said Dr. Robert Temple, an official in the agency's Center for Drug Evaluation and Research.Reports of aftereffects from sleeping pills have circulated for years, and some doctors questioned why the drug agency took so long to act. Mishaps with sleepy driving — and even strange acts of texting, eating or having sex in the night without any memory of it in the morning — have long been familiar to the medical community."In this case, the F.D.A. may be behind the eight ball," said Daniel Carlat, an associate clinical professor of psychiatry at Tufts University, referring to residual drowsiness. "Few doctors will be surprised hearing about this. They'll say, 'Oh yeah, we've already seen this in our patients.' "He added that Thursday's announcement "will be good for public health because it will get patients to ask their doctors about the appropriate dosage."Agency officials acknowledged that they had received about 700 reports of driving mishaps with people on zolpidem over the years, with a spike in 2007 after a change in labeling caused more people to call in complaints. But they said it was not easy to draw a direct connection between the reports and the drug. Patients often did not remember what time they took the pill. Sometimes they had been drinking.It was not until the drug agency reviewed driving simulation studies from controlled trials of the drug Intermezzo, which was approved in 2011 for middle-of-the-night waking, that a more complete picture of the risks emerged. The agency linked the driving simulation information with data from manufacturers on the amount of zolpidem in patients' blood and determined that levels above about 50 nanograms per milliliter increased the risk of crashing while driving, said Dr. Ellis Unger, an official at the agency's Center for Drug Evaluation and Research.Dr. Unger said that all makers of new sleeping drugs would now be asked to conduct driving trials; a spokeswoman clarified that it would not be required."A lot of people are wondering about the elephant in the room," Dr. Unger said. "Why did this take so long? This is science, and our thinking evolves over time."The drug agency told manufacturers that the recommended dose for women should be lowered to 5 milligrams from 10 for immediate-release products like Ambien, Edluar and Zolpimist. Doses for extended-release products should be lowered to 6.25 milligrams from 12.5, the agency said. Most sleeping drugs containing zolpidem are now generic.For men, the agency informed manufacturers that labels should recommend that health care providers should "consider" prescribing lower doses.Patients taking the higher doses should continue them for the time being, officials said, but should consult with their doctors about lowering them. Doctors can still prescribe the higher dose if the lower one does not work. The lower doses are already commercially available, Dr. Unger said, as they are recommended for older patients.Sanofi, the manufacturer of Ambien and Ambien CR, said in a statement that people taking zolpidem "should always talk to their doctor about the most appropriate dose," and that the label "provides important information" to determine what that is. The company added that it "stands behind the significant clinical data demonstrating the safety and efficacy of Ambien."Zolpidem has also been known to cause sleepwalking incidents, and Dr. Unger said there was evidence that the lower dose might ease such events, though it is weaker than the evidence about next-morning drowsiness. Dr. Carlat said one of his patients discovered that her weight gain while on the drug was from midnight trips to the kitchen that she did not even remember taking.Dr. Daniel Kripke, professor emeritus of psychiatry at the University of California, San Diego, and a leading critic of sleeping pills, welcomed the move but said the agency was still not doing enough to investigate other possible side effects."It's a very small step in the right direction," he said. He added that sleeping medications like zolpidem might increase total sleep time by 20 minutes a night, but that most studies suggest that the use of sleeping pills impairs a person's performance the next day.Critics of the drug agency said the label on Intermezzo, which very clearly denotes the risks for women, indicates that the agency was aware of these problems earlier.But Thomas Roth, director of the sleep center at Henry Ford Hospital in Detroit who has been a consultant to sleeping pill makers, said that the drug agency had always been concerned about the potential risks with driving, "but they care about it more now." He said he believed the lower dose would still be effective for many patients.Agency officials say all patients are unique and doses will need to be tailored. They say the drugs should be prescribed at the lowest dose required to treat a patient's insomnia.Dr. Daniel J. Buysse, professor of psychiatry at the University of Pittsburgh School of Medicine, says he already prescribes the lower dose when he feels it is necessary, by telling patients to cut a tablet in half along the score."This just tells me, maybe be a little bit more cautious," said Dr. Buysse, who has been a consultant for drug companies including the maker of Ambien. "But I do not think it will have a big effect on what I do."
HUNTINGTON PARK, Calif. — The "bodega clinicas" that line the bustling commercial streets of immigrant neighborhoods around Los Angeles are wedged between money order kiosks and pawnshops. These storefront offices, staffed with Spanish-speaking medical providers, treat ailments for cash: a doctor's visit is $20 to $40; a cardiology exam is $120; and at one bustling clinic, a colonoscopy is advertised on an erasable board for $700.County health officials describe the clinics as a parallel health care system, serving a vast number of uninsured Latino residents. Yet they say they have little understanding of who owns and operates them, how they are regulated and what quality of medical care they provide. Few of these low-rent corner clinics accept private insurance or participate in Medicaid managed care plans."Someone has to figure out if there's a basic level of competence," said Dr. Patrick Dowling, the chairman of the family medicine department at the David Geffen School of Medicine at the University of California, Los Angeles.Not that researchers have not tried. Dr. Dowling, for one, has canvassed the clinics for years to document physician shortages as part of his research for the state. What he and others found was that the owners were reluctant to answer questions. Indeed, multiple attempts in recent weeks to interview owners and employees at a half-dozen of the clinics in Southern California proved fruitless.What is certain, however, is that despite their name, many of these clinics are actually private doctor's offices, not licensed clinics, which are required to report regularly to federal and state oversight bodies.It is a distinction that deeply concerns Kimberly Wyard, the chief executive of the Northeast Valley Health Corporation, a nonprofit group that runs 13 accredited health clinics for low-income Southern Californians. "They are off the radar screen," said Ms. Wyard of the bodega clinicas, "and it's unclear what they're doing."But with deadlines set by the federal Affordable Care Act quickly approaching, health officials in Los Angeles are vexed over whether to embrace the clinics and bring them — selectively and gingerly — into the network of tightly regulated public and nonprofit health centers that are driven more by mission than by profit to serve the uninsured.Health officials see in the clinics an opportunity to fill persistent and profound gaps in the county's strained safety net, including a chronic shortage of primary care physicians. By January 2014, up to two million uninsured Angelenos will need to enroll in Medicaid or buy insurance and find primary care.And the clinics, public health officials point out, are already well established in the county's poorest neighborhoods, where they are meeting the needs of Spanish-speaking residents. The clinics also could continue to serve a market that the Affordable Care Act does not touch: illegal immigrants who are prohibited from getting health insurance under the law.Dr. Mark Ghaly, the deputy director of community health for the Los Angeles County Department of Health Services, said bodega clinicas — a term he seems to have coined — that agree to some scrutiny could be a good way of addressing the physician shortage in those neighborhoods."Where are we going to find those providers?" he said. "One logical place to consider looking is these clinics."Los Angeles is not the only city with a sizable Latino population where the clinics have become a part of the streetscape. Health care providers in Phoenix and Miami say there are clinics in many Latino neighborhoods.But their presence in parts of the Los Angeles area can be striking, with dozens in certain areas. Visits to more than two dozen clinics in South Los Angeles and the San Fernando Valley found Latino women in brightly colored scrubs handing out cards and coupons that promised a range of services like pregnancy tests and endoscopies. Others advertised evening and weekend hours, and some were open around the clock.Such all-hours access and upfront pricing are critical, Latino health experts say, to a population that often works around the clock for low wages.Also important, officials say, is that new immigrants from Mexico and Central America are more accustomed to corner clinics, which are common in their home countries, than to the sprawling medical complexes or large community health centers found in the United States. And they can get the kind of medical treatments — including injections of hypertension drugs, intravenous vitamins and liberally dispensed antibiotics — that are frowned upon in traditional American medicine.The waiting rooms at the clinics reflected the everyday maladies of peoples' lives: a glassy-eyed child resting listlessly on his mother's lap, a fit-looking young woman waiting with a bag of ice on her wrist, a pensive middle-aged man in work boots staring straight ahead.For many ordinary complaints, the medical care at these clinics may be suitable, county health officials and medical experts say. But they say problems arise when an illness exceeds the boundaries of a physician's skills or the patient's ability to pay cash.Dr. Raul Joaquin Bendana, who has been practicing general medicine in South Los Angeles for more than 20 years, said the clinics would refer patients to him when, for example, they had uncontrolled diabetes. "They refer to me because they don't know how to handle the situation," he said.The clinic physicians by and large appear to have current medical licenses, a sample showed, but experts say they are unlikely to be board certified or have admitting privileges at area hospitals. That can mean that some clinics try to treat patients who face serious illness.Olivia Cardenas, 40, a restaurant worker who lives in Woodland Hills, Calif., got a free Pap smear at a clinic that advertises "especialistas," including in gynecology. The test came back abnormal, and the doctor told Ms. Cardenas that she had cervical cancer. "Come back in a week with $5,000 in cash, and I'll operate on you," Ms. Cardenas said the doctor told her. "Otherwise you could die."She declined to pay the $5,000. Instead, a family friend helped her apply for Medicaid, and she went to a hospital. The diagnosis, it turned out, was correct.Health care experts say the clinics' medical practices would come under greater scrutiny if they were brought closer into the fold.But being connected would mean the clinics' cash-only business model would need to change. Dr. Dowling said the lure of newly insured patients in 2014 might draw them in. "To the extent there are payments available," he said, "the legitimate ones might step up to the plate."
No one but a deeply disturbed individual marches into an elementary school or a movie theater and guns down random, innocent people.That hard fact drives the public longing for a mental health system that produces clear warning signals and can somehow stop the violence. And it is now fueling a surge in legislative activity, in Washington and New York.But these proposed changes and others like them may backfire and only reveal how broken the system is, experts said."Anytime you have one of these tragic cases like Newtown, it's going to expose deficiencies in the mental health system, and provide some opportunity for reform," said Richard J. Bonnie, a professor of public policy at the University of Virginia's law school who led a state commission that overhauled policies after the 2007 Virginia Tech shootings that left 33 people dead. "But you have to be very careful not to overreact."New York State legislators on Tuesday passed a gun bill that would require therapists to report to the authorities any client thought to be "likely to engage in" violent behavior; under the law, the police would confiscate any weapons the person had.And in Washington, lawmakers said that President Obama was considering a range of actions as part of a plan to reduce gun violence, including more sharing of records between mental health and law enforcement agencies.The White House plan to make use of mental health data was still taking shape late Tuesday. But several ideas being discussed — including the reporting provision in the New York gun law — are deeply contentious and transcend political differences.Some advocates favored the reporting provision as having the potential to prevent a massacre. Among them was D. J. Jaffe, founder of the Mental Illness Policy Org., which pushes for more aggressive treatment policies. Some mass killers "were seen by mental health professionals who did not have to report their illness or that they were becoming dangerous and they went on to kill," he said.Yet many patient advocates and therapists strongly disagreed, saying it would intrude into the doctor-patient relationship in a way that could dissuade troubled people from speaking their minds, and complicate the many judgment calls therapists already have to make.The New York statute requires doctors and other mental health professionals to report any person who "is likely to engage in conduct that would result in serious harm to self or others."Under current ethical guidelines, only involuntary hospitalizations (and direct threats made by patients) are reported to the authorities. These reports then appear on a federal background-check database. The new laws would go further."The way I read the new law, it means I have to report voluntary as well as involuntary hospitalizations, as well as many people being treated for suicidal thinking, for instance, as outpatients," said Dr. Paul S. Appelbaum, director of the Division of Law, Ethics, and Psychiatry at Columbia University's medical school. "That is a much larger group of people than before, and most of whom will never be a serious threat to anyone."One fundamental problem with looking for "warning signs" is that it is more art than science. People with serious mental disorders, while more likely to commit aggressive acts than the average person, account for only about 4 percent of violent crimes over all.The rate is higher when it comes to rampage or serial killings, closer to 20 percent, according to Dr. Michael Stone, a New York forensic psychiatrist who has a database of about 200 mass and serial killers. He has concluded from the records that about 40 were likely to have had paranoid schizophrenia or severe depression or were psychopathic, meaning they were impulsive and remorseless."But most mass murders are done by working-class men who've been jilted, fired, or otherwise humiliated — and who then undergo a crisis of rage and get out one of the 300 million guns in our country and do their thing," Dr. Stone said.The sort of young, troubled males who seem to psychiatrists most likely to commit school shootings — identified because they have made credible threats — often do not qualify for any diagnosis, experts said. They might have elements of paranoia, of deep resentment, or of narcissism, a grandiose self-regard, that are noticeable but do not add up to any specific "disorder" according to strict criteria.
African-Americans who live in highly segregated counties are considerably more likely to die from lung cancer than those in counties that are less segregated, a new study has found.The study was the first to look at segregation as a factor in lung cancer mortality. Its authors said they could not fully explain why it worsens the odds of survival for African-Americans, but hypothesized that blacks in more segregated areas may be less likely to have health insurance or access to health care and specialty doctors. It is also possible that lower levels of education mean they are less likely to seek care early, when medical treatment could make a big difference. Racial bias in the health care system might also be a factor."If you want to learn about someone's health, follow him home," said Dr. Awori J. Hayanga, a heart and lung surgeon at the University of Pittsburgh Medical Center, who was the lead author of the study.The study, published in JAMA Surgery on Wednesday, divided all counties in the country into three levels of segregation: high, medium and low. It found that lung cancer mortality rates, a ratio of deaths to a population, were about 20 percent higher for blacks who lived in the most segregated counties, than for blacks living in the least segregated counties.Lung cancer is the top cause of preventable death in the United States. Blacks have the highest incidence of it and are also more likely to die from it. For every million black males, 860 will die from lung cancer, compared with 620 among every million white males. The rates were calculated over the period of the study, from 2003 to 2007.The study drew on federal mortality data from that period, and segregation data from about a third of United States counties that had African-American populations large enough to measure. About 28 percent of Americans live in counties with low segregation, 40 percent in counties with moderate segregation and 32 percent in counties with high segregation.The gap in outcomes persisted even after accounting for differences in smoking rates and socio-economic status, Dr. Hayanga said.For whites, high levels of segregation had the opposite effect, a finding that surprised the authors. Whites who lived in highly segregated counties had about 6 percent lower mortality rates from lung cancer than those who lived in the least segregated counties, though researchers pointed out that the difference was slight enough that it was not clear whether it was meaningful.Dr. David Chang, director of outcomes research at the University of California San Diego Department of Surgery, who wrote an accompanying editorial, said he hoped that the study would focus attention on the environmental factors involved in the stark disparities in health outcomes in the United States because they lend themselves to change through policy. Medical researchers tend to focus on factors that are harder to change, like the genetics and the behaviors of individuals."We don't need drugs or genetic explanations to fix a lot of the health care problems we have," he said.
Doctors have long believed that disabling autistic disorders last a lifetime, but a new study has found that some children who exhibit signature symptoms of the disorder recover completely.The study, posted online on Wednesday by the Journal of Child Psychology and Psychiatry, is the largest to date of such extraordinary cases and is likely to alter the way that scientists and parents think and talk about autism, experts said.Researchers on Wednesday cautioned against false hope. The findings suggest that the so-called autism spectrum contains a small but significant group who make big improvements in behavioral therapy for unknown, perhaps biological reasons, but that most children show much smaller gains. Doctors have no way to predict which children will do well.Researchers have long known that between 1 and 20 percent of children given an autism diagnosis no longer qualify for one a few years or more later. They have suspected that in most cases the diagnosis was mistaken; the rate of autism diagnosis has ballooned over the past two decades, and some research suggests that it has been loosely applied.The new study should put some of that skepticism to rest."This is the first solid science to address this question of possible recovery, and I think it has big implications," said Sally Ozonoff of the MIND Institute at the University of California, Davis, who was not involved in the research. "I know many of us as would rather have had our tooth pulled than use the word 'recover,' it was so unscientific. Now we can use it, though I think we need to stress that it's rare."She and other experts said the findings strongly supported the value of early diagnosis and treatment.In the study, a team led by Deborah Fein of the University of Connecticut at Storrs recruited 34 people who had been diagnosed before the age of 5 and no longer had any symptoms. They ranged in age from 8 to 21 years old and early in their development were in the higher-than-average range of the autism spectrum. The team conducted extensive testing of its own, including interviews with parents in some cases, to gauge current social and communication skills.The debate over whether recovery is possible has simmered for decades and peaked in 1987, when the pioneering autism researcher O. Ivar Lovaas reported that 47 percent of children with the diagnosis showed full recovery after undergoing a therapy he had devised. This therapy, a behavioral approach in which increments of learned skills garner small rewards, is the basis for the most effective approach used today; still, many were skeptical and questioned his definition of recovery.Dr. Fein and her team used standardized, widely used measures and found no differences between the group of 34 formerly diagnosed people and a group of 34 matched control subjects who had never had a diagnosis."They no longer qualified for the diagnosis," said Dr. Fein, whose co-authors include researchers from Queens University in Kingston, Ontario; Children's Hospital of Philadelphia; the Institute of Living in Hartford; and the Child Mind Institute in New York. "I want to stress to parents that it's a minority of kids who are able to do this, and no one should think they somehow missed the boat if they don't get this outcome."On measures of social and communication skills, the recovered group scored significantly better than 44 peers who had a diagnosis of high-functioning autism or Asperger's syndrome.Dr. Fein emphasized the importance of behavioral therapy. "These people did not just grow out of their autism," she said. "I have been treating children for 40 years and never seen improvements like this unless therapists and parents put in years of work."The team plans further research to learn more about those who are able to recover. No one knows which ingredients or therapies are most effective, if any, or if there are patterns of behavior or biological markers that predict such success."Some children who do well become quite independent as adults but have significant anxiety and depression and are sometimes suicidal," said Dr. Fred Volkmar, the director of the Child Study Center at the Yale University School of Medicine. There are no studies of this group, he said.That, because of the new study, is about to change.
The genetic data posted online seemed perfectly anonymous — strings of billions of DNA letters from more than 1,000 people. But all it took was some clever sleuthing on the Web for a genetics researcher to identify five people he randomly selected from the study group. Not only that, he found their entire families, even though the relatives had no part in the study — identifying nearly 50 people.The researcher did not reveal the names of the people he found, but the exercise, published Thursday in the journal Science, illustrates the difficulty of protecting the privacy of volunteers involved in medical research when the genetic information they provide needs to be public so scientists can use it.Other reports have identified people whose genetic data was online, but none had done so using such limited information: the long strings of DNA letters, an age and, because the study focused on only American subjects, a state."I've been worried about this for a long time," said Barbara Koenig, a researcher at the University of California in San Francisco who studies issues involving genetic data. "We always should be operating on the assumption that this is possible."The data are from an international study, the 1000 Genomes Project, that is collecting genetic information from people around the world and posting it online so researchers can use it freely. It also includes the ages of participants and the regions where they live. That information, a genealogy Web site and Google searches were sufficient to find complete family trees. While the methods for extracting relevant genetic data from the raw genetic sequence files were specialized enough to be beyond the scope of most laypeople, no one expected it to be so easy to zoom in on individuals."We are in what I call an awareness moment," said Eric D. Green, director of the National Human Genome Research Institute at the National Institutes of Health.There is no easy answer about what to do to protect the privacy of study subjects. Subjects might be made more aware that they could be identified by their DNA sequences. More data could be locked behind security walls, or severe penalties could be instituted for those who invade the privacy of subjects."We don't have any claim to have the answer," Dr. Green said. And opinions about just what should be done vary greatly among experts.But after seeing how easy it was to find the individuals and their extended families, the N.I.H. removed people's ages from the public database, making it more difficult to identify them.But Dr. Jeffrey R. Botkin, associate vice president for research integrity at the University of Utah, which collected the genetic information of some research participants whose identities were breached, cautioned about overreacting. Genetic data from hundreds of thousands of people have been freely available online, he said, yet there has not been a single report of someone being illicitly identified. He added that "it is hard to imagine what would motivate anyone to undertake this sort of privacy attack in the real world." But he said he had serious concerns about publishing a formula to breach subjects' privacy. By publishing, he said, the investigators "exacerbate the very risks they are concerned about."The project was the inspiration of Yaniv Erlich, a human genetics researcher at the Whitehead Institute, which is affiliated with M.I.T. He stresses that he is a strong advocate of data sharing and that he would hate to see genomic data locked up. But when his lab developed a new technique, he realized he had the tools to probe a DNA database. And he could not resist trying.The tool allowed him to quickly find a type of DNA pattern that looks like stutters among billions of chemical letters in human DNA. Those little stutters — short tandem repeats — are inherited. Genealogy Web sites use repeats on the Y chromosome, the one unique to men, to identify men by their surnames, an indicator of ancestry. Any man can submit the short tandem repeats on his Y chromosome and find the surname of men with the same DNA pattern. The sites enable men to find their ancestors and relatives.So, Dr. Erlich asked, could he take a man's entire DNA sequence, pick out the short tandem repeats on his Y chromosome, search a genealogy site, discover the man's surname and then fully identify the man?
A FREQUENT traveler, Soozan Baxter never bothers with the hotel gym. Instead, she checks with the front desk to make sure there is a tub in the bathroom, an iron in the closet and a sturdy bench or ottoman in the room.Ms. Baxter's solution for staying in shape while on the road: a 30-minute routine designed by her Manhattan-based personal trainer, Nicole Glor, that lets her exercise without having to pack hand weights or exercise mats. "I don't want to carry a lot of stuff with me," said Ms. Baxter, 37, a commercial real estate consultant who travels from one to three days a week throughout the year.Ms. Baxter, who stands 5 feet 1 inch tall and weighs less than 100 pounds, used to be able to go weeks without exercising. But that changed in June 2010, when she was hit by a car while running at the South Street Seaport. She spent four months in a wheelchair after shattering her left leg and wrist. Without daily exercise, her physical therapist warned her, her joints and muscles would stiffen.She has been a model of self-discipline ever since. One day recently at Ms. Baxter's Midtown Manhattan apartment, Ms. Glor led her through one of her hotel room workouts. These include toning and cardio moves that work several muscle groups at once, Ms. Glor said, boosting metabolism and making the sessions more efficient.After a warm-up in the living room, Ms. Baxter moved to the bedroom and did an "L stand," essentially a half-handstand, with hands on the floor, legs straight and toes resting just on the edge of the bed, as the arms hold the body up in an L shape."This move is good for people who sit for hours in front of a laptop or in uncomfortable airline seats and get hunched over," Ms. Glor said. "It strengthens the upper back." Since the routine features push-ups (a total of 100, divided into sets of 20 and 15), working the opposing muscle groups of the back prevents rounding of the shoulders.Next came "swinging lunges" by the bed: Ms. Baxter, both legs bent, moved one forward and lowered herself so that the knee on the back leg was almost touching the floor; she repeated the move with the same leg moving back. This works the glutes, abdominals and quads, Ms. Glor said, instructing Ms. Baxter to lift her knee between lunges to add a cardio component.A few steps to the bathroom, and the push-up routine began. Twenty push-ups with hands wide and gripping the edge of the tub, with the spine straight and toes on the floor, were followed by 20 running lunges: with one foot on the edge of the tub, Ms. Baxter hopped up and lifted the opposite knee. Breathing hard, she was able to lodge a complaint — "This bathroom is superhot!" — before switching to 20 tricep dips: seated on the tub's edge with her legs straight out, heels on the floor, she bent her elbows and lowered her torso to the floor, then pushed herself back up. Ms. Glor sweetly called for 20 more running lunges, then another set of 20 push-ups.Back in the living room, a soft leather ottoman became the landing zone for 10 two-legged jump-ups. (For beginners, Ms. Glor suggests stepping up with one foot, then the other, and then stepping down and repeating, or simply jumping back and forth on the floor). Next, Ms. Baxter's iron was put to use as a free weight in an exercise in which she knelt on all fours, then raised one bent leg up and to the side while she lifted the iron with her opposite arm.After another set of 20 push-ups, Ms. Glor introduced the X jump. Like a souped-up jumping jack, the X jump involves jumping three times with knees bent, followed by a split jump, cheerleader-style. Ms. Baxter did 15, no problem. "Your muscles really fire up to make the move happen," Ms. Glor said. "It's cardio and muscle toning at the same time."With only a short water break, Ms. Baxter was back to doing 15 swinging lunges, this time lifting the iron with her arm between lunges. She complained that her buttocks hurt, patting her glutes. "Ouch. Right here."Ms. Glor assured her it was almost over. Actually, there were 20 more sets of side-to-side pliés while lifting the iron; 25 more push-ups; abdominal crunches with her feet on the ottoman; a forearm stand for upper-back strengthening — Ms. Baxter placed her forearms flat on the floor, then kicked both legs up against a wall — and a killer exercise Ms. Glor calls "down and dirty." It involves that old gym class standard, the squat thrust, as well as jumping jacks, push-ups and lunges.Cooling down, Ms. Baxter stretched and reflected on her two-year journey from wheelchair to workouts: "I never want to forget how grateful I am to be able to jump in the air," she said, "or walk the dog on a sunny day."
WASHINGTON — Millions of low-income people could be required to pay more for health care under a proposed federal policy that would give states more freedom to impose co-payments and other charges on Medicaid patients.Hoping to persuade states to expand Medicaid, the Obama administration said state Medicaid officials could charge higher co-payments and premiums for doctors' services, prescription drugs and certain types of hospital care, including the "nonemergency use" of emergency rooms. State officials have long asked for more leeway to impose such charges.The 2010 health care law extended Medicaid to many childless adults and others who were previously ineligible. The Supreme Court said the expansion of Medicaid was an option for states, not a requirement as Congress had intended. The administration has been trying to persuade states to take the option, emphasizing that they can reconfigure Medicaid to hold down their costs and "promote the most effective use of services."In the proposed rule published Tuesday in the Federal Register, the administration said it was simplifying a complex, confusing array of standards that limit states' ability to charge Medicaid beneficiaries. Under the proposal, a family of three with annual income of $30,000 could be required to pay $1,500 in premiums and co-payments.As if to emphasize the latitude given to states, the administration used this heading for part of the new rule: "Higher Cost Sharing Permitted for Individuals With Incomes Above 100 Percent of the Federal Poverty Level" (that is, $19,090 for a family of three).Barbara K. Tomar, director of federal affairs at the American College of Emergency Physicians, said the administration had not adequately defined the "nonemergency services" for which low-income people could be required to pay. In many cases, she said, patients legitimately believe they need emergency care, but the final diagnosis does not bear that out."This is just a way to reduce payments to physicians and hospitals" from the government, Ms. Tomar said.With patients paying more, the federal government and states would pay less than they otherwise would. Medicaid covers 60 million people, and at least 11 million more are expected to qualify under the 2010 law. The federal government pays more than half of Medicaid costs and will pay a much larger share for those who become eligible under the law.In the proposed rule, the administration said it had discovered several potential problems in its efforts to carry out the law.First, it said, it has not found a reliable, comprehensive and up-to-date source of information about whether people have employer-sponsored health insurance. The government needs such information to decide whether low- and middle-income people can obtain federal subsidies for private insurance.The subsidies can be used to buy coverage in competitive marketplaces known as insurance exchanges. Under the law, people can start enrolling in October for coverage that starts in January 2014, when most Americans will be required to have health insurance. People who have access to affordable coverage from employers will generally be ineligible for subsidies.In applying for subsidies, people must report any employer-sponsored insurance they have. But the administration said it could be difficult to verify this information because the main sources of data reflect only "whether an individual is employed and with which employer, and not whether the employer provides health insurance."Since passage of the health care law, the administration has often said that people seeking insurance would use a single streamlined application for Medicaid and the subsidies for private coverage. Moreover, the state Medicaid agency and the exchange are supposed to share data and issue a "combined eligibility notice" for all types of assistance.But the administration said this requirement would be delayed to Jan. 1, 2015, because more time was needed to establish electronic links between Medicaid and the exchanges.Leonardo D. Cuello, who represents Medicaid beneficiaries as a lawyer at the National Health Law Program, expressed concern."Under the proposed rule," Mr. Cuello said, "many people will be funneled into health insurance exchanges even though they have special needs that are better met in Medicaid. And if you asked the right questions, you would find out that they are eligible for Medicaid."The federal government will have the primary responsibility for running exchanges in more than half the states. About 20 states are expected to expand Medicaid; governors in other states are opposed or uncommitted.The proposed rule allows hospitals to decide, "on the basis of preliminary information," whether a person is eligible for Medicaid. States must provide immediate temporary coverage to people who appear eligible.Kenneth E. Raske, president of the Greater New York Hospital Association, said this could be a boon to low-income people. "Currently," he said, "only children and pregnant women are presumed eligible for inpatient admissions under Medicaid in New York."The public has until Feb. 13 to comment on the proposed rule. Comments can be submitted at www.regulations.gov.
Trying to stem the scourge of prescription drug abuse , an advisory panel of experts to the Food and Drug Administration voted on Friday to toughen the restrictions on painkillers like Vicodin that contain hydrocodone, the most widely prescribed drugs in the country.The recommendation, which the drug agency is likely to follow, would limit access to the drugs by making them harder to prescribe, a major policy change that advocates said could help ease the growing problem of addiction to painkillers, which exploded in the late 1990s and continues to strike hard in communities from Appalachia and the Midwest to New England.But at 19 to 10, the vote was far from unanimous, with some opponents expressing skepticism that the change would do much to combat abuse. Oxycodone, another highly abused painkiller and the main ingredient in OxyContin, has been in the more restrictive category since it first came on the market, they pointed out in testimony at a public hearing. They also said the change could create unfair obstacles for patients in chronic pain.Painkillers now take the lives of more Americans than heroin and cocaine combined, and since 2008, drug-induced deaths have outstripped those from traffic accidents. Prescription drugs account for about three-quarters of all drug overdose deaths in the United States, with the number of deaths from painkillers quadrupling since 1999, according to federal data.The change would have sweeping consequences for doctors, pharmacists and patients. Refills without a new prescription would be forbidden, as would faxed prescriptions and those called in by phone. Only written prescriptions from a doctor would be allowed. Distributors would be required to store the drugs in special vaults.The vote comes after similar legislation in Congress failed last year, after aggressive lobbying by pharmacists and drugstores."This is the federal government saying, 'We need to tighten the reins on this drug,' " said Scott R. Drab, associate professor of pharmacy and therapeutics at the University of Pittsburgh's School of Pharmacy. "Pulling in the rope is a way to rein in abuse, and, consequently, addiction."But at the panel's two-day hearing at F.D.A. headquarters in Silver Spring, Md., many spoke against the change, including advocates for nursing home patients, who said frail residents with chronic pain would have to make the trip to a doctor's office. The change would also ban nurse practitioners and physician assistants from prescribing the drugs, making it harder for people in underserved rural areas.Panelists also cautioned that the change would produce a whack-a-mole effect, pushing up abuse of other drugs, like heroin, which has declined in recent years."Many of us are concerned that the more stringent controls will eventually lead to different problems, which may be worse," said Dr. John Mendelson, a senior scientist at the Addiction and Pharmacology Research Laboratory at the California Pacific Medical Center Research Institute in San Francisco.The F.D.A. convened the panel, made up of scientists, pain doctors and other experts, after a request by the Drug Enforcement Administration, which contends that the drugs are among the most frequently abused painkillers and should be more tightly controlled.If the F.D.A. accepts the panel's recommendation, it will be sent to officials at the Department of Health and Human Services, who will make the final determination. The F.D.A. denied a similar request by the D.E.A. in 2008, but the law enforcement agency requested that the F.D.A. reconsider its position in light of new research and data.While hydrocodone products are the most widely prescribed painkillers, they make up a minority of deaths, because there is less medication in each tablet than some of the other more restricted drugs, like extended-release oxycodone products, said Dr. Nathaniel Katz, assistant professor of anesthesia at Tufts University School of Medicine in Boston. Oxycodone and methadone products account for about two-thirds of drug overdose deaths, he said, despite accounting for only a fraction of hydrocodone prescriptions.The importance of Friday's vote was more symbolic, he said, a message to doctors that they will need to think twice before prescribing hydrocodone, and to patients that the days of "unbridled access" are coming to an end. The tide has been turning against easy opioid prescriptions, as the medical system and federal regulators slowly make adjustments to reduce the potential for abuse."It will help shape thinking," said Dr. Katz, whose clinical research company, Analgesic Solutions, is trying to develop other treatments for pain. "It's an important marker in the progressively more conservative swing of the pendulum in opioid prescribing."He cautioned that patients who need the medications for pain should not suffer inappropriate barriers to access because of the change, a concern that the dissenters shared.  Medical professionals battling the prescription drug abuse epidemic applauded the change."This may be the single most important intervention undertaken at the federal level to bring the epidemic under control," said Dr. Andrew Kolodny, chairman of psychiatry at Maimonides Medical Center in New York and president of Physicians for Responsible Opioid Prescribing, a New York-based advocacy group. "This is about correcting a mistake made 40 years ago that's had disastrous consequences."Testimony at the hearing included emotional appeals from parents who had lost their children to painkiller addiction. Senator Joe Manchin III, a Democrat from West Virginia, a state that has been hit hard by the prescription drug epidemic, pleaded for tougher restrictions."When I go back to West Virginia, I hear how easy it is for anybody to get their hands on hydrocodone drugs," Mr. Manchin said. "For under-age children, these drugs are easier to get than beer or cigarettes."
In a flood of lawsuits, Roman Catholics, evangelicals and Mennonites are challenging a provision in the new health care law that requires employers to cover birth control in employee health plans — a high-stakes clash between religious freedom and health care access that appears headed to the Supreme Court .In recent months, federal courts have seen dozens of lawsuits brought not only by religious institutions like Catholic dioceses but also by private employers ranging from a pizza mogul to produce transporters who say the government is forcing them to violate core tenets of their faith. Some have been turned away by judges convinced that access to contraception is a vital health need and a compelling state interest. Others have been told that their beliefs appear to outweigh any state interest and that they may hold off complying with the law until their cases have been judged. New suits are filed nearly weekly."This is highly likely to end up at the Supreme Court," said Douglas Laycock, a law professor at the University of Virginia and one of the country's top scholars on church-state conflicts. "There are so many cases, and we are already getting strong disagreements among the circuit courts."President Obama's health care law, known as the Affordable Care Act, was the most fought-over piece of legislation in his first term and was the focus of a highly contentious Supreme Court decision last year that found it to be constitutional.But a provision requiring the full coverage of contraception remains a matter of fierce controversy. The law says that companies must fully cover all "contraceptive methods and sterilization procedures" approved by the Food and Drug Administration, including "morning-after pills" and intrauterine devices whose effects some contend are akin to abortion.As applied by the Health and Human Services Department, the law offers an exemption for "religious employers," meaning those who meet a four-part test: that their purpose is to inculcate religious values, that they primarily employ and serve people who share their religious tenets, and that they are nonprofit groups under federal tax law.But many institutions, including religious schools and colleges, do not meet those criteria because they employ and teach members of other religions and have a broader purpose than inculcating religious values."We represent a Catholic college founded by Benedictine monks," said Kyle Duncan, general counsel of the Becket Fund for Religious Liberty, which has brought a number of the cases to court. "They don't qualify as a house of worship and don't turn away people in hiring or as students because they are not Catholic."In that case, involving Belmont Abbey College in North Carolina, a federal appeals court panel in Washington told the college last month that it could hold off on complying with the law while the federal government works on a promised exemption for religiously-affiliated institutions. The court told the government that it wanted an update by mid-February.Defenders of the provision say employers may not be permitted to impose their views on employees, especially when something so central as health care is concerned."Ninety-nine percent of women use contraceptives at some time in their lives," said Judy Waxman, a vice president of the National Women's Law Center, which filed a brief supporting the government in one of the cases. "There is a strong and legitimate government interest because it affects the health of women and babies."She added, referring to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, "Contraception was declared by the C.D.C. to be one of the 10 greatest public health achievements of the 20th century."Officials at the Justice Department and the Health and Human Services Department declined to comment, saying the cases were pending.A compromise for religious institutions may be worked out. The government hopes that by placing the burden on insurance companies rather than on the organizations, the objections will be overcome. Even more challenging cases involve private companies run by people who reject all or many forms of contraception.The Alliance Defending Freedom — like Becket, a conservative group — has brought a case on behalf of Hercules Industries, a company in Denver that makes sheet metal products. It was granted an injunction by a judge in Colorado who said the religious values of the family owners were infringed by the law."Two-thirds of the cases have had injunctions against Obamacare, and most are headed to courts of appeals," said Matt Bowman, senior legal counsel for the alliance. "It is clear that a substantial number of these cases will vindicate religious freedom over Obamacare. But it seems likely that the Supreme Court will ultimately resolve the dispute."The timing of these cases remains in flux. Half a dozen will probably be argued by this summer, perhaps in time for inclusion on the Supreme Court's docket next term. So far, two- and three-judge panels on four federal appeals courts have weighed in, granting some injunctions while denying others.One of the biggest cases involves Hobby Lobby, which started as a picture framing shop in an Oklahoma City garage with $600 and is now one of the country's largest arts and crafts retailers, with more than 500 stores in 41 states.David Green, the company's founder, is an evangelical Christian who says he runs his company on biblical principles, including closing on Sunday so employees can be with their families, paying nearly double the minimum wage and providing employees with comprehensive health insurance.Mr. Green does not object to covering contraception but considers morning-after pills to be abortion-inducing and therefore wrong."Our family is now being forced to choose between following the laws of the land that we love or maintaining the religious beliefs that have made our business successful and have supported our family and thousands of our employees and their families," Mr. Green said in a statement. "We simply cannot abandon our religious beliefs to comply with this mandate."The United States Court of Appeals for the 10th Circuit last month turned down his family's request for a preliminary injunction, but the company has found a legal way to delay compliance for some months.
Whether they have chronic ailments like diabetes or just want to watch their weight, Americans are increasingly tracking their health using smartphone applications and other devices that collect personal data automatically, according to health industry researchers."The explosion of mobile devices means that more Americans have an opportunity to start tracking health data in an organized way," said Susannah Fox, an associate director of the Pew Research Center's Internet and American Life Project, which was to release the national study on Monday. Many of the people surveyed said the experience had changed their overall approach to health.More than 500 companies were making or developing self-management tools by last fall, up 35 percent from January 2012, said Matthew Holt, co-chairman of Health 2.0, a market intelligence project that keeps a database of health technology companies. Nearly 13,000 health and fitness apps are now available, he said.The Pew study said 21 percent of people who track their health use some form of technology.They are people like Steven Jonas of Portland, Ore., who uses an electronic monitor to check his heart rate when he feels stressed. Then he breathes deeply for a few minutes and watches the monitor on his laptop as his heart slows down."It's incredibly effective in a weird way," he said.Mr. Jonas said he also used electronic means to track his mood, weight, mental sharpness, sleep and memory.Dr. Peter A. Margolis is a principal investigator at the Collaborative Chronic Care Network Project, which tests new ways to diagnose and treat diseases. He has connected 20 young patients who have Crohn's disease with tracking software developed by a team led by Ian Eslick, a doctoral candidate at the Media Lab at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology.Data from their phones is reported to a Web site that charts the patients' behavior patterns, said Dr. Margolis, a professor of pediatrics at Cincinnati Children's Hospital. Some phones have software that automatically reports the data.Patients and their parents and doctors watch the charts for early warning signs of flare-up symptoms, like abdominal pain, nausea and vomiting, before the flare-ups occur. The physicians then adjust the children's treatment to minimize the symptoms."One of the main findings was that many patients were unaware of the amount of variation in their symptoms that they were having every day," Dr. Margolis said.The Pew survey found most people with several chronic conditions said that tracking had led them to ask a doctor new questions, led them to seek a second opinion or influenced their treatment decisions.Mr. Holt said self-tracking products and services companies formed the fastest growing category among the 2,100 health technology companies in his database. He said venture capital financing in the sector rose 20 percent from January through September 2012, with $539 million allotted to new products and services for consumers by Sept. 30.He attributed the rise to a "perceived increase in consumer interest in wellness and tracking in general, and the expectation that at-home monitoring of all types of patients will be a bigger deal under the new accountable care organizations," as President Obama's health care law takes effect.But even an enthusiast like Mr. Jonas said he saw "a dark side to tracking.""People who are feeling down may not want a tracking device to keep reminding them of their mood," he said.
Scientists have known for decades that the ability to remember newly learned information declines with age, but it was not clear why. A new study may provide part of the answer.The report, posted online on Sunday by the journal Nature Neuroscience, suggests that structural brain changes occurring naturally over time interfere with sleep quality, which in turn blunts the ability to store memories for the long term.Previous research had found that the prefrontal cortex, the brain region behind the forehead, tends to lose volume with age, and that part of this region helps sustain quality sleep, which is critical to consolidating new memories. But the new experiment, led by researchers at the University of California, Berkeley, is the first to directly link structural changes with sleep-related memory problems.The findings suggest that one way to slow memory decline in aging adults is to improve sleep, specifically the so-called slow-wave phase, which constitutes about a quarter of a normal night's slumber.Doctors cannot reverse structural changes that occur with age any more than they can turn back time. But at least two groups are experimenting with electrical stimulation as a way to improve deep sleep in older people. By placing electrodes on the scalp, scientists can run a low current across the prefrontal area, essentially mimicking the shape of clean, high-quality slow waves.The result: improved memory, at least in some studies. "There are also a number of other ways you can improve sleep, including exercise," said Ken Paller, a professor of psychology and the director of the cognitive neuroscience program at Northwestern University, who was not involved in the research.Dr. Paller said that a whole array of changes occurred across the brain during aging and that sleep was only one factor affecting memory function.But he said the study told "a convincing story, I think: that atrophy is related to slow-wave sleep, which we know is related to memory performance. So it's a contributing factor."In the study, the research team took brain images from 19 people of retirement age and from 18 people in their early 20s. It found that a brain area called the medial prefrontal cortex, roughly behind the middle of the forehead, was about one-third smaller on average in the older group than in the younger one — a difference due to natural atrophy over time, previous research suggests.Before bedtime, the team had the two groups study a long list of words paired with nonsense syllables, like "action-siblis" and "arm-reconver." The team used the nonwords because one type of memory that declines with age is for new, previously unseen information.After training on the pairs for half an hour or so, the participants took a test on some of them. The young group outscored the older group by about 25 percent.Then everyone went to bed — and bigger differences emerged. For one, the older group got only about a quarter of the amount of high-quality slow-wave sleep that the younger group did, as measured by the shape and consistency of electrical waves on an electroencephalogram machine, or EEG. It is thought that the brain moves memories from temporary to longer-term storage during this deep sleep.On a second test, given in the morning, the younger group outscored the older group by about 55 percent. The estimated amount of atrophy in each person roughly predicted the difference between his or her evening and morning scores, the study found. Even seniors who were very sharp at night showed declines after sleeping."The analysis showed that the differences were due not to changes in capacity for memories, but to differences in sleep quality," said Bryce A. Mander, a postdoctoral fellow at Berkeley and the lead author of the study. His co-authors included researchers from the California Pacific Medical Center in San Francisco; the University of California, San Diego; and the Lawrence Berkeley National Laboratory.The findings do not imply that medial prefrontal atrophy is the only age-related change causing memory problems, said Matthew P. Walker, a professor of psychology and neuroscience at Berkeley and a co-author of the study."Essentially, with age, you lose tissue in this prefrontal area," Dr. Walker said. "You get less quality deep sleep, and have less opportunity to consolidate new memories."
WASHINGTON — As workers open their W-2 forms this month, many will see a new box with information on the total cost of employer-sponsored health insurance coverage. To some, it will be a surprise, perhaps even a shock.Workers often have little idea how much they and their employers are paying for coverage. In many cases, economists say, workers give up cash compensation to get and keep health benefits.The disclosures, required by the 2010 health care law, are meant to make workers more cost-conscious. Health benefits are still tax-free. But labor unions and employer groups say it could be easier to tax them in the future, now that employers must report their value to the government.The new information appears in Box 12 of the standard W-2 form, with a two-letter code, DD. The box shows the "cost of employer-sponsored health coverage." And that amount is not taxable, the Internal Revenue Service says on the back of the form.Jay J. Makled, a union steward for the United Automobile Workers at the Ford plant in Dearborn, Mich., described his reaction after seeing that his health coverage cost nearly $16,000 last year: "It's quite expensive. I was surprised to see how much the company was paying for that benefit."Hourly employees represented by the union there said they generally did not pay any of the premium.The number on the W-2 form is supposed to reflect the part of the cost paid by the employer and the part paid by the employee.Prof. Nicole Huberfeld, an expert on health law at the University of Kentucky, who received her W-2 form on Monday, said, "Most people who get health insurance from their employers have no idea how much it costs.""People are often shocked when they see the cost, $12,000 to $16,000 a year," Ms. Huberfeld said. "Many Americans believe this is something they get free. But employers pay lower wages because they provide insurance."In 2012, according to an annual survey by the Kaiser Family Foundation, premiums for employer-sponsored health insurance averaged $5,615 a year for single coverage and $15,745 for family coverage. Over five years, the costs have increased 25 percent for individual coverage and 30 percent for family coverage."Health coverage is a big piece of people's income and a large part of the social welfare budget," said C. Eugene Steuerle, a tax economist at the Urban Institute. "But the benefits are not taxable, and most of the spending is hidden, so we don't consider the trade-offs. If we want to get control of health care costs, people have to be aware of them."That is the goal of the disclosure requirement, which was proposed by a bipartisan group of senators: two Republicans, Charles E. Grassley of Iowa and Michael B. Enzi of Wyoming, and two Democrats, Max Baucus of Montana and Ron Wyden of Oregon.Congress acted after Peter R. Orszag, then the director of the Congressional Budget Office, told lawmakers: "The economic evidence is overwhelming, the theory is overwhelming, that when your firm pays for your health insurance, you actually pay through reduced take-home pay. The firm is not giving that to you for free."The tax-free treatment of employer-provided health benefits is the largest tax break in the tax code, costing the government roughly $180 billion a year in lost revenue, or 80 percent more than the home mortgage interest deduction, according to the administration.Katie W. Mahoney, the executive director of health policy at the U.S. Chamber of Commerce, said, "It's useful for employees to know the value of coverage their employers provide." But she said some employers worried that reporting the benefit on the W-2 form could lead to taxing the benefit."That's not the intent of the current requirement," Ms. Mahoney said. "But once the information is collected by the government, it's very easy for another administration to have a different intent."An employee of the A.F.L.-C.I.O. whose health coverage was listed as costing more than $20,000 said: "That knocks my socks off. When I saw the number, my eyes popped out. I appreciate my employer all the more."The employee said he had been told not to discuss the cost publicly because the union did not want to suggest that some employees had "Cadillac coverage."An employer that fails to comply with the reporting requirement could be subject to penalties of $200 per W-2 form, up to a maximum of $3 million, tax lawyers said.Employers are exempt from the reporting obligation if they are required to file fewer than 250 W-2 forms, the I.R.S. said. That could change, but the agency said employers would be given at least six months' notice.
WASHINGTON — As workers open their W-2 forms this month, many will see a new box with information on the total cost of employer-sponsored health insurance coverage. To some, it will be a surprise, perhaps even a shock.Workers often have little idea how much they and their employers are paying for coverage. In many cases, economists say, workers give up cash compensation to get and keep health benefits.The disclosures, required by the 2010 health care law, are meant to make workers more cost-conscious. Health benefits are still tax-free. But labor unions and employer groups say it could be easier to tax them in the future, now that employers must report their value to the government.The new information appears in Box 12 of the standard W-2 form, with a two-letter code, DD. The box shows the "cost of employer-sponsored health coverage." And that amount is not taxable, the Internal Revenue Service says on the back of the form.Jay J. Makled, a union steward for the United Automobile Workers at the Ford plant in Dearborn, Mich., described his reaction after seeing that his health coverage cost nearly $16,000 last year: "It's quite expensive. I was surprised to see how much the company was paying for that benefit."Hourly employees represented by the union there said they generally did not pay any of the premium.The number on the W-2 form is supposed to reflect the part of the cost paid by the employer and the part paid by the employee.Prof. Nicole Huberfeld, an expert on health law at the University of Kentucky, who received her W-2 form on Monday, said, "Most people who get health insurance from their employers have no idea how much it costs.""People are often shocked when they see the cost, $12,000 to $16,000 a year," Ms. Huberfeld said. "Many Americans believe this is something they get free. But employers pay lower wages because they provide insurance."In 2012, according to an annual survey by the Kaiser Family Foundation, premiums for employer-sponsored health insurance averaged $5,615 a year for single coverage and $15,745 for family coverage. Over five years, the costs have increased 25 percent for individual coverage and 30 percent for family coverage."Health coverage is a big piece of people's income and a large part of the social welfare budget," said C. Eugene Steuerle, a tax economist at the Urban Institute. "But the benefits are not taxable, and most of the spending is hidden, so we don't consider the trade-offs. If we want to get control of health care costs, people have to be aware of them."That is the goal of the disclosure requirement, which was proposed by a bipartisan group of senators: two Republicans, Charles E. Grassley of Iowa and Michael B. Enzi of Wyoming, and two Democrats, Max Baucus of Montana and Ron Wyden of Oregon.Congress acted after Peter R. Orszag, then the director of the Congressional Budget Office, told lawmakers: "The economic evidence is overwhelming, the theory is overwhelming, that when your firm pays for your health insurance, you actually pay through reduced take-home pay. The firm is not giving that to you for free."The tax-free treatment of employer-provided health benefits is the largest tax break in the tax code, costing the government roughly $180 billion a year in lost revenue, or 80 percent more than the home mortgage interest deduction, according to the administration.Katie W. Mahoney, the executive director of health policy at the U.S. Chamber of Commerce, said, "It's useful for employees to know the value of coverage their employers provide." But she said some employers worried that reporting the benefit on the W-2 form could lead to taxing the benefit."That's not the intent of the current requirement," Ms. Mahoney said. "But once the information is collected by the government, it's very easy for another administration to have a different intent."An employee of the A.F.L.-C.I.O. whose health coverage was listed as costing more than $20,000 said: "That knocks my socks off. When I saw the number, my eyes popped out. I appreciate my employer all the more."The employee said he had been told not to discuss the cost publicly because the union did not want to suggest that some employees had "Cadillac coverage."An employer that fails to comply with the reporting requirement could be subject to penalties of $200 per W-2 form, up to a maximum of $3 million, tax lawyers said.Employers are exempt from the reporting obligation if they are required to file fewer than 250 W-2 forms, the I.R.S. said. That could change, but the agency said employers would be given at least six months' notice.
Just over a year ago, Angel Gonzalez, 36, awoke with searing chest pain at 2 a.m. A friend drove him to the closest emergency room.Though he was living on $18,000 a year as a graduate student, Mr. Gonzalez had good insurance and the hospital, St. Charles in Port Jefferson, N.Y., was in his network. But the surgeon who came in to remove Mr. Gonzalez's gallbladder that Sunday night was not.He billed Mr. Gonzalez $30,000, and an assistant billed an additional $30,000. Mr. Gonzalez's policy covered out-of-network providers, but at a rate it considered appropriate: $2,000. "I was on the hook for more than I made in a year," Mr. Gonzalez said.A health insurance industry report to be released on Friday highlights the exorbitant fees charged by some doctors to out-of-network patients like Mr. Gonzalez. The report, by America's Health Insurance Plans, or AHIP, contrasts some of the highest bills charged by non-network providers in 30 states with Medicare rates for the same services. Some of the charges, the insurers assert, are 30, 40 or nearly 100 times greater than Medicare rates.Insurers hope to spotlight a vexing problem that they say the Affordable Care Act does little to address. "When you're out of network, it's a blank check," said Karen Ignagni, president and chief executive of AHIP. "The consumer is vulnerable to 'anything goes.' ""Unless we deal with cost, we won't have affordability," she added. "And unless we have affordability, we won't have people participating" under the Affordable Care Act.Among the fees on the report's list are a $6,205 outpatient office visit to a doctor in Massachusetts for which Medicare would have paid $152; a $12,000 bill for examining a tissue specimen in New York for which Medicare would have paid $128; and a $48,983 surgeon's fee for a total hip replacement in New Jersey that Medicare would have reimbursed at $1,543. Many of the highest billers were in New York, Texas, Florida and New Jersey.Elisabeth R. Benjamin, co-founder of the Health Care for All New York coalition, who is often at odds with the insurance industry, said that "is one area we totally agree on." She continued, "Out-of-network billing is just out of control."Even when out-of-network fees are compared with average commercial insurance reimbursements, which are usually greater than Medicare, she said, "It's pretty outrageous."Doctors say the report is skewed because it focuses on a few dozen cases of overcharging that are not representative of their billing. In response to the insurers' report, the American Medical Association noted on Thursday that a recent analysis found that doctors' services account for just 16 percent of health care costs."There are outliers in every profession, in every business," said Dr. Andrew Y. Kleinman, a plastic surgeon who is vice president of the Medical Society of the State of New York.Dr. Kleinman also noted that insurers had effectively shifted the costs of out-of-network care onto patients by changing reimbursement formulas. Instead of the rates commercial insurers usually pay doctors, insurers increasingly are basing their out-of-network payments on Medicare rates, usually far lower.A growing number of high-end, flexible health plans offer policies that cover outside providers at, for example, 140 percent of Medicare. "They're selling you an insurance product you can't use," Dr. Kleinman said. "You're buying an insurance policy where the out-of-network benefit is worthless."The industry's own report suggests that using Medicare rates as a benchmark will lead to patients' picking up much more of the cost for out-of-network care, whether they carefully select a specialist or, as in the case of Mr. Gonzalez and many others, have no choice in the matter.Had Mr. Gonzalez been 65 or older, Medicare would have paid only $958 for the surgery. The average commercial price is $12,292, according to FAIR Health, an independent nonprofit group that tracks information on health care costs.But Mr. Gonzalez's health plan, United Healthcare, determined the fee should be $1,273, of which the company paid $838. Mr. Gonzalez filed appeals, which were rejected. He then contacted Community Health Advocates at the Community Service Society of New York for help, and the group's caseworkers negotiated with the surgeon on his behalf.After months of wrangling, the surgeon agreed to accept a significantly reduced payment: $340.Consumer advocates and health insurance executives are calling for greater transparency in health care pricing, including upfront disclosure of prices of medical procedures and services."The health care industry can give you an estimate, just like any other industry," said Carrie H. Colla, an assistant professor at the Dartmouth Institute for Health Policy and Clinical Practice, noting that the Dartmouth-Hitchcock Medical Center has a patient price estimator online."It's just not current practice right now," Dr. Colla said. "Sometimes a doctor won't even know. The patient really has to push for it."
People with mental illness are 70 percent more likely to smoke cigarettes than people without mental illness, two federal health agencies reported Tuesday.New data from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration show that one of every three adults with mental illness smokes, compared with one in five adults without mental illness.Adults with mental illness smoke about a third of all the cigarettes in the United States, and they smoke more cigarettes per month and are significantly less likely to quit than people without mental illness, the report said. There are nearly 46 million adults with mental illness in the United States, about a fifth of the population."Many people with mental illness are at greater risk of dying early from smoking than of dying from their mental health conditions," said Dr. Thomas R. Frieden, director of the Centers for Disease Control, during a press briefing.The report is based on information from the National Survey on Drug Use and Health, which interviewed 138,000 adults in their homes from 2009 to 2011. People were asked 14 questions to assess psychological distress and disability, and were deemed to have mental illness if their responses indicated they had a mental, behavior or emotional disorder in the past 12 months. Those with substance abuse or developmental disorders were not considered people with mental illness. The report did not include patients in psychiatric hospitals or individuals serving in the military.People who reported smoking all or part of a cigarette in the previous 30 days were counted as smokers.The study found that smoking rates for people with mental illness were generally higher in states where overall smoking rates were high. Utah had the lowest rate of smoking among people with mental illness — 18.1 percent — while West Virginia had the highest rate, at 48.7 percent. Smoking among people with mental illness was higher among the poor and less educated, and among American Indians and Alaska Natives, although every ethnic group had significant percentages of smokers.The study noted several possible reasons that smoking among the mentally ill has been and remains high, including marketing by the tobacco industry and the historical use of cigarettes as an incentive to improve behavior in psychiatric hospitals."There are some effects of nicotine which can mask some of the negative effects of mental illness," Dr. Frieden said. The study said that smoking can also make some medications less effective, which may then lead the person with mental illness to smoke more to quell symptoms. And it said that people with mental illness, many of whom struggle to live a financially and socially stable life, may be less able to cope with withdrawal symptoms from quitting cigarettes.While the study did not compare trends in smoking among people with mental illness over time, Dr. Frieden and Douglas Tipperman, lead public health adviser on tobacco prevention for the Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration, cited indications that smoking rates for this population have not declined nearly as quickly as smoking in the general population. Dr. Frieden called the situation "a very serious health issue that needs more attention."Mr. Tipperman said a recent survey in New York showed that smoking rates among people with mental illness had not changed significantly over the past decade.Still, Mr. Tipperman said that surveys show that many people with mental illness want to quit smoking, and can quit successfully with the right approaches, which may include extra antismoking counseling or longer use of smoking cessation medications. His agency has been working to establish and encourage smoking cessation programs that work.
MANDEVILLE, La. — Annelle S., 64, who has paranoid schizophrenia , took an urgent drag on a cigarette at a supervised outdoor smoke break at Southeast Louisiana Hospital."It's mandatory to smoke," she explained. "It's a mental institution, and we have to smoke by law."That was 18 months ago, and Annelle's confusion was understandable. Until recently, Louisiana law required psychiatric hospitals to accommodate smokers — unlike rules banning smoking at most other health facilities. The law was changed last year, and by March 30, smoking is supposed to end at Louisiana's two remaining state psychiatric hospitals.After decades in which smoking by people with mental illness was supported and even encouraged — a legacy that experts say is causing patients to die prematurely from smoking-related illnesses — Louisiana's move reflects a growing effort by federal, state and other health officials to reverse course.But these efforts are hardly simple given the longstanding obstacles.Hospitals often used cigarettes as incentives or rewards for taking medicine, following rules or attending therapy. Some programs still do. And smoking was endorsed by advocates for people with mental illness and family members, who sometimes sued to preserve smoking rights, considering cigarettes one of the few pleasures patients were allowed.New data from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention shows that the nearly 46 million adults with mental illness have a smoking rate 70 percent higher than those without mental illness, and consume about a third of the cigarettes in the country, though they make up one-fifth of the adult population.People with psychiatric disorders are often "smoking heavier, their puffs are longer and they're smoking it down to the end of the cigarette," said William Riley, chief of the Science of Research and Technology Branch at the National Cancer Institute. With some diagnoses, like schizophrenia, rates are especially high.A report by the National Association of State Mental Health Program Directors said data suggested that people with the most serious mental illnesses die on average 25 years earlier than the general population, with many from smoking-exacerbated conditions like heart or lung disease.Now more treatment facilities are banning smoking, with some finding it easier than expected. Others still allow it, usually outside on their grounds during scheduled times. About a fifth of state hospitals are not smoke-free, a survey issued in 2012 by the State Mental Health Program Directors association found. Occasionally, hospitals that banned smoking have reinstated it to avoid losing patients.Moreover, smoking is so deeply ingrained that smoke-free hospitals can only dent the problem; many patients are now hospitalized only for short stints and resume smoking later.New research suggests scientific underpinnings for some of the affinity, said Dr. Nora D. Volkow, director of the National Institute on Drug Abuse. Nicotine has antidepressant effects and, for people with schizophrenia, helps dampen extraneous thoughts and voices, she and other experts said.Other chemicals in cigarette smoke set off a perilous cycle, causing some medications to be metabolized faster, making them less effective and allowing symptoms to return. Because patients feel sicker, they may seek even more comfort from nicotine. "You may think, 'Well, I need to smoke more,' " said Dr. Steven Schroeder, a professor of health and health care at the University of California, San Francisco.Then, as smoking increases, "blood levels of their medication go down, and they end up back in the hospital," said Judith Prochaska, an associate professor of medicine at Stanford University's Prevention Research Center.Socially, smoking provides "cover rituals for patients having psychiatric symptoms," said Dr. Rona Hu, medical director of the acute psychiatric inpatient unit at Stanford Hospital in Palo Alto, Calif. "You tamp the box, you kind of play with the lighter, you can exhale and look into the middle distance and not look like you're hallucinating."Dr. Thomas R. Frieden, director of the C.D.C., said hospitals had historically resisted going smoke-free, fearing it would interfere with treatment. "In my very first job as an aide in a psychiatric hospital," he said, "if patients behaved better they got additional cigarettes."Southeast Louisiana Hospital used such practices when Annelle was there. (The hospital was recently privatized, and she is at another state facility.) Patricia Gonzales, a former director of hospital services for the Office of Behavioral Health in Louisiana, said staff members would say, for example, " 'John, if you don't get up and get the bed made, you're not going to get your morning smoke break.' "Smoke breaks were even used to persuade patients to get medical care. "We had a couple of patients who needed important CAT scans and M.R.I.'s, and that's how we did it," said Dr. Schoener LaPrairie, a former staff psychiatrist.At hospitals across the country, staff members asked tobacco companies for free cigarettes. In 2000, Dr. Elizabeth Roberson, then a psychiatrist at Hawaii State Hospital, wrote to R. J. Reynolds, seeking donated cigarettes for a patient. "Whenever he runs out of cigarettes he becomes highly agitated to the point where he has seriously injured staff and other patients," she wrote. "Providing a cigarette is generally much more effective at decreasing agitation than most medications I can provide."
WASHINGTON — The nation's Roman Catholic bishops on Thursday rejected the latest White House proposal on health insurance coverage of contraceptives , saying it did not offer enough safeguards for religious hospitals, colleges and charities that objected to providing such coverage for their employees.The bishops said they would continue fighting the federal mandate in court.The administration said the proposal, issued last Friday, would guarantee free employee coverage of birth control "while respecting religious concerns" of organizations that objected to paying or providing for it.The bishops said the proposal seemed to address part of their concern about the definition of religious employers who could be exempted from the requirement to offer contraceptive coverage at no charge to employees. But they said it did not go far enough and failed to answer many questions, like who would pay for birth control coverage provided to employees of certain nonprofit religious organizations."The administration's proposal maintains its inaccurate distinction among religious ministries," said Cardinal Timothy M. Dolan of New York, the president of the United States Conference of Catholic Bishops. "It appears to offer second-class status to our first-class institutions in Catholic health care, Catholic education and Catholic charities. The Department of Health and Human Services offers what it calls an 'accommodation,' rather than accepting the fact that these ministries are integral to our church and worthy of the same exemption as our Catholic churches."The bishops' statement, issued after they had reviewed President Obama's proposal for six days, was more moderate and measured than their criticisms of the original rule issued by the White House early last year. Cardinal Dolan said the bishops wanted to work with the administration to find a solution.The administration had no immediate reaction to the bishops' statement, other than to say it was not a surprise.Marcia D. Greenberger, co-president of the National Women's Law Center, said that 99 percent of women used contraceptives at some point in their lives and that their interests must be considered."The health needs, the religious and conscience beliefs of women deserve to be respected and protected," said Ms. Greenberger, who supports the White House proposal.Under the latest proposal, churches and nonprofit religious groups that object to providing birth control coverage on religious grounds would not have to pay for it. Women who work for such organizations could get free contraceptive coverage through separate individual health insurance policies. The institution objecting to the coverage would not pay for the contraceptives. Costs would be paid by an insurance company, with the possibility that it could recoup the costs through lower health care expenses resulting in part from fewer births.The administration refused to grant an exemption or accommodation to secular businesses owned by people who said they objected to contraceptive coverage on religious grounds.The bishops rallied to the defense of such employers."In obedience to our Judeo-Christian heritage," Cardinal Dolan said, "we have consistently taught our people to live their lives during the week to reflect the same beliefs that they proclaim on the Sabbath. We cannot now abandon them to be forced to violate their morally well-informed consciences."Federal courts have issued differing judgments on the legality of the federal rule. The litigation appears likely to end up in the Supreme Court.Archbishop Charles J. Chaput of Philadelphia said that the administration's proposal, at first glance, had "struck some people as a modest improvement." The proposal, he said, appeared to increase the number of religiously affiliated entities that could claim exemption from the requirement.But on closer examination, the archbishop said, the federal mandate "remains unnecessary, coercive and gravely flawed.""The White House has made no concessions to the religious conscience claims of private businesses, and the whole spirit of the 'compromise' is minimalist," Archbishop Chaput said.In court cases, judges have expressed keen interest in details of the arrangements for contraceptive coverage. The most difficult question, which the administration has yet to resolve, is how coverage will be provided and financed for employees of self-insured faith-based institutions, which serve as both employers and insurers.
Chagas disease may be obscure, but the economic burden it imposes on the world is greater than that of better-known diseases, like cervical cancer or cholera , according to a new study. Even in the United States, the authors said, the costs of Chagas are commensurate with those of more publicized diseases, like Lyme disease .Chagas disease is caused by a trypanosome parasite transmitted by the bloodsucking "kissing bug," which bites victims as they sleep. Transmission is endemic in much of Latin America, from central Mexico to northern Argentina. Kissing bugs have been found in the southern United States; the bugs tend to live in substandard housing and animal pens.The parasites cause an initial flulike illness that can be cured if it is caught. But it is often not diagnosed, and the infection may become chronic. It may be silent for decades and then emerge as long-term damage to the heart or intestines. It can be fatal.Up to 10 million people may be infected, many of whom have emigrated from Latin America seeking jobs in the United States, Canada and Europe — especially Spain.The authors, from the schools of public health and medicine of the University of Pittsburgh and from the Baylor College of Medicine, estimated the economic burden by trying to calculate the cost of hospitalization and care, including pacemaker implants, for those with heart damage or other organ failure. The costs vary by country, of course, with the United States being the most expensive.The researchers then added estimates of "disability-adjusted life years," a measure of how many years of healthy life are lost. They "cost" more when they are subtracted from the life of a working-age adult in a high-wage country than from a retiree or an infant in a poor country.The authors estimate that the global burden of Chagas is about $7 billion a year. By comparison, the burden of cervical cancer — a notorious killer of women, but almost only in poor countries, and usually as they age out of their working lives — is estimated at below $5 billion.The burden of rotavirus, a diarrheal disease that kills many babies but rarely endangers anyone over age 5, is estimated at $2 billion. (By contrast, lung cancer's burden is estimated at $83 billion a year, and breast cancer's at $35 billion.)Many millions have been spent developing a rotavirus vaccine and on ways to fight cervical cancer in poor countries.Knowing that Chagas is a serious economic threat could push policy makers to spend more money on developing vaccines against it, said Dr. Peter J. Hotez, dean of the National School of Tropical Medicine at Baylor College of Medicine and a co-author of the new study. Dr. Hotez is also president of the Sabin Vaccine Institute, which is doing research on Chagas vaccines.
A common concern about exercise is that if you don't do it almost every day, you won't achieve much health benefit. But a commendable new study suggests otherwise, showing that a fairly leisurely approach to scheduling workouts may actually be more beneficial than working out almost daily.For the new study, published this month in Medicine & Science in Sports & Exercise, researchers at the University of Alabama at Birmingham gathered 72 older, sedentary women, ages 60 to 74, and randomly assigned them to one of three exercise groups.One group began lifting weights once a week and performing an endurance-style workout, like jogging or bike riding, on another day.Another group lifted weights twice a week and jogged or rode an exercise bike twice a week.The final group, as you may have guessed, completed three weight-lifting and three endurance sessions, or six weekly workouts.The exercise, which was supervised by researchers, was easy at first and meant to elicit changes in both muscles and endurance. Over the course of four months, the intensity and duration gradually increased, until the women were jogging moderately for 40 minutes and lifting weights for about the same amount of time.The researchers were hoping to find out which number of weekly workouts would be, Goldilocks-like, just right for increasing the women's fitness and overall weekly energy expenditure.Some previous studies had suggested that working out only once or twice a week produced few gains in fitness, while exercising vigorously almost every day sometimes led people to become less physically active, over all, than those formally exercising less. Researchers theorized that the more grueling workout schedule caused the central nervous system to respond as if people were overdoing things, sending out physiological signals that, in an unconscious internal reaction, prompted them to feel tired or lethargic and stop moving so much.To determine if either of these possibilities held true among their volunteers, the researchers in the current study tracked the women's blood levels of cytokines, a substance related to stress that is thought to be one of the signals the nervous system uses to determine if someone is overdoing things physically. They also measured the women's changing aerobic capacities, muscle strength, body fat, moods and, using sophisticated calorimetry techniques, energy expenditure over the course of each week.By the end of the four-month experiment, all of the women had gained endurance and strength and shed body fat, although weight loss was not the point of the study. The scientists had not asked the women to change their eating habits.There were, remarkably, almost no differences in fitness gains among the groups. The women working out twice a week had become as powerful and aerobically fit as those who had worked out six times a week. There were no discernible differences in cytokine levels among the groups, either.However, the women exercising four times per week were now expending far more energy, over all, than the women in either of the other two groups. They were burning about 225 additional calories each day, beyond what they expended while exercising, compared to their calorie burning at the start of the experiment.The twice-a-week exercisers also were using more energy each day than they had been at first, burning almost 100 calories more daily, in addition to the calories used during workouts.But the women who had been assigned to exercise six times per week were now expending considerably less daily energy than they had been at the experiment's start, the equivalent of almost 200 fewer calories each day, even though they were exercising so assiduously."We think that the women in the twice-a-week and four-times-a-week groups felt more energized and physically capable" after several months of training than they had at the start of the study, says Gary Hunter, a U.A.B. professor who led the experiment. Based on conversations with the women, he says he thinks they began opting for stairs over escalators and walking for pleasure.The women working out six times a week, though, reacted very differently. "They complained to us that working out six times a week took too much time," Dr. Hunter says. They did not report feeling fatigued or physically droopy. Their bodies were not producing excessive levels of cytokines, sending invisible messages to the body to slow down.Rather, they felt pressed for time and reacted, it seems, by making choices like driving instead of walking and impatiently avoiding the stairs.Despite the cautionary note, those who insist on working out six times per week need not feel discouraged. As long as you consciously monitor your activity level, the findings suggest, you won't necessarily and unconsciously wind up moving less over all.But the more fundamental finding of this study, Dr. Hunter says, is that "less may be more," a message that most likely resonates with far more of us. The women exercising four times a week "had the greatest overall increase in energy expenditure," he says. But those working out only twice a week "weren't far behind."Correction: An earlier version of this article misstated the name of the journal in which the study appeared. It is Medicine & Science in Sports & Exercise.
WASHINGTON — An Obama administration official told Congress on Thursday that the government would be ready to enroll millions of people in private health insurance plans this fall, but senators of both parties expressed doubts.The skepticism voiced by four Democratic members of the Senate Finance Committee was striking because they had been deeply involved in writing the health care legislation that President Obama signed in March 2010.Gary M. Cohen, the federal official in charge of setting up health insurance marketplaces, or exchanges, told the committee: "We are making great progress. We are on track. We will be ready for people all across the country to receive high-quality affordable health insurance starting Oct. 1."But after listening to Mr. Cohen for more than an hour, the committee chairman, Senator Max Baucus, Democrat of Montana, demanded a detailed work plan and timetable for specific tasks, showing how the White House would meet the Oct. 1 deadline."We've got to get moving here," said Mr. Baucus, the chief author of the 2010 law.Several senators said they feared a repetition of the turmoil and confusion that occurred when Medicare was expanded with the addition of a prescription drug benefit, offered through private insurance plans, in 2006.Mr. Baucus said he was particularly concerned that federal agencies would not have the computer systems needed to communicate with one another, with state agencies and with insurance companies. Those systems will be needed to verify consumers' income and citizenship status, to enroll them in health plans and to pay subsidies to insurers.Under the law, most Americans must have health insurance by Jan. 1, or they may be subject to tax penalties. Congress had assumed that each state would set up its own exchange, where people could shop for insurance. But many states balked, so the federal government will have the main responsibility for running exchanges in more than half the states.Senator Ron Wyden, Democrat of Oregon, criticized a decision by the administration to define affordable health insurance by reference to the cost of coverage for an individual worker, without regard to the cost of family coverage, which is often much higher."In January 2014," Mr. Wyden said, "we are going to have millions of families really pinched — in a no man's land, where they are unable to afford family coverage offered through their employers and ineligible for subsidies that could be used by dependents on the exchange."Senator Orrin G. Hatch of Utah, the senior Republican on the Finance Committee, said, "I have a hard time understanding how the administration expects to have exchanges up and running by Oct. 1, especially since we have no details on how the exchanges will work in over half the states."Mr. Cohen, director of the federal Center for Consumer Information and Insurance Oversight, assured the senators that the administration had "a contingency plan for every eventuality."Under current plans, Mr. Cohen said, insurers will submit proposals to the federal exchange in April, and federal officials will decide by July which insurance policies can be sold in the federal marketplace.Senator Maria Cantwell, Democrat of Washington, said the administration appeared to be "trying to lure people into the exchange" and thwarting alternatives. Ms. Cantwell expressed dismay that the administration had ignored a provision of the law that allows states to establish "basic health plans" for low-income people who will not be eligible for Medicaid.Some officials in Washington, Minnesota and several other states want to use this option. But Mr. Cohen said it would not be available until 2015, a year later than Congress intended.Senator Bill Nelson, Democrat of Florida, complained that the administration had torpedoed efforts to establish nonprofit health insurance cooperatives in about half the states, including Florida.The administration has offered low-interest loans to co-ops in 24 states. But it agreed to eliminate money for co-ops in other states as part of a deal on taxes and spending at the end of last year. Mr. Nelson said the administration had suggested the co-op program as a source of savings."Why was that negotiated away at the 11th hour?" Mr. Nelson asked.Mr. Cohen said, "I don't have an answer."
The F.D.A. Approves a Bionic Eye: The Argus II allows Barbara Campbell, who lost her sight 20 years ago, to see the world through patterns of light. Scientists hope it is the beginning of even more treatments.The Food and Drug Administration on Thursday approved the first treatment to give limited vision to people who are blind, involving a technology called the artificial retina.The device allows people with a certain type of blindness to detect crosswalks on the street, the presence of people or cars, and sometimes even large numbers or letters. The approval of the system marks a milestone in a new frontier in vision research, a field in which scientists are making strides with gene therapy, optogenetics, stem cells and other strategies."This is just the beginning," said Grace Shen, a director of the retinal diseases program at the National Eye Institute, which helped finance the artificial retina research and is supporting many other blindness therapy projects. "We have a lot of exciting things sitting in the wings."The artificial retina is a sheet of electrodes implanted in the eye. The patient is also given glasses with an attached camera and a portable video processor. This system, called Argus II, allows visual signals to bypass the damaged portion of the retina and be transmitted to the brain.With the artificial retina or retinal prosthesis, a blind person cannot see in the conventional sense, but can identify outlines and boundaries of objects, especially when there is contrast between light and dark — fireworks against a night sky or black socks mixed with white ones."Without the system, I wouldn't be able to see anything at all, and if you were in front of me and you moved left and right, I'm not going to realize any of this," said Elias Konstantopolous, 74, a retired electrician in Baltimore, one of about 50 Americans and Europeans who have been using the device in clinical trials. He said it helps him differentiate curbs from roads, and detect contours of objects and people. "When you have nothing, this is something. It's a lot."The F.D.A. approved Argus II, made by Second Sight Medical Products, to treat people with severe retinitis pigmentosa, in which photoreceptor cells, which take in light, deteriorate.The eyeglass camera captures images, which the video processor translates into pixelized patterns of light and dark, and transmits them to the electrodes. The electrodes then send them to the brain."The questions that this particular device raised for F.D.A. were very new," said Dr. Malvina Eydelman, the F.D.A.'s director for the Division of Ophthalmic and Ear, Nose, and Throat Devices. "It's a big step forward for the whole ophthalmology field."About 100,000 Americans have retinitis pigmentosa, but initially between 10,000 and 15,000 will likely qualify for the Argus II, according to the company. To be eligible, people must be over 25, have previously had useful vision, and be so visually impaired that the device would be an improvement.But experts said the technology holds promise for others who are blind, especially those with advanced age-related macular degeneration, the major cause of vision loss in older people, affecting about two million Americans. About 50,000 would be impaired enough for the device to help, said Dr. Robert Greenberg, Second Sight's chief executive.In Europe, Argus II received approval in 2011 to treat severe blindness from any type of outer retinal degeneration, although so far it is marketed there for retinitis pigmentosa. In the United States, additional trials are necessary for such approval.Eventually, the company plans to implant electrodes directly into the brain's cortex to "allow us to address blindness from all causes," Dr. Greenberg said.Initially, Argus II will be available at seven hospitals in New York, California, Texas, Maryland and Pennsylvania. It will cost about $150,000, excluding surgery and training. Second Sight said it was optimistic that insurance would cover it.Argus II was developed over 20 years by Dr. Mark S. Humayun, an ophthalmologist and biomedical engineer at the University of Southern California. Some financing came from private sources and the National Eye Institute, the National Science Foundation and the Department of Energy, all federal agencies.Dr. Humayun said he envisioned applying the technology to other conditions than blindness, implanting electrodes in other parts of the body to address bladder control problems, perhaps, or spinal paralysis. "We don't think of the human body as an electrical grid, but it runs off electrical impulses," he said.The Argus II was approved under a special F.D.A. program designating it a "humanitarian use device," which Dr. Eydelman said applied to therapies that would be used for fewer than 4,000 people a year. Argus II is only the 57th humanitarian device exemption granted by the agency. Companies applying for humanitarian device approval can conduct much smaller clinical trials — Second Sight submitted data on only 30 patients — and must only demonstrate safety and "probable benefit," not proof of effectiveness, Dr. Eydelman said.The F.D.A. worked with Second Sight to develop ways to measure that benefit, including tasks like walking on a sidewalk without stepping off, and matching black, gray and white socks.Of the 30 Argus II clinical trial patients, 11 experienced a total of 23 negative effects, the F.D.A. said, including retinal detachment and erosion of the clear covering of the eyeball.
SEATTLE (AP) — Teaching parents to switch channels from violent shows to educational TV can improve preschoolers' behavior, even without getting them to watch less, a study found.The results were modest and faded over time, but may hold promise for finding ways to help young children avoid aggressive, violent behavior, the study authors and other doctors said."It's not just about turning off the television. It's about changing the channel. What children watch is as important as how much they watch," said lead author Dr. Dimitri Christakis, a pediatrician and researcher at Seattle Children's Research Institute.The research was to be published online Monday by the journal Pediatrics.The study involved 565 Seattle parents, who periodically filled out TV-watching diaries and questionnaires measuring their child's behavior.Half were coached for six months on getting their 3-to-5-year-old kids to watch shows like "Sesame Street" and "Dora the Explorer" rather than more violent programs like "Power Rangers." The results were compared with kids whose parents who got advice on healthy eating instead.At six months, children in both groups showed improved behavior, but there was a little bit more improvement in the group that was coached on their TV watching.By one year, there was no meaningful difference between the two groups overall. Low-income boys appeared to get the most short-term benefit."That's important because they are at the greatest risk, both for being perpetrators of aggression in real life, but also being victims of aggression," Christakis said.The study has some flaws. The parents weren't told the purpose of the study, but the authors concede they probably figured it out and that might have affected the results.Before the study, the children averaged about 1½ hours of TV, video and computer game watching a day, with violent content making up about a quarter of that time. By the end of the study, that increased by up to 10 minutes. Those in the TV coaching group increased their time with positive shows; the healthy eating group watched more violent TV.Nancy Jensen, who took part with her now 6-year-old daughter, said the study was a wake-up call."I didn't realize how much Elizabeth was watching and how much she was watching on her own," she said.Jensen said her daughter's behavior improved after making changes, and she continues to control what Elizabeth and her 2-year-old brother, Joe, watch. She also decided to replace most of Elizabeth's TV time with games, art and outdoor fun.During a recent visit to their Seattle home, the children seemed more interested in playing with blocks and running around outside than watching TV.Another researcher who was not involved in this study but also focuses his work on kids and television commended Christakis for taking a look at the influence of positive TV programs, instead of focusing on the impact of violent TV."I think it's fabulous that people are looking on the positive side. Because no one's going to stop watching TV, we have to have viable alternatives for kids," said Dr. Michael Rich, director of the Center on Media and Child Health at Children's Hospital Boston.
Obstetricians increasingly recommend planned Caesarean sections for women having twins, but a new study has found that a C-section for healthy twins usually provides no advantage over vaginal delivery.Researchers randomly assigned 2,800 mothers carrying healthy twins to either a planned C-section or a planned vaginal delivery. There was no difference in outcome between the two groups. There were serious medical problems, like bone fracture or abnormal levels of consciousness, in 36 babies delivered by C-section and 35 delivered vaginally. Twenty-one babies delivered by C-section died, as did 17 delivered vaginally.Mothers fared equally well in each group, with serious health problems in 7.3 percent of the C-section mothers and in 8.5 percent of the vaginal delivery group.The trial was carried out in well-equipped health care settings and by practitioners experienced in multiple births. "These skills should be available to anyone trained in obstetrics," said the lead author, Dr. Jon Barrett, chief of maternal-fetal medicine at Sunnybrook Health Sciences Center in Toronto. "This indicates the need for the current generation of obstetricians who have these skills to impart them to their students and give women the opportunity for the best choice."Results of the study were presented at a medical conference in San Francisco last week.
Experts have long known that children imitate many of the deeds — good and bad — that they see on television. But it has rarely been shown that changing a young child's viewing habits at home can lead to improved behavior.In a study published Monday in the journal Pediatrics, researchers reported the results of a program designed to limit the exposure of preschool children to violence-laden videos and television shows and increase their time with educational programming that encourages empathy. They found that the experiment reduced the children's aggression toward others, compared with a group of children who were allowed to watch whatever they wanted."Here we have an experiment that proposes a potential solution," said Dr. Thomas N. Robinson, a professor of pediatrics at Stanford, who was not involved in the study. "Giving this intervention — exposing kids to less adult television, less aggression on television and more prosocial television — will have an effect on behavior."While the research showed "a small to moderate effect" on the preschoolers' behavior, he added, the broader public health impact could be "very meaningful."The new study was a randomized trial, rare in research on the effects of media on children. The researchers, at Seattle Children's Research Institute and the University of Washington, divided 565 parents of children ages 3 to 5 into two groups. Both were told to track their children's media consumption in a diary that the researchers assessed for violent, didactic and prosocial content, which they defined as showing empathy, helping others and resolving disputes without violence.The control group was given advice only on better dietary habits for children. The second group of parents were sent program guides highlighting positive shows for young children. They also received newsletters encouraging parents to watch television with their children and ask questions during the shows about the best ways to deal with conflict. The parents also received monthly phone calls from the researchers, who helped them set television-watching goals for their preschoolers.The researchers surveyed the parents at six months and again after a year about their children's social behavior. After six months, parents in the group receiving advice about television-watching said their children were somewhat less aggressive with others, compared with those in the control group. The children who watched less violent shows also scored higher on measures of social competence, a difference that persisted after one year.Low-income boys showed the most improvement, though the researchers could not say why. Total viewing time did not differ between the two groups."The take-home message for parents is it's not just about turning off the TV; it's about changing the channel," said Dr. Dimitri A. Christakis, the lead author of the study and a professor of pediatrics at the University of Washington."We want our children to behave better," Dr. Christakis said, "and changing their media diet is a good way to do that."Until she began participating in Dr. Christakis's trial, Nancy Jensen, a writer in Seattle, had never heard of shows like Nickelodeon's "Wonder Pets!," featuring cooperative team players, and NBC's "My Friend Rabbit," with its themes of loyalty and friendship.At the time, her daughter Elizabeth, then 3, liked"King of the Hill,"a cartoon comedy geared toward adults that features beer and gossip. In hindsight, she said, the show was "hilariously funny, but completely inappropriate for a 3-year-old."These days, she consults Common Sense Media, a nonprofit advocacy group in San Francisco, to make sure that the shows her daughter watches have some prosocial benefit. Elizabeth, now 6, was "not necessarily an aggressive kid," Ms. Jensen said. Still, the girl's teacher recently commended her as very considerate, and Ms. Jensen believes a better television diet is an important reason.The new study has limitations, experts noted. Data on both the children's television habits and their behavior was reported by their parents, who may not be objective. And the study focused only on media content in the home, although some preschool-aged children are exposed to programming elsewhere.Children watch a mix of "prosocial but also antisocial media," said Marie-Louise Mares, an associate professor of communications at the University of Wisconsin, Madison. "Merely being exposed to prosocial media doesn't mean that kids take it that way."Even educational programming with messages of empathy can be misunderstood by preschoolers, with negative consequences. A study published online in November in The Journal of Applied Developmental Psychology found that preschoolers shown educational media were more likely to engage in certain forms of interpersonal aggression over time.Preschoolers observe relationship conflict early in a television episode but do not always connect it to the moral lesson or resolution at the end, said Jamie M. Ostrov, the lead author of the November study and an associate professor of psychology at the University of Buffalo.Preschoolers watch an estimated 4.1 hours of television and other screen time daily, according to a 2011 study. Dr. Ostrov advised parents to watch television with their young children and to speak up during the relationship conflicts that are depicted. Citing one example, Dr. Ostrov counseled parents to ask children, "What could we do differently here?" to make it clear that yelling at a sibling is not acceptable.He also urged parents to stick with age-appropriate programming. A 3-year-old might misunderstand the sibling strife in the PBS show"Arthur," he said, or stop paying attention before it is resolved.
CHICAGO (AP) — A new study shows that hip replacements are more likely to fail in women than in men.Researchers found that a small number of the hip implants failed overall, but women were 29 percent more likely than men to need a repeat surgery within the first three years.Researchers looked at more than 35,000 surgeries at 46 hospitals in the Kaiser Permanente health system. The study is being published Monday in JAMA Internal Medicine. It was funded by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration.Some experts say more research is needed to determine which models of hip implants perform best in women.Women make up the majority of the more than 400,000 Americans who have full or partial hip replacements each year.
During a talk last spring in San Francisco, Dr. Susan Love, the well-known breast cancer book author and patient advocate, chided the research establishment for ignoring the needs of people with cancer. "The only difference between a researcher and a patient is a diagnosis," she told the crowd. "We're all patients."It was an eerily prescient lecture. Less than two months later, Dr. Love was given a diagnosis of acute myelogenous leukemia. She had no obvious symptoms and learned of her disease only after a checkup and routine blood work."Little did I know I was talking about myself," she said in an interview. "It was really out of the blue. I was feeling fine. I ran five miles the day before."Dr. Love, a surgeon, is best known as the author of the top-selling "Dr. Susan Love's Breast Book" (Da Capo Press, 2010) now in its fifth edition. She is also president of the Dr. Susan Love Research Foundation, which focuses on breast cancer prevention and research into eradicating the disease. But after decades of tireless advocacy on behalf of women with breast cancer, Dr. Love found herself in an unfamiliar role with an unfamiliar disease."There is a sense of shock when it happens to you," she said. "In some ways I would have been less shocked if I got breast cancer because it's so common, but getting leukemia was a world I didn't know. Even when you're a physician, when you get shocking news like this you sort of forget everything you know and are scared the same as everybody else."Because Dr. Love's disease was caught early, she had a little time to seek second opinions and choose her medical team. She chose City of Hope in Duarte, Calif., because of its extensive experience in bone marrow transplants. At 65, Dr. Love was startled to learn she was considered among the "elderly" patients for this type of leukemia.She was admitted to the hospital and underwent chemotherapy. Because her blood counts did not rebound after the treatment, her stay lasted a grueling seven weeks.She went home for just two weeks, and then returned to the hospital for a bone-marrow transplant, with marrow donated by her younger sister, Elizabeth Love De Garcia, 53, who lives in Mexico City.Although the transplant itself was uneventful, the next four weeks were an ordeal. Dr. Love developed pain and neuropathy from the chemotherapy drugs. Dr. Love's wife, Dr. Helen Cooksey; daughter, Katie Love-Cooksey, 24; and siblings offered round-the-clock support. Ms. Love-Cooksey slept in the hospital every night. "I wasn't very articulate during that time, but I always had my family there," Dr. Love said. "They were great advocates for me."The transplant "is quite an amazing thing," Dr. Love said. Her blood type changed from O positive to B positive, the same type as her sister. She also has inherited her sister's immune system, and a lifelong allergy to nickel has disappeared. "I can wear cheap jewelry now," she said. She returned to work last month.Dr. Love has been told her disease is in remission, though her immune system remains compromised and she is more susceptible to infection. So she avoids crowds, air travel and other potential sources of cold and flu viruses.While Dr. Love has always been a strong advocate for women undergoing cancer treatment, she says her disease and treatment has strengthened her understanding of what women with breast cancer and other types of cancer go through during treatments."There are little things like having numb toes or having less stamina to building muscles back up after a month of bed rest," she said. "There is significant collateral damage from the treatment that is underestimated by the medical profession. There's a sense of 'You're lucky to be alive, so why are you complaining?' "Dr. Love says her experience has emboldened her in her quest to focus on the causes of disease rather than new drugs to treat it."I think I'm more impatient now and in more of a hurry," she said. "I've been reminded that you don't know how long you have. There are women being diagnosed every day. We don't have the luxury to sit around and come up with a new marketing scheme. We have to get rid of this disease, and there is no reason we can't do it."People who remain skeptical about the ability to eradicate breast cancer should look to the history of cervical cancer, she said. Decades ago, a woman with an abnormal Pap smear would be advised to undergo hysterectomy. Now a vaccine exists that can protect women from the infection that causes most cervical cancers."We need to focus more on the cause of breast cancer," she said. "I'm still very impressed with the fact that cancer of the cervix went from being a disease that robbed women of their fertility, if not their lives, to having a vaccine to prevent it."Dr. Love, who wrote a book called "Live a Little!," said illness has also made her grateful that she didn't put off her "bucket list" and that she has traveled the world and focused on work she finds challenging and satisfying."It just reminds you that none of us are going to get out of here alive, and we don't know how much time we have," she said. "I say this to my daughter, whether it's changing the world or having a good time, that we should do what we want to do. I drink the expensive wine now."
CHICAGO (AP) — Drug overdose deaths rose for the 11th straight year, federal data show, and most of them were accidents involving addictive painkillers despite growing attention to risks from these medicines."The big picture is that this is a big problem that has gotten much worse quickly," said Dr. Thomas Frieden, head of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, which gathered and analyzed the data.In 2010, the CDC reported, there were 38,329 drug overdose deaths nationwide. Medicines, mostly prescription drugs, were involved in nearly 60 percent of overdose deaths that year, overshadowing deaths from illicit narcotics.The report appears in Tuesday's Journal of the American Medical Association.It details which drugs were at play in most of the fatalities. As in previous recent years, opioid drugs — which include OxyContin and Vicodin — were the biggest problem, contributing to 3 out of 4 medication overdose deaths.Frieden said many doctors and patients don't realize how addictive these drugs can be, and that they're too often prescribed for pain that can be managed with less risky drugs.They're useful for cancer, "but if you've got terrible back pain or terrible migraines," using these addictive drugs can be dangerous, he said.Medication-related deaths accounted for 22,134 of the drug overdose deaths in 2010.Anti-anxiety drugs including Valium were among common causes of medication-related deaths, involved in almost 30 percent of them. Among the medication-related deaths, 17 percent were suicides.The report's data came from death certificates, which aren't always clear on whether a death was a suicide or a tragic attempt at getting high. But it does seem like most serious painkiller overdoses were accidental, said Dr. Rich Zane, chair of emergency medicine at the University of Colorado School of Medicine.The study's findings are no surprise, he added. "The results are consistent with what we experience" in ERs, he said, adding that the statistics no doubt have gotten worse since 2010.Some experts believe these deaths will level off. "Right now, there's a general belief that because these are pharmaceutical drugs, they're safer than street drugs like heroin," said Don Des Jarlais, director of the chemical dependency institute at New York City's Beth Israel Medical Center."But at some point, people using these drugs are going to become more aware of the dangers," he said.Frieden said the data show a need for more prescription drug monitoring programs at the state level, and more laws shutting down "pill mills" — doctor offices and pharmacies that over-prescribe addictive medicines.Last month, a federal panel of drug safety specialists recommended that Vicodin and dozens of other medicines be subjected to the same restrictions as other narcotic drugs like oxycodone and morphine. Meanwhile, more and more hospitals have been establishing tougher restrictions on painkiller prescriptions and refills.One example: The University of Colorado Hospital in Aurora is considering a rule that would ban emergency doctors from prescribing more medicine for patients who say they lost their pain meds, Zane said.AP Medical Writer Lindsey Tanner can be reached at http://www.twitter.com
CHICAGO (AP) — Robotic surgery is increasingly being used for women's hysterectomies, adding at least $2,000 to the cost without offering much benefit over less high-tech methods, a study found.The technique was used in just 0.5 percent of operations studied in 2007, but that soared to almost 10 percent by early 2010. Columbia University researchers analyzed data on more than 260,000 women who had their wombs removed at 441 U.S. hospitals for reasons other than cancer. The database covered surgeries performed through the first few months of 2010.Women who had the robotic operations were slightly less likely to spend more than two days in the hospital, but hospital stays were shorter than that for most women. Also, complications were equally rare among robotic surgery patients and those who had more conventional surgeries. Average costs for robotic hysterectomies totaled nearly $9,000, versus about $3,000 for the least expensive method, a different type of minimally invasive technique using more conventional surgery methods.Traditionally hysterectomies were done by removing the womb through a large abdominal incision. Newer methods include removing the uterus through the vagina and minimally invasive "keyhole" abdominal operations using more conventional surgery methods, or surgeon-controlled robotic devices.Robotic operations involve computer-controlled long, thin robot-like "arms" equipped with tiny surgery instruments. Surgeons operate the computer and can see inside the body on the computer screen, through a tiny camera attached to the robotic arms. The initial idea was for surgeons to do these operations miles away from the operating room, but robotic operations now are mostly done with the surgeon in the same room as the patient.Theoretically, robotic surgeries make it easier to maneuver inside the patient, and are increasingly used for many types of operations, not just hysterectomies.The main explanation for the big increase "is that robotic surgery has been marketed extensively to not only hospitals and physicians, but also directly to patients. There is minimal data in gynecology that it is advantageous," said Dr. Jason Wright, an assistant professor of women's health and the study's lead author.The study was published Tuesday in the Journal of the American Medical Association."Our findings highlight the importance of developing rational strategies to implement new surgical technologies," the researchers wrote.They note that 1 in 9 U.S. women will undergo a hysterectomy, usually after the age of 40. Reasons include fibroids and other non-cancerous growths, abnormal bleeding, and cancer.Traditional abdominal operations remain common and more than 40 percent of women studied had them, costing on average about $6,600.A JAMA editorial says the study doesn't answer whether the robotic method might be better for certain women, and says more research comparing methods is needed. Still, it says doctors and hospitals have a duty to inform patients about costs of different surgery options.Dr. Myriam Curet of manufacturer Intuitive Surgical of Sunnyvale, Calif., said surgical robots can help surgeons overcome the limitations of other minimally invasive methods for very overweight patients, those with scarring from other surgeries and other complexities.
ATLANTA (AP) — You may not be a disease detective, but now you can play one at home.The nation's public health agency has released a free app for the iPad called "Solve the Outbreak." It allows users to run through fictional outbreaks and make decisions: Do you quarantine the village? Talk to people who are sick?The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention says the app was designed in-house and wouldn't give an estimate for development costs.The agency says it is using social media to educate the public about diseases and to promote an appreciation for public health work. The app went live this week.
Debra Sukin and her husband were determined to take no chances with her second pregnancy. Their first child, Jacob, who had a serious genetic disorder, did not babble when he was a year old and had severe developmental delays. So the second time around, Ms. Sukin had what was then the most advanced prenatal testing.The test found no sign of Angelman syndrome, the rare genetic disorder that had struck Jacob. But as months passed, Eli was not crawling or walking or babbling at ages when other babies were."Whatever the milestones were, my son was not meeting them," Ms. Sukin said.Desperate to find out what is wrong with Eli, now 8, the Sukins, of The Woodlands, Tex., have become pioneers in a new kind of testing that is proving particularly helpful in diagnosing mysterious neurological illnesses in children. Scientists sequence all of a patient's genes, systematically searching for disease-causing mutations.A few years ago, this sort of test was so difficult and expensive that it was generally only available to participants in research projects like those sponsored by the National Institutes of Health. But the price has plunged in just a few years from tens of thousands of dollars to around $7,000 to $9,000 for a family. Baylor College of Medicine and a handful of companies are now offering it. Insurers usually pay.Demand has soared — at Baylor, for example, scientists analyzed 5 to 10 DNA sequences a month when the program started in November 2011. Now they are doing more than 130 analyses a month. At the National Institutes of Health, which handles about 300 cases a year as part of its research program, demand is so great that the program is expected to ultimately take on 800 to 900 a year.The test is beginning to transform life for patients and families who have often spent years searching for answers. They can now start the grueling process with DNA sequencing, says Dr. Wendy K. Chung, professor of pediatrics and medicine at Columbia University."Most people originally thought of using it as a court of last resort," Dr. Chung said. "Now we can think of it as a first-line test."Even if there is no treatment, there is almost always some benefit to diagnosis, geneticists say. It can give patients and their families the certainty of knowing what is wrong and even a prognosis. It can also ease the processing of medical claims, qualifying for special education services, and learning whether subsequent children might be at risk."Imagine the people who drive across the whole country looking for that one neurologist who can help, or scrubbing the whole house with Lysol because they think it might be an allergy," said Richard A. Gibbs, the director of Baylor College of Medicine's gene sequencing program. "Those kinds of stories are the rule, not the exception."Experts caution that gene sequencing is no panacea. It finds a genetic aberration in only about 25 to 30 percent of cases. About 3 percent of patients end up with better management of their disorder. About 1 percent get a treatment and a major benefit."People come to us with huge expectations," said Dr. William A. Gahl, who directs the N.I.H. program. "They think, 'You will take my DNA and find the causes and give me a treatment.' ""We give the impression that we can do these things because we only publish our successes," Dr. Gahl said, adding that when patients come to him, "we try to make expectations realistic."DNA sequencing was not available when Debra and Steven Sukin began trying to find out what was wrong with Eli. When he was 3, they tried microarray analysis, a genetic test that is nowhere near as sensitive as sequencing. It detected no problems."My husband and I looked at each other and said, 'The good news is that everything is fine; the bad news is that everything is not fine,' " Ms. Sukin said.In November 2011, when Eli was 6, Ms. Sukin consulted Dr. Arthur L. Beaudet, a medical geneticist at Baylor."Is there a protein missing?" she recalled asking him. "Is there something biochemical we could be missing?"By now, DNA sequencing had come of age. Dr. Beaudet said that Eli was a great candidate, and it turned out that the new procedure held an answer.A single DNA base was altered in a gene called CASK, resulting in a disorder so rare that there are fewer than 10 cases in all the world's medical literature."It really became definitive for my husband and me," Ms. Sukin said. "We would need to do lifelong planning for dependent care for the rest of his life."
ATLANTA (AP) — It turns out this year's flu shot is doing a startlingly dismal job of protecting older people, the most vulnerable age group.The vaccine is proving only 9 percent effective in those 65 and older against the harsh strain of the flu that is predominant this season, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention said Thursday.Health officials are baffled as to why this is so. But the findings help explain why so many older people have been hospitalized with the flu this year.Despite the findings, the CDC stood by its recommendation that everyone over 6 months get flu shots, the elderly included, because some protection is better than none, and because those who are vaccinated and still get sick may suffer less severe symptoms."Year in and year out, the vaccine is the best protection we have," said CDC flu expert Dr. Joseph Bresee.Overall, across the age groups studied, the vaccine's effectiveness was found to be a moderate 56 percent, which means those who got a shot have a 56 percent lower chance of winding up at the doctor with the flu. That is somewhat worse than what has been seen in other years.For those 65 and older, the vaccine was only 27 percent effective against the three strains it is designed to protect against, the worst level in about a decade. It did a particularly poor job against the tough strain that is causing more than three-quarters of the illnesses this year.It is well known that flu vaccine tends to protect younger people better than older ones. Elderly people have weaker immune systems that don't respond as well to flu shots, and they are more vulnerable to the illness and its complications, including pneumonia.But health officials said they don't know why this year's vaccine did so poorly in that age group.One theory, as yet unproven, is that older people's immune systems were accustomed to strains from the last two years and had more trouble switching gears to handle this year's different, harsh strain.The preliminary data for senior citizens is less than definitive. It is based on fewer than 300 people scattered among five states.But it will no doubt surprise many people that the effectiveness is that low, said Michael Osterholm, a University of Minnesota infectious-disease expert who has tried to draw attention to the need for a more effective flu vaccine.Among infectious diseases, flu is considered one of the nation's leading killers. On average, about 24,000 Americans die each flu season, according to the CDC.This flu season started in early December, a month earlier than usual, and peaked by the end of year. Hospitalization rates for people 65 and older have been some of the highest in a decade, at 146 per 100,000 people.Flu viruses tend to mutate more quickly than others, so a new vaccine is formulated each year to target the strains expected to be the major threats. CDC officials have said that in formulating this year's vaccine, scientists accurately anticipated the strains that are circulating this season.Because of the guesswork involved, scientists tend to set a lower bar for flu vaccine. While childhood vaccines against diseases like measles are expected to be 90 or 95 percent effective, a flu vaccine that's 60 to 70 percent effective in the U.S. is considered pretty good. By that standard, this year's vaccine is OK.For senior citizens, a flu vaccine is considered pretty good if it's in the 30 to 40 percent range, said Dr. Arnold Monto, a University of Michigan flu expert.A high-dose version of the flu shot was recently made available for those 65 and older, but the new study was too small to show whether that has made a difference.The CDC estimates are based on about 2,700 people who got sick in December and January. The researchers traced back to see who had gotten shots and who hadn't. An earlier, smaller study put the vaccine's overall effectiveness at 62 percent, but other factors that might have influenced that figure weren't taken into account.The CDC's Bresee said there is a danger in providing preliminary results because it may result in people doubting — or skipping — flu shots. But the figures were released to warn older people who got shots that they may still get sick and shouldn't ignore any serious flu-like symptoms, he said.
WASHINGTON (AP) — Don't be afraid to question your doctor and ask, "Do I really need that?"That's the advice from leading medical groups who came up dozens of tests and treatments that physicians too often prescribe when they shouldn't.No worrisome stroke signs? Then don't screen a healthy person for a clogged neck artery, the family physicians say. It could lead to risky surgery for a blockage too small to matter.Don't routinely try heartburn medicine for infants with reflux, the pediatric hospitalists say. It hasn't been proven to work in babies, and could cause side effects.Don't try feeding tubes in people with advanced dementia, say the hospice providers. Helping them eat is a better option.These are examples of potentially needless care that not only can waste money and time, but sometimes can harm, says the warning being issued Thursday from medical specialty groups that represent more than 350,000 doctors.Too many people "think that more is better, that more treatment, more testing somehow results in better health care," said Dr. Glen Stream, former president of the American Academy of Family Physicians, which contributed to the list. "That really is not true."The recommendations are part of a coalition called Choosing Wisely, formed by the American Board of Internal Medicine Foundation. Participating medical societies were asked to identify five tests or treatments that are commonly overused in their specialty. The list is aimed at doctors and includes references to published studies. Consumers Reports and other consumer groups are publicizing the information in more patient-friendly terms.Last year, the coalition listed 45 overused tests and treatments. It included some of the best known examples, such as too much imaging for back pain and repeating colonoscopies too frequently.This year's list adds 90 more overused kinds of care. Some are the result of doctors' habits, hard to overcome despite new evidence, Stream said. Others come about because patients demand care they think they need.—Don't use opioid painkillers for migraines except as a last resort, say the neurologists. There are better, more migraine-specific drugs available without the addictive risk of narcotics. Plus, frequent use of opioids actually can worsen migraines, a concept known as rebound headache.—Just because a pregnant woman misses her due date, don't race to induce labor if mom and baby are doing fine, say the obstetricians. Inducing before the cervix is ready often fails, leading to an unneeded C-section. "Just being due by the calendar doesn't mean your body says you're due," Stream notes.—Don't automatically give a child a CT scan after a minor head injury, say the pediatricians. About half of children who go to the ER with head injuries get this radiation-heavy scan, and clinical observation first could help some who don't really need a CT avoid it.—And don't leave an implanted heart-zapping defibrillator turned on when a patient is near death, say the hospice providers. This technology clearly saves lives by guarding against an irregular heartbeat. But if someone is dying of something else, or is in the terminal stages of heart disease, it can issue repeated painful shocks, to no avail. Yet fewer than 10 percent of hospices have formal policies on when to switch off the implants.
WASHINGTON — The Obama administration issued a final rule on Wednesday defining "essential health benefits" that must be offered by most health insurance plans next year, and it said that 32 million people would gain access to coverage of mental health care as a result.The federal rule requires insurers to cover treatment of mental illnesses, behavioral disorders, drug addiction and alcohol abuse, and other conditions.Kathleen Sebelius, the secretary of health and human services, said that in addition to the millions who would gain access to mental health care, 30 million people who already have some mental health coverage will see improvements in benefits.White House officials described the rule as a major expansion of coverage. In the past, they said, nearly 20 percent of people buying insurance on their own did not have coverage for mental health services, and nearly one-third had no coverage for treatment of substance abuse.The rule requires insurers to cover benefits in 10 broad categories, including hospital services, prescription drugs and maternity and newborn care.Ms. Sebelius said the partial standardization of benefits would make it easier for consumers to compare health plans.In the market today, she said, "it is difficult for consumers to make well-informed choices" because benefits, deductibles, co-payments and other features vary widely among competing health plans.The rule says the new health insurance policies can be offered at four levels of coverage. Under the least generous policies, known as bronze plans, consumers will pay 40 percent of the costs of covered benefits, on average, and insurers will pay the rest. Under the most generous policies, known as platinum plans, consumers will pay 10 percent. The administration, however, declined to set a uniform national standard and allowed states to set many of the specific requirements.Minimum benefits will vary from state to state, as each state will have a benchmark plan, reflecting coverage typically offered by employers. In more than 30 states, the benchmark, or standard, is an insurance plan offered by Blue Cross and Blue Shield.Insurers in each state will generally be required to provide all benefits required by state laws adopted before Dec. 31, 2011. States can require additional benefits, but will have to pay the extra costs themselves.Carl E. Schmid, deputy executive director of the AIDS Institute, an advocacy group, said he had hoped the federal government would set explicit, uniform national standards."We are disappointed," Mr. Schmid said. "We thought the federal government would spell out essential health benefits in more detail. Patients respond differently to different drugs and often need multiple drugs at the same time. Under this rule, patients might have access to a total of 500 drugs in one state and more than 1,000 in another state."Access to autism treatment may also differ. Stuart Spielman, senior policy adviser at Autism Speaks, an advocacy group, said that 32 states had laws requiring coverage of autism treatments and that other states were considering legislation to impose such requirements.The rule limits the costs to consumers in several ways. For health plans offered in the small-group market, the deductible amount, paid by consumers before insurance kicks in, generally cannot exceed $2,000 for individual coverage and $4,000 for family coverage. Total out-of-pocket costs will also be subject to limits. If a health plan has a network of doctors and hospitals, consumers may be required to pay more if they go outside the network.The new rule generally applies to all health insurers offering coverage in the individual and small group markets. States will have primary responsibility for enforcing the standards. The federal government said it would step in if it found that a state was not doing an adequate job of protecting consumers.Federal officials acknowledged that many policies sold in the individual insurance market did not cover all the services required in the new rule. The administration said that many small business health plans "meet or are close to meeting the coverage requirements."Under the rule, health plans must provide benefits that have not always been provided by commercial insurers. For example, insurers must cover dental care and vision services for children, as well as "habilitative services" to help people with disabilities keep or improve their skills.
ATLANTA (AP) — On an average day, U.S. adults get roughly 11 percent of their calories from fast food, a government study shows.That's down slightly from the 13 percent reported the last time the government tried to pin down how much of the American diet is coming from fast food. Eating fast food too frequently has been seen as a driver of America's obesity problem.For the research, about 11,000 adults were asked extensive questions about what they ate and drank over the previous 24 hours to come up with the results.— Young adults eat more fast food than their elders; 15 percent of calories for ages 20 to 39 and dropping to 6 percent for those 60 and older.— Blacks get more of their calories from fast-food, 15 percent compared to 11 percent for whites and Hispanics.— Young black adults got a whopping 21 percent from the likes of Wendy's, Taco Bell and KFC.The figures are averages. Included in the calculations are some people who almost never eat fast food, as well as others who eat a lot of it.The survey covers the years 2007 through 2010 and was released Thursday by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. The authors couldn't explain why the proportion of calories from fast food dropped from the 13 percent found in a survey for 2003 through 2006.One nutrition professor cast doubts on the latest results, saying 11 percent seemed implausibly low. New York University's Marion Nestle said it wouldn't be surprising if some people under-reported their hamburgers, fries and milkshakes since eating too much fast food is increasingly seen as something of a no-no."If I were a fast-food company, I'd say 'See, we have nothing to do with obesity! Americans are getting 90 percent of their calories somewhere else!'" she said.The study didn't include the total number of fast-food calories, just the percentage. Previous government research suggests that the average U.S. adult each day consumes about 270 calories of fast food — the equivalent of a small McDonald's hamburger and a few fries.The new CDC study found that obese people get about 13 percent of daily calories from fast food, compared with less than 10 percent for skinny and normal-weight people.There was no difference seen by household income, except for young adults. The poorest — those with an annual household income of less than $30,000 — got 17 percent of their calories from fast food, while the figure was under 14 percent for the most affluent 20- and 30-somethings with a household income of more than $50,000.That's not surprising since there are disproportionately higher numbers of fast-food restaurants in low-income neighborhoods, Nestle said.Fast food is accessible and "it's cheap," she said.
WASHINGTON (AP) — The nation's top disease detective says impending budget cuts will make it harder to solve outbreaks, fight hospital infections and keep illnesses overseas from making their way here.Dr. Tom Frieden, director of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, says his agency will lose more than $300 million at a time when public health already is struggling to keep up with new germs.In Frieden's words, "Our threats aren't getting cut but our ability to respond to them is."One example: Frieden says the cuts could constrain his agency's investigation of a worrisome tuberculosis outbreak in Los Angeles. Another example: CDC would have to cut funding for state and local health departments, impairing their ability to spot early warning signs of outbreaks.
WASHINGTON — One of the biggest threats to the success of President Obama's health care law comes from shortages of doctors, nurses and other health care professionals. But a 15-member commission created to investigate the problem has never met in two and a half years because it has no money from Congress or the administration."It's like 'Waiting for Godot,' " said Dr. Richard D. Krugman, the dean of the University of Colorado Medical School and a member of the commission. "We are sitting on a park bench, waiting for Godot. We'll see if he shows up."With an aging population and 30 million people expected to gain coverage under Mr. Obama's health care law, the demand for medical care is expected to increase. But Dr. Sheldon M. Retchin, the vice chairman of the panel, the National Health Care Workforce Commission, said, "We are prohibited from meeting and discussing these issues."Members of the independent nonpartisan panel said they wanted to address these questions: How many more doctors are needed? What is the right mix of primary care physicians and specialists? Who will care for the millions of people gaining Medicaid coverage next year?Should states rewrite their laws to allow nurse practitioners and physician assistants to do more of the work done by doctors? Could pharmacists play a larger role in coordinating care and managing the use of medications?The commission was created by the 2010 health care law, the Affordable Care Act. Mr. Obama has requested $3 million for the panel in each of the last two years, and some Democrats, like Senator Tom Harkin of Iowa, chairman of the Appropriations subcommittee on health, have supported the request.But Republicans in Congress have been reluctant to provide money for anything connected with the law, which they opposed. "Anything authorized in the Affordable Care Act has a tough road with the Republicans," said Dr. Atul Grover, the chief lobbyist for the Association of American Medical Colleges.The chairman of the commission, Peter I. Buerhaus, a professor of nursing at Vanderbilt University, said: "It's a disappointing situation. The nation's health care work force has many problems that are not being attended to. These problems were apparent before health care reform, and they will be even more pressing after health care reform."Dr. Krugman said the commission was "caught in a broader political struggle, and in the gridlock between Congress and the administration."Dr. Retchin, who is the senior vice president for health sciences at Virginia Commonwealth University in Richmond, said "the government needs to analyze the scope, caliber and composition of the health care work force" because labor costs accounted for a large share of the nation's health care bill.Members of the panel, appointed in September 2010 by the comptroller general of the United States, have no staff, no budget and no agenda.Kim J. Gillan, the director of the work force training program at Montana State University Billings, said federal officials had made clear to her and other panel members that "we were not to function as a group or have contact with one another."Ms. Gillan said some people apparently feared that the commission might recommend the national licensing of health care professionals or other steps that could interfere with state prerogatives.Another panel member, Prof. Thomas C. Ricketts of the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill, said the Government Accountability Office, an investigative arm of Congress, had advised the panel that "we were not to work or be seen to be working."Dr. Krugman said, "We were told that we were to have no conversations until we were funded because that would be a violation of some federal law or rule."Chuck Young, a spokesman for the accountability office, said, "Agencies generally cannot conduct business without an appropriation."In a summary of research, the Department of Health and Human Services said, "The United States faces shortages of primary care physicians, dentists, nurses and other health professionals."Roger J. Moncarz, an economist at the Bureau of Labor Statistics, said that employment in health care occupations was expected to grow by 29 percent, with the addition of 3.5 million new jobs from 2010 to 2020. Federal officials expect 712,000 new jobs for registered nurses — more than for any other occupation in the country — and a total of 1.3 million new jobs for home health and personal care aides, he said.Edward S. Salsberg, the director of the National Center for Health Workforce Analysis at the Health and Human Services Department, said 57 million people were living in areas with shortages of primary care practitioners.
About 30 percent of heart attacks, strokes and deaths from heart disease can be prevented in people at high risk if they switch to a Mediterranean diet rich in olive oil, nuts, beans, fish, fruits and vegetables, and even drink wine with meals, a large and rigorous new study has found.The findings, published on The New England Journal of Medicine's Web site on Monday, were based on the first major clinical trial to measure the diet's effect on heart risks. The magnitude of the diet's benefits startled experts. The study ended early, after almost five years, because the results were so clear it was considered unethical to continue.The diet helped those following it even though they did not lose weight and most of them were already taking statins, or blood pressure or diabetes drugs to lower their heart disease risk."Really impressive," said Rachel Johnson, a professor of nutrition at the University of Vermont and a spokeswoman for the American Heart Association. "And the really important thing — the coolest thing — is that they used very meaningful endpoints. They did not look at risk factors like cholesterol or hypertension or weight. They looked at heart attacks and strokes and death. At the end of the day, that is what really matters."Until now, evidence that the Mediterranean diet reduced the risk of heart disease was weak, based mostly on studies showing that people from Mediterranean countries seemed to have lower rates of heart disease — a pattern that could have been attributed to factors other than diet.And some experts had been skeptical that the effect of diet could be detected, if it existed at all, because so many people are already taking powerful drugs to reduce heart disease risk, while other experts hesitated to recommend the diet to people who already had weight problems, since oils and nuts have a lot of calories.Heart disease experts said the study was a triumph because it showed that a diet was powerful in reducing heart disease risk, and it did so using the most rigorous methods. Scientists randomly assigned 7,447 people in Spain who were overweight, were smokers, or had diabetes or other risk factors for heart disease to follow the Mediterranean diet or a low-fat one.Low-fat diets have not been shown in any rigorous way to be helpful, and they are also very hard for patients to maintain — a reality borne out in the new study, said Dr. Steven E. Nissen, chairman of the department of cardiovascular medicine at the Cleveland Clinic Foundation."Now along comes this group and does a gigantic study in Spain that says you can eat a nicely balanced diet with fruits and vegetables and olive oil and lower heart disease by 30 percent," he said. "And you can actually enjoy life."The study, by Dr. Ramon Estruch, a professor of medicine at the University of Barcelona, and his colleagues, was long in the planning. The investigators traveled the world, seeking advice on how best to answer the question of whether a diet alone could make a big difference in heart disease risk. They visited the Harvard School of Public Health several times to consult Dr. Frank M. Sacks, a professor of cardiovascular disease prevention there.In the end, they decided to randomly assign subjects at high risk of heart disease to three groups. One would be given a low-fat diet and counseled on how to follow it. The other two groups would be counseled to follow a Mediterranean diet. At first the Mediterranean dieters got more intense support. They met regularly with dietitians while members of the low-fat group just got an initial visit to train them in how to adhere to the diet, followed by a leaflet each year on the diet. Then the researchers decided to add more intensive counseling for them, too, but they still had difficulty staying with the diet.One group assigned to a Mediterranean diet was given extra-virgin olive oil each week and was instructed to use at least 4 four tablespoons a day. The other group got a combination of walnuts, almonds and hazelnuts and was instructed to eat about an ounce of the mix each day. An ounce of walnuts, for example, is about a quarter cup — a generous handful. The mainstays of the diet consisted of at least three servings a day of fruits and at least two servings of vegetables. Participants were to eat fish at least three times a week and legumes, which include beans, peas and lentils, at least three times a week. They were to eat white meat instead of red, and, for those accustomed to drinking, to have at least seven glasses of wine a week with meals.They were encouraged to avoid commercially made cookies, cakes and pastries and to limit their consumption of dairy products and processed meats.
The incidence of advanced breast cancer among younger women, ages 25 to 39, may have increased slightly over the last three decades, according to a study released Tuesday.But more research is needed to verify the finding, which was based on an analysis of statistics, the study's authors said. They do not know what may have caused the apparent increase.Some outside experts questioned whether the increase was real, and expressed concerns that the report would frighten women needlessly.The study, published in The Journal of the American Medical Association, found that advanced cases climbed to 2.9 per 100,000 younger women in 2009, from 1.53 per 100,000 women in 1976 — an increase of 1.37 cases per 100,000 women in 34 years. The totals were about 250 such cases per year in the mid-1970s, and more than 800 per year in 2009.Though small, the increase was statistically significant, and the researchers said it was worrisome because it involved cancer that had already spread to organs like the liver or lungs by the time it was diagnosed, which greatly diminishes the odds of survival.For now, the only advice the researchers can offer to young women is to see a doctor quickly if they notice lumps, pain or other changes in the breast, and not to assume that they cannot have breast cancer because they are young and healthy, or have no family history of the disease."Breast cancer can and does occur in younger women," said Dr. Rebecca H. Johnson, the first author of the study and medical director of the adolescent and young adult oncology program at Seattle Children's Hospital.But Dr. Johnson noted that there is no evidence that screening helps younger women who have an average risk for the disease and no symptoms. "We're certainly not advocating that young women get mammography at an earlier age than is generally specified," she said.Expert groups differ about when screening should begin; some say at age 40, others 50.Breast cancer is not common in younger women; only 1.8 percent of all cases are diagnosed in women from 20 to 34, and 10 percent in women from 35 to 44. However, when it does occur, the disease tends to be more deadly in younger women than in older ones. Researchers are not sure why.The researchers analyzed data from SEER, a program run by the National Cancer Institute to collect cancer statistics on 28 percent of the population of the United States. The study also used data from the past when SEER was smaller.The study is based on information from 936,497 women who had breast cancer from 1976 to 2009. Of those, 53,502 were 25 to 39 years old, including 3,438 who had advanced breast cancer, also called metastatic or distant disease.Younger women were the only ones in whom metastatic disease seemed to have increased, the researchers found.Dr. Archie Bleyer, a clinical research professor in radiation medicine at the Knight Cancer Institute at the Oregon Health and Science University in Portland who helped write the study, said scientists needed to verify the increase in advanced breast cancer in young women in the United States and find out whether it is occurring in other developed Western countries. "This is the first report of this kind," he said, adding that researchers had already asked colleagues in Canada to analyze data there."We need this to be sure ourselves about this potentially concerning, almost alarming trend," Dr. Bleyer said. "Then and only then are we really worried about what is the cause, because we've got to be sure it's real."Dr. Johnson said her own experience led her to look into the statistics on the disease in young women. She had breast cancer when she was 27; she is now 44. Over the years, friends and colleagues often referred young women with the disease to her for advice."It just struck me how many of those people there were," she said.Dr. Donald A. Berry, an expert on breast cancer data and a professor of biostatistics at the University of Texas' M. D. Anderson Cancer Center in Houston, said he was dubious about the finding, even though it was statistically significant, because the size of the apparent increase was so small — 1.37 cases per 100,000 women, over the course of 30 years.More screening and more precise tests to identify the stage of cancer at the time of diagnosis might account for the increase, he said."Not many women aged 25 to 39 get screened, but some do, but it only takes a few to account for a notable increase from one in 100,000," Dr. Berry said.Dr. Silvia C. Formenti, a breast cancer expert and the chairwoman of radiation oncology at New York University Langone Medical Center, questioned the study in part because although it found an increased incidence of advanced disease, it did not find the accompanying increase in deaths that would be expected.A spokeswoman for an advocacy group for young women with breast cancer, Young Survival Coalition, said the organization also wondered whether improved diagnostic and staging tests might explain all or part of the increase."We're looking at this data with caution," said the spokeswoman, Michelle Esser. "We don't want to invite panic or alarm."She said it was important to note that the findings applied only to women who had metastatic disease at the time of diagnosis, and did not imply that women who already had early-stage cancer faced an increased risk of advanced disease.Dr. J. Leonard Lichtenfeld , deputy chief medical officer of the American Cancer Society, said he and an epidemiologist for the society thought the increase was real."We want to make sure this is not oversold or that people suddenly get very frightened that we have a huge problem," Dr. Lichtenfeld said. "We don't. But we are concerned that over time, we might have a more serious problem than we have today."
WASHINGTON (AP) — The largest genetic study of mental illnesses to date finds five major disorders may not look much alike but they share some gene-based risks. The surprising discovery comes in the quest to unravel what causes psychiatric disorders and how to better diagnose and treat them.The disorders — autism, attention deficit-hyperactivity disorder or ADHD, bipolar disorder, major depressive disorder and schizophrenia — are considered distinct problems. But findings published online Wednesday suggest they're related in some way."These disorders that we thought of as quite different may not have such sharp boundaries," said Dr. Jordan Smoller of Massachusetts General Hospital, one of the lead researchers for the international study appearing in The Lancet.That has implications for learning how to diagnose mental illnesses with the same precision that physical illnesses are diagnosed, said Dr. Bruce Cuthbert of the National Institute on Mental Health, which funded the research.Consider: Just because someone has chest pain doesn't mean it's a heart attack; doctors have a variety of tests to find out. But there's no blood test for schizophrenia or other mental illnesses. Instead, doctors rely on symptoms agreed upon by experts. Learning the genetic underpinnings of mental illnesses is part of one day knowing if someone's symptoms really are schizophrenia and not something a bit different."If we really want to diagnose and treat people effectively, we have to get to these more fine-grained understandings of what's actually going wrong biologically," Cuthbert explained.Added Mass General's Smoller: "We are still in the early stages of understanding what are the causes of mental illnesses, so these are clues."The Psychiatric Genomics Consortium, a collaboration of researchers in 19 countries, analyzed the genomes of more than 61,000 people, some with one of the five disorders and some without. They found four regions of the genetic code where variation was linked to all five disorders.Of particular interest are disruptions in two specific genes that regulate the flow of calcium in brain cells, key to how neurons signal each other. That suggests that this change in a basic brain function could be one early pathway that leaves someone vulnerable to developing these disorders, depending on what else goes wrong.For patients and their families, the research offers no immediate benefit. These disorders are thought to be caused by a complex mix of numerous genes and other risk factors that range from exposures in the womb to the experiences of daily life."There may be many paths to each of these illnesses," Smoller cautioned.But the study offers a lead in the hunt for psychiatric treatments, said NIMH's Cuthbert. Drugs that affect calcium channels in other parts of the body are used for such conditions as high blood pressure, and scientists could explore whether they'd be useful for psychiatric disorders as well.The findings make sense, as there is some overlap in the symptoms of the different disorders, he said. People with schizophrenia can have some of the same social withdrawal that's so characteristic of autism, for example. Nor is it uncommon for people to be affected by more than one psychiatric disorder.
CHICAGO — Michelle Obama announced the name of the best picture via satellite for the Academy Awards ceremony in order to promote the arts among children, her principal constituency, she said in an interview on Thursday. And if people didn't like it, she added, that doesn't bother her."We're going to be approaching those filmmakers to do some things in the White House with kids all over this country who, sometimes, that's going to be their hook, watching that movie that inspires them," she told a small group of reporters during a two-day, three-city trip to promote her anti-obesity campaign for children, including a new initiative to increase physical education in schools. "I want to connect with those people, and then I want to pull them in."She chalked up criticism of her Oscar cameo and other recent television appearances to the modern media era and the public's fascination with her activities. "My bangs set off a national conversation," she acknowledged."It doesn't have anything to do with me," she said. "Anyone in this position has a huge spotlight, and in modern-day media the spotlight just gets more intense. I don't attribute this to me or Barack. The culture has just shifted."She elaborated on what being part of the first African-American couple in the White House — and one of the iPhone generation — had meant so far. "We're a young couple, we have young kids, we grew up with limited means," she said. "Our stories are the stories of so many faceless, voiceless people." She added, "My life isn't new, but it's new to a lot of people who haven't seen this up close and personal."In the interview, held in a conference room at the McCormick Place convention center in Chicago, the first lady also hinted at a more international second-term agenda.But she said that whatever work she would do in the second term would probably build on her efforts to help children. "I am powerfully moved by children," she said. "I need to have them in my life. They keep me focused; they keep me directed." She added that "if I do anything internationally I want it to dovetail with the work I do domestically," making certain that it "is linking back and being real to people here."Mrs. Obama has largely tried to stay out of hot-button issues like gun safety. "The question becomes who defines what's contentious and controversial," she said. "I can't think along those notions because everyone's definition of what's controversial is different." She added, "What I don't want is just to do something to satisfy someone's idea of what's controversial."Mrs. Obama spoke to reporters shortly before she announced an ambitious plan in front of 6,000 Chicago-area children to increase physical education in the country's public schools with the help of private companies.Under the $70 million program, the first public-private partnership of its kind, schools will be able to apply for grants to assess and improve their health and physical education programs, with the goal of getting children to exercise an hour a day."This is an earth-shattering, awesomely inspiring day," Mrs. Obama said in an emotional speech announcing the program in her hometown. "I grew up just a few miles from where we are today, over on the South Side." She said that "being active was a way of life" back then, even though "my family certainly wasn't rich, our neighborhood was barely middle class." She recalled jumping rope and going to a summer camp for low-income children."Where would I have been without those activities that kept me busy and safe and off the streets?" she said.The program is supported by Nike, which will provide $50 million over five years to help set up programs and spaces to get children to exercise. Other groups will give a combined $20 million for grants, training and other resources to help develop exercise programs and other health programs in schools.A random note on Mrs. Obama's years going to camp: One year she was not named best camper because she cursed too much. "I was, like, 'Man, I am really getting out of hand,' " she said. "That left an impact in my mind."
The psychiatric illnesses seem very different — schizophrenia , bipolar disorder , autism , major depression and attention deficit hyperactivity disorder . Yet they share several genetic glitches that can nudge the brain along a path to mental illness, researchers report. Which disease, if any, develops is thought to depend on other genetic or environmental factors.Their study, published online Wednesday in the Lancet, was based on an examination of genetic data from more than 60,000 people worldwide. Its authors say it is the largest genetic study yet of psychiatric disorders. The findings strengthen an emerging view of mental illness that aims to make diagnoses based on the genetic aberrations underlying diseases instead of on the disease symptoms.Two of the aberrations discovered in the new study were in genes used in a major signaling system in the brain, giving clues to processes that might go awry and suggestions of how to treat the diseases."What we identified here is probably just the tip of an iceberg," said Dr. Jordan Smoller, lead author of the paper and a professor of psychiatry at Harvard Medical School and Massachusetts General Hospital. "As these studies grow we expect to find additional genes that might overlap."The new study does not mean that the genetics of psychiatric disorders are simple. Researchers say there seem to be hundreds of genes involved and the gene variations discovered in the new study confer only a small risk of psychiatric disease.Steven McCarroll, director of genetics for the Stanley Center for Psychiatric Research at the Broad Institute of Harvard and M.I.T., said it was significant that the researchers had found common genetic factors that pointed to a specific signaling system."It is very important that these were not just random hits on the dartboard of the genome," said Dr. McCarroll, who was not involved in the new study.The work began in 2007 when a large group of researchers began investigating genetic data generated by studies in 19 countries and including 33,332 people with psychiatric illnesses and 27,888 people free of the illnesses for comparison. The researchers studied scans of people's DNA, looking for variations in any of several million places along the long stretch of genetic material containing three billion DNA letters. The question: Did people with psychiatric illnesses tend to have a distinctive DNA pattern in any of those locations?Researchers had already seen some clues of overlapping genetic effects in identical twins. One twin might have schizophrenia while the other had bipolar disorder. About six years ago, around the time the new study began, researchers had examined the genes of a few rare families in which psychiatric disorders seemed especially prevalent. They found a few unusual disruptions of chromosomes that were linked to psychiatric illnesses. But what surprised them was that while one person with the aberration might get one disorder, a relative with the same mutation got a different one.Jonathan Sebat, chief of the Beyster Center for Molecular Genomics of Neuropsychiatric Diseases at the University of California, San Diego, and one of the discoverers of this effect, said that work on these rare genetic aberrations had opened his eyes. "Two different diagnoses can have the same genetic risk factor," he said.In fact, the new paper reports, distinguishing psychiatric diseases by their symptoms has long been difficult. Autism, for example, was once called childhood schizophrenia. It was not until the 1970s that autism was distinguished as a separate disorder.But Dr. Sebat, who did not work on the new study, said that until now it was not clear whether the rare families he and others had studied were an exception or whether they were pointing to a rule about multiple disorders arising from a single genetic glitch."No one had systematically looked at the common variations," in DNA, he said. "We didn't know if this was particularly true for rare mutations or if it would be true for all genetic risk." The new study, he said, "shows all genetic risk is of this nature."The new study found four DNA regions that conferred a small risk of psychiatric disorders. For two of them, it is not clear what genes are involved or what they do, Dr. Smoller said. The other two, though, involve genes that are part of calcium channels, which are used when neurons send signals in the brain."The calcium channel findings suggest that perhaps — and this is a big if — treatments to affect calcium channel functioning might have effects across a range of disorders," Dr. Smoller said.There are drugs on the market that block calcium channels — they are used to treat high blood pressure — and researchers had already postulated that they might be useful for bipolar disorder even before the current findings.One investigator, Dr. Roy Perlis of Massachusetts General Hospital, just completed a small study of a calcium channel blocker in 10 people with bipolar disorder and is about to expand it to a large randomized clinical trial. He also wants to study the drug in people with schizophrenia, in light of the new findings. He cautions, though, that people should not rush out to take a calcium channel blocker on their own."We need to be sure it is safe and we need to be sure it works," Dr. Perlis said.
WASHINGTON (AP) — A baby born with the virus that causes AIDS appears to have been cured, scientists announced Sunday, describing the case of a child from Mississippi who's now 2½ and has been off medication for about a year with no signs of infection.There's no guarantee the child will remain healthy, although sophisticated testing uncovered just traces of the virus' genetic material still lingering. If so, it would mark only the world's second reported cure.Specialists say Sunday's announcement, at a major AIDS meeting in Atlanta, offers promising clues for efforts to eliminate HIV infection in children, especially in AIDS-plagued African countries where too many babies are born with the virus."You could call this about as close to a cure, if not a cure, that we've seen," Dr. Anthony Fauci of the National Institutes of Health, who is familiar with the findings, told The Associated Press.A doctor gave this baby faster and stronger treatment than is usual, starting a three-drug infusion within 30 hours of birth. That was before tests confirmed the infant was infected and not just at risk from a mother whose HIV wasn't diagnosed until she was in labor."I just felt like this baby was at higher-than-normal risk, and deserved our best shot," Dr. Hannah Gay, a pediatric HIV specialist at the University of Mississippi, said in an interview.That fast action apparently knocked out HIV in the baby's blood before it could form hideouts in the body. Those so-called reservoirs of dormant cells usually rapidly reinfect anyone who stops medication, said Dr. Deborah Persaud of Johns Hopkins Children's Center. She led the investigation that deemed the child "functionally cured," meaning in long-term remission even if all traces of the virus haven't been completely eradicated.Next, Persaud's team is planning a study to try to prove that, with more aggressive treatment of other high-risk babies. "Maybe we'll be able to block this reservoir seeding," Persaud said.No one should stop anti-AIDS drugs as a result of this case, Fauci cautioned.But "it opens up a lot of doors" to research if other children can be helped, he said. "It makes perfect sense what happened."Better than treatment is to prevent babies from being born with HIV in the first place.About 300,000 children were born with HIV in 2011, mostly in poor countries where only about 60 percent of infected pregnant women get treatment that can keep them from passing the virus to their babies. In the U.S., such births are very rare because HIV testing and treatment long have been part of prenatal care."We can't promise to cure babies who are infected. We can promise to prevent the vast majority of transmissions if the moms are tested during every pregnancy," Gay stressed.The only other person considered cured of the AIDS virus underwent a very different and risky kind of treatment — a bone marrow transplant from a special donor, one of the rare people who is naturally resistant to HIV. Timothy Ray Brown of San Francisco has not needed HIV medications in the five years since that transplant.The Mississippi case shows "there may be different cures for different populations of HIV-infected people," said Dr. Rowena Johnston of amFAR, the Foundation for AIDS Research. That group funded Persaud's team to explore possible cases of pediatric cures.It also suggests that scientists should look back at other children who've been treated since shortly after birth, including some reports of possible cures in the late 1990s that were dismissed at the time, said Dr. Steven Deeks of the University of California, San Francisco, who also has seen the findings."This will likely inspire the field, make people more optimistic that this is possible," he said.In the Mississippi case, the mother had had no prenatal care when she came to a rural emergency room in advanced labor. A rapid test detected HIV. In such cases, doctors typically give the newborn low-dose medication in hopes of preventing HIV from taking root. But the small hospital didn't have the proper liquid kind, and sent the infant to Gay's medical center. She gave the baby higher treatment-level doses.The child responded well through age 18 months, when the family temporarily quit returning and stopped treatment, researchers said. When they returned several months later, remarkably, Gay's standard tests detected no virus in the child's blood.Ten months after treatment stopped, a battery of super-sensitive tests at half a dozen laboratories found no sign of the virus' return. There were only some remnants of genetic material that don't appear able to replicate, Persaud said.In Mississippi, Gay gives the child a check-up every few months: "I just check for the virus and keep praying that it stays gone."The mother's HIV is being controlled with medication and she is "quite excited for her child," Gay added.The United Nations agency that guides the global fight against HIV/AIDS, known as UNAIDS, hailed the news."This news gives us great hope that a cure for HIV in children is possible and could bring us one step closer to an AIDS-free generation," said UNAIDS Executive Director Michel Sidibe. "This also underscores the need for research and innovation especially in the area of early diagnostics."Associated Press writer Ron DePasquale contributed from the United Nations in New York.
Doctors announced on Sunday that a baby had been cured of an H.I.V. infection for the first time, a startling development that could change how infected newborns are treated and sharply reduce the number of children living with the virus that causes AIDS.The baby, born in rural Mississippi, was treated aggressively with antiretroviral drugs starting around 30 hours after birth, something that is not usually done. If further study shows this works in other babies, it will almost certainly be recommended globally. The United Nations estimates that 330,000 babies were newly infected in 2011, the most recent year for which there is data, and that more than three million children globally are living with H.I.V.If the report is confirmed, the child born in Mississippi would be only the second well-documented case of a cure in the world. That could give a lift to research aimed at a cure, something that only a few years ago was thought to be virtually impossible, though some experts said the findings in the baby would probably not be relevant to adults.The first person cured was Timothy Brown, known as the Berlin patient, a middle-aged man with leukemia who received a bone-marrow transplant from a donor genetically resistant to H.I.V. infection."For pediatrics, this is our Timothy Brown," said Dr. Deborah Persaud, associate professor at the Johns Hopkins Children's Center and lead author of the report on the baby. "It's proof of principle that we can cure H.I.V. infection if we can replicate this case."Dr. Persaud and other researchers spoke in advance of a presentation of the findings on Monday at the Conference on Retroviruses and Opportunistic Infections in Atlanta. The results have not yet been published in a peer-reviewed medical journal.Some outside experts, who have not yet heard all the details, said they needed convincing that the baby had truly been infected. If not, this would be a case of prevention, something already done for babies born to infected mothers."The one uncertainty is really definitive evidence that the child was indeed infected," said Dr. Daniel R. Kuritzkes, chief of infectious diseases at Brigham and Women's Hospital in Boston.Dr. Persaud and some other outside scientists said they were certain the baby — whose name and gender were not disclosed — had been infected. There were five positive tests in the baby's first month of life — four for viral RNA and one for DNA. And once the treatment started, the virus levels in the baby's blood declined in the pattern characteristic of infected patients.Dr. Persaud said there was also little doubt that the child experienced what she called a "functional cure." Now 2 1/2, the child has been off drugs for a year with no sign of functioning virus.The mother arrived at a rural hospital in the fall of 2010 already in labor and gave birth prematurely. She had not seen a doctor during the pregnancy and did not know she had H.I.V. When a test showed the mother might be infected, the hospital transferred the baby to the University of Mississippi Medical Center, where it arrived at about 30 hours old.Dr. Hannah B. Gay, an associate professor of pediatrics, ordered two blood draws an hour apart to test for the presence of the virus' RNA and DNA.The tests found a level of virus at about 20,000 copies per milliliter, fairly low for a baby. But since tests so early in life were positive, it suggests the infection occurred in the womb rather than during delivery, Dr. Gay said.Typically a newborn with an infected mother would be given one or two drugs as a prophylactic measure. But Dr. Gay said that based on her experience, she almost immediately used a three-drug regimen aimed at treatment, not prophylaxis, not even waiting for the test results confirming infection.Virus levels rapidly declined with treatment and were undetectable by the time the baby was a month old. That remained the case until the baby was 18 months old, after which the mother stopped coming to the hospital and stopped giving the drugs.When the mother and child returned five months later, Dr. Gay expected to see high viral loads in the baby. But the tests were negative.Suspecting a laboratory error, she ordered more tests. "To my greater surprise, all of these came back negative," Dr. Gay said.Dr. Gay contacted Dr. Katherine Luzuriaga, an immunologist at the University of Massachusetts, who was working with Dr. Persaud and others on a project to document possible pediatric cures. The researchers, sponsored by amfAR, the Foundation for AIDS Research, put the baby through a battery of sophisticated tests. They found tiny amounts of some viral genetic material but no virus able to replicate, even lying dormant in so-called reservoirs in the body.There have been scattered cases reported in the past, including one in The New England Journal of Medicine in 1995, of babies clearing the virus, even without treatment.
CHICAGO (AP) — Want to know your chances of dying in the next 10 years? Here are some bad signs: getting winded walking several blocks, smoking, and having trouble pushing a chair across the room.That's according to a "mortality index" developed by San Francisco researchers for people older than 50.The test scores may satisfy people's morbid curiosity, but the researchers say their 12-item index is mostly for use by doctors. It can help them decide whether costly health screenings or medical procedures are worth the risk for patients unlikely to live 10 more years.It's best to take the test with a doctor, who can discuss what the score means in the context of patients' own medical history, the study authors say.The index "wasn't meant as guidance about how to alter your lifestyle," said lead author Dr. Marisa Cruz of the University of California, San Francisco.Instead, doctors can use the results to help patients understand the pros and cons of such things as rigorous diabetes treatment, colon cancer screening and tests for cervical cancer. Those may not be safe or appropriate for very sick, old people likely to die before cancer ever develops.The 12 items on the index are assigned points; fewer total points means better odds.— Men automatically get 2 points. In addition to that, men and women ages 60 to 64 get 1 point; ages 70 to 74 get 3 points; and 85 or over get 7 points.— Two points each: a current or previous cancer diagnosis, excluding minor skin cancers; lung disease limiting activity or requiring oxygen; heart failure; smoking; difficulty bathing; difficulty managing money because of health or memory problem; difficulty walking several blocks.— One point each: diabetes or high blood sugar; difficulty pushing large objects, such as a heavy chair; being thin or normal weight.The highest, or worst, score is a 26, with a 95 percent chance of dying within 10 years. To get that, you'd have to be a man at least 85 years old with all the above conditions.For a score of zero, which means a 3 percent chance of dying within 10 years, you'd have to be a woman younger than 60 without any of those infirmities — but at least slightly overweight.It's hardly surprising that a sick, older person would have a much higher chance of dying than someone younger and more vigorous, and it's well known that women generally live longer than men. But why would being overweight be less risky than being of normal weight or slim?One possible reason is that thinness in older age could be a sign of illness, Cruz said.Other factors could also play a role, so the index should be seen as providing clues but not the gospel truth, the research suggests.The findings were published Tuesday in the Journal of the American Medical Association. Grants from the National Institute on Aging and the American Federation for Aging Research helped pay for the study.The researchers created the index by analyzing data on almost 20,000 Americans over 50 who took part in a national health survey in 1998. They tracked the participants for 10 years. Nearly 6,000 participants died during that time.They previously used the test to predict the risk of dying within four years. They said their new effort shows the same index can be used to predict 10-year mortality.Dr. Stephan Fihn, a University of Washington professor of medicine and health quality measurement specialist with Veterans Affairs health services in Seattle, said the index seems valid and "methodologically sound."But he said it probably would be most accurate for the oldest patients, who don't need a scientific crystal ball to figure out their days are numbered.
The rate of Caesarean deliveries, the most common operating-room procedure performed in the United States, varies drastically among hospitals across the country, a new study has found, ranging from 7 percent of all births at the hospital with the lowest share of Caesarean deliveries to 70 percent at the hospital with the highest rate.The study, published on Monday in the journal Health Affairs, was based on federal data of more than 800,000 deliveries at 593 hospitals in 2009. Conducted by researchers at the University of Minnesota in Minneapolis and the University of British Columbia in Vancouver, the study did not identify the hospitals because their names were not included in the data.Caesarean deliveries are often performed to improve birth outcomes in high-risk pregnancies, but they can also be performed for the convenience of the mother or the doctor. The rate has increased significantly in recent years, to 33 percent of all births in 2011, up from 21 percent in 1996, the study said, citing numbers from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention."Frankly I did not expect to see variations of this magnitude," said Katy B. Kozhimannil, an assistant professor of health policy and management at the University of Minnesota School of Public Health. "It begs a closer look at how we structure and finance childbirth in the United States."Researchers decided to test rates for low-risk pregnancies because they expected that such deliveries would show less variation. In fact, those rates varied even more widely. For deliveries of single babies carried to term who were not breech and were born to mothers who had never had a Caesarean before, the rates varied from a low of 2 percent to a high of 36 percent.The study relied exclusively on hospital discharge data, Professor Kozhimannil said, adding that the data were drawn from sparse administrative information that did not allow for a deeper analysis of why the rates varied so much. Clinical risks alone, like having twins or triplets — a factor that has increased in recent years — are not enough to explain the difference, the researchers found. Nor was the variation explained by hospital size, geographic location or an institution's status as a teaching hospital.And two other factors — women asking for Caesarean deliveries and doctors pushing them for reasons linked to liability — are also unlikely to explain the difference because they account for only a small percentage of all Caesareans.Professor Kozhimannil said she suspected that the vast patchwork of health management techniques was driving the variation, including how patients are admitted, how their labor is managed and how hospitals and clinicians are paid for the work.
CHICAGO (AP) — States with the most gun control laws have the fewest gun-related deaths, according to a study that suggests sheer quantity of measures might make a difference.But the research leaves many questions unanswered and won't settle the debate over how policymakers should respond to recent high-profile acts of gun violence.In the dozen or so states with the most gun control-related laws, far fewer people were shot to death or killed themselves with guns than in the states with the fewest laws, the study found. Overall, states with the most laws had a 42 percent lower gun death rate than states with the least number of laws.The results are based on an analysis of 2007-2010 gun-related homicides and suicides from the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. The researchers also used data on gun control measures in all 50 states compiled by the Brady Center to Prevent Gun Violence, a well-known gun control advocacy group. They compared states by dividing them into four equal-sized groups according to the number of gun laws.The results were published online Wednesday in the medical journal JAMA Internal Medicine.More than 30,000 people nationwide die from guns every year nationwide, and there's evidence that gun-related violent crime rates have increased since 2008, a journal editorial noted.During the four-years studied, there were nearly 122,000 gun deaths, 60 percent of them suicides."Our motivation was really to understand what are the interventions that can be done to reduce firearm mortality," said Dr. Eric Fleegler, the study's lead author and an emergency department pediatrician and researcher at Boston Children's Hospital.He said his study suggests but doesn't prove that gun laws — or something else — led to fewer gun deaths.Fleegler is also among hundreds of doctors who have signed a petition urging President Barack Obama and Congress to pass gun safety legislation, a campaign organized by the advocacy group Doctors for America.Gun rights advocates have argued that strict gun laws have failed to curb high murder rates in some cities, including Chicago and Washington, D.C. Fleegler said his study didn't examine city-level laws, while gun control advocates have said local laws aren't as effective when neighboring states have lax laws.Previous research on the effectiveness of gun laws has had mixed results, and it's a "very challenging" area to study, said Dr. Daniel Webster, director of the Johns Hopkins Center For Gun Policy. He was not involved in the current study.The strongest kind of research would require comparisons between states that have dissimilar gun laws but otherwise are nearly identical, "but there isn't a super nice twin for New Jersey," for example, a state with strict gun laws, Webster noted.Fleegler said his study's conclusions took into account factors also linked with gun violence, including poverty, education levels and race, which vary among the states.The average annual gun death rate ranged from almost 3 per 100,000 in Hawaii to 18 per 100,000 in Louisiana. Hawaii had 16 gun laws, and along with New Jersey, New York and Massachusetts was among states with the most laws and fewest deaths. States with the fewest laws and most deaths included Alaska, Kentucky, Louisiana and Oklahoma.But there were outliers: South Dakota, for example, had just two guns laws but few deaths.Editorial author Dr. Garen Wintemute, director the Violence Prevention Research Program at the University of California, Davis, said the study doesn't answer which laws, if any, work.Wintemute said it's likely that gun control measures are more readily enacted in states with few gun owners — a factor that might have more influence on gun deaths than the number of laws.AP Medical Writer Lindsey Tanner can be reached at http://www.twitter.com
Deadly infections with bacteria that resist even the strongest antibiotics are on the rise in hospitals in the United States, and there is only a "limited window of opportunity" to halt their spread, health officials warned Tuesday.The bacteria, normally found in the gut, have acquired a lethal trait: they are unscathed by antibiotics, including carbapenems, a group of drugs that are generally considered a last resort. When these resistant germs invade parts of the body where they do not belong, like the bloodstream, lungs or urinary tract, the illness may be untreatable. The death rate from bloodstream infections can reach 50 percent.Dr. Thomas R. Frieden, director of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, called the organisms "nightmare bacteria" during a telephone news conference, and noted that they could pass their trait for drug resistance — encoded in a scrap of genetic material called a plasmid — along to other bacteria.Most people who contract these infections already have other serious illnesses that require complicated treatment and lengthy stays in hospitals, nursing homes or long-term care facilities. One bit of good news, Dr. Frieden said, is that the infections do not seem to have spread beyond hospitals into the community at large. But that could easily happen, he warned.According to a new report by the disease centers, among all infections with gut bacteria, the proportion caused by carbapenem-resistant types rose to 4 percent in 2012, from 1 percent in 2001; among infections caused by one type of bacteria, Klebsiella, 10 percent have become resistant, compared with 2 percent a decade ago.Drug-resistant Klebsiella, traced to one patient, caused a notorious outbreak in 2011 at a hospital at the National Institutes of Health. Seventeen other people were infected, and six of them died.Forty-two states have had cases of carbapenem-resistant infection. The problem is most common in the Northeast, particularly in hospitals in New York City, officials said. Nationwide, about 4 percent of short-stay hospitals reported such infections in the first half of 2012, but the rate was much higher — 18 percent — among long-term acute-care hospitals, which treat people who need ventilators for a long time or who have other chronic problems.The disease centers recommended a variety of ways to try to stop the infections from spreading. The advice includes the usual call for ruthless scrubbing of all surfaces and relentless handwashing.But hospitals are also urged to find out whether patients are infected, isolate those who are, and assign dedicated-care teams and equipment to infected people only, to avoid spreading the bacteria to others.Catheters and intravenous lines should be removed as quickly as possible, because they can be avenues of infection, and doctors should prescribe antibiotics only when they are truly needed. Health officials also urge patients and their loved ones to insist that medical personnel wash their hands before touching a patient.
SAN FRANCISCO (AP) — The future is unclear for a promising heart device aimed at preventing strokes in people at high risk of them because of an irregular heartbeat.Early results from a key study of Boston Scientific Corp.'s Watchman device suggested it is safer than previous testing found, but may not be better than a drug that is used now for preventing strokes, heart-related deaths and blood clots in people with atrial fibrillation over the long term.More than 2.7 million Americans and 15 million people worldwide have atrial fibrillation. The upper chambers of the heart quiver instead of beating properly. That lets blood pool in a small pouch. Clots can form and travel to the brain, causing a stroke.The usual treatment is blood thinners such as warfarin, sold as Coumadin and other brands. But they have problems of their own and some are very expensive. The Watchman is intended to be a permanent solution that would not require people to take medications for the rest of their lives. It's a tiny expandable umbrella that plugs the pouch, and is inserted without surgery, through a tube pushed into a vein.A study four years ago suggested the device was at least as good at preventing strokes as warfarin is, but the procedure to implant it led to strokes in some patients. Advisers to the Food and Drug Administration narrowly recommended approving the Watchman but the federal agency required a second test of its safety and effectiveness.The new study was to be the top presentation Saturday at an American College of Cardiology conference in San Francisco. But the group took the unprecedented step of pulling it from the program just before it was to go on because Boston Scientific released results early to investors.The study was led by Dr. David Holmes Jr. of the Mayo Clinic in Rochester, Minn. He and the clinic have a financial stake in the device.The study involved 407 patients — 269 assigned to get the device and 138 to get warfarin. It had three main goals, and it clearly met the first on safety — strokes, heart-related deaths, blood clots and serious complications a week after implant or release from the hospital."The early concerns about safety of the device ... have been alleviated," Holmes said.The other two goals were estimated based on just 88 patients who have been tracked for 18 months after treatment. Strokes and blood clots occurred no more often with the device in those patients. However, the results suggest the device will not prove better than warfarin at 18 months on a wider measure — a combination of strokes, heart-related deaths or clots.Whether that will be enough to win FDA approval remains to be seen. Dr. Gordon Tomaselli, a Johns Hopkins University heart specialist and former president of the American Heart Association, said he was reassured that the device seems safer, and said it might be approved just for people who cannot tolerate blood thinners long term."It's a mixed result," he said. "There still are complications" but fewer of them in the new study.Dr. Hadley Wilson, cardiology chief at Carolinas HealthCare System in Charlotte, enrolled patients in the new study and predicts the FDA will require even more testing."It would be difficult for approvability without further study," he said.Marilynn Marchione can be followed on Twitter at (at)MMarchioneAP
SAN FRANCISCO (AP) — Stress does bad things to the heart. New studies have found higher rates of cardiac problems in veterans with PTSD, New Orleans residents six years after Hurricane Katrina and Greeks struggling through that country's financial turmoil.Disasters and prolonged stress can raise "fight or flight" hormones that affect blood pressure, blood sugar and other things in ways that make heart trouble more likely, doctors say. They also provoke anger and helplessness and spur heart-harming behaviors like eating or drinking too much."We're starting to connect emotions with cardiovascular risk markers" and the new research adds evidence of a link, said Dr. Nieca Goldberg, a cardiologist at NYU Langone Medical Center and an American Heart Association spokeswoman.She had no role in the studies, which were discussed Sunday at an American College of Cardiology conference in San Francisco.The largest, involving 207,954 veterans in California and Nevada ages 46 to 74, compared those with PTSD, or post-traumatic stress disorder, to those without it. They were free of major heart disease and diabetes when researchers checked their Veterans Administration medical records from 2009 and 2010.Checked again about two years later, 35 percent of those with PTSD but only 19 percent of those without it had developed insulin resistance, which can lead to diabetes and hardening of the arteries.Doctors also saw higher rates of metabolic syndrome — a collection of heart disease risk factors that include high body fat, cholesterol, blood pressure and blood sugar levels. About 53 percent of veterans with PTSD but only 37 percent of those without it had several of these symptoms.The numbers are estimates and are not as important as the trend — more heart risk with more stress, said one study leader, Dr. Ramin Ebrahimi, a cardiologist at the Greater Los Angeles VA Medical Center and a professor at UCLA. It shows that PTSD can cause physical symptoms, not just the mental ones commonly associated with it."Twenty or 30 years ago PTSD was a term reserved for combat veterans. We have come to realize now that PTSD is actually a much more common disorder and it can happen in veterans who did not undergo combat but had a very traumatic experience" such as losing a friend, he said.That goes for others who suffer trauma such as being raped, robbed at gunpoint or in a serious accident, he said. Nearly 8 million Americans have PTSD, the National Institute of Mental Health estimates.They include survivors of Hurricane Katrina. Tulane Medical Center doctors led a study of their hospital's patients that suggests heart attack incidence is three times higher in New Orleans than it was in the two years before the 2005 storm.Heart attacks made up 2.4 percent of admissions in the six years after the storm compared to just .7 percent before it. The post-storm patients were more likely to be unemployed or uninsured, to smoke, and to have depression, anxiety or high cholesterol, resarchers found. A third study found that heart attacks rose sharply in the Messinia area of southwestern Greece since January 2008, the start of that country's financial crisis. Researchers compared medical records of more than 22,000 patients admitted to the General Hospital of Kalamata — the only hospital with a cardiology department in the region.There were 1,084 heart attacks in the four years after the crisis began compared to 841 in the four years before it, even though the population and its demographics remained the same.Heart attack incidence rose 40 percent among women, who have higher unemployment rates than men and tend to be more responsible for child care — a double burden of stress, said the lead researcher, Dr. Emmanouil Makaris.
SAN FRANCISCO (AP) — The future is unclear for a heart device aimed at preventing strokes in people at high risk of them because of an irregular heartbeat.Early results from a key study of the device, Boston Scientific's Watchman, suggested it is safer than previous testing found, but may not be better than a drug that is used to prevent strokes, heart-related deaths and blood clots in people with atrial fibrillation in the long term.Atrial fibrillation, a common heart arrhythmia that affects millions of Americans, causes blood to pool in a small pouch. Clots can form and travel to the brain, causing a stroke.The usual treatment is blood thinners like warfarin, sold as Coumadin and other brands. But they have their own problems and some are very expensive. The Watchman is intended to be a permanent solution that would not require people to take medication for the rest of their lives. It is a tiny expandable umbrella that plugs the pouch of blood, and is inserted without surgery, via a tube pushed into a vein.A study four years ago indicated the device was at least as good at preventing strokes as warfarin, but the procedure to implant it led to strokes in some patients. The Food and Drug Administration required another test of its safety and effectiveness.The new study was led by Dr. David Holmes Jr. of the Mayo Clinic in Rochester, Minn. He and the clinic have a financial stake in the device.The study involved 407 patients — 269 assigned to get the device and 138 to get warfarin. It had three main goals, and it clearly met the first on safety — strokes, heart-related deaths, blood clots and serious complications a week after implant or release from the hospital.The other goals were assessed based on 88 patients who were tracked for 18 months after treatment. Strokes and blood clots occurred no more often with the device in the patients. However, the results suggested it would not prove better than warfarin at 18 months on a wider measure — a combination of strokes, heart-related deaths or clots.
SAN FRANCISCO (AP) — The future is unclear for a heart device aimed at preventing strokes in people at high risk of them because of an irregular heartbeat.Early results from a key study of the device, Boston Scientific's Watchman, suggested it is safer than previous testing found, but may not be better than a drug that is used to prevent strokes, heart-related deaths and blood clots in people with atrial fibrillation in the long term.Atrial fibrillation, a common heart arrhythmia that affects millions of Americans, causes blood to pool in a small pouch. Clots can form and travel to the brain, causing a stroke.The usual treatment is blood thinners like warfarin, sold as Coumadin and other brands. But they have their own problems and some are very expensive. The Watchman is intended to be a permanent solution that would not require people to take medication for the rest of their lives. It is a tiny expandable umbrella that plugs the pouch of blood, and is inserted without surgery, via a tube pushed into a vein.A study four years ago indicated the device was at least as good at preventing strokes as warfarin, but the procedure to implant it led to strokes in some patients. The Food and Drug Administration required another test of its safety and effectiveness.The new study was led by Dr. David Holmes Jr. of the Mayo Clinic in Rochester, Minn. He and the clinic have a financial stake in the device.The study involved 407 patients — 269 assigned to get the device and 138 to get warfarin. It had three main goals, and it clearly met the first on safety — strokes, heart-related deaths, blood clots and serious complications a week after implant or release from the hospital.The other goals were assessed based on 88 patients who were tracked for 18 months after treatment. Strokes and blood clots occurred no more often with the device in the patients. However, the results suggested it would not prove better than warfarin at 18 months on a wider measure — a combination of strokes, heart-related deaths or clots.
SAN FRANCISCO (AP) — New research shows that stopping the heart for bypass surgery is safe even in the elderly.Heart bypass is one of the most common operations in the world and patients often are given a choice of how to have it done. The usual way involves stopping the heart and putting people on a heart-lung machine while doctors create detours around clogged arteries.The operation also can be done while the heart is still beating, but some research suggests results are not as good.Two large studies found the methods equally safe and effective after one year. One study involved people 75 and older, a group thought to be at high risk for complications from stopping the heart.The studies were discussed Monday at a cardiology conference in San Francisco.
WASHINGTON (AP) — Nearly every woman takes a medication at some point during pregnancy. Yet there's disturbingly little easy-to-understand information about which drugs pose a risk to her baby, and what to do about it.Need some pain relief? In the fine print is the warning that painkillers like Advil aren't for the third trimester. Left unsaid is whether to worry if you took them earlier.An awful cold? Don't panic if you used decongestant pills, but doctors advise a nasal spray in early pregnancy.And don't abandon antidepressants or epilepsy medicines without talking to your doctor first. Some brands are safer during pregnancy than others — and worsening depression or seizures aren't good for a mom-to-be or her baby."To come off of those medications is often a dangerous thing for the pregnancy itself," warns Dr. Sandra Kweder of the Food and Drug Administration. "They need information on what to expect, how to make those trade-offs."A new study shows how difficult that information is to come by.Women often turn to the Internet with pregnancy questions. But researchers examined 25 pregnancy-related websites and found no two lists of purportedly safe drugs were identical. Twenty-two products called safe on one site were deemed risky on another.Worse, specialists couldn't find evidence to back up safety claims for 40 percent of the drugs listed, said Cheryl Broussard of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, who led the recent study."The reality is that for most of the medications, it's not that they're safe or not that's the concern. The concern is that we just don't know," she said.Broussard experienced some of that confusion during her own two pregnancies — when different doctors handed over different lists of what was safe to use.It's a growing dilemma. The CDC says medication use during the first trimester — especially vulnerable for birth defects because fetal organs are forming — has jumped 60 percent in the last three decades. Plus, women increasingly are postponing pregnancy until their 30s, even 40s, more time to develop a chronic health condition before they're expecting.The CDC is beginning a Treating for Two program to explore how to get better information, and the FDA plans to revamp prescription drug labels with more details on what's known now. But people want an easy answer — use it or don't — and for many drugs, they won't get one anytime soon."Women agonize over it," said Dr. Christina Chambers of the University of California, San Diego. She helps direct California's pregnancy risk information hotline that advises thousands of worried callers every year.Some drugs pose particular birth-defect risks. For example, the FDA requires versions of the acne drug isotretinoin, first marketed as Accutane, to be sold under special tight controls. Similarly, last year FDA said women who want to use a new weight-loss drug, Qsymia, need testing first to be sure they're not pregnant.Other medications are considered safe choices. Obstetricians say pregnant women need a flu shot, for example. A recent massive study in Denmark offered reassurance that taking the anti-nausea drug Zofran for morning sickness won't hurt the baby.But many drug labels bear little if any details about pregnancy. Drugmakers shy from studying pregnant women, so it can take years for safety information to accumulate. Moreover, the CDC says 1 in 33 babies has some type of birth defect regardless of medication use. It can be hard to tell if a drug adds to that baseline risk.Consider antidepressants, used by about 5 percent of pregnant women. Certain brands are suspected of a small risk of heart defects. Studies suggest a version called SSRIs may increase risk of a serious lung problem at birth — from 1 in 3,000 pregnancies to 3 in 3,000 pregnancies, Chambers said. Also, some babies go through withdrawal symptoms in the first days of life that can range from jitteriness to occasional seizures.Women have to weigh those findings with the clear risks of stopping treatment, she said."The time to be thinking about all this is when you're not pregnant," when your doctor can consider how to balance mom's and baby's health and might switch brands, Chambers said.That's what heart attack survivor Kelli Tussey of Columbus, Ohio, did. The 34-year-old takes a variety of heart medications, including a cholesterol-lowering statin drug that the government advises against during pregnancy.So when Tussey wanted a second child, she turned to doctors at Ohio State University who specialize in treating pregnant heart patients. They stopped the statin and switched her to a safer blood thinner."They said my heart could take it," Tussey said. Now four months pregnant, "it seems everything's fine."Sometimes it's a question of timing. That painkiller ibuprofen, sold as Advil and other brands, isn't for the third trimester but isn't a big concern earlier on, said Dr. Siobhan Dolan, an adviser to the March of Dimes.And women should watch out for over-the-counter drugs with multiple ingredients, like decongestants added to allergy medicines, Dolan said. While any potential risk from decongestant pills seems small, "the question is, 'Do you really need it?'" she asked, advising a nasal spray instead.Ask your doctor about the safest choices, Dolan said. Also, check the Organization of Teratology Information Specialists, or OTIS — www.otispregnancy.org — for consumer-friendly drug fact sheets or hotlines to speak with a specialist.Stay tuned: The FDA has proposed big changes to drug labels that now just say if animal or human data suggest a risk. Kweder said adding details would help informed decision-making: How certain are those studies? What's the risk of skipping treatment? Is the risk only during a certain trimester?
Young men in a state prison for juveniles and professors of library science from the University of South Carolina have joined forces to fight AIDS with a graphic novel.The work — brief enough to be considered a comic book, but not comic — is called "AIDS in the End Zone." The drawings were by a professional illustrator, but the plotline and the dialogue were written by incarcerated youths, ages 15 to 19.One character, Brad Timmerman, a spoiled, rich teenager, loses his starting quarterback spot on the Marina High football team to a newcomer, Marcus Johnson, and conspires to get revenge by pressuring a gorgeous party girl, Maria, to seduce Marcus. Brad knows Maria is infected with H.I.V. and blackmails her into sleeping with Marcus by threatening to expose her. The story does not end happily for anyone — although it does show that, thanks to antiretroviral drugs, life can go on.AIDS is a big problem in South Carolina. Columbia, the capital, was ranked sixth in the nation in 2010 in AIDS cases per capita — higher than Washington, New York or San Francisco. Young black Southern men who have sex with men are the nation's highest-risk group.Libraries need an easy-to-read book explaining AIDS to the young, said Kendra Albright and Karen Gavigan, the professors who guided the project. "What can two middle-aged white women tell African-American teenagers?" Dr. Albright asked rhetorically.Some aspects of the novel have been questioned at academic conferences, she said. It has no mention of gay sex or prison sex, even though those both are greater H.I.V. risk factors than the teenage heterosexual sex that the novel portrays."We want to go into school libraries," Dr. Albright said. "If we came in with stories about homosexuality in the South, I don't know that we'd be accepted."
Most women with ovarian cancer receive inadequate care and miss out on treatments that could add a year or more to their lives, a new study has found.The results highlight what many experts say is a neglected problem: widespread, persistent flaws in the care of women with this disease, which kills 15,000 a year in the United States. About 22,000 new cases are diagnosed annually, most of them discovered at an advanced stage and needing aggressive treatment. Worldwide, there are about 200,000 new cases a year.Cancer specialists around the country say the main reason for the poor care is that most women are treated by doctors and hospitals that see few cases of the disease and lack expertise in the complex surgery and chemotherapy that can prolong life."If we could just make sure that women get to the people who are trained to take care of them, the impact would be much greater than that of any new chemotherapy drug or biological agent," said Dr. Robert E. Bristow, the director of gynecologic oncology at the University of California, Irvine, and lead author of the new study presented on Monday at a meeting of the Society of Gynecologic Oncology in Los Angeles.The study found that only a little more than a third of patients received the best possible care, confirming a troubling pattern that other studies have also documented.Karen Mason, 61, from Pitman, N.J., had been a nurse for 28 years when she was found to have ovarian cancer in 2001. She scheduled surgery with her gynecologist, who was not a cancer surgeon.But her sisters would not allow it. They had gone on the Internet, and became convinced — rightly, according to experts — that she should go to a major cancer center."They took the reins out of my hands," Ms. Mason said.She wound up having a long, complicated and successful operation performed by a gynecologic oncologist, which she does not believe her gynecologist could have done.Dr. Barbara A. Goff, a professor of gynecologic oncology at the University of Washington, in Seattle, who was not part of Dr. Bristow's study, said the problem with ovarian cancer care was clear: "We're not making the most use of things that we know work well."What works best is meticulous, extensive surgery and aggressive chemotherapy. Ovarian cancer spreads inside the abdomen, and studies have shown that survival improves if women have surgery called debulking, to remove all visible traces of the disease. Taking out as much cancer as possible gives the drugs a better chance of killing whatever is left. The surgery may involve removing the spleen, parts of the intestine, stomach and other organs, as well as the reproductive system.The operations should be done by gynecologic oncologists, said Dr. Deborah Armstrong of Johns Hopkins University, who is not a surgeon. But many women, she said, are operated on by general surgeons and gynecologists.Some women prefer the obstetricians who delivered their children. Many are desperate to start treatment and think there is no time to find a specialist. Some do not know that gynecologic oncologists exist. Some inexperienced doctors may find the cancer unexpectedly during surgery and try to remove it, but not do a thorough job."If this was breast cancer, and two-thirds of women were not getting guideline care that improves survival, you know what kind of hue and cry there would be," said Dr. Armstrong, who was not involved in the study. But in ovarian cancer, she said: "There's not as big an advocacy community. The women are a little older, sicker and less prone to be activists."One patient advocacy group, the Ovarian Cancer National Alliance, ranks the availability of a gynecologic oncologist as one of its criteria in comparing the quality of care among states.Surgeons who lack expertise in ovarian cancer should refer women to specialists if the women are suspected to have the disease, but often do not, Dr. Goff said.Dr. Bristow's research, which has been submitted to a medical journal but not yet published, was based on the medical records of 13,321 women with ovarian cancer diagnosed from 1999 to 2006 in California. They had the most common type, called epithelial. Only 37 percent received treatment that adhered to guidelines set by the National Comprehensive Cancer Network, an alliance of 21 major cancer centers with expert panels that analyze research and recommend treatments. The guidelines for ovarian cancer specify surgical procedures and chemotherapy, depending on the stage of the disease.Surgeons who operated on 10 or more women a year for ovarian cancer, and hospitals that treated 20 or more a year, were more likely to stick to the guidelines, the study found. And their patients lived longer. Among women with advanced disease — the stage at which ovarian cancer is usually first found — 35 percent survived at least five years if their care met the guidelines, compared with 25 percent of those whose care fell short.
WASHINGTON (AP) — Pricey robotic surgery shouldn't be the first or even second choice for most women who need a hysterectomy, says advice issued Thursday to doctors who help those women decide.The preferred method: Operate through the vagina, using standard tools rather than a robot, said Dr. James Breeden, president of the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists.Increasingly, women are seeing ads that say a robot could help their doctor perform a hysterectomy more easily. And Breeden said doctors are reporting patients who demand that approach or say they'll take their business elsewhere.But for routine hysterectomies, the vaginal method lets women leave the hospital just as quickly, without spending nearly as much money, Breeden said Thursday in a statement setting out the position of the nation's largest group of OB/GYNs.When that's not possible, a laparoscopic hysterectomy — so-called keyhole surgery, operating through a few small incisions in the abdomen — is the second least invasive and costly option, he said."It is important to separate the marketing hype from the reality when considering the best surgical approach," Breeden said, adding: "There is no good data proving that robotic hysterectomy is even as good as, let alone better than, existing and far less costly minimally invasive alternatives."The robotic method is similar to that keyhole operation except the doctor uses a computer to control robotic arms that hold the surgical tools, theoretically easier to move in tight quarters. Breeden said there may be advantages to robotic techniques for "unusual and complex clinical conditions," such as cancer operations that require extensive surgery to find and remove lymph nodes — but that needs additional research.About 600,000 U.S. women a year undergo a hysterectomy. Traditionally, doctors removed the uterus through a large abdominal incision that meant a long recovery. Today, minimally invasive surgery is encouraged although many women still get the older open surgery for a variety of reasons.Thursday's statement is sure to prove controversial with doctors who have embraced the technology. But it comes after a major study last month found robotic surgery adds at least $2,000 to the cost of a hysterectomy without improving outcomes. Breeden said another study found surgeons perform 50 to 90 robotic hysterectomies before becoming as good at it as they are with other minimally invasive methods.Manufacturer Intuitive Surgical Inc. said its da Vinci robot system allows some women who otherwise would need an old-fashioned open hysterectomy — because of obesity, scarring or other complexities — to instead have a smaller operation.
Radiation treatment for breast cancer can increase a woman's risk of heart disease, doctors have long known. But the size of the added risk has not been clear.Now, a new study offers a way to estimate the risk. It finds that for most women the risk is modest, and that it is outweighed by the benefit from the treatment, which can halve the recurrence rate and lower the death rate from breast cancer by about one-sixth.According to the study, a 50-year-old woman with no cardiovascular risk factors has a 1.9 percent chance of dying of heart disease before she turns 80. Radiation treatment for breast cancer would increase that risk to between 2.4 percent and 3.4 percent, depending on how much radiation hits the heart."It would be a real tragedy if this put women off having radiotherapy for breast cancer," said Sarah Darby, a professor of medical statistics at the University of Oxford in Britain, and the lead author of the study, published Wednesday in The New England Journal of Medicine.Dr. Silvia Formenti, the chairwoman of radiation oncology at New York University Langone Medical Center, said she worried that women with cancer would misconstrue the findings to mean that radiation is dangerous and that they should have their breasts removed instead of having lumpectomies, in order to avoid radiation."There is a wave toward mastectomy in this country," Dr. Formenti said.But at the same time, she and other experts say that the cardiovascular risk is real and that when radiation is given, every effort should be made to minimize exposure of the heart.In addition, women who have had radiation treatment need to be especially vigilant about controlling other factors that increase the odds of heart disease, like high blood pressure and cholesterol.Dr. Lori Mosca, the director of preventive cardiology at NewYork-Presbyterian Hospital/Columbia University Medical Center, who was not involved in the study, said the findings meant that a history of breast irradiation should be added to the list of risk factors for heart disease and taken into consideration by all doctors who are treating such patients."We absolutely need to put on our radar screen that prior radiation to the breast may be a new and important risk factor for women," Dr. Mosca said.But she and other experts also warned that the results needed to be verified because the study was not a controlled experiment, but was based on an analysis of records and estimates of radiation exposure to the heart.Dr. Javid Moslehi, co-director of the cardio-oncology program at the Dana-Farber Cancer Institute in Boston and the author of an editorial accompanying the study, said the research was the first to provide risk estimates correlated with doses in breast cancer treatment, over a long time period."This is a huge paper, both in terms of how many women it impacts, and how it opens the door for new studies that need to be done," Dr. Moslehi said.He said the study reflected the fact that many people with cancer are now living long enough to encounter long-term effects of both radiation and chemotherapy.They have given rise to a new and fast-growing field in medicine, cardio-oncology.About three million women in the United States have been treated for breast cancer, and the majority have had radiation.Although doctors try to spare the heart, it still gets some of the dose, especially when the left breast is treated. Radiation can damage the linings of blood vessels and scar the heart muscle.Dr. Darby's study is based on the records of 2,168 women who had radiation for breast cancer from 1958 to 2001 in Sweden and Denmark; 963 of the women had "major cardiac events" sometime after their cancer treatment, meaning a heart attack or clogged coronary arteries that needed treatment or caused death.From the treatment records, the researchers estimated the radiation dose to the women's hearts. They found that the risk began to increase within a few years after exposure, and that it continued for at least 20 years. The higher the dose, the higher the risk, and there was some increase in risk at even the lowest level of exposure."It was certainly a surprise to us that the risk started within the first few years after exposure, as radiation-related heart disease has traditionally been thought of as usually occurring several decades after exposure," Dr. Darby said.Radiation is measured in units called Grays, and the researchers found that for each Gray to which the heart was exposed, the odds of heart attack or another coronary events rose by 7.4 percent. The average dose to the heart over an entire course of radiation treatment was 5 Gray, they said. For an individual woman, the net effect would depend on her baseline initial risk of heart disease and the total radiation dose to her heart.Women who already had risk factors, especially those who had had heart attacks in the past, would have seen the largest absolute risk from radiation.Some radiation oncologists say that nowadays, the dose to the heart is lower than 5 Gray.Dr. Louis S. Constine, vice chairman of radiation oncology at the University of Rochester Medical Center, said that 2 Gray was more common and that doctors could now put shields in front of the heart and "curve radiation around the chest wall instead of shooting it through the heart and lungs."Dr. Formenti thinks that for most patients, the best way to protect the heart is to treat them while they are lying on their stomachs, instead of the usual way, lying on their backs. Women lie on a table or a mattress with openings that let the breasts drop away from the chest.Anatomy differs, but in most women this prone position helps keep the radiation beams as far as possible from the heart and lungs. The heart still receives some radiation, but significantly less than when women lie on their backs, especially when the left breast is being treated."If you can keep it below 1 Gray, which is what we are doing, you are probably O.K. with the majority of patients," Dr. Formenti said.During the past 15 years, she said, she has treated several thousand patients this way.Dr. Formenti and her colleagues also teach the technique to other doctors. But, she said, it is taking a long time to catch on.
It takes a team of medical specialists to care for Anna Barkhuizen, a 9-year-old with epilepsy , cerebral palsy and significant developmental delays. Her mother, Rebecca, recalls waiting for hours in exam rooms and leaving before seeing the doctor, because Anna had grown too impatient."I felt like we had all of these dots with all of these specialists, but no one to connect all these dots for us," Ms. Barkhuizen said. "Now, I feel like I have a partner in raising Anna."For the last year, Anna has participated in a pilot program at the Seton Children's Comprehensive Care clinic at Dell Children's Medical Center of Central Texas in Austin. The three-year program, now in its second year, coordinates care for medically needy children, providing access to pediatric physicians, medical specialists and behavioral health care, while offering family support services. The program's founders hope comparative data collected from the pilot program and routine outpatient care will show that centralized coordination improves the quality of care while cutting costs."Typically, you put everybody through the same rigid system, and it's not necessarily efficient or effective," said Dr. Rahel Berhane, the medical director of the clinic. "The hypothesis is that this is much more cost-effective, so Medicaid would be able to serve more patients."Dell Children's Medical Center hopes to expand the program, which gets $1.5 million annually from its parent, the Seton Healthcare Family. It has applied for $18 million through a federal Medicaid waiver that Texas received in 2011. The waiver allows the state to invest nearly $10 billion in federal and local financing to transform health care delivery across Texas. More than 1,300 projects have been proposed, and federal approval is expected in May. (Seton is a corporate sponsor of The Texas Tribune.)The program has enrolled 130 children, three-quarters of whom receive Medicaid. Half speak only Spanish.Preliminary data shows that the program has halved the rate of emergency room visits for these children."This project is a good example of how the waiver intends to help children and their families by improving how we deliver critical and comprehensive health care," Linda Edwards Gockel, a spokeswoman for the Texas Health and Human Services Commission, said in an e-mail.Medicaid does not reimburse providers for coordination services. But if the program receives federal approval to participate in the waiver program, expenses not traditionally reimbursed by Medicaid could be reimbursed.Dr. Berhane said important lessons from the program's first year could be applied across a wider population if the program received financing through the waiver."Since we've been going to this clinic, it's just been an answered prayer," Ms. Barkhuizen said. "It's become her one-stop shop for medical care."
A patient in Maryland has died of rabies contracted from a kidney transplant, and three other people who received organs from the same donor were being treated to prevent the disease, health officials said Friday.The patient's sex and date of death were not disclosed.Doctors did not know or even suspect that the organ donor had rabies, so he was not tested for the virus that causes it before his heart, liver and kidneys were removed for transplantation.This was the second time in the United States that transplanted organs have spread rabies, said Dr. Matthew J. Kuehnert, the director of the Office of Blood, Organ, and Other Tissue Safety at the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. The first was in 2004, when three people who received organs from one donor died of the disease. A fourth recipient died, but so soon after surgery that the death was not thought to be a result of rabies. In addition, in 1979 a patient was infected with rabies by a corneal transplant.Infections of any type spread by transplanted organs are uncommon. Fewer than 1 percent of deceased donors are found to have infected recipients, says the Organ Procurement and Transplantation Network, which oversees transplants nationwide. But when infections occur, they can be deadly, because drugs used to prevent patients from rejecting transplants work by suppressing the immune system — leaving them vulnerable to infection.Transplant specialists walk a fine line. Organs are scarce and doctors are loath to discard anything that could save a life. Time is of the essence: once a donor dies, the organs start to deteriorate and must be used quickly.Extensive testing is done for H.I.V., hepatitis and other diseases, but cannot be done for every possible infection. Rabies is rare, and donors are not tested for it unless there is reason to suspect it.The rabies cases highlight a particular dilemma: whether to use organs from people who die of poorly defined neurological disorders. It is not known how many patients fall into that category, Dr. Kuehnert said.In some cases, people thought to have had strokes or other noncontagious brain problems that would make them ideal donors turned out to have infections that were transmitted to recipients. Rabies and amoebic infections were among the diseases that killed transplant recipients. West Nile virus also caused deaths in the past, but donors are now screened for it.In the latest rabies cases, the donor died in Florida in 2011, and his organs went to recipients there and in Georgia, Illinois and Maryland. More than a year passed before one of the recipients — the patient in Maryland — became ill with rabies and died (the disease can have a long incubation period).The rabies was a strain found in raccoons. Because the patient had no known exposure to animals, doctors wondered if the transplant might have been the source. Tissue samples from the donor had been stored, and tested positive for the same strain of rabies that killed the recipient.Health officials immediately called the other three recipients. None were ill. All were being given rabies vaccine and immunoglobulins.The C.D.C. was also trying to track down health workers and others who had been in contact with the donor and transplant recipients, and who might also require preventive treatment.In June, the organ network issued advice to doctors on how to recognize central nervous system infections in potential organ donors. It recommended looking for fever and abnormalities in the spinal fluid, and double-checking records to see which diagnosis seemed more logical based on a donor's age and medical history — an infection or a stroke.
NEW YORK (AP) — When athletes are suspected of having a concussion, they should be taken out of action immediately, new guidelines from a major medical group say.The American Academy of Neurology said athletes shouldn't resume playing until they've been fully evaluated and cleared by a doctor or other professional with concussion expertise.The recommendations issued Monday generally agree with a brief position paper the academy issued in 2010, but add details on evaluation and management. The guidelines are based on a comprehensive review of scientific research.Sports concussions have gained a new public focus in recent years because of concern over the risk of developing long-term mental impairment. Thousands of former pro football players are suing the NFL and its teams, saying that for years the NFL did not do enough to protect players from concussions.The new advice replaces guidelines published 15 years ago. Those recommended grading the severity of concussions at the time of injury to determine possible time frames for return to play. Now the group emphasizes more individualized assessment and management of the injury.Research showed the grading system didn't relate to outcome, and that nobody can predict how long recovery will take, explained Dr. Christopher Giza of the University of California, Los Angeles, an author of the new guidelines.The new document says athletes should not be allowed back in action if they show any symptoms. And it says athletes of high school age or younger with a diagnosed concussion should be managed more conservatively than older athletes when it comes to allowing a return to play.Dr. David Dodick, a concussion expert at the Mayo Clinic in Phoenix who was familiar with highlights of the new document, said they contain "no great revelations" beyond what experts know already. He noted that the guidelines state that the first 10 days after a concussion are the period of highest risk for being diagnosed with a second concussion, and that younger athletes take longer to recover from the injury.Since getting a second concussion before the first is healed can lead to a long period of disabling symptoms, that is good guidance for doctors who have to decide when young athletes can return to play, he said in a telephone interview.
You might not want to rush into knee surgery. Physical therapy can be just as good for a common injury and at far less cost and risk, the most rigorous study to compare these treatments concludes.Therapy didn't always help and some people wound up having surgery for the problem, called a torn meniscus. But those who stuck with therapy had improved as much six months and one year later as those who were given arthroscopic surgery right away, researchers found."Both are very good choices. It would be quite reasonable to try physical therapy first because the chances are quite good that you'll do quite well," said one study leader, Dr. Jeffrey Katz, a joint specialist at Brigham and Women's Hospital and Harvard Medical School.He was to discuss the study Tuesday at an American Academy of Orthopaedic Surgeons conference in Chicago. Results were published online by the New England Journal of Medicine.A meniscus is one of the crescent-shaped cartilage discs that cushion the knee. About one-third of people over 50 have a tear in one, and arthritis makes this more likely. Usually the tear doesn't cause symptoms but it can be painful.When that happens, it's tough to tell if the pain is from the tear or the arthritis — or whether surgery is needed or will help. Nearly half a million knee surgeries for a torn meniscus are done each year in the U.S.The new federally funded study compared surgery with a less drastic option. Researchers at seven major universities and orthopedic surgery centers around the U.S. assigned 351 people with arthritis and meniscus tears to get either surgery or physical therapy. The therapy was nine sessions on average plus exercises to do at home, which experts say is key to success.After six months, both groups had similar rates of functional improvement. Pain scores also were similar.Thirty percent of patients assigned to physical therapy wound up having surgery before the six months was up, often because they felt therapy wasn't helping them. Yet they ended up the same as those who got surgery right away, as well as the rest of the physical therapy group who stuck with it and avoided having an operation."There are patients who would like to get better in a 'fix me' approach" and surgery may be best for them, said Elena Losina, another study leader from Brigham and Women's Hospital.However, an Australian preventive medicine expert contends that the study's results should change practice. Therapy "is a reasonable first strategy, with surgery reserved for the minority who don't have improvement," Rachelle Buchbinder of Monash University in Melbourne wrote in a commentary in the medical journal.As it is now, "millions of people are being exposed to potential risks associated with a treatment that may or may not offer specific benefit, and the costs are substantial," she wrote.Surgery costs about $5,000, compared with $1,000 to $2,000 for a typical course of physical therapy, Katz said.One study participant — Bob O'Keefe, 68, of suburban Boston — was glad to avoid surgery for his meniscus injury three years ago."I felt better within two weeks" on physical therapy, he said. "My knee is virtually normal today" and he still does the recommended exercises several times a week.Robert Dvorkin had both treatments for injuries on each knee several years apart. Dvorkin, 56, director of operations at the Coalition for the Homeless in New York City, had surgery followed by physical therapy for a tear in his right knee and said it was months before he felt no pain.Then several years ago he hurt his left knee while exercising. "I had been doing some stretching and doing some push-ups and I just felt it go 'pop.'" he recalls. "I was limping, it was extremely painful."An imaging test showed a less severe tear and a different surgeon recommended physical therapy. Dvorkin said it worked like a charm — he avoided surgery and recovered faster than from his first injury. The treatment involved two to three hour-long sessions a week, including strengthening exercises, balancing and massage. He said the sessions weren't that painful and his knee felt better after each one."Within a month I was healed," Dvorkin said. "I was completely back to normal."AP Medical Writer Lindsey Tanner in Chicago contributed to this report.
WASHINGTON (AP) — Don't look for testing of the anthrax vaccine to begin in children any time soon.Controversy arose last year as experts debated whether such studies should be done to learn how to treat children in case of a bioterror attack.But a presidential commission says the government would have to take multiple steps — including more safety research in young adults — before it would be ethical to consider tests in children."The safety of our children is paramount, and we have to get this precisely right," said Dr. Amy Gutmann, who chairs the Presidential Commission for the Study of Bioethical Issues, which released its report Tuesday.More than a decade after the anthrax attacks, the government has a multibillion-dollar stockpile of drugs and vaccines to fight an array of threats. There's no information on whether those so-called countermeasures would work in children like they're expected to help their parents, or even what dose to use. Yet if a large attack were to occur, children undoubtedly would receive those untested products.Worried about how to handle an emergency, a government advisory group recommended studying the anthrax vaccine in children if independent ethics experts agreed it could be done appropriately. The Obama administration put that question to the panel.Tuesday's answer: Children don't gain any benefit from pre-attack research with the anthrax vaccine or other countermeasures. So the panel said such studies would be ethical only if they presented no more than minimal risk to participants — like the risk from a routine medical check-up. Determining that would require, among other things, more testing in adults, the panel added. Something that proved safe in 18-year-olds, for example, might be a candidate to study next in 16- and 17-year-olds.However, the government should plan now for how it would study children who receive those treatments in the event of an attack, the panel said.The Health and Human Services Department, which requested the advice, said it would review the findings.
NEW YORK (AP) — A government survey of parents says 1 in 50 U.S. schoolchildren has autism, surpassing another federal estimate for the disorder.Health officials say the new number doesn't mean autism is occurring more often. But it does suggest that doctors are diagnosing autism more frequently, especially in children with milder problems.The earlier government estimate of 1 in 88 comes from a study that many consider more rigorous. It looks at medical and school records instead of relying on parents.For decades, autism meant kids with severe language, intellectual and social impairments and unusual, repetitious behaviors. But the definition has gradually expanded and now includes milder, related conditions.The new estimate released Wednesday by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention would mean at least 1 million children have autism.The number is important — government officials look at how common each illness or disorder is when weighing how to spend limited public health funds.The new statistic comes from a national phone survey of more than 95,000 parents in 2011 and 2012. Less than a quarter of the parents contacted agreed to answer questions, and it's likely that those with autistic kids were more interested than other parents in participating in a survey on children's health, CDC officials said.Still, CDC officials believe the survey provides a valid snapshot of how many families are affected by autism, said Stephen Blumberg, the CDC report's lead author.The study that came up with the 1-in-88 estimate had its own limitations. It focused on 14 states, only on children 8 years old, and the data came from 2008. Updated figures based on medical and school records are expected next year."We've been underestimating" how common autism is, said Michael Rosanoff of Autism Speaks, an advocacy group. He believes the figure is at least 1 in 50.There are no blood or biologic tests for autism, so diagnosis is not an exact science. It's identified by making judgments about a child's behavior.Doctors have been looking for autism at younger and younger ages, and experts have tended to believe most diagnoses are made in children by age 8.However, the new study found significant proportions of children were diagnosed at older ages.Dr. Roula Choueiri, a neurodevelopmental pediatrician at Tufts Medical Center in Boston, said she's seen that happening at her clinic. Those kids "tend to be the mild ones, who may have had some speech delays, some social difficulties," she wrote in an email. But they have more problems as school becomes more demanding and social situations grow more complex, she added.
The American Academy of Pediatrics declared its support for same-sex marriage for the first time on Thursday, saying that allowing gay and lesbian parents to marry if they so choose is in the best interests of their children.The academy's new policy statement says same-sex marriage helps guarantee rights, benefits and long-term security for children, while acknowledging that it does not now ensure access to federal benefits. When marriage is not an option, the academy said, children should not be deprived of foster care or adoption by single parents or couples, whatever their sexual orientation.The academy's review of scientific literature began more than four years ago, and the result is a 10-page report with 60 citations."If the studies are different in their design and sample but the results continue to be similar, that gives scientists and consumers more faith in the result," said Dr. Ellen Perrin, a co-author of the new policy and a professor of pediatrics at Tufts University School of Medicine.Other scientists called the evidence lackluster and said the academy's endorsement was premature. Loren Marks, an associate professor of child and family studies at Louisiana State University in Baton Rouge, said there was not enough national data to support the pediatric association's position on same-sex marriage. "National policy should be informed by nationally representative data," he said. "We are moving in the direction of higher-quality national data, but it's slow."The academy cited research finding that a child's well-being is much more affected by the strength of relationships among family members and a family's social and economic resources than by the sexual orientation of the parents. "There is an emerging consensus, based on extensive review of the scientific literature, that children growing up in households headed by gay men or lesbians are not disadvantaged in any significant respect relative to children of heterosexual parents," the academy said.A large body of evidence demonstrates that children raised by gay or lesbian parents fare as well in emotional, cognitive and social functioning as peers raised by heterosexuals, the academy said.One study in England compared 39 families with lesbian mothers to 74 heterosexual parents and 60 families headed by single heterosexual women. No difference was found between the groups in emotional involvement, abnormal behaviors in children as reported by parents or teachers, or psychiatric disorders in them. Both mothers and teachers reported more behavioral problems among children in single-parent families than two-parent ones, whatever their sexual orientation.A 2010 study of children born to 154 lesbian parents in the United States compared mothers' reports of their 17-year-olds to a national sample of age-matched peers. The mothers' reports indicated that their sons and daughters had high levels of competence and fewer social problems, compared with their peers."Marriage strengthens families and benefits child development, and it also increases a parent's sense of competence and security when they are able to raise children without stigma," said Dr. Nanette Gartrell, the lead author of the study and a visiting scholar at the University of California, Los Angeles, School of Law.The research on same-sex marriage has limitations, experts note, including the relatively small sample sizes of gay or lesbian parents even in long-term studies. Many studies have relied on parental assessments of their children's well-being, and there is relatively little data about the well-being of children raised by gay men compared with lesbians."Many studies compare wealthy, well-educated lesbian mothers to single heterosexual mothers instead of married couples," Dr. Marks said. "This matters, because children from married families do better on numerous outcomes including psychological and physical health and avoidance of high-risk behaviors than children of single-parent families."Timm Ryan-Young, a 48-year-old married Brooklynite and father of Zelia, 6, found the academy's support of same-sex marriage reaffirming."Whenever a formal institution validates or confirms that a same-sex family is valid," he said, "and there are no measurable negatives to it, or deterrents to it, it means a great deal, frankly."Dr. Travis Kidner, 36, a surgeon in Los Angeles, and Hernan Lopez, 42, a media executive, married in 2008 and adopted Nicholas, 2 1/2 years old, and Zoe, 21 months. "It's important for kids to know they are from a stable home and that their parents are married," Dr. Kidner said.The pediatrics academy's support for same-sex marriage heartened him. "The arc is in our favor now," he said.Another reason same-sex couples should be allowed to marry, the academy said, is that divorce law provides for a legally structured arrangement for visits and custody."If people can't get married, then they can't get divorced," Dr. Perrin said. "That legal system that exists to protect our most vulnerable, namely children, isn't in play."
The likelihood of a school-aged American child receiving a diagnosis of autism, Asperger syndrome or a related developmental disorder increased 72 percent in 2011-12 from 2007, according to an analysis of a phone survey of parents released Wednesday by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the Health Resources and Services Administration.According to experts not involved in the report, the increase coincided with a period of soaring awareness of autism spectrum disorders among clinicians and schools, as well as parents.The report emphasized that while the numbers changed from 1 in 86 children, ages 6 to 17, having received a diagnosis in a 2007 parent survey, to 1 in 50 children in the current report, most of the increase was because of previously undiagnosed cases."Our findings suggest that the increase in prevalence is due to improved recognition of autism spectrum disorders," said Stephen J. Blumberg, a senior scientist with the centers' National Center for Health Statistics and the lead author of the study, "as opposed to children with newly developed risks for them."Parents in the newer survey who reported that their children had received a diagnosis between 2008 and 2012 were far more likely to report that the diagnosis had been characterized as "mild" than parents who received the diagnosis earlier."We in the field don't have a standard set of definitions about what is mild and severe yet," said Dr. Susan L. Hyman, a professor of pediatrics at the University of Rochester Medical Center. "Yet this survey allows parents to determine whether they see their child as mild or severe."In keeping with earlier studies about autism spectrum disorders, the new report reflected gender disparities. In the new study, 1 in 31 boys had received a diagnosis, up from 1 in 56 boys in 2007. By contrast, 1 in 143 girls received a diagnosis, according to the latest report; in 2007, 1 in 204 girls received a diagnosis.The rise in diagnoses was also generally greater among 14- to 17-year-olds, underscoring the likelihood that these were previously unrecognized cases.Nonetheless, with parents describing 1 in 50 children as having significant social or other challenges, the new data "tells us the real numbers of children needing help to experience social and academic success," said Deborah A. Fein, a co-author of a forthcoming study in Pediatrics about a widely used screening tool for autism in toddlers. "We need to find ways of funding and providing help to these children," Dr. Fein, a professor of psychology at the University of Connecticut, said in an e-mail.Experts also reacted cautiously to the new report because of its methodology, in which researchers randomly dialed landlines and cellphone numbers, interviewing parents.By contrast, a study released last year by the C.D.C.'s Autism and Developmental Disabilities Monitoring Network looked directly at school behavioral assessments and clinical reports of children who were 8 years old in 2008 and applied a standard checklist of criteria for the diagnoses. While that study found a 78 percent increase in autism spectrum disorders from 2002 to 2008, it said the likelihood of a child receiving such a diagnosis was 1 in 88.Because the methodologies were so different, as well as the age range of the children themselves, it was difficult, experts said, to draw conclusions about prevalence or diagnoses, not least because clinicians themselves use different assessment tools. A diagnosis of an autism spectrum disorder can change as a child grows older.Dr. Catherine Lord, director for the Center for Autism and Developing Brain at NewYork-Presbyterian Hospital/Weill Cornell and Columbia, who was not involved in the C.D.C. study, said, "We can't dismiss this report, but we can't interpret it to mean that more people have a diagnosis. It means that more families are thinking of this as a possibility and maybe more professionals are bringing it up."
A treatment that genetically alters a patient's own immune cells to fight cancer has, for the first time, produced remissions in adults with an acute leukemia that is usually lethal, researchers are reporting.In one patient who was severely ill, all traces of leukemia vanished in eight days."We had hoped, but couldn't have predicted that the response would be so profound and rapid," said Dr. Renier J. Brentjens, the first author of a new study of the therapy and a specialist in leukemia at Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center.The treatment is experimental, has been used in only a small number of patients and did not work in all of them. But experts consider it a highly promising approach for a variety of malignancies, including other blood cancers and tumors in organs like the prostate gland.The new study, in five adults with acute leukemia in whom chemotherapy had failed, was published Wednesday in the journal Science Translational Medicine.The treatment is similar to one that pulled a 7-year-old girl, Emma Whitehead, from death's door into remission nearly a year ago, and that has had astounding success in several adults with chronic leukemia in whom chemotherapy had failed. The treatment regimen that saved Emma and those adults was developed at the University of Pennsylvania. Related studies have also been done at the National Cancer Institute.But this cell-therapy approach had not been tried before in adults with the disease that Emma had, acute lymphoblastic leukemia. This type of blood cancer is worse in adults than in children, with a cure rate in adults of only about 40 percent, compared with 80 percent to 90 percent in children. The disease is not common. Each year in the United States, it affects about 2,400 people older than 20, and 3,600 younger. Though there are fewer cases in adults, there are more deaths: about 1,170 adults die each year compared with 270 deaths in people under 20.In adults, this type of leukemia is a "devastating, galloping disease," said Dr. Michel Sadelain, the senior author of the new study and director of the Center for Cell Engineering and the Gene Transfer and Gene Expression Laboratory at Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center in Manhattan.Patients like the ones in the study, who relapse after chemotherapy, usually have only a few months left, Dr. Sadelain said. But now, three of the five have been in remission for 5 to 24 months. Two others died: one was in remission but died from a blood clot, and the other relapsed. The survivors have gone on to have bone-marrow transplants. Their prognosis is good, but relapse is still possible, and only time will tell.Experts not connected with the study said it was an important advance in an emerging field. Dr. Carl June of the University of Pennsylvania, who led the team that treated Emma and the other patients, said, "This is the first report showing some real, clinically beneficial activity in adult acute lymphoblastic leukemia." He said his team was also starting to test its version of the cell therapy on patients with the disease.Dr. Richard M. Stone, the program director for adult leukemia at the Dana-Farber Cancer Institute in Boston, called the research exciting and said he hoped to begin collaborating with the team at Sloan-Kettering. He has already sent them a patient.The treatment uses patients' own T-cells, a type of white blood cell that normally fights viruses and cancer. The patient's blood is run through a machine that extracts T-cells and returns the rest of the blood to the body. Researchers then do some genetic engineering: they use a disabled virus as a "vector" to carry new genetic material into the T cells, which reprograms them to recognize and kill any cell that carries a particular protein on its surface.The protein, called CD19, is found on B-cells, which are part of the immune system. This target was chosen because the patients had a type of leukemia that affects B-cells, so the goal was to train the patients' T-cells to destroy B-cells. Healthy B-cells — which make antibodies to fight infection — would be killed along with cancerous ones, but that side effect was treatable."We're creating living drugs," Dr. Sadelain said. "It's an exciting story that's just beginning."One of the sickest patients in the study was David Aponte, 58, who works on a sound crew for ABC News. In November 2011, what he thought was a bad case of tennis elbow turned out to be leukemia. He braced himself for a long, grueling regimen of chemotherapy.His oncologist, Dr. Brentjens, suggested that before starting the drugs, Mr. Aponte might want to have some of his T-cells removed and stored (chemotherapy would deplete them). That way, if he relapsed, he might be able to enter a study using the cells. Mr. Aponte agreed.At first, the chemotherapy worked, but by the summer of 2012, while he was still being treated, tests showed that the disease was back. "After everything I had gone through, the chemo, losing hair, the sickness, it was absolutely devastating," Mr. Aponte recalled.He joined the T-cell study. For a few days, nothing seemed to be happening. Then, his temperature began to rise. He has no memory of what took place during the next week or so, but the journal article — where he is Patient 5 — reports that his fever spiked to 105 degrees. He was in the throes of a "cytokine storm," meaning that the T-cells, in a furious battle with the cancer, were churning out enormous amounts of hormones called cytokines. Besides fever, the hormonal rush can make a patient's blood pressure plummet and his heart rate shoot up. Mr. Aponte was taken to intensive care and treated with steroids to quell the reaction.Eight days later, his leukemia was gone. Even the doctors were shocked, Dr. Brentjens said. They repeated the lab tests just to make sure there was no mistake.Once he was in remission, Mr. Aponte had a bone-marrow transplant, as did three of the other patients in the study. Another had medical problems that made a transplant impossible, and it was he who relapsed and died. The researchers think he may have relapsed because the steroids he needed to treat the cytokine storm may have wiped out the T-cells before they could do their job.For the other patients, it is not known whether the transplants were really needed; in theory, the T-cells alone might have produced a long-term remission or even a cure. Patients treated at the University of Pennsylvania were not given transplants, and most have stayed in remission. But the technique used there involves a different viral vector and different genetic programming from the one at Sloan-Kettering.In any case, Dr. Brentjens said, the T-cells are still experimental, whereas transplants are the standard of care in acute leukemia because they have been shown to give many patients the best odds of survival. So the transplants were done for ethical reasons. The study is continuing, and as more patients are treated, answers may emerge as to whether the T-cells alone will be enough for some patients.Mr. Aponte, who had the transplant in December, is still recovering, and trying to gain back some of the 40 pounds he lost while he was ill. But he hopes to return to work soon.
NEW YORK (AP) — The flu season is winding down, and it has killed 105 children so far — about the average toll.The season started about a month earlier than usual, sparking concerns it might turn into the worst in a decade. It ended up being very hard on the elderly, but was moderately severe overall, according to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.Six of the pediatric deaths were reported in the last week, and it's possible there will be more, said the CDC's Dr. Michael Jhung said Friday.Roughly 100 children die in an average flu season. One exception was the swine flu pandemic of 2009-2010, when 348 children died.The CDC recommends that all children ages 6 months and older be vaccinated against flu each season, though only about half get a flu shot or nasal spray.All but four of the children who died were old enough to be vaccinated, but 90 percent of them did not get vaccinated, CDC officials said.This year's vaccine was considered effective in children, though it didn't work very well in older people. And the dominant flu strain early in the season was one that tends to cause more severe illness.The government only does a national flu death count for children. But it does track hospitalization rates for people 65 and older, and those statistics have been grim.In that group, 177 out of every 100,000 were hospitalized with flu-related illness in the past several months. That's more than 2 1/2 times higher than any other recent season.This flu season started in early December, a month earlier than usual, and peaked by the end of year. Since then, flu reports have been dropping off throughout the country."We appear to be getting close to the end of flu season," Jhung said.
WASHINGTON — The Food and Drug Administration said Friday that it was moving to toughen regulation of the industry that produces heart defibrillators — devices used to jolt a failing heart back into its regular rhythm — after tens of thousands of malfunctions and hundreds of deaths in recent years.In one case, a nurse was trying to hook up a defibrillator to a patient in cardiac arrest when its electronic screen read "memory full" and then shut down, according to one example provided by the F.D.A. The patient soon died. In another case, a software defect caused the device to show an "equipment disabled" message. That patient also died.The devices, which can be found in malls, airports, casinos and churches in addition to medical settings, re-establish cardiac rhythms in patients whose hearts have abruptly stopped or lost their regular beats. Such cardiac arrests kill as many as 400,000 people a year in the United States, according to the American Heart Association, more deaths than caused by Alzheimer's disease, diabetes and accidents combined.There have been 45,000 reports of the devices failing or malfunctioning since 2005, agency officials said. The vast majority of them were due to manufacturing problems, officials said, but some were because of improper maintenance, like battery failure. Manufacturers have recalled the devices 88 times in that period.The problems led the agency to propose a change that would allow it to more closely monitor how the devices — known as automated external defibrillators, or A.E.D.'s — are designed and made. There are about 2.4 million of them in public places across the country.Dr. William Maisel, chief scientist at the F.D.A.'s Center for Devices and Radiological Health, said in a conference call with reporters on Friday, "We think tens of thousands of adverse events is too many and 88 recalls is too many."On Friday, the agency issued an order that, if made official after a public comment period, would require manufacturers to submit details of their designs and the controls they use in buying defibrillator components, many of which are produced abroad. Regulators would also be able to inspect manufacturers' factories.Normally, for devices regulated under this framework, manufacturers would have to conduct costly and time-consuming clinical trials, but Dr. Maisel said that most of the manufacturers have already collected the data that such trials would produce, and that only a couple would need to carry out such studies.After a 90-day public comment period, companies will have another 90 days to file their paperwork. The agency will give companies an additional 15 months to comply with the changes. An F.D.A. official said she expected the process to be complete by the end of 2014.A spokeswoman for Philips, one of the manufacturers, said the change would not interrupt distribution, but she added that the company needed to review the F.D.A. order before commenting on whether future supplies would be affected.Another major manufacturer, Physio-Control, in Washington State, said in a statement that it was "extremely confident in our ability to meet these new regulations, if adopted." A spokesman said the change would be more difficult for smaller manufacturers, because more resources would be required to follow the rules.Death rates from cardiac arrests have changed little since the 1980s, when defibrillators first became widely available to the public. Experts say those statistics could improve if more of the devices were accessible to more people. Bystanders use them in just 5 percent of cardiac arrests, according to data from the Emory University School of Medicine, in part because patients usually become ill in private homes where there are no defibrillators.Dr. Mickey Eisenberg, the emergency medical services director for King County in Seattle, said he worried the changes would hinder innovation, which he said was critical to better use of the devices and could lead to fewer deaths. The price of defibrillators, which cost $1,000 to $2,000, needs to drop, he said, to make them affordable for home use, a bit like a fancy smoke detector."A.E.D.'s in public places will never solve the problem," he said. "They need to become consumer items, to enter people's bedrooms and homes."Even for manufacturers that would not be required to conduct clinical trials, the cost of complying with the new regulations would rise to about $220,000 from about $5,000, according to Dr. Maisel. He said that companies with multiple models would have to pay that money only once, and that the sum could also be applied to subsequent versions.Elliot Fisch, the president of Atrus, which provides defibrillator location information to dispatch agencies during cardiac arrest calls, said cost increases could be passed on to the consumer and make the devices less affordable. He said survival rates have improved sharply in recent years in Seattle, in part because defibrillators are more easily accessible."If this is going to increase costs to where it becomes prohibitive for organizations to purchase them, that's not good, because the biggest problem is access," he said.But Dr. Gordon Tomaselli, chief of cardiology at Johns Hopkins University and a past president of the American Heart Association, said the F.D.A.'s move could boost confidence in the devices and encourage their use."People already have a lack of comfort in using these devices," he said. "If word is out there that they don't work anyway, people will be even more reluctant to do something that they were pretty nervous about to begin with."
SAN FRANCISCO (AP) — Have a heart problem? If it's fixable, there's a good chance it can be done without surgery, using tiny tools and devices that are pushed through tubes into blood vessels.Heart care is in the midst of a transformation. Many problems that once required sawing through the breastbone and opening up the chest for open heart surgery now can be treated with a nip, twist or patch through a tube.These minimal procedures used to be done just to unclog arteries and correct less common heart rhythm problems. Now some patients are getting such repairs for valves, irregular heartbeats, holes in the heart and other defects — without major surgery. Doctors even are testing ways to treat high blood pressure with some of these new approaches.All rely on catheters — hollow tubes that let doctors burn away and reshape heart tissue or correct defects through small holes in blood vessels."This is the replacement for the surgeon's knife. Instead of opening the chest, we're able to put catheters in through the leg, sometimes through the arm," said Dr. Spencer King of St. Joseph's Heart and Vascular Institute in Atlanta. He is former president of the American College of Cardiology. Its conference earlier this month featured research on these novel devices."Many patients after having this kind of procedure in a day or two can go home" rather than staying in the hospital while a big wound heals, he said. It may lead to cheaper treatment, although the initial cost of the novel devices often offsets the savings from shorter hospital stays.Not everyone can have catheter treatment, and some promising devices have hit snags in testing. Others on the market now are so new that it will take several years to see if their results last as long as the benefits from surgery do.But already, these procedures have allowed many people too old or frail for an operation to get help for problems that otherwise would likely kill them."You can do these on 90-year-old patients," King said.These methods also offer an option for people who cannot tolerate long-term use of blood thinners or other drugs to manage their conditions, or who don't get enough help from these medicines and are getting worse."It's opened up a whole new field," said Dr. Hadley Wilson, cardiology chief at Carolinas HealthCare System in Charlotte. "We can hopefully treat more patients more definitively, with better results."For patients, this is crucial: Make sure you are evaluated by a "heart team" that includes a surgeon as well as other specialists who do less invasive treatments. Many patients now get whatever treatment is offered by whatever specialist they are sent to, and those specialists sometimes are rivals."We want to get away from that" and do whatever is best for the patient, said Dr. Timothy Gardner, a surgeon at Christiana Care Health System in Newark, Del., and an American Heart Association spokesman. "There shouldn't be a rivalry in the field."Here are some common problems and newer treatments for them:Millions of people have leaky heart valves. Each year, more than 100,000 people in the United States alone have surgery for them. A common one is the aortic valve, the heart's main gate. It can stiffen and narrow, making the heart strain to push blood through it. Without a valve replacement operation, half of these patients die within two years, yet many are too weak to have one."Essentially, this was a death sentence," said Dr. John Harold, a Los Angeles heart specialist who is president of the College of Cardiology.That changed just over a year ago, when Edwards Lifesciences Corp. won approval to sell an artificial aortic valve flexible and small enough to fit into a catheter and wedged inside the bad one. At first it was just for inoperable patients. Last fall, use was expanded to include people able to have surgery but at high risk of complications.Gary Verwer, 76, of Napa, Calif., had a bypass operation in 1988 that made surgery too risky when he later developed trouble with his aortic valve."It was getting worse every day. I couldn't walk from my bed to my bathroom without having to sit down and rest," he said. After getting a new valve through a catheter last April at Stanford University, "everything changed; it was almost immediate," he said. "Now I can walk almost three miles a day and enjoy it. I'm not tired at all.""The chest cracking part is not the most fun," he said of his earlier bypass surgery. "It was a great relief not to have to go through that recovery again."Catheter-based treatments for other valves also are in testing. One for the mitral valve — Abbott Laboratories' MitraClip — had a mixed review by federal Food and Drug Administration advisers this week; whether it will win FDA approval is unclear. It is already sold in Europe.Catheters can contain tools to vaporize or "ablate" bits of heart tissue that cause abnormal signals that control the heartbeat. This used to be done only for some serious or relatively rare problems, or surgically if a patient was having an operation for another heart issue.Now catheter ablation is being used for the most common rhythm problem — atrial fibrillation, which plagues about 3 million Americans and 15 million people worldwide. The upper chambers of the heart quiver or beat too fast or too slow. That lets blood pool in a small pouch off one of these chambers. Clots can form in the pouch and travel to the brain, causing a stroke.Ablation addresses the underlying rhythm problem. To address the stroke risk from pooled blood, several novel devices aim to plug or seal off the pouch. Only one has approval in the U.S. now — SentreHeart Inc.'s Lariat, a tiny lasso to cinch the pouch shut. It uses two catheters that act like chopsticks. One goes through a blood vessel and into the pouch to help guide placement of the device, which is contained in a second catheter poked under the ribs to the outside of the heart. A loop is released to circle the top of the pouch where it meets the heart, sealing off the pouch.A different kind of device — Boston Scientific Corp.'s Watchman — is sold in Europe and parts of Asia, but is pending before the FDA in the U.S. It's like a tiny umbrella pushed through a vein and then opened inside the heart to plug the troublesome pouch. Early results from a pivotal study released by the company suggested it would miss a key goal, making its future in the U.S. uncertain.Some people have a hole in a heart wall called an atrial septal defect that causes abnormal blood flow. St. Jude Medical Inc.'s Amplatzer is a fabric-mesh patch threaded through catheters to plug the hole.The patch is also being tested for a more common defect — PFO, a hole that results when the heart wall doesn't seal the way it should after birth. This can raise the risk of stroke. In two new studies, the device did not meet the main goal of lowering the risk of repeat strokes in people who had already suffered one, but some doctors were encouraged by other results.The original catheter-based treatment — balloon angioplasty — is still used hundreds of thousands of times each year in the U.S. alone. A Japanese company, Terumo Corp., is one of the leaders of a new way to do it that is easier on patients — through a catheter in the arm rather than the groin.Newer stents that prop arteries open and then dissolve over time, aimed at reducing the risk of blood clots, also are in late-stage testing.About 75 million Americans and 1 billion people worldwide have high blood pressure, a major risk factor for heart attacks. Researchers are testing a possible long-term fix for dangerously high pressure that can't be controlled with multiple medications.It uses a catheter and radio waves to zap nerves, located near the kidneys, which fuel high blood pressure. At least one device is approved in Europe and several companies are testing devices in the United States."We're very excited about this," said Harold, the cardiology college's president. It offers hope to "essentially cure high blood pressure."
Despite growing warnings from pediatricians about feeding newborns anything other than breast milk or formula, many mothers appear to be introducing solid food well before their babies' bodies can handle it, says a study published Monday in the journal Pediatrics.In a national survey of 1,334 mothers, conducted by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, 40 percent said they gave their baby solid food before they were 4 months old, with 9 percent starting as early as 4 weeks. Doctors now recommend waiting until a baby is at least 6 months old.For at least 20 years, the American Academy of Pediatrics had advised against feeding babies solid food before they turned at least 4 months old. Last year, encouraged by growing evidence of the health benefits of breast milk, the group raised that age, saying babies should be fed nothing but breast milk for six months. When breast milk is not an option, formula is an acceptable alternative, the group says.But the survey suggests that mothers are not aware of the recommendations or find them difficult to follow. Popular reasons for giving solid food to babies before 4 months included "my baby is old enough," "my baby seemed hungry," "I wanted my baby to sleep longer at night" and — most alarming to researchers — "a doctor or health care professional said my baby should begin eating solid food.""Clearly we need better dissemination of the recommendations on solid food introduction," said Kelley Scanlon, an epidemiologist with the C.D.C. and an author of the study. "Health care providers need to provide clear and accurate guidance, and then provide support to help parents carry out those recommended practices."The study suggested that economics were a factor in the decision to introduce solid food, with poorer women who saw formula as too expensive more likely to feed solids too soon. Women who were feeding their children exclusively formula or a mix of formula and breast milk were not only more likely to introduce solid food early, but to say their doctors gave them the go-ahead."It makes me want to know more about the other advice that those parents were getting on infant feeding," Dr. Scanlon said.Further, the women in the survey who turned to solid food early were more likely to be young, less educated and unmarried. They also had lower levels of income or education, and were more likely to participate in the Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants and Children.While many pediatricians are sympathetic to the difficulties parents face feeding their child nothing but breast milk or formula for six months, they say little good can come from feeding solid food to a child before he or she is physically ready."When a baby is ready to start eating food, he will put his hands in his mouth, and you will see him actually making chewing motions," said Dr. T J Gold, a pediatrician with Tribeca Pediatrics in Brooklyn. "At 2, 3 months, they can't even hold their heads up well, and they can't sit," making it difficult, if not dangerous, to put solid food in their mouths.They also have yet to develop the proper gut bacteria that allow them to process solid food safely, potentially leading to gastroenteritis and diarrhea, Dr. Gold said. The early introduction of solid foods has also been linked to increased risk of obesity, diabetes, eczema and celiac disease.One reason parents turn to solid food early is the persistence of myths about solid food helping babies sleep through the night or put on weight."That big fat bottle at the end of the night isn't why your baby is sleeping — it's a skill you acquire," Dr. Gold said. "And if you think giving your child more calories is going to help him gain weight, but it gives him more diarrhea, then he's not actually absorbing as much."But even parents who are aware of the guidelines can have trouble following them, particularly if they are struggling to buy enough formula to feed a rapidly growing child. "The formula gets really expensive, especially in the 4-to-6-month window," Dr. Gold said. "And if you have more than one child and you're already preparing food for the whole family, it's much easier to just start sweeping things off your plate."Pediatricians can help parents delay solid food by helping them better understand their baby's signals, Dr. Scanlon said. "When the baby is fussy, they need to help them understand that doesn't necessarily mean they're hungry and need solid foods," she said.Parents should also know the signs that their child is ready for solid food, like sitting up, being able to take food off a fork and not closing the mouth when food is offered, Dr. Scanlon said.
WASHINGTON (AP) — We know a lot about how babies learn to talk, and youngsters learn to read. Now scientists are unraveling the earliest building blocks of math — and what children know about numbers as they begin first grade seems to play a big role in how well they do everyday calculations later on.The findings have specialists considering steps that parents might take to spur math abilities, just like they do to try to raise a good reader.This isn't only about trying to improve the nation's math scores and attract kids to become engineers. It's far more basic.Consider: How rapidly can you calculate a tip? Do the fractions to double a recipe? Know how many quarters and dimes the cashier should hand back as your change?About 1 in 5 adults in the U.S. lacks the math competence expected of a middle-schooler, meaning they have trouble with those ordinary tasks and aren't qualified for many of today's jobs."It's not just, can you do well in school? It's how well can you do in your life," says Dr. Kathy Mann Koepke of the National Institutes of Health, which is funding much of this research into math cognition. "We are in the midst of math all the time."University of Missouri researchers tested 180 seventh-graders. Those who lagged behind their peers in a test of core math skills needed to function as adults were the same kids who'd had the least number sense or fluency way back when they started first grade."The gap they started with, they don't close it," says Dr. David Geary, a cognitive psychologist who leads the study that is tracking children from kindergarten to high school in the Columbia, Mo., school system. "They're not catching up" to the kids who started ahead.If first grade sounds pretty young to be predicting math ability, well, no one expects tots to be scribbling sums. But this number sense, or what Geary more precisely terms "number system knowledge," turns out to be a fundamental skill that students continually build on, much more than the simple ability to count.What's involved? Understanding that numbers represent different quantities — that three dots is the same as the numeral "3'' or the word "three." Grasping magnitude — that 23 is bigger than 17. Getting the concept that numbers can be broken into parts — that 5 is the same as 2 and 3, or 4 and 1. Showing on a number line that the difference between 10 and 12 is the same as the difference between 20 and 22.Factors such as IQ and attention span didn't explain why some first-graders did better than others. Now Geary is studying if something that youngsters learn in preschool offers an advantage.There's other evidence that math matters early in life. Numerous studies with young babies and a variety of animals show that a related ability — to estimate numbers without counting — is intuitive, sort of hard-wired in the brain, says Mann Koepke, of NIH's National Institute of Child Health and Human Development. That's the ability that lets you choose the shortest grocery check-out line at a glance, or that guides a bird to the bush with the most berries.Number system knowledge is more sophisticated, and the Missouri study shows children who start elementary school without those concepts "seem to struggle enormously," says Mann Koepke, who wasn't part of that research.While schools tend to focus on math problems around third grade, and math learning disabilities often are diagnosed by fifth grade, the new findings suggest "the need to intervene is much earlier than we ever used to think," she adds.Exactly how to intervene still is being studied, sure to be a topic when NIH brings experts together this spring to assess what's known about math cognition.But Geary sees a strong parallel with reading. Scientists have long known that preschoolers who know the names of letters and can better distinguish what sounds those letters make go on to read more easily. So parents today are advised to read to their children from birth, and many youngsters' books use rhyming to focus on sounds.Likewise for math, "kids need to know number words" early on, he says.—Don't teach your toddler to count solely by reciting numbers. Attach numbers to a noun — "Here are five crayons: One crayon, two crayons..." or say "I need to buy two yogurts" as you pick them from the store shelf — so they'll absorb the quantity concept.—Talk about distance: How many steps to your ball? The swing is farther away; it takes more steps.—Describe shapes: The ellipse is round like a circle but flatter.—As they grow, show children how math is part of daily life, as you make change, or measure ingredients, or decide how soon to leave for a destination 10 miles away,"We should be talking to our children about magnitude, numbers, distance, shapes as soon as they're born," she contends. "More than likely, this is a positive influence on their brain function."EDITOR'S NOTE — Lauran Neergaard covers health and medical issues for The Associated Press in Washington.
When Fred E. Taylor arrived at Harrison Medical Center in Silverdale, Wash., for a routine prostatectomy, he expected the best medical care new technology had to offer: robotic surgery, billed as safer, less painful and easier on the body than traditional surgery.The operation, on Sept. 9, 2008, was supposed to take five hours. But it was marred by a remarkable cascade of complications and dragged on for more than 13 hours, leaving Mr. Taylor, who had been an active 67-year-old retiree, incontinent and with a colostomy bag, and leading to kidney and lung damage, sepsis and a stroke.Mr. Taylor survived his injuries but died last year. Now, his wife, Josette, is suing Intuitive Surgical Inc., the company that makes the equipment and trained the surgeon to use it. As it turned out, the surgeon, Dr. Scott Bildsten, had never before used the robotic equipment without supervision."We are the old school, where you trust the doctor," said Mrs. Taylor, who noted that her husband's life was so limited after the operation that he used to cry about being "trapped in this body."It is not the first time patients have claimed they were harmed by Intuitive's robotic surgical equipment, called the da Vinci Surgical System. But the Taylor case, set for trial in April, is unusual. Internal company e-mails, provided to The New York Times by lawyers for the Taylor estate, offer a glimpse into the aggressive tactics used to market high-tech medical devices and raise questions about the quality of training provided to doctors before they use new equipment on patients.Intuitive, based in Sunnyvale, Calif., declined to comment on the lawsuit but said studies showed that its robotic equipment results in better outcomes than conventional open surgery. "The most objective and therefore best measure of efficacy for all of those involved in training — from Intuitive Surgical, the hospitals, the proctors and the surgeons themselves — is represented in the comparative clinical outcomes of da Vinci surgery," said Angela Wonson, the company's vice president for communications.According to Intuitive, 1,371 hospitals in the United States have purchased a da Vinci system, and many have purchased two. Nearly half a million procedures worldwide were performed robotically last year, including prostatectomies and hysterectomies, among other operations.A surgeon using the da Vinci system sits at a console with a camera that provides a high-definition, three-dimensional image of the surgical site. He or she manipulates miniaturized instruments; computer and robotic technology translates and scales the surgeon's hand movements.Hospitals are responsible for setting the credentialing standards, or training requirements, for physicians who will use the equipment on patients. But internal company e-mails suggest that Intuitive's sales representatives were intimately involved in the process, presenting themselves as experts and pressing for lower standards in order to ease the training path for busy surgeons, to increase use of the equipment and to drive sales.In an e-mail dated May 31, 2011, a Western regional sales manager for Intuitive noted that area surgeons had used robotic equipment only five times, although the company's goal was to see 36 robotic operations performed by the end of June. He urged sales staff to persuade surgeons to switch upcoming cases to robotic ones."Don't let proctoring or credentialing" — shorthand for supervised surgery and hospital certification — "get in our way," the e-mail said.In December 2009, a sales representative urged a hospital in Billings, Mont., to ease up on its credentialing requirement, saying in an e-mail that requiring surgeons to do five supervised operations using the robot before going solo was "on the high side" and could have "unintended consequences." Hospital officials replied, saying, "We will review and most likely will decrease the 5 down to 3."Ms. Wonson, the Intuitive spokeswoman, said the company does not get involved in determining who is qualified to operate its robotic equipment, which is the responsibility of the hospitals. "We do not make recommendations," she said in an e-mail.Dr. Bildsten was one of six doctors given free training by Intuitive, including one day of hands-on training at the company's facility in California. He also had done two practice runs on the equipment with a more experienced surgeon before operating on Mr. Taylor, he said in a legal deposition. Still, he said, no one warned him that a patient like Mr. Taylor, who weighed nearly 300 pounds, was not a good candidate for robotic surgery.He did not respond to telephone messages requesting comment.
NEW YORK (AP) — Surveys show most Americans would rather die at home than in a hospital. Now, a new government study suggests more and more people getting their wish.The researchers studied the deaths of patients admitted to a sampling of hospitals. They determined that hospital deaths accounted for 29 percent of U.S. deaths in 2010, down from more than 32 percent in 2000.Meanwhile, other reports indicate deaths in the home grew from 23 percent to 27 percent over the decade. Deaths in nursing homes held steady at around 21 percent.The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention released the figures Wednesday. CDC officials said the growing availability of hospice care may be one factor for fewer hospital deaths.
NEW YORK (AP) — Government health officials launched the second round of a graphic ad campaign Thursday that is designed to get smokers off tobacco, saying they believe the last effort convinced tens of thousands to quit.The ads feature sad, real-life stories: There is Terrie, a North Carolina woman who lost her voice box. Bill, a diabetic smoker from Michigan who lost his leg. And Aden, a 7-year-old boy from New York, who has asthma attacks from secondhand smoke."Most smokers want to quit. These ads encourage them to try," said Dr. Tom Frieden, director of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.The CDC campaign cost $48 million and includes TV, radio and online spots as well as print ads and billboards.The spending comes as the agency is facing a tough budget squeeze, but officials say the ads should more than pay for themselves by averting future medical costs to society. Smoking is the leading cause of preventable illness and death in the United States. It's responsible for the majority of the nation's lung cancer deaths and is a deadly factor in heart attacks and a variety of other illnesses.Last year's similar $54 million campaign was the agency's first and largest national advertising effort. The government deemed it a success: That campaign triggered an increase of 200,000 calls to quit lines. The CDC believes that likely prompted tens of thousands of smokers to quit based on calculations that a certain percentage of callers do actually stop.Like last year, the current 16-week campaign spotlights real people who were hurt and disfigured by smoking. Terrie Hall, a 52-year-old throat cancer survivor makes a repeat performance. She had her voice box removed about a dozen years ago.In last year's ad there's a photo of her as a youthful high school cheerleader. Then she is seen more recently putting on a wig, inserting false teeth and covering the hole in her neck with a scarf. It was, by far, the campaign's most popular spot, as judged by YouTube viewings and Web clicks.In a new ad, Hall addresses the camera, speaking with the buzzing sound of her electrolarynx. She advises smokers to make a video of themselves now, reading a children's book or singing a lullaby. "I wish I had. The only voice my grandson's ever heard is this one," her electric voice growls.One difference from last year: The new campaign tilts more toward the impact smokers have on others. One ad features a Kentucky high school student who suffers asthma attacks from being around cigarette smoke. Another has a Louisiana woman who was 16 when her mother died from smoking-related causes.The return of the campaign is already being applauded by some anti-smoking advocates, who say tobacco companies spend more on tobacco product promotion in a week than the CDC spends in a year.After decades of decline, the adult smoking rate has stalled at roughly 20 percent in recent years. Advocates say the campaign provides a necessary jolt to a weary public that has been listening to government warnings about the dangers of smoking for nearly 50 years."There is an urgent need to continue this campaign," said Matthew Myers, president of the Campaign for Tobacco-Free Kids, in a statement.It would seem like a bad time for the CDC to be buying air time — the agency is facing roughly $300 million in budget cuts as part of the government's sequestration cuts in federal spending. However, the ad money comes not from the CDC's regular budget but from a special $1 billion public health fund set up years ago through the Affordable Care Act. The fund has set aside more than $80 million for CDC smoking prevention work.Frieden argues that the ads are extremely cost-effective — spending about $50 million a year to save potentially tens of thousands of lives."We're trying to figure out how to have more impact with less resources," he said.The ads direct people to call 1-800-QUIT-NOW. PlowShare Group, of Stamford, Conn., is again the advertising company that put the ads together.
Gov. Bill Haslam of Tennessee said Wednesday that he would not expand Medicaid in his state as called for in the federal health care overhaul, joining 18 other Republican governors who have rejected expansion for now.Governor Haslam said he wanted instead to use federal Medicaid money to buy private insurance for as many as 175,000 low-income residents of his state. But he said that plan was being held up because the Obama administration had put too many conditions on the money.With his health care law, President Obama wanted to make Medicaid, the federal-state health program for poor people, available to many more Americans, covering those earning up to 138 percent of the federal poverty level (currently up to $15,856 a year for an individual). But when the Supreme Court upheld the law last year, it ruled that states could opt out of the Medicaid expansion.For states that opt in, the federal government will pay the full cost of expansion from 2014 to 2016, with its share gradually decreasing to 90 percent in 2020. So far, about two dozen governors, most of them Democrats, have said they want to expand Medicaid.Tennessee is not the first state to latch on to the idea of using the federal expansion money to buy private insurance for a portion of its low-income population. Arkansas and Ohio are seeking permission from the Obama administration to do so, and some lawmakers in other states, including Florida, Louisiana, Pennsylvania and Texas, have also expressed interest.Under this option, a state would use the federal Medicaid expansion funds to pay premiums for commercial insurance that will be sold through new marketplaces known as insurance exchanges. But Governor Haslam said he had not received assurances from the Obama administration that he could do things the way he wanted. For example, he said, he wants beneficiaries to pay a portion of their health care costs if they can afford to. And he does not want the expansion population to have better benefits than others who get insurance through the exchange."Until we get those assurances," Governor Haslam said in a speech to state legislators, "I cannot recommend to you that we move forward on this plan."Erin Shields Britt, a spokeswoman for the federal Department of Health and Human Services, said, "We welcome continued conversations with Tennessee about developing a state-based solution that meets both the state's unique needs and the requirements of the Medicaid program while providing much-needed coverage to thousands of Tennesseans."
For years, medical students who chose a residency in radiology were said to be on the ROAD to happiness. The acronym highlighted the specialties — radiology, ophthalmology, anesthesiology and dermatology — said to promise the best lifestyle for doctors, including the most money for the least grueling work.Not anymore. Radiologists still make twice as much as family doctors, but are high on the list of specialists whose incomes are in steepest decline. Recent radiology graduates with huge medical school debts are having trouble finding work, let alone the $400,000-and-up dream jobs that beckoned as they signed on for five to seven years of relatively low-paid labor as trainees. On Internet forums, younger radiology residents agonize about whether it is too late to switch tracks.At St. Barnabas Hospital in the Bronx, a dozen radiologists in training, including Dr. Luke Gerges, 28, are suddenly stranded on an expensive road to nowhere. All received termination notices recently because their hospital is ending their residency program next year as part of a plan to replace its radiologists with a teleradiology company that reads diagnostic images remotely."Those days of raking in the dough with radiology are gone," said Dr. Gerges, who is four years beyond medical school and $300,000 in debt. He said he chose a specialty he loves without caring that big salaries were waning, but never imagined it would be this hard to finish his postgraduate training and get a job."No one is going to hire me to be a radiologist without my training," he said.Few specialties have been immune to the same factors depressing radiology: deep Medicare cuts, cut-rate competition driven by technology, doubts about the health value of many tests and procedures and new measures to tilt public money to primary care.The case of St. Barnabas may be extreme, said Dr. Paul H. Ellenbogen, chairman of the American College of Radiology, the principal organization of the nation's 30,000 radiologists, who called the hospital's treatment of the residents "unconscionable." But it is part of a larger pattern that has made radiology the target of a dozen cuts in Medicare reimbursement since 2006, he said, totaling $6 billion."We were somewhat victims of our success," said Dr. Ellenbogen, in Dallas, whose career spans what radiologists call the golden years, when the cost of diagnostic imaging grew faster than other items in health care.Starting in the 1980s, the advent of technology like M.R.I.'s and CT scans, combined with a fee-for-service system, created ballooning demand for imaging and drove the compensation of radiologists to unsustainable heights, he said. "That led to a sense of entitlement in some people's minds," he said. "And that led to this development of offshore remote reading of cases."By 2001, with the supply of radiologists limited by a 1997 Congressional cap on all Medicare-supported residencies, nighttime demand was unmanageable for smaller emergency rooms. So-called nighthawk radiology services began pooling the diagnostic imaging loads of several hospitals and transmitting them electronically to American radiologists stationed overseas or working from home.Though outsourcing to India grabbed headlines, the big growth in teleradiology was domestic. Now the nighthawk companies, staffed by recent radiology graduates, are competing for the daytime work, too.St. Barnabas pays radiology residents $48,000 to $60,000 a year and collects about $150,000 for each in "direct graduate medical education" Medicare payments, which, besides their pay, is supposed to cover malpractice insurance and education in the program, accredited by the American Osteopathic Association. But the hospital will not release the money to other programs where the radiology residents could complete their training, Steven Clark, a hospital spokesman, said, because it plans to use the money to expand primary-care residencies.That decision could be seen as a small victory for national policies intended to bolster primary care. But to many St. Barnabas residents, it mainly shows that the system of graduate medical education is broken."If the model becomes that everything is remote reading, it comes at the expense of training," said Dr. Nirav Shelat, another third-year radiology resident. "Are we going to allow our trainees to essentially be kicked out by corporations?"
The bacterial makeup of the intestines may help determine whether people gain weight or lose it, according to two new studies, one in humans and one in mice.The research also suggests that a popular weight-loss operation, gastric bypass, which shrinks the stomach and rearranges the intestines, seems to work in part by shifting the balance of bacteria in the digestive tract. People who have the surgery generally lose 65 percent to 75 percent of their excess weight, but scientists have not fully understood why. Now, the researchers are saying that bacterial changes may account for 20 percent of the weight loss.The findings mean that eventually, treatments that adjust the microbe levels, or "microbiota," in the gut may be developed to help people lose weight without surgery, said Dr. Lee M. Kaplan, director of the obesity, metabolism and nutrition institute at the Massachusetts General Hospital, and an author of a study published Wednesday in Science Translational Medicine.Not everyone who hopes to lose weight wants or needs surgery to do it, he said. About 80 million people in the United States are obese, but only 200,000 a year have bariatric operations."There is a need for other therapies," Dr. Kaplan said. "In no way is manipulating the microbiota going to mimic all the myriad effects of gastric bypass. But if this could produce 20 percent of the effects of surgery, it will still be valuable."In people, microbial cells outnumber human ones, and the new studies reflect a growing awareness of the crucial role played by the trillions of bacteria and other microorganisms that live in their own ecosystem in the gut. Perturbations there can have profound and sometimes devastating effects.One example is infection with a bacterium called C. difficile, which sometimes takes hold in people receiving antibiotics for other illnesses. The drugs can wipe out other organisms that would normally keep C. difficile in check. Severe cases can be life-threatening, and the medical profession is gradually coming to accept the somewhat startling idea that sometimes the best therapy is a fecal transplant — from a healthy person to the one who is sick, to replenish the population of "good germs."Dr. Kaplan said his group's experiments were the first to try to find out if microbial changes could account for some of the weight loss after gastric bypass. Earlier studies had shown that the microbiota of an obese person changed significantly after the surgery, becoming more like that of someone who was thin. But was the change from the surgery itself, or from the weight loss that followed the operation? And did the microbial change have any effects of its own?Because it would be difficult and time-consuming to study these questions in people, the researchers used mice, which they had fattened up with a rich diet. One group had gastric bypass operations, and two other groups had "sham" operations in which the animals' intestines were severed and sewn back together. The point was to find out whether just being cut open, without having the bypass, would have an effect on weight or gut bacteria. One sham group was kept on the rich food, while the other was put on a weight-loss diet.In the bypass mice, the microbial populations quickly changed, and the mice lost weight. In the sham group, the microbiota did not change much — even in those on the weight-loss diet.Next, the researchers transferred intestinal contents from each of the groups into other mice, which lacked their own intestinal bacteria. The animals that received material from the bypass mice rapidly lost weight; stool from mice that had the sham operations had no effect.Exactly how the altered intestinal bacteria might cause weight loss is not yet known, the researchers said. But somehow the microbes seem to rev up metabolism so that the animals burn off more energy.A next step, Dr. Kaplan said, may be to take stool from people who have had gastric bypass and implant it into mice to see if causes them to lose weight. Then the same thing could be tried from person to person."In addition, we've identified four subsets of bacteria that seem to be most specifically enhanced by the bypass," Dr. Kaplan said. "Another approach would be to see if any or all of those individual bacteria could mediate the effects, rather than having to transfer stool."A second study by a different group found that overweight people may be more likely to harbor a certain type of intestinal microbe. The microbes may contribute to weight gain by helping other organisms to digest certain nutrients, making more calories available. That study was published Tuesday in the Journal of Clinical Endocrinology & Metabolism.The study involved 792 people who had their breath analyzed to help diagnose digestive orders. They agreed to let researchers measure the levels of hydrogen and methane; elevated levels indicate the presence of a microbe called Methanobrevibacter smithii. The people with the highest readings on the breath test were more likely to be heavier and have more body fat, and the researchers suspect that the microbes may be at least partly responsible for their obesity.This type of organism may have been useful thousands of years ago, when people ate more roughage and needed all the help they could get to squeeze every last calorie out of their food. But modern diets are much richer, said an author of the study, Dr. Ruchi Mathur, director of the diabetes outpatient clinic at Cedars-Sinai Medical Center in Los Angeles."Our external environment is changing faster than our internal one," Dr. Mathur said. Studies are under way, she said, to find out whether getting rid of this particular microbe will help people lose weight.
WASHINGTON — A study commissioned by the State of California says that the new federal health care law will drive up individual insurance premiums, but that subsidies will offset most of the increase for low-income people.The study, issued Thursday in the midst of a growing national debate over the impact of the law, is significant because California is far ahead of most states in setting up a competitive marketplace, or exchange, where people can buy insurance this fall.Premiums could increase by an average of 30 percent for higher-income people in California who are now insured and do not qualify for federal insurance subsidies, the study said.However, it said, people in this group will benefit from new limits on their out-of-pocket medical expenses, so their total cost of care will increase by 20 percent, on average.The report for the state insurance exchange, known as Covered California, cited several factors contributing to higher premiums: an influx of less healthy people into the individual insurance market, and a requirement for health insurance plans to offer richer benefits and to cover more of the cost of care than is now typical for individual insurance policies.Another factor, it said, is that federal and state government agencies are imposing new taxes and fees on insurers, which are likely to pass on some of the costs to consumers."Health insurance will become relatively less expensive for people with chronic conditions and relatively more expensive for healthier people," said Robert G. Cosway, an actuary at Milliman, a large consulting firm that prepared the report.Some people, especially those in good health, may drop their insurance because of the premium increases, Mr. Cosway said.However, the study said that low-income people would see significant reductions in their premiums and out-of-pocket costs, in part because of income tax credits and other subsidies. The total cost of care, it said, will fall by an average of 76 percent for people who are currently insured and have incomes less than 250 percent of the poverty level (meaning less than $28,725 a year for an individual).The report was prepared to help state officials evaluate proposals from insurers and develop marketing messages to reach consumers."There are 5.3 million Californians who will qualify to purchase insurance through the exchange," said Peter V. Lee, the executive director of the California exchange. "Insights gained from this research confirm that most people will experience a positive impact."The California report follows a study by the Society of Actuaries, a professional organization, suggesting that the new law would contribute to higher insurance costs in the next three years.Asked about such estimates, Kathleen Sebelius, the secretary of health and human services, acknowledged that costs could rise in the individual insurance market, particularly for men and for younger people. She noted that the law prohibits insurers from charging women more than men and limits their ability to charge higher premiums based on age. "Women are going to see some lower costs, some men are going to see some higher costs," she said Tuesday at a White House briefing. "So it's sort of a one-to-one shift."Republicans said the Society of Actuaries report validated their concerns. Senator Lamar Alexander, Republican of Tennessee, said, "This nonpartisan report offers more evidence that what I told the president in 2010 is true: individual insurance premiums will rise under his plan."Under the law, insurers cannot deny coverage or charge higher premiums to people because of pre-existing medical conditions.As a result, Milliman said in the California study, "we expect the average currently insured to experience premium increases because they will be part of a new risk pool" including sicker people who have been excluded from the market in the past.The White House says the fears of "rate shock" are overblown. Consumers can move from expensive health plans to more efficient, lower-cost plans, the administration says. Officials also predict that people gaining insurance will, on average, be younger and healthier than those who already have it.
A doctor who prosecutors said recklessly performed liposuction on a woman with a transplanted heart, leading to her death, was arraigned Thursday on charges including manslaughter and falsification of records.According to the indictment, the woman, Isel Pineda, 51, went to Dr. Oleg Davie's Manhattan office on Park Avenue for a consultation in April 2012 and filled out forms disclosing her heart transplant eight years earlier and the immunosuppressant drugs she was taking. The transplant had been performed by Dr. Mehmet Oz, the cardiothoracic surgeon who has become a television personality, prosecutors said."Any medical professional would clearly know if a patient has previously had heart transplant surgery because of the obvious scar on the chest," Charles J. Hynes, the Brooklyn district attorney, said in a statement, adding that anti-rejection drugs put Ms. Pineda at higher risk for infection. "Doctors are well aware of the fact that they are discouraged from performing liposuction and similar procedures on patients with heart disease."Prosecutors charge that Dr. Davie, 51, was reckless in going ahead with the laser procedure known as SmartLipo on May 10, 2012, in his Brooklyn office, using a local anesthetic. Ms. Pineda went into cardiac arrest and was rushed to Coney Island Hospital, where she died.Prosecutors charge that Dr. Davie falsified the medical history forms in an attempted cover-up, eliminating the references to heart disease, the transplant and anti-rejection drugs like Prednisone. The changes came to light after the original forms were found in Ms. Pineda's purse.Dr. Davie's state medical license had been restricted to cosmetic procedures in 2011 because of professional negligence involving seven other patients. Since Ms. Pineda's death, his license has been suspended. On Thursday, he pleaded not guilty and was released on $175,000 bail.James J. DiPietro, Dr. Davie's defense lawyer, disputed the district attorney's account of the cause of death, reading aloud from reports by two experts, including Dr. Michael Baden, a former city medical examiner who has become a TV personality himself. Both reports said the evidence showed that Ms. Pineda's death was not criminal and had nothing to do with her status as a heart transplant recipient. Rather, they said, she died from "fat embolism syndrome," a risk in this procedure regardless of the patient's history."She clearly signed a waiver form where risks were described to her," Mr. DiPietro said. "Her death is tragic, but it's not criminal."Dr. Baden's report found that Ms. Pineda's transplanted heart had become enlarged and was 95 percent occluded, or blocked, by arteriosclerosis; most people who die of heart disease do so before their hearts are 80 percent occluded, he wrote."This woman was a walking time bomb," Mr. DiPietro said. "It's unusual she was even alive."Why Ms. Pineda sought liposuction at all is unclear, said Michael Fruhling, a lawyer representing the family in a wrongful-death suit. He said she was "a very, very pretty woman," amicably divorced from the husband with whom she had run a custom tote bag design business. She had a boyfriend and lived in Midtown, was 5 foot 9 inches and weighed 130 pounds."Unfortunately, Isel is not here to answer those questions," he said. "You have to look at the doctor being the gatekeeper. Physicians are in the position to say yes or no."No responsible plastic surgeon would do such a procedure on a heart transplant recipient in an office, Mr. Fruhling contended, and Dr. Davie was not even equipped to handle the complication known as "fat embolism syndrome."And why did she choose this doctor, who had been disciplined, fined $100,000 and put on probation by the state health department?"She answered an ad," the lawyer said. "He had advertised his services at a reduced rate."
The unsanitary practices of a dentist in Tulsa, Okla., may have exposed thousands of patients to H.I.V. and hepatitis , forcing him to close his offices while health officials investigate and test about 7,000 people who had visited him since 2007.Officials with the Oklahoma Department of Health began sending letters Friday to those patients, urging them to have their blood tested for H.I.V., hepatitis B and hepatitis C. The dentist, Dr. W. Scott Harrington, has offices in Tulsa and Owasso, a northern Tulsa suburb, and investigators said they found numerous health and safety violations at the Tulsa office, including nonsterilized and rusty instruments.So far, only one patient has been confirmed as having been infected — with hepatitis C — after being treated by Dr. Harrington. While officials stressed how important it was for patients to be tested, they cautioned that it was premature to characterize the situation as a widespread public health crisis. They said the transmission of H.I.V., hepatitis B and hepatitis C in a setting like a dentist's office was unusual."This is certainly going to be very alarming for those patients of this dental practice, but we're trying to assure folks that this is not an outbreak investigation," said Leslea Bennett-Webb, the spokeswoman for the Health Department. "We know based on scientific investigations in the past that acquiring these kinds of infectious diseases in a dental practice is very rare."Health officials have records for Dr. Harrington's patients only since 2007, so they do not know how many others had visited him before then and might have been exposed to the viruses. They also do not know how long the improper practices were in place, and so were recommending that anyone who had ever been treated by Dr. Harrington be tested.Dr. Harrington, 64, has been a state-licensed dentist since 1974 and an oral surgeon since 1977. He told investigators that he had treated a large number of patients known to be infectious disease carriers.He has voluntarily closed his two offices and surrendered his dental license for 30 days. He faces the possibility of having his license revoked, after a hearing on April 19 at the state Board of Dentistry in Oklahoma City.Dr. Harrington and his lawyer did not respond to requests for comment.In a 17-count complaint filed Thursday by the dentistry board, Dr. Harrington was accused of being "a menace to the public health" by using unsafe and unsanitary practices. The complaint accused him of using drug vials for more than one patient and keeping expired vials; failing to keep suitable records of dangerous drugs; leaving his drug cabinet unlocked and unsupervised; and allowing dental assistants to sedate patients though they were not licensed to do so.Dr. Harrington told officials during one inspection that his staff handled all sterilization and drug procedures, telling investigators, according to the complaint: "They take care of that. I don't."Inspectors this month also found two separate sets of instruments at the Tulsa office, each cleaned by a different method — one for those patients known to have infectious diseases and one for those not believed to have such diseases, the complaint stated. The proper approach, officials said, is for all instruments to be handled as if they contained viruses."This is unprecedented for us," said Susan Rogers, the executive director of the state Board of Dentistry and a member of the team that examined Dr. Harrington's office. "When I say he wasn't following infection control guidelines, that's an understatement. I will tell you that I was stunned. I'm used to seeing drug cabinets in disarray. I'm not used to seeing rusty instruments."A spokeswoman for the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention said the agency was assisting Oklahoma authorities with the investigation.The Tulsa Health Department said it would offer free testing at a local clinic starting on Saturday.
Texas lawmakers have grappled year after year over whether families or medical professionals should decide when to end a terminally ill patient's life-sustaining care. This year, they seem closer to a compromise."If we were only making decisions based on medical facts, everything would be straightforward," said Dr. Leigh Fredholm, the medical director of Seton palliative care at the University Medical Center Brackenridge in Austin. "But that's not how we make decisions." (Seton is a corporate sponsor of The Texas Tribune.)State law allows physicians to discontinue treatment they deem medically futile. If a physician's decision to end treatment contradicts the patient's advance directive or the judgment of the patient's surrogates, state law gives patients or their families 10 days to find another provider and appeal the doctor's decision to a hospital ethics committee.Advocacy groups that identify as "pro-life" say existing law does not go far enough to protect the interests of patients or their families. But they are divided on how legislators should change it. While support in the Legislature's upper chamber seems to be coalescing around Senate Bill 303, which would tweak the process, some support bills that would bar doctors or hospital ethics committees from making the final decision to end treatment."There are times when medical treatment is inappropriate and death is inevitable," said State Senator Robert Deuell, Republican of Greenville, a physician who filed S.B. 303. Prohibiting doctors or an ethics committee from participating in the process could "let a family subject a loved one to a lot of truly unnecessary, perhaps painful and harmful treatment," he said.The bill would alter the existing dispute process by extending the time frame for finding an alternate provider to 14 days, and by ensuring the patient or patient's surrogate has assistance navigating the appeals process, access to free copies of medical records and adequate representation at an ethics committee hearing. The bill has the support of the Texas Medical Association, the Texas Hospital Association, two church-affiliated groups and the Texas Alliance for Life.Notably missing from that list is Texas Right to Life. John Seago, the group's legislative director, said Dr. Deuell's bill would still allow an ethics committee to override a patient or surrogate's desire to continue treatment and would not alleviate the burden put on families to find a new provider."An inmate on death row has more appeals and due process than a patient before an ethics committee," Mr. Seago said.Texas Right to Life supports two other measures, Senate Bill 675, which would prohibit a physician from withdrawing life-sustaining treatment based on a medical or value judgment, and House Bill 1464, which would eliminate the 10-day time frame and require the physician or hospital to continue life-sustaining treatment until the patient is transferred to another facility.So far, none of the bills have advanced out of committee. Dr. Deuell said he planned to add additional protections to S.B. 303 based on input he has received.In 2012, the Texas Hospital Association surveyed 202 private hospitals — a third of all hospitals in the state — and found the end-of-life dispute process had been used 30 times between 2007 and 2012. Of those cases, a third of the patients died during the appeals process, six patients were transferred to another provider and four continued treatment past the 10-day period. The ethics committees agreed with the physician's decision to end treatment in 7 of the 10 cases that got that far."Legislating the end of life is tricky," Dr. Fredholm said, "but for us, how you prepare for the end of life is much more important, because we all have to die."
A.D.H.D. Diagnoses Worry Doctors: The Times's Alan Schwarz on doctors' growing concern about the skyrocketing use of A.D.H.D. medications in children.Nearly one in five high school age boys in the United States and 11 percent of school-age children over all have received a medical diagnosis of attention deficit hyperactivity disorder, according to new data from the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.These rates reflect a marked rise over the last decade and could fuel growing concern among many doctors that the A.D.H.D. diagnosis and its medication are overused in American children.The figures showed that an estimated 6.4 million children ages 4 through 17 had received an A.D.H.D. diagnosis at some point in their lives, a 16 percent increase since 2007 and a 41 percent rise in the past decade. About two-thirds of those with a current diagnosis receive prescriptions for stimulants like Ritalin or Adderall, which can drastically improve the lives of those with A.D.H.D. but can also lead to addiction, anxiety and occasionally psychosis."Those are astronomical numbers. I'm floored," said Dr. William Graf, a pediatric neurologist in New Haven and a professor at the Yale School of Medicine. He added, "Mild symptoms are being diagnosed so readily, which goes well beyond the disorder and beyond the zone of ambiguity to pure enhancement of children who are otherwise healthy."And even more teenagers are likely to be prescribed medication in the near future because the American Psychiatric Association plans to change the definition of A.D.H.D. to allow more people to receive the diagnosis and treatment. A.D.H.D. is described by most experts as resulting from abnormal chemical levels in the brain that impair a person's impulse control and attention skills.While some doctors and patient advocates have welcomed rising diagnosis rates as evidence that the disorder is being better recognized and accepted, others said the new rates suggest that millions of children may be taking medication merely to calm behavior or to do better in school. Pills that are shared with or sold to classmates — diversion long tolerated in college settings and gaining traction in high-achieving high schools — are particularly dangerous, doctors say, because of their health risks when abused.The findings were part of a broader C.D.C. study of children's health issues, taken from February 2011 to June 2012. The agency interviewed more than 76,000 parents nationwide by both cellphone and landline and is currently compiling its reports. The New York Times obtained the raw data from the agency and compiled the results.A.D.H.D. has historically been estimated to affect 3 to 7 percent of children. The disorder has no definitive test and is determined only by speaking extensively with patients, parents and teachers, and ruling out other possible causes — a subjective process that is often skipped under time constraints and pressure from parents. It is considered a chronic condition that is often carried into adulthood.The C.D.C. director, Dr. Thomas R. Frieden, likened the rising rates of stimulant prescriptions among children to the overuse of pain medications and antibiotics in adults."We need to ensure balance," Dr. Frieden said. "The right medications for A.D.H.D., given to the right people, can make a huge difference. Unfortunately, misuse appears to be growing at an alarming rate."Experts cited several factors in the rising rates. Some doctors are hastily viewing any complaints of inattention as full-blown A.D.H.D., they said, while pharmaceutical advertising emphasizes how medication can substantially improve a child's life. Moreover, they said, some parents are pressuring doctors to help with their children's troublesome behavior and slipping grades."There's a tremendous push where if the kid's behavior is thought to be quote-unquote abnormal — if they're not sitting quietly at their desk — that's pathological, instead of just childhood," said Dr. Jerome Groopman, a professor of medicine at Harvard Medical School and the author of "How Doctors Think."Fifteen percent of school-age boys have received an A.D.H.D. diagnosis, the data showed; the rate for girls was 7 percent. Diagnoses among those of high-school age — 14 to 17 — were particularly high, 10 percent for girls and 19 percent for boys. About one in 10 high-school boys currently takes A.D.H.D. medication, the data showed.Rates by state are less precise but vary widely. Southern states, like Arkansas, Kentucky, Louisiana, South Carolina and Tennessee, showed about 23 percent of school-age boys receiving an A.D.H.D. diagnosis. The rates in Colorado and Nevada were less than 10 percent.The medications — primarily Adderall, Ritalin, Concerta and Vyvanse — often afford those with severe A.D.H.D. the concentration and impulse control to lead relatively normal lives. Because the pills can vastly improve focus and drive among those with perhaps only traces of the disorder, an A.D.H.D. diagnosis has become a popular shortcut to better grades, some experts said, with many students unaware of or disregarding the medication's health risks.
LONDON (AP) — After crocheting a colorful blanket, Joan Ferguson snuggled up under it one night and proudly thought: "This is one groovy blanket. I'm brilliant."Ferguson, 53, who struggles with low self-esteem, said it was the first time she had ever praised herself. She attributed the breakthrough in part to free self-help classes on mental health run by Britain's government-funded medical system.With a long wait to see a psychologist, the British government is turning to the classroom to treat people with mild-to-moderate mental health problems with a mix of PowerPoint presentations and group exercises.Ferguson's class of about 10 people, which meets once a week in east London, is led by two "psychological wellbeing practitioners." The instructors are trained for a year on how to help people change their behavior or thinking but they aren't fully fledged psychologists.While some dismiss the approach as do-it-yourself therapy, experts say there is convincing evidence that people with conditions like depression and anxiety can be successfully treated without ever seeing a psychologist or a psychiatrist.The strategy was adopted after Britain's independent health watchdog ruled that classes and self-help books are cost-effective. Treating people with mental health problems this way could get them back to work quicker and save the U.K. an estimated 700 million pounds in lost tax revenue over four years, a previous study found.The government is aiming to use the classes to treat least 15 percent of the more than 6 million who need treatment for anxiety or depression. In 2011, only about 5 percent got some kind of therapy; about half were treated in classes or settings such as telephone sessions or computer therapy.Those with more serious problems, like schizophrenia or post-traumatic stress disorder, are usually offered traditional psychotherapy.The self-help classes have a recovery rate of about 46 percent, slightly lower than the 50 to 60 percent recovery rates for those who get personal psychological counseling, according to statistics from the department of health.The British Psychological Society, a professional group, helped design the training received by the class instructors. The society's David Murphy, however, said the classes might not be a fit for everyone."Some people are wary about going to a class instead of seeing a psychologist," said Murphy, who isn't involved with the program.The classes often require more effort by the individual than working with a psychologist, he said."For the (self-help) classes to be effective, the onus is on the patient to change what they're doing in between sessions," Murphy said.Some American experts weren't sure the approach would work in the United States."The expectations of treatment are very different in the U.S.," said Michael Otto, a professor of psychology at Boston University who has studied self-help approaches. "People think, 'if I'm going to be paying for care, I want to get the treatment I want and that's often personal therapy."Otto said the downside to such self-help programs is that people who don't get better might just give up.Instructor Nabila El-Zanaty said the classes aren't meant to be like group therapy."It's more like psychological education," she said, after leading a session that taught participants how to spot negative thoughts about themselves.She said patients must be monitored closely in case they need more intensive help. At the start of every class, they fill in a survey about their recent behavior, including whether they have hurt themselves or had suicidal thoughts.El-Zanaty said she's been surprised by how much the participants are willing to share in class. She said one woman who cried during every session and talked about suicide attempts was referred to personalized therapy.Most courses run about eight to 12 weeks. El-Zanaty said they check in with participants a month after the classes end. After three months, they can apply to do another course if they still need help.Ferguson and her classmates in El-Zanaty's course realize it's up to them to make sure the classes work."They only give us the tools," she said. "I know if I don't practice the techniques, it will be back to square one."
Medicine honors its heroes in many ways. But sometimes high accolades can turn out to be highly embarrassing.Consider the annual award for lifetime achievement in preventing and controlling sexual infections, given since 1972 by the American Sexually Transmitted Diseases Association. The prize is named for an authentic giant of medicine: Dr. Thomas Parran Jr., the nation's sixth surgeon general (from 1936 to 1948), who used what was then a supremely powerful position to lift American public health to the front ranks.At a time when "venereal diseases" were spoken of in whispers, Dr. Parran influenced Congress to finance rapid-treatment centers to control and prevent syphilis, gonorrhea and chancroid.He defined the basic epidemiological principles of tracing all sexual contacts of infected individuals so they could be treated. He was largely responsible for requiring syphilis tests for marriage license applications.Beyond that, he fought to clean up polluted waterways, crusaded for truth in radio drug advertising and was an architect of the World Health Organization.But if Dr. Parran was ahead of his time, he was also complicit in two of the most egregious medical scandals of the 20th century. And that blight on his record is now endangering his honored place in the world of public health.The sexual disease association is seeking comment from its members and the public to determine the fate of the Parran Award; as of April 1, in a nonbinding vote, 62 percent of 210 viewers favored removing his name from it.  An official decision is expected this month.The debate over the Parran Award throws a spotlight on the issue of changing standards in medicine. What are scientists to do when they name their most prestigious award for an icon linked years later to unethical research?The two medical scandals revolved around experiments that are now universally regarded as shocking. Dr. Parran did not perform either study. Though national experts approved them both, he presided over them, strongly supported them and followed their progress in medical journals.One, the Tuskegee study, observed the course of untreated syphilis among hundreds of men who were infected naturally in Alabama. The study began in 1932, and it was not halted by the United States Public Health Service until 1972, after a whistle-blower complained that infected patients in the study were not given penicillin, the standard therapy after World War II.  Some participants died of the disease, some of their sexual partners contracted it, and some children were born infected.In the other study, even more odious, American researchers from 1946 to 1948 intentionally exposed more than 1,300 Guatemalans, including many in mental institutions, to syphilis, gonorrhea and chancroid. Although Dr. Parran had said that consent was needed before individuals participated in experiments, no evidence exists that the American researchers sought such permission. Dr. Parran told a contemporary that the Guatemalan experiments could not have been conducted in the United States.The unpublished Guatemalan experiments were hidden for more than half a century — until 2010, when the records were found and released, causing worldwide outrage and prompting a formal apology to Guatemala from then Secretary of State Hillary Rodham Clinton and Health and Human Services Secretary Kathleen Sebelius. President Bill Clinton made a similar apology in 1997 to the Tuskegee participants and their families.Few would disagree with Julius Schachter, a Parran Award recipient from the University of California, San Francisco, who wrote that "the incredible inhumanity of these actions and the deceit involved are absolutely mind-boggling." But should the association drop Dr. Parran's name from the award, as Dr. Schachter suggests?Paul A. Lombardo of the Georgia State University College of Law, who advised the presidential commission that studied the Guatemala affair, offers a less drastic measure: rewriting the citation to include "an account of Dr. Parran's involvement in two of the most disgraceful episodes in the annals of research ethics."Such a step would remind future generations that even scientists' most glittering successes are no guarantee against ethical malfeasance. "Myth would be balanced with a touch of reality," Professor Lombardo wrote.I share his view. Few doctors are taught medical history, and Dr. Parran's achievements deserve to be remembered alongside his inexcusable ethical lapses.He was a protégé of Franklin D. Roosevelt, who as governor of New York in 1930 appointed him state health commissioner, largely because of Dr. Parran's efforts to destigmatize venereal diseases.
A new study suggests that most young gay men in Mexico City would pledge to stay H.I.V.-free, attend a monthly safe-sex talk and take regular H.I.V. tests to prove they were uninfected — all in return for just $288 a year.Most male prostitutes would make the same promise for $156 a year, the study found.Because each person receiving H.I.V. treatment costs Mexico's public health system up to $7,000 a year for drugs alone, payments that encourage men to stay uninfected could be a bargain, the authors argue.The study, done by researchers from Brown University, the University of California at Berkeley and Mexico's national public health institute, was published online by The European Journal of Health Economics.Although other countries have tried programs that pay people for good health behavior, like taking children for checkups, the authors believe their study was the first to pinpoint a specific dollar value that would ensure cooperation from 70 percent of a risk group — in this case, young gay and bisexual men, who have very high H.I.V. infection rates and are the drivers of Mexico's epidemic.The researchers approached men aged 18 to 25 in gay bars, discos and the streets of the city's red-light district. The 40-minute survey, taken on cellphone-size computers, increased or decreased the amount each man was offered until 70 percent answered yes.When it comes to staying H.I.V.-free, prostitutes have to make difficult decisions, said the lead author, Omar Galárraga, a health economist at Brown. They are often desperate for cash, and they can charge more for sex without a condom."But also, they know they are high-risk, so it's good for them to have checkups," he said. "If you're a man who has sex with men in Mexico City, you're lucky if you are tested every two years, if at all."Although he has not surveyed gay men or prostitutes in the United States to determine how much cash would be tempting, Dr. Galárraga said the cost-benefit ratio could, in theory, be greater in the United States because drugs and hospital care are far more expensive.However, he noted two important differences. Prostitution is not illegal in Mexico, but it is in the United States, which could hamper recruitment. Also, 9 percent of the survey takers said they would not participate at any price, and they tended to be wealthier and better educated — that is, more resembling Americans.
A treatment that many people with multiple sclerosis had hoped would prove effective has failed its first rigorous test, according to a new study.The treatment uses balloons — the type commonly employed to open blocked arteries in people with heart disease — to widen veins in the head and neck. The technique is based on the unproven theory that narrowed veins cause multiple sclerosis by stopping blood from draining out of the brain properly, which is thought to damage nerves and the fatty sheath, myelin, that insulates them. A vascular surgeon from Italy, Dr. Paolo Zamboni, is the leading proponent of the idea.In recent years, 30,000 people around the world have flocked to clinics offering the balloon treatment, despite the lack of solid evidence for it. Many patients want it because the standard drug treatments have not helped. Multiple sclerosis is incurable and causes progressive disability that eventually forces many patients to use wheelchairs. Some people think the balloon treatment has helped them, and testimonials on the Internet have helped create a powerful demand for the procedure.Researchers at the University at Buffalo recruited 20 patients with the disease to test the theory. Half were picked at random to receive the treatment, and the other half underwent a "sham" procedure in which doctors did not actually use balloons. The patients did not know whether their veins had been expanded, and neither did the people who assessed them later. The patients were monitored for six months.There were no significant differences between the two groups in symptoms or tests used to measure the quality of life, the researchers reported last month at a meeting of the American Academy of Neurology in San Diego. In a few cases, brain lesions associated with the disease actually seemed to worsen after the treatment.Dr. Adnan Siddiqui, who led the study, said the increased lesions were a sign of potential harm from the treatment. He said the results surprised even the researchers because they thought there might be some benefit. He emphasized that the study was small and needed to be verified by more research.But based on the findings, he said, the balloon treatment should not be used except in studies that are carefully designed to find out whether there are any patients who might be helped by it.
Cancer and heart disease are bigger killers, but Alzheimer's is the most expensive malady in the U.S., costing families and society $157 billion to $215 billion a year, according to a new study that looked at this in unprecedented detail.The biggest cost of Alzheimer's and other types of dementia isn't drugs or other medical treatments, but the care that's needed just to get mentally impaired people through daily life, the nonprofit RAND Corp.'s study found.It also gives what experts say is the most reliable estimate for how many Americans have dementia — around 4.1 million. That's less than the widely cited 5.2 million estimate from the Alzheimer's Association, which comes from a study that included people with less severe impairment."The bottom line here is the same: Dementia is among the most costly diseases to society, and we need to address this if we're going to come to terms with the cost to the Medicare and Medicaid system," said Matthew Baumgart, senior director of public policy at the Alzheimer's Association.Dementia's direct costs, from medicines to nursing homes, are $109 billion a year in 2010 dollars, the new RAND report found. That compares to $102 billion for heart disease and $77 billion for cancer. Informal care by family members and others pushes dementia's total even higher, depending on how that care and lost wages are valued."The informal care costs are substantially higher for dementia than for cancer or heart conditions," said Michael Hurd, a RAND economist who led the study. It was sponsored by the government's National Institute on Aging and will be published in Thursday's New England Journal of Medicine.Alzheimer's is the most common form of dementia and the sixth leading cause of death in the United States. Dementia also can result from a stroke or other diseases. It is rapidly growing in prevalence as the population ages. Current treatments only temporarily ease symptoms and don't slow the disease. Patients live four to eight years on average after an Alzheimer's diagnosis, but some live 20 years. By age 80, about 75 percent of people with Alzheimer's will be in a nursing home compared with only 4 percent of the general population, the Alzheimer's group says."Most people have understood the enormous toll in terms of human suffering and cost," but the new comparisons to heart disease and cancer may surprise some, said Dr. Richard Hodes, director of the Institute on Aging."Alzheimer's disease has a burden that exceeds many of these other illnesses," especially because of how long people live with it and need care, he said.For the new study, researchers started with about 11,000 people in a long-running government health survey of a nationally representative sample of the population. They gave 856 of these people extensive tests to determine how many had dementia, and projected that to the larger group to determine a prevalence rate — nearly 15 percent of people over age 70.Using Medicare and other records, they tallied the cost of purchased care — nursing homes, medicines, other treatments — including out-of-pocket expenses for dementia in 2010. Next, they subtracted spending for other health conditions such as high blood pressure, diabetes or depression so they could isolate the true cost of dementia alone."This is an important difference" from other studies that could not determine how much health care cost was attributable just to dementia, said Dr. Kenneth Langa, a University of Michigan researcher who helped lead the work.Even with that adjustment, dementia topped heart disease and cancer in cost, according to data on spending for those conditions from the federal Agency for Healthcare Research and Quality.Finally, researchers factored in unpaid care using two different ways to estimate its value — foregone wages for caregivers and what the care would have cost if bought from a provider such as a home health aide. That gave a total annual cost of $41,000 to $56,000 per year for each dementia case, depending on which valuation method was used."They did a very careful job," and the new estimate that dementia affects about 4.1 million Americans seems the most solidly based than any before, Hodes said. The government doesn't have an official estimate but more recently has been saying "up to 5 million" cases, he said.The most worrisome part of the report is the trend it portends, with an aging population and fewer younger people "able to take on the informal caregiving role," Hodes said. "The best hope to change this apparent future is to find a way to intervene" and prevent Alzheimer's or change its course once it develops, he said.
NEW YORK (AP) — Nearly half of young women say the first time they lived with a guy, they weren't married.That's the finding of a government survey released Thursday.The results are a marked changed from 1995 when only 34 percent said they moved in together. Now it is 48 percent. Back then, 39 percent said they married first, compared to 23 now.Experts say the numbers show living together is increasing used as a testing ground for marriage. About 40 percent of the women who lived with a guy went on to marry him within 3 years.The survey by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention questioned more than 12,000 women younger than 45 from 2006 to 2010.
In what may be an important step toward a long-elusive AIDS vaccine, American researchers have minutely tracked one person's powerful immune response to the virus to see how a series of mutations led to an antibody that can defeat many H.I.V. strains.A vaccine still remains far off, but the research lighted up one complex path that may someday be followed to that distant goal.Thirty-four million people in the world are H.I.V.-positive, and 2.5 million are newly infected each year, 50,000 of them in this country."The beauty of this is that it's a big clue as to the sequential steps the virus and the antibody take as they evolve," said Dr.Anthony S. Fauci, director of the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases, which financed the research.The study was led by scientists at Duke University and also drew in researchers from Columbia, Stanford, the University of Pennsylvania and elsewhere. It was published online Wednesday in the journal Nature.Scientists have so far failed to produce an AIDS vaccine because H.I.V. mutates so rapidly. Influenza viruses mutate so often that flu shots must be reformulated every year; H.I.V. mutates in one day as much as flu viruses do in a year.The study analyzed many sequential samples of the blood of one African man from shortly after he was infected until about two years later, when he started to produce "broadly neutralizing antibodies." Antibodies are Y-shaped proteins that neutralize virus particles by grabbing onto all the surface receptors they use to attach to cells. The antibodies the patient eventually evolved were called "broadly neutralizing" because they were able to jam up about 55 percent of all known H.I.V. strains.Scientists have been isolating broadly neutralizing antibodies for several years now, and more than a dozen have been found.About 20 percent of all H.I.V. carriers eventually produce broadly neutralizing antibodies, Dr. Fauci said. But that usually happens only after they have been infected for between two and four years, and by that time the powerful antibodies cannot save them because they are overwhelmed with so much mutating virus.In theory, if such antibodies could be cloned in bulk, a cocktail of enough variants to match all known H.I.V. strains could be given to newly infected patients. That is the equivalent of an immune globulin shot, which was once the only treatment for some diseases, like hepatitis.But it would be very expensive, and the treatment would have to be given for life. And antiretroviral drugs, which cost pennies to make, do the same thing: prevent the virus from replicating.However, if a healthy patient could be given a vaccine that would induce his own white blood cells to produce the same cocktail of antibodies, they might knock out any infection that patient got later.Because the cells that produce antibodies have to go through up to 100 mutations before they make broadly neutralizing ones, Dr. Fauci said, a vaccine to induce that would require many shots, given month after month, to "push" the cells through those mutations. Whether that is possible, let along financially practical, remains to be seen.Other H.I.V. vaccine experts reacted cautiously to the research, saying it was first-rate work but hedging on its practical implications.Dr. Louis J. Picker, an H.I.V. vaccine specialist at Oregon Health & Science University, described the work as "a road map to vaccine development, yes — but it's like one of those maps of the world from the year 1400. We still don't know how to turn this into a vaccine."Dr. Mike McCune III, head of experimental medicine at the University of California, San Francisco, called it "clarifying science, with a lot of data I hadn't seen before."But he said it was not clear if one patient's immune process could be applied to others."Eighty percent of all patients don't create broadly neutralizing antibodies," he said. "What do we do for them? Do we know how protective this strategy is against new infections? And would we have to tailor-make batches of vaccine for people with different backgrounds?"
WASHINGTON (AP) — Talk about a comeback: A treatment pulled off the market 30 years ago has won Food and Drug Administration approval again as the only drug specifically designated to treat morning sickness.That long-ago safety scare, prompted by hundreds of lawsuits claiming birth defects, proved to be a false alarm.Monday's FDA decision means a new version of the pill once called Bendectin is set to return to U.S. pharmacies under a different name — Diclegis — as a safe and effective treatment for this pregnancy rite of passage.In the intervening decades, the treatment is widely believed to have undergone more scrutiny for safety than any other drug used during pregnancy."There's been a lot of buzz about this. Nothing better has come along" to treat morning sickness in those 30 years, said Dr. Edward McCabe, medical director for the March of Dimes, who welcomed the step."We know safety-wise, there's zero question," said Dr. Gary Hankins of the University of Texas Medical Branch in Galveston, who headed one of the company-financed studies of Diclegis that led to its approval.U.S. sales of Diclegis are expected to begin in early June, according to Canada-based manufacturer Duchesnay Inc. The company has long sold a generic version of the pill in Canada under yet another name, Diclectin.For all the names, the main ingredients are the same: Vitamin B6 plus the over-the-counter antihistamine doxylamine, found in the sleep aid Unisom. U.S. obstetricians have long told nauseated pregnant women how to mix up the right dose themselves.In fact, in 2004 the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists issued guidelines calling the combination a first-line therapy.The difference that prescription-only Diclegis would offer: Combining both ingredients with a delayed-release coating designed to help women take a daily dose before their nausea sets in.The return of an FDA-cleared treatment is needed, said ACOG spokesman Dr. Jeffrey Ecker, an obstetrician at Massachusetts General Hospital who wasn't involved in the study of Diclegis."It's not magic," Ecker cautioned, saying few women see their symptoms completely disappear with the medication. "But for some it allows them to be much more functional."In Hankins' study, about 260 U.S. women with morning sickness were given either Diclegis or a dummy pill for two weeks. The Diclegis users missed on average 1 1/2 fewer days of work than their counterparts.About three-quarters of women experience at least some nausea and vomiting with the hormonal surges of early pregnancy. Although it often occurs upon waking, some women have trouble all day. It usually ends by the second trimester.About 1 percent of women undergo dangerously severe vomiting called hyperemesis gravidarum, the condition that made headlines last December when in Britain, Prince William's wife Kate was briefly hospitalized.An initial version of Bendectin began selling in 1956, and 33 million women around the world were estimated to have taken it before the lawsuits began. At the time, the FDA continued to call the drug safe; appeals courts ruled in favor of Bendectin maker Merrell Dow Pharmaceuticals; and eventually a U.S. Supreme Court decision would render continuing suits unlikely. But Merrell Dow declared the litigation cost too high, and quit making Bendectin in 1983.What happened? The government estimates 1 in 33 babies are born with birth defects regardless of medication use during pregnancy, and studies eventually concluded that Bendectin didn't increase that baseline risk. McCabe of the March of Dimes says it's important to recognize that when a drug is widely used in pregnancy, some babies will be born with birth defects that are a coincidence.Doctors advise trying some other steps before turning to medication for morning sickness: Eat protein snacks before bed. Nibble crackers or sip ginger ale before getting out of bed. Eat frequent small meals. Avoid nausea-triggering odors.When that doesn't work, Ecker says vitamin B6 alone helps some women. His next step is the B6-and-antihistamine combination that will form Diclegis. A next-step option includes the drug Zofran, normally used to treat nausea from cancer therapy.
It was breakfast time and the people participating in a study of red meat and its consequences had hot, sizzling sirloin steaks plopped down in front of them. The researcher himself bought a George Foreman grill for the occasion, and the nurse assisting him did the cooking.For the sake of science, these six men and women ate every last juicy bite of the 8-ounce steaks. Then they waited to have their blood drawn.Dr. Stanley Hazen of the Cleveland Clinic, who led the study, and his colleagues had accumulated evidence for a surprising new explanation of why red meat may contribute to heart disease. And they were testing it with this early morning experiment.The researchers had come to believe that what damaged hearts was not just the thick edge of fat on steaks, or the delectable marbling of their tender interiors. In fact, these scientists suspected that saturated fat and cholesterol made only a minor contribution to the increased amount of heart disease seen in red-meat eaters. The real culprit, they proposed, was a little-studied chemical that is burped out by bacteria in the intestines after people eat red meat. It is quickly converted by the liver into yet another little-studied chemical called TMAO that gets into the blood and increases the risk of heart disease.That, at least, was the theory. So the question that morning was: Would a burst of TMAO show up in people's blood after they ate steak? And would the same thing happen to a vegan who had not eaten meat for at least a year and who consumed the same meal?The answers were: yes, there was a TMAO burst in the five meat eaters; and no, the vegan did not have it. And TMAO levels turned out to predict heart attack risk in humans, the researchers found. The researchers also found that TMAO actually caused heart disease in mice. Additional studies with 23 vegetarians and vegans and 51 meat eaters showed that meat eaters normally had more TMAO in their blood and that they, unlike those who spurned meat, readily made TMAO after swallowing pills with carnitine."It's really a beautiful combination of mouse studies and human studies to tell a story I find quite plausible," said Dr. Daniel J. Rader, a heart disease researcher at the University of Pennsylvania School of Medicine, who was not involved in the research.Researchers say the work could lead to new treatments for heart disease — perhaps even an antibiotic to specifically wipe out the bacterial culprit — and also to a new way to assess heart disease risk by looking for TMAO in the blood.Of course, critical questions remain. Would people reduce their heart attack risk if they lowered their blood TMAO levels? An association between TMAO levels in the blood and heart disease risk does not necessarily mean that one causes the other. And which gut bacteria in particular are the culprits?There also are questions about the safety of supplements, like energy drinks and those used in body building. Such supplements often contain carnitine, a substance found mostly in red meat.But the investigators' extensive experiments in both humans and animals, published Sunday in Nature Medicine, have persuaded scientists not connected with the study to seriously consider this new theory of why red meat eaten too often might be bad for people.Dr. Frank Sacks, a professor of cardiovascular disease prevention at the Harvard School of Public Health, called the findings impressive. "I don't have any reason to doubt it," he said, "but it is kind of amazing."Lora Hooper, an associate professor of immunology and microbiology at the University of Texas Southwestern Medical Center, who follows the Paleo diet, heavy on meat, exclaimed, "Yikes!"The study does not mean that red meat is entirely bad or that it is best to avoid it entirely, said Dr. Hazen, the lead researcher. Dr. Hazen is the chairman of the department of cellular and molecular medicine at the Lerner Research Institute of the Cleveland Clinic, a nonprofit academic medical center. Meat contains protein, for example, and B vitamins, which are both essential for health. But the study's findings indicated that the often-noticed association between red meat consumption and heart disease risk might be related to more than just the saturated fat and cholesterol in red meats like beef and pork.Dr. Hazen began his research five years ago with a scientific fishing expedition. He directs a study of patients who come to the Cleveland Clinic for evaluations. Over the years, there have been 10,000. All were at risk for heart disease and agreed to provide blood samples and to be followed so the researchers would know if any patient had a heart attack or died of heart disease in the three years after the first visit. Those samples enabled him to look for small molecules in the blood to see whether any were associated with heart attacks or deaths.That study and a series of additional experiments led to the discovery that a red meat substance no one had suspected — carnitine — seemed to be a culprit. Carnitine is found in red meat and gets its name from the Latin word carnis, the root of carnivore, Dr. Hazen said. It is also found in other foods, he noted, including fish and chicken and even dairy products, but in smaller amounts. Red meat, he said, is the major source, and for many people who eat a lot of red meat, it may be a concern.The researchers found that carnitine was not dangerous by itself. Instead, the problem arose when it was metabolized by bacteria in the intestines and ended up as TMAO in the blood.That led to the steak-eating study. It turned out that within a couple of hours of a regular meat-eater having a steak, TMAO levels in the blood soared.But the outcome was quite different when a vegan ate a steak. Researchers had hypothesized that vegans would not have as many of the gut bacteria needed to make TMAO, and indeed virtually no TMAO appeared in the vegan's blood after he consumed a steak."We did not expect to see such a dramatic difference," Dr. Hazen said.Then researchers gave meat eaters doses of antibiotics to wipe out almost all of their gut bacteria. After that, they no longer had TMAO in their blood either after consuming red meat or carnitine pills. That meant, he said, that the effect really was because of gut bacteria.Researchers then tried to determine whether people with high blood carnitine or TMAO levels were at higher heart disease risk. They analyzed blood from more than 2,500 people, asking if carnitine or TMAO levels predicted heart attacks independently of traditional risk factors like smoking, high cholesterol and blood pressure. Both carnitine and TMAO did. But upon further analysis, they discovered that the effect was solely because of TMAO.The researchers' theory, based on their laboratory studies, is that TMAO enables cholesterol to get into artery walls and also prevents the body from excreting excess cholesterol.But what is it about carnitine that bacteria like? The answer, Dr. Hazen said, is that bacteria use it as a fuel.He said he worries about carnitine-containing energy drinks. Carnitine often is added to the drinks on the assumption that is will speed fat metabolism and increase a person's energy level, Dr. Hazen said.Dr. Robert H. Eckel, a professor of medicine at the University of Colorado and a past president of the American Heart Association, worried about how carnitine might be affecting body builders and athletes who often take it because they believe it builds muscle.Those supplements, Dr. Hazen said, "are scary, especially for our kids."Dr. Hazen, though, has taken his findings to heart. He used to eat red meat several times a week, about 12 ounces at a time. Now, he said, he eats it once every two weeks and has no more than 4 to 6 ounces at a time."I am not a vegan," Dr. Hazen said. "I like a good steak."
The scientists who were recruited to appear at a conference called Entomology-2013 thought they had been selected to make a presentation to the leading professional association of scientists who study insects.But they found out the hard way that they were wrong. The prestigious, academically sanctioned conference they had in mind has a slightly different name: Entomology 2013 (without the hyphen). The one they had signed up for featured speakers who were recruited by e-mail, not vetted by leading academics. Those who agreed to appear were later charged a hefty fee for the privilege, and pretty much anyone who paid got a spot on the podium that could be used to pad a résumé."I think we were duped," one of the scientists wrote in an e-mail to the Entomological Society.Those scientists had stumbled into a parallel world of pseudo-academia, complete with prestigiously titled conferences and journals that sponsor them. Many of the journals and meetings have names that are nearly identical to those of established, well-known publications and events.Steven Goodman, a dean and professor of medicine at Stanford and the editor of the journal Clinical Trials, which has its own imitators, called this phenomenon "the dark side of open access," the movement to make scholarly publications freely available.The number of these journals and conferences has exploded in recent years as scientific publishing has shifted from a traditional business model for professional societies and organizations built almost entirely on subscription revenues to open access, which relies on authors or their backers to pay for the publication of papers online, where anyone can read them.Open access got its start about a decade ago and quickly won widespread acclaim with the advent of well-regarded, peer-reviewed journals like those published by the Public Library of Science, known as PLoS. Such articles were listed in databases like PubMed, which is maintained by the National Library of Medicine, and selected for their quality.But some researchers are now raising the alarm about what they see as the proliferation of online journals that will print seemingly anything for a fee. They warn that nonexperts doing online research will have trouble distinguishing credible research from junk. "Most people don't know the journal universe," Dr. Goodman said. "They will not know from a journal's title if it is for real or not."Researchers also say that universities are facing new challenges in assessing the résumés of academics. Are the publications they list in highly competitive journals or ones masquerading as such? And some academics themselves say they have found it difficult to disentangle themselves from these journals once they mistakenly agree to serve on their editorial boards.The phenomenon has caught the attention of Nature, one of the most competitive and well-regarded scientific journals. In a news report published recently, the journal noted "the rise of questionable operators" and explored whether it was better to blacklist them or to create a "white list" of those open-access journals that meet certain standards. Nature included a checklist on "how to perform due diligence before submitting to a journal or a publisher."Jeffrey Beall, a research librarian at the University of Colorado in Denver, has developed his own blacklist of what he calls "predatory open-access journals." There were 20 publishers on his list in 2010, and now there are more than 300. He estimates that there are as many as 4,000 predatory journals today, at least 25 percent of the total number of open-access journals."It's almost like the word is out," he said. "This is easy money, very little work, a low barrier start-up."Journals on what has become known as "Beall's list" generally do not post the fees they charge on their Web sites and may not even inform authors of them until after an article is submitted. They barrage academics with e-mail invitations to submit articles and to be on editorial boards.One publisher on Beall's list, Avens Publishing Group, even sweetened the pot for those who agreed to be on the editorial board of The Journal of Clinical Trails & Patenting, offering 20 percent of its revenues to each editor.One of the most prolific publishers on Beall's list, Srinubabu Gedela, the director of the Omics Group, has about 250 journals and charges authors as much as $2,700 per paper. Dr. Gedela, who lists a Ph.D. from Andhra University in India, says on his Web site that he "learnt to devise wonders in biotechnology."Open-access publishers say that the papers they publish are reviewed and that their businesses are legitimate and ethical.
CHICAGO (AP) — Robotic surgery is being done more and more often for a variety of operations. But experts say there's a lack of strong evidence that it's any better than standard surgery in most cases — and it's usually costlier.Q: What exactly is robotic surgery?A: A multi-armed robot called da Vinci is used for many operations done with small incisions and tiny instruments. Prostate removal is one of the most common. Da Vinci also is used for removing the uterus, gallbladder, certain complex cancer surgeries and weight-loss operations.Q: How does the robot do surgery?A: A surgeon sits at a computer console in the operating room, directing the long robot arms with hand controls. The arms are tipped with tiny surgical instruments and one has a video camera that lets the surgeon view the operation on the computer screen.Q: What are the pros and cons of using the robot?A: Robot hands don't shake and they can twist and rotate in more directions than human hands. However, robotic operations often cost much more than more conventional surgery. They also sometimes take longer. But patients often spend less time in the hospital.Q: Does the robot ever break or cause problems?A: The U.S. Food and Drug Administration is looking into a growing number of reports of malfunctions and complications, including problems that resulted in deaths and injuries. There's no proof the robot was directly involved. The robot's maker says what appears to be an increase in problems really just reflects a change in the way the company reports them.Q: If I need an operation, should I have robotic surgery?A: Ask your doctor about the risks and benefits of using a robot versus standard less invasive surgery. And ask how many robotic operations your surgeon has done. A 2010 New England Journal of Medicine essay by a doctor and a health policy analyst said surgeons must do at least 150 procedures to become adept. But there is no expert consensus on how much training is needed.If you're considering a hysterectomy, your doctor was recently advised by the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists that robotic surgery shouldn't be the first choice because there's no good data it's as good as the cheaper alternatives.
WASHINGTON (AP) — Talk about a comeback: A treatment pulled off the market 30 years ago has won Food and Drug Administration approval again as the only drug specifically designated to treat morning sickness.That long-ago safety scare, prompted by hundreds of lawsuits claiming birth defects, proved to be a false alarm.Monday's FDA decision means a new version of the pill once called Bendectin is set to return to U.S. pharmacies under a different name — Diclegis — as a safe and effective treatment for this pregnancy rite of passage.In the intervening decades, the treatment is widely believed to have undergone more scrutiny for safety than any other drug used during pregnancy."There's been a lot of buzz about this. Nothing better has come along" to treat morning sickness in those 30 years, said Dr. Edward McCabe, medical director for the March of Dimes, who welcomed the step."We know safety-wise, there's zero question," said Dr. Gary Hankins of the University of Texas Medical Branch in Galveston, who headed one of the company-financed studies of Diclegis that led to its approval.U.S. sales of Diclegis are expected to begin in early June, according to Canada-based manufacturer Duchesnay Inc. The company has long sold a generic version of the pill in Canada under yet another name, Diclectin.For all the names, the main ingredients are the same: Vitamin B6 plus the over-the-counter antihistamine doxylamine, found in the sleep aid Unisom. U.S. obstetricians have long told nauseated pregnant women how to mix up the right dose themselves.In fact, in 2004 the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists issued guidelines calling the combination a first-line therapy.The difference that prescription-only Diclegis would offer: Combining both ingredients with a delayed-release coating designed to help women take a daily dose before their nausea sets in.The return of an FDA-cleared treatment is needed, said ACOG spokesman Dr. Jeffrey Ecker, an obstetrician at Massachusetts General Hospital who wasn't involved in the study of Diclegis."It's not magic," Ecker cautioned, saying few women see their symptoms completely disappear with the medication. "But for some it allows them to be much more functional."In Hankins' study, about 260 U.S. women with morning sickness were given either Diclegis or a dummy pill for two weeks. The Diclegis users missed on average 1 1/2 fewer days of work than their counterparts.About three-quarters of women experience at least some nausea and vomiting with the hormonal surges of early pregnancy. Although it often occurs upon waking, some women have trouble all day. It usually ends by the second trimester.About 1 percent of women undergo dangerously severe vomiting called hyperemesis gravidarum, the condition that made headlines last December when in Britain, Prince William's wife Kate was briefly hospitalized.An initial version of Bendectin began selling in 1956, and 33 million women around the world were estimated to have taken it before the lawsuits began. At the time, the FDA continued to call the drug safe; appeals courts ruled in favor of Bendectin maker Merrell Dow Pharmaceuticals; and eventually a U.S. Supreme Court decision would render continuing suits unlikely. But Merrell Dow declared the litigation cost too high, and quit making Bendectin in 1983.What happened? The government estimates 1 in 33 babies are born with birth defects regardless of medication use during pregnancy, and studies eventually concluded that Bendectin didn't increase that baseline risk. McCabe of the March of Dimes says it's important to recognize that when a drug is widely used in pregnancy, some babies will be born with birth defects that are a coincidence.Doctors advise trying some other steps before turning to medication for morning sickness: Eat protein snacks before bed. Nibble crackers or sip ginger ale before getting out of bed. Eat frequent small meals. Avoid nausea-triggering odors.When that doesn't work, Ecker says vitamin B6 alone helps some women. His next step is the B6-and-antihistamine combination that will form Diclegis. A next-step option includes the drug Zofran, normally used to treat nausea from cancer therapy.
CHICAGO (AP) — The biggest thing in operating rooms these days is a million-dollar, multi-armed robot named da Vinci, used in nearly 400,000 surgeries nationwide last year — triple the number just four years earlier.But now the high-tech helper is under scrutiny over reports of problems, including several deaths that may be linked with it, and the high cost of using the robotic system.There also have been a few disturbing, freak incidents: a robotic hand that wouldn't let go of tissue grasped during surgery and a robotic arm hitting a patient in the face as she lay on the operating table.Is it time to curb the robot enthusiasm?Some doctors say yes, concerned that the "wow" factor and heavy marketing are behind the boost in use. They argue that there is not enough robust research showing that robotic surgery is at least as good or better than conventional surgeries.Many U.S. hospitals promote robotic surgery in patient brochures, online and even on highway billboards. Their aim is partly to attract business that helps pay for the costly robot.The da Vinci is used for operations that include removing prostates, gallbladders and wombs, repairing heart valves, shrinking stomachs and transplanting organs. Its use has grown worldwide, but the system is most popular in the United States."We are at the tip of the iceberg. What we thought was impossible 10 years ago is now commonplace," said Dr. Michael Stifelman, robotic surgery chief at New York University's Langone Medical Center.For surgeons, who control the robot while sitting at a computer screen, these operations can be less tiring. Plus robot hands don't shake. Advocates say patients sometimes have less bleeding and often are sent home sooner than with conventional laparoscopic surgeries and operations involving large incisions.But the Food and Drug Administration is looking into a spike in reported problems. Earlier this year, the FDA began surveying surgeons using the robotic system. The agency conducts such surveys of device use routinely, but FDA spokeswoman Synim Rivers said the reason for it now "is the increase in number of reports received" about da Vinci.Reports filed since early last year include at least five deaths.Whether there truly are more problems lately is uncertain. Rivers said she couldn't quantify the increase and that it may simply reflect more awareness among doctors and hospitals. Doctors aren't required to report such things; device makers and hospitals are.It could also reflect wider use. Last year there were 367,000 robot-assisted surgeries versus 114,000 in 2008, according to da Vinci's maker, Intuitive Surgical Inc. of Sunnyvale, Calif.Da Vinci is the company's only product, and it's the only robotic system cleared for soft-tissue surgery by the FDA. Other robotic devices are approved for neurosurgery and orthopedics, among other things.A search for the company's name in an FDA medical device database of reported problems brings up 500 events since Jan. 1, 2012. Many of those came from Intuitive Surgical. The reports include incidents that happened several years ago and some are duplicates. There's also no proof any of the problems were caused by the robot, and many didn't injure patients. Reports filed this year include:— A woman who died during a 2012 hysterectomy when the surgeon-controlled robot accidentally nicked a blood vessel.— A Chicago man who died in 2007 after spleen surgery.— A New York man whose colon was allegedly perforated during prostate surgery. Da Vinci's maker filed that report after seeing a newspaper article about it and said the doctor's office declined to provide additional information.— A robotic arm that wouldn't let go of tissue grasped during colorectal surgery on Jan. 14. "We had to do a total system shutdown to get the grasper to open its jaws," said the report filed by the hospital. The report said the patient was not injured.— A robotic arm hit a patient in the face during a hysterectomy. Intuitive Surgical filed the report and said it's not known if the patient was injured but that the surgeon decided to switch to an open, more invasive operation instead.Intuitive Surgical filed all but one of those reports.Complications can occur with any type of surgery, and so far it's unclear if they are more common in robotic operations. That's part of what the FDA is trying to find out.Intuitive Surgical disputes there's been a true increase in problems and says the rise reflects a change it made last year in the way it reports incidents.The da Vinci system "has an excellent safety record with over 1.5 million surgeries performed globally, and total adverse event rates have remained low and in line with historical trends," said company spokeswoman Angela Wonson.But an upcoming research paper suggests that problems linked with robotic surgery are underreported. They include cases with "catastrophic complications," said Dr. Martin Makary, a Johns Hopkins surgeon who co-authored the paper."The rapid adoption of robotic surgery ... has been done by and large without the proper evaluation," Makary said.The da Vinci system, on the market since 2000, includes a three- or four-armed robot that surgeons operate with hand controls at a computer system several feet from the patient. They see inside the patient's body through a tiny video camera attached to one of the long robot arms. The other arms are tipped with tiny surgical instruments.Robotic operations are similar to conventional laparoscopy, or "keyhole" surgery, which involves small incisions and camera-tipped instruments controlled by the surgeon's hands, not a robot.Almost 1,400 U.S. hospitals — nearly 1 out of 4 — have at least one da Vinci system. Each one costs about $1.45 million, plus $100,000 or more a year in service agreements.The most common robotic operations include prostate removal — about 85 percent of these in the U.S. are done with the robot. Da Vinci is often used for hysterectomies too, Wonson said.Makary says there's no justification for the big growth in robotic surgery, which he attributes to aggressive advertising by the manufacturer and hospitals seeking more patients.He led a study published in 2011 that found 4 in 10 hospitals promoted robotic surgery on their websites, often using wording from the manufacturer. Some of the claims exaggerated the benefits or had misleading, unproven claims, the study said.Stifelman, the Langone surgeon, said it makes sense for hospitals to promote robotic surgery and other new technology, but that doesn't mean it's the right option for all patients."It's going to be the responsibility of the surgeon ... to make sure the patient knows there are lots of options," and to discuss the risks and benefits, he said.His hospital expects to do more than 1,200 robotic surgeries this year, versus just 175 in 2008.For a few select procedures that require operating in small, hard-to-reach areas, robotic surgery may offer advantages, Makary said. Those procedures include head and neck cancer surgery and rectal surgery.Some surgeons say the robotic method also has advantages for weight-loss surgery on extremely obese patients, whose girth can make hands-on surgery challenging."At the console, the operation can be performed effectively and precisely, translating to superior quality," said Dr. Subhashini Ayloo, a surgeon at the University of Illinois Hospital & Health Sciences System in Chicago.Ayloo, who uses the da Vinci robot, last year began a study on the effectiveness of robotic obesity surgery in patients who need a kidney transplant. Some hospitals won't do transplants on obese patients with kidney failure because of the risks. In the study, robotic stomach-shrinking surgery and kidney transplants are done simultaneously. Patients who get both will be compared with a control group getting only robotic kidney transplants."We don't know the results, but so far it's looking good," Ayloo said.Aidee Diaz of Chicago was the first patient and was taken aback when told the dual operation would be done robotically."At first you would get scared. Everybody says, 'A robot?' But in the long run that robot does a lot of miracles," said Diaz, 36.She has had no complications since her operation last July, has lost 100 pounds and says her new kidney is working well.Lawsuits in cases that didn't turn out so well often cite inadequate surgeon training with the robot. These include a malpractice case that ended last year with a $7.5 million jury award for the family of Juan Fernandez, a Chicago man who died in 2007 after robotic spleen surgery. The lawsuit claimed Fernandez's surgeons accidentally punctured part of his intestines, leading to a fatal infection.The surgeons argued that Fernandez had a health condition that caused the intestinal damage, but it was the first robot operation for one of the doctors and using the device was overkill for an ordinarily straightforward surgery, said Fernandez's attorney, Ted McNabola.McNabola said an expert witness told him it was like "using an 18-wheeler to go the market to get a quart of milk."Company spokesman Geoff Curtis said Intuitive Surgical has physician-educators and other trainers who teach surgeons how to use the robot. But they don't train them how to do specific procedures robotically, he said, and it's up to hospitals and surgeons to decide "if and when a surgeon is ready to perform robotic cases."A 2010 New England Journal of Medicine essay by a doctor and a health policy analyst said surgeons must do at least 150 procedures to become adept at using the robotic system. But there is no expert consensus on how much training is needed.New Jersey banker Alexis Grattan did a lot of online research before her gallbladder was removed last month at Hackensack University Medical Center. She said the surgeon's many years of experience with robotic operations was an important factor. She also had heard that the surgeon was among the first to do the robotic operation with just one small incision in the belly button, instead of four cuts in conventional keyhole surgery."I'm 33, and for the rest of my life I'm going to be looking at those scars," she said.The operation went smoothly. Grattan was back at work a week later.
NEW YORK (AP) — A government study found that states in Appalachia and the South had the highest average number of antibiotic prescriptions per person. One theory is that the region has more diabetes and people with that condition tend to have more infections.The study reported the number of antibiotic prescriptions per person for 2010.
NEW YORK (AP) — U.S. doctors are prescribing enough antibiotics to give them to 4 out of 5 Americans every year, an alarming pace that suggests they are being overused, a new government study finds.Overuse is one reason antibiotics are losing their punch, making infections harder to treat. The report released Wednesday gives the first detailed look at usage of these medicines in every state and finds it highest in the South and Appalachia."It sounds high," said Keith Rodvold, a professor of pharmacy practice at the University of Illinois at Chicago.There is no scientific consensus on an appropriate level of antibiotic prescribing. But some experts said the new study's results are disturbing, and that rates are probably excessive even in the states with the lowest antibiotic prescription levels.Antibiotics have been commonly available since the 1940s, and have done wonders at saving patients with infections ranging from pneumonia to sexually spread diseases. But bacteria have increasingly gained the power to shrug off antibiotics.Experts say chances of resistance increase when antibiotics are not used long enough or are taken for the wrong reasons, allowing bacteria to survive and adapt. The Centers for Disease control and Prevention is tracking at least 20 strains of resistant bacteria.CDC researchers conducted the new study, analyzing a national prescription drug database for 2010. The findings are being published in Thursday's New England Journal of Medicine.Other studies have focused on antibiotic prescriptions for specific groups like Medicare patients. This is the first to look at it for all Americans.Doctors and other health care providers prescribed 258 million courses of antibiotics in 2010, for a population just shy of 309 million, the researchers found. That translates to 833 antibiotic prescriptions for every 1,000 people, on average.But rates were much higher in West Virginia, Kentucky and Tennessee, where about 1,200 were written for every 1,000 people. On the low end were Alaska, Oregon and California, where prescriptions were at or below 600. Earlier studies found similar geographic trends.One possibility: Southerners suffer more infections than people in other parts of the country.Southern states have the highest rates of obesity and diabetes, and diabetics tend to have more infections than other people, noted the CDC's Dr. Lauri Hicks, one of the study's authors."So some of that prescribing may be warranted," she said.During the swine flu pandemic of 2009 and 2010, the South saw more reports of illness than other parts of the country. Experts at the time said patients with flu-related pneumonia should be treated with both antiviral medicines and antibiotics to prevent all forms of deadly complications, Rodvold noted.The South also has higher rates of certain other respiratory infections, including bronchitis, according to a study last year by University of Pittsburgh researchers.And the CDC study found the most frequently prescribed antibiotic was azithromycin, which is commonly used for bronchitis symptoms. But that's a problem. Bronchitis is usually caused by a virus, and antibiotics like azithromycin don't work against viruses."Some of the prescribing may not be warranted," Hicks said.
African-Americans have a slightly higher risk of Alzheimer's disease than people of largely European ancestry, but there is no major genetic difference that could account for the slight excess risk, new research shows.The results are from one of the only large studies ever done on Alzheimer's in African-Americans. Researchers identified the same gene variants in older African-Americans that they had found in older people of European ancestry. But they found that African-Americans with Alzheimer's disease were slightly more likely to have one gene, ABCA7, that is thought to confer risk for the disease.Another gene, APoE4, long known to increase Alzheimer's risk in older white people, was present in about the same proportion of African-Americans with Alzheimer's as it is in people of European ancestry.The researchers' paper was published online on Tuesday in The Journal of the American Medical Association. In an accompanying editorial, Dr. Robert L. Nussbaum of the University of California, San Francisco, noted that finding ABCA7 and APoE4 in African-Americans as well as those of European ancestry "strengthens the case" that the genes are important in conferring susceptibility to the disease.John Hardy, an Alzheimer's researcher at University College London and a discoverer of the first gene mutation found to cause Alzheimer's, applauded the effort to study minorities. But, he said, because the data confirmed what was already known among those of European descent, "I don't think they tell us much new."The data for the analysis came from nearly 6,000 African-Americans who were over age 60 and had participated in studies at 18 medical centers. About 2,000 had Alzheimer's disease, and the rest, for comparison, did not. Dr. Richard Mayeux of Columbia University was the lead author of the study.The researchers calculated that ABCA7 increased Alzheimer's risk by about 80 percent in African-Americans, compared with about 10 percent to 20 percent in people of European ancestry. Those are considered modest increases; a gene that carries a significant risk would increase the chances of getting a disease by well over 200 percent. And ABCA7 was not very common, still leaving most Alzheimer's risk unexplained. About 9 of every 100 African-Americans with Alzheimer's had the gene, compared with 6 out of 100 who did not have the disease.Dr. Hardy cautioned that the difference in risk between African-Americans and those of European ancestry who had ABCA7 was unlikely to be meaningful. It is to be expected that genetic links that are tenuous, like that with ABCA7, would be more significant in some studies and less in others, simply because populations, purely by chance, would vary slightly, he explained.Even before this study, researchers had been working on the assumption that ABCA7 has something to do with Alzheimer's disease. The gene is involved in facilitating the movement of cholesterol in and out of cells and is thought to play a role in the development of heart disease, too. That suggests, Dr. Mayeux said, that it might not be coincidence that many people get both Alzheimer's and cardiovascular disease.ABCA7 also moves proteins through the membranes that encase cells. One of the proteins it transports is a precursor of beta amyloid, the major component in the brain plaques found in Alzheimer's disease. In studies with mice, Dr. Mayeux said, disabling ABCA7 results in an accumulation of amyloid in the brain.But, he said, the gene's function is not well understood. "We don't know the mechanism for amyloid accumulation," Dr. Mayeux said. The current understanding of ABCA7 "is just not there yet."
WASHINGTON (AP) — Federal health officials say the parents of premature babies enrolled in a study of oxygen treatment several years ago weren't properly informed of the risks: a kind of blindness or death.Oxygen has been a mainstay of treatment for very premature babies. But too much has long been known to cause a kind of blindness called retinopathy of prematurity, and too little can increase risk of death. The study in question enrolled 1,300 babies at 23 hospitals between 2005 and 2009, to hunt the best dose somewhere in between.Standard practice at that time was to use a particular range of oxygen, and researchers in the study, funded by the National Institutes of Health, randomly assigned babies to receive either the low end or the high end of that range.The study's stated intent was to determine how much oxygen minimized the chances of blindness without increasing the risks of other problems including death or brain damage. The problem: The informed consent document that parents had to sign to enroll didn't spell out those risks, according to the government's Office for Human Research Protections.In a letter to the University of Alabama at Birmingham, which led the study, the government agency concluded the research had violated regulations requiring that patients be fully informed of the risks of a clinical trial. The March 7 letter, which was publicized Wednesday by the consumer advocacy group Public Citizen, asked the university to take steps to ensure consent forms in future studies outline all the risks.In a statement, university's vice president for research Richard Marchase said although slightly more babies who received lower-dose oxygen in the study died, those death rates still were lower than was usual for premature babies getting standard care at the time.But, "we will ensure that any future consent form clearly delineates risks to all arms of a study as completely as possible, including studies in which all arms are operating within the accepted standard of clinical care," Marchase wrote.
WASHINGTON (AP) — Federal health officials say the parents of premature babies enrolled in a study of oxygen treatment several years ago weren't properly informed of the risks: a kind of blindness or death.Oxygen has been a mainstay of treatment for very premature babies. But too much has long been known to cause a kind of blindness called retinopathy of prematurity, and too little can increase risk of death. The study in question enrolled 1,300 babies at 23 hospitals between 2005 and 2009, to hunt the best dose somewhere in between.Standard practice at that time was to use a particular range of oxygen, and researchers in the study, funded by the National Institutes of Health, randomly assigned babies to receive either the low end or the high end of that range.The study's stated intent was to determine how much oxygen minimized the chances of blindness without increasing the risks of other problems including death or brain damage. The problem: The informed consent document that parents had to sign to enroll didn't spell out those risks, according to the government's Office for Human Research Protections.In a letter to the University of Alabama at Birmingham, which led the study, the government agency concluded the research had violated regulations requiring that patients be fully informed of the risks of a clinical trial. The March 7 letter, which was publicized Wednesday by the consumer advocacy group Public Citizen, asked the university to take steps to ensure consent forms in future studies outline all the risks.In a statement, university's vice president for research Richard Marchase said although slightly more babies who received lower-dose oxygen in the study died, those death rates still were lower than was usual for premature babies getting standard care at the time.But, "we will ensure that any future consent form clearly delineates risks to all arms of a study as completely as possible, including studies in which all arms are operating within the accepted standard of clinical care," Marchase wrote.
A tiny magnetic bracelet implanted at the base of the throat is greatly improving life for some people with chronic heartburn who need more help than medicine can give them.It's a novel way to treat severe acid reflux, which plagues millions of Americans and can raise their risk for more serious health problems.It happens when a weak muscle doesn't close after swallowing as it should. That lets stomach juices splash back into the throat. Drugs like Nexium and Prilosec reduce acid. But they don't fix the underlying problem, called GERD, or gastroesophageal reflux disease.Rodd Foster had it so bad he used to sleep sitting up to keep his dinner down. Tricia Carr worried she would develop complications like the one that killed her mother.Both Californians got help from the new device, approved a year ago by the federal Food and Drug Administration and also sold in Europe.The treatment was "life-changing," said Foster, a 61-year-old plumbing contractor from Canyon Country, Calif. "It's been 30 years since I've been able to eat normally and now I can eat anything anytime."The Linx device, made by Torax Medical Inc., of St. Paul, Minn., is a ring of titanium beads with magnets inside. Doctors place it around the weak muscle at the base of the esophagus in a half-hour operation using a scope and "keyhole" incisions in the belly. The ring reinforces the weak muscle to keep it closed, yet is flexible and expands to let food pass when someone swallows. The ring comes in multiple sizes; it is about a half-inch in diameter and expands to about 1.5 inches. People don't feel it once it is implanted.The device costs $5,000; the operation can run $12,000 to $20,000 depending on hospital charges, said Dr. John Lipham, a surgeon who offers it at the University of Southern California and at Hoag Memorial Hospital Presbyterian in Newport Beach. Many insurers cover it for patients who are not helped enough by antacid medicines."It is a clever device," said another doctor who has used it — Dr. Donald Castell, a gastroenterologist at the Medical University of South Carolina in Charleston. The magnets "just bolster a little bit the pressure that is normally there" and help seal off the stomach juices, he said.Both doctors consult for Torax. A third expert with no financial ties to the company — Dr. Daniel DeMarco of Baylor University Medical Center in Dallas — said early results with the device have been "very impressive." But only time will tell if they hold up for many years, he said.As many as 20 million Americans have GERD. It's not just a quality-of-life issue: Chronic acid reflux can raise the risk of a condition called Barrett's esophagus, which in turn can raise the risk of throat cancer."No one doubts that reflux should be treated," but most people get enough relief from acid-lowering medicines, said Dr. Brian Reid. He's director of the Barrett's esophagus program at Fred Hutchinson Cancer Research Center in Seattle."You're having a wonderful time and all of a sudden it hurts. It's horrible," she said. Her mother had a serious complication from chronic reflux — lung scarring that led to her death. "So I really was anxious about having my GERD fixed," Carr said.Lipham gave a presentation on the device at a staff training session at Hoag, the Newport Beach hospital where Carr works."After his talk I went right over to him and said, 'I need one of those things,'" she said. The device, which she received in October at the USC hospital in Los Angeles, "completely fixed it immediately," she said of her reflux.A side benefit: She eats more slowly and chews her food more to avoid swallowing problems that some people have right after surgery. And she said that has helped her drop 10 pounds.Lipham and other doctors recently published a study of the device in 100 patients in the New England Journal of Medicine. All had had reflux for at least 10 years and were getting worse despite using antacids.After having the magnetic ring implanted, acid measured in their throats greatly decreased. Quality of life improved substantially for 92 percent, and within one year, 86 percent no longer needed acid-lowering medicines.The most frequent side effect was difficulty swallowing, which occurred in 68 percent of patients right after surgery. That dropped to 11 percent after one year and 4 percent after three years.Six of the 100 had to have the device removed. In three it was because swallowing problems persisted. Other problems prompted removal in the others.The device is available so far in 24 states.
A federal agency has found that a number of prestigious universities failed to tell more than a thousand families in a government-financed study of oxygen levels for extremely premature babies that the risks could include increased chances of blindness or death.None of the families have yet been notified of the findings from the Office for Human Research Protections, which safeguards people who participate in government-financed research. But the agency's conclusions were listed in great detail in a letter last month to the University of Alabama at Birmingham, the lead site in the study. In all, 23 academic institutions took part, including Stanford, Duke and Yale.The letter stated that the study did have an effect on which infants died and which developed blindness, and that those risks were not properly communicated to the parents, depriving them of information needed to decide whether to participate.The 1,300 infants who participated in the study, which took place between 2004 and 2009, and whose results were published in The New England Journal of Medicine in 2010, were born at just 24 to 27 weeks of gestation, a very high-risk category that is already prone to death and eye disease.Babies assigned to a high-oxygen group were more likely to develop eye disease and blindness, the letter said, and babies assigned to a low-oxygen group were more likely to die. Ultimately, 130 babies out of 654 in the low-oxygen group died, and 91 babies out of 509 in the high-oxygen group developed an eye ailment that in serious cases can lead to blindness.The letter said that "the researchers had sufficient available information to know, before conducting the study, that participation might lead to differences in whether an infant survived, or developed blindness, in comparison to what might have happened to a child had that child not been enrolled in the study."The risk the consent form did mention was far less significant: abrasion of the infants' skin by an oxygen monitoring device. It also said there was a possible benefit to participating — a decreased need for eye surgery depending on the group the infant was assigned to.Richard B. Marchase, vice president for research at the University of Alabama at Birmingham, said in a telephone interview that the study kept the infants within the standard band of treatment for oxygen levels — 85 to 95 percent — and that its findings would help inform a discussion by the American Academy of Pediatrics this year about standards for oxygen levels.But the federal office critical of the consent process said in its letter that the risks of participating in the trial "were not the same as those receiving standard care." The office stated that the consent form should have explained that "there is significant evidence from past research indicating that the oxygen provided to an infant can have an important effect on many outcomes including whether the infant becomes blind, develops a serious brain injury or even possibly whether the infant dies."The consent forms were written by researchers at the University of California, San Diego, a spokesman for the University of Alabama at Birmingham said, and were approved by the review boards of all 23 institutions in the study. It was financed by the National Institutes of Health.Dr. Marchase said he had assured the office that in the future, "we will to the best of our ability let the subjects or their parents know as thoroughly as possible what previous studies suggest in terms of risk." He added, "We are going to be very sensitive to that going forward as we look at these consent forms."He said that a similar group of infants born around the same time in the same hospitals who did not participate in the study, but were eligible, died at higher rates than those in the low-oxygen group. Those infants were not a control group in the study, but were similar to those in the study group, he said; they had a 24 percent mortality rate, compared with a 20 percent mortality rate for the infants in the low-oxygen group.But Michael Carome, a physician who is the deputy director of the health research group at Public Citizen, a consumer advocacy organization, which brought the letter to the attention of the news media on Wednesday, pointed out that a study in Pediatrics in 2012 that looked closely at the two groups determined that the infants who did not participate, or were not chosen, were in worse health, and therefore more prone to die."To try to retrospectively make comparisons like this is very fraught because of the difference in the populations," he said. "That's not a valid way of doing science."Dr. Marchase replied that the conclusions of the Pediatrics study "are not universally accepted among those who know the field best."
Anyone in the United States who wants to know if she has mutations in two breast cancer genes has little choice of where to be tested. One company alone has patents on the genes, and that company pretty much controls the market.On Monday, the Supreme Court will take up the issue of whether companies can own patents on genes. But there is another issue, often overlooked, that might make the patent question beside the point. No matter which way the patent decision goes, the company, Myriad Genetics, will still own the largest database that tells patients what various mutations mean.With 17 years of experience, millions of tests looking for thousands of mutations in the genes, and a $500 million investment, the company was able to amass a huge database that tells which DNA changes increase cancer risk and by how much, and which are inconsequential blips in DNA. And it is keeping that data to itself.Some genetics researchers are furious and have now figured out a way to get the data anyway. Every time Myriad sends out a report on a gene test, it specifies not just the mutations it found but also what they mean. As a result, Myriad's data on each of the mutations is scattered in millions of reports in the hands of doctors and patients. If the geneticists could just gather those reports, they say, they can recreate Myriad's database.So they started a grass-roots project, Sharing Clinical Reports, and are asking cancer clinics and doctors to provide them with all the Myriad data they have from patients who have been tested.None of the data have names of patients or other identifiers, so confidentiality is not an issue, advocates say. But their task is huge because the amount of data needed is vast. The project's leader, Dr. Robert L. Nussbaum, chief of the division of genomic medicine at the University of California, San Francisco, estimates that with about 1,000 mutations collected so far, he has only about 1.5 percent of what Myriad has."Myriad is probably laughing at me, saying, 'Here is this little flea,' " Dr. Nussbaum said.The story began in 1996, when Myriad got patents on the two isolated DNA molecules known as the BRCA1 and BRCA2 genes and provided a test to determine if the genes carried mutations. The company realized, though, that it would be crucial to figure out how risky each mutation was.That sort of analysis requires linking the mutations to people's cancer history. Obtaining that data is a momentous project, said Mark Capone, president of Myriad Genetic Laboratories, a wholly owned Myriad subsidiary. In 1996, the company classified 40 percent of mutations as being of uncertain significance because it did not have enough information to know what they meant. By 2004, the figure was down to 20 percent. Now it is just 3 percent.Mr. Capone explained how the work is done. The company finds a mutation and is not certain what it means. To find out, it needs to see the same mutation in at least 20 other people, asking whether they had cancer and, if so, what type. So Myriad offers free testing to other family members to get more information.Until 2004, Myriad posted its data on a site for researchers. But, Mr. Capone said, the company became aware of problems with the way its data were being used. For example, he said, the person running the database part time updated it only every couple of months. And the database included risk estimates submitted by laboratories all over the world, not just by Myriad."We might classify a mutation one way, and someone else might call it something different," Mr. Capone said. That is fine if the data were being used as intended — for research purposes only. But instead, they were being used to tell patients their cancer risk and to make major medical decisions.Myriad's database, Mr. Capone said, is highly regulated. "We can only use our database to provide clinical results for patients who had their genes sequenced in our lab," he said. So, he said, when the company became aware of how the research database was being used, "we had to act — we didn't have any choice."Dr. Nussbaum does not buy that argument. "The Myriad approach is a big black box," he said. "It's a 'trust us, we know best' approach." And, he said, "it is contrary to the public health."One thing it does is preclude independent second opinions, said Sherri Bale, managing director of GeneDX, a gene testing company working with Dr. Nussbaum. Yet the consequences of some mutations are so dire that women may have their breasts and ovaries removed to protect themselves from cancer. "You are going to remove my breasts, you are going to remove my ovaries? Let me ask one other person," Dr. Bale said.Myriad disagrees, though, saying it has licensed to LabCorp the ability to independently use its technology to search for mutations. Myriad then uses its data to say what the mutations mean.But having one company control the data for genes is contrary to the way medicine is developing, said Heidi Rehm, a Harvard geneticist who also is working with Dr. Nussbaum.
CHICAGO (AP) — The distressing nonstop crying in babies with colic is often blamed on tummy trouble, but a new study says the problem could be linked with migraine headaches in at least some infants.Children and teens treated for migraine headaches at three hospitals in Italy and France were much more likely than other kids to have had colic in infancy. The link has been suggested in other research, and if it can be proven, it could offer new hope for treating colic, the researchers said."Infantile colic causes pain in babies and high levels of stress in parents. Preventive therapies for migraine could therefore be an option in the future," said study co-author Dr. Luigi Titomanlio, chief of a pediatric migraine clinic at Robert Debre Hospital in Paris.More research is needed to prove any link between colic and migraines, and Titomanlio said studies would need to be done before anyone would recommend using migraine treatments for babies' colic.The study appears in Wednesday's Journal of the American Medical Association.Among about 200 children and teens who got emergency treatment for migraines in the study, 73 percent had colic as infants, versus 27 percent of children in a control group. That group — 471 kids — got emergency treatment for minor trauma and had no history of recurrent headaches.An editorial in JAMA calls it important research and says if colic really is an early form of migraines that might explain why digestive treatments typically don't help colic.Definitive causes are uncertain for both colic and migraines.Roughly 20 percent of U.S. infants have colic — intense crying spells lasting more than three hours a day, at least three days a week, for more than three weeks in an otherwise healthy baby. It usually starts a few weeks after birth. The symptoms are sometimes blamed on digestive problems including gas but experts say the true cause is unknown.Migraine headaches are rare in very young children but by middle-school and teen years as many as 10 percent or more experience them.The throbbing headaches are thought to be inherited and may be caused by some sort of irritation in nerve cells in the brain interacting with brain blood vessels.The researchers said it could be that colic is caused by similar changes in nerves and blood vessels in the gut.The study supports the idea that colic "may be an early life manifestation of migraine," said Dr. Amy Gelfand, a neurologist at the University of California, San Francisco's Headache Center. Her own research, published last year, found that infants whose mothers had migraines were more than twice as likely as other babies to have colic.She noted that Tylenol is sometimes used to treat migraines in children, and pain in infants, but said whether it works for colic should be studied.Janelle Valore of Mount Joy, Pa., said she was intrigued by the results. Her mother, sister and cousins all have migraines and were colicky as babies. Valore was spared both, but her 5-month-old daughter, Alena, just got over a nearly three-month bout with colic, and now she wonders if the baby will develop migraines later on."I always thought it was gas," but treatments designed to relieve gas and tummy upsets didn't work for her baby, Valore said.She said her daughter would cry day and night "and I'd cry right along with her."
On Monday, an influential panel of experts said that the answer is yes, but only for certain women who are at increased risk because of breast cancer in the family or a personal history of breast lumps or other problems. Two drugs, tamoxifen and raloxifene, can lower the risk, and may be worth taking even though both can have serious adverse effects like blood clots and strokes, the experts said.The panel, the United States Preventive Services Task Force, recommended that for healthy women ages 40 to 70, doctors help assess the odds of breast cancer and offer to prescribe one of the drugs for patients whose risk is above average — but only if their chances of developing blood clots and strokes is low.Because of the adverse effects, the panel also advised that the drugs not be prescribed for women unless they are at increased risk of breast cancer."There is evidence of benefit for certain women," said Dr. Wanda K. Nicholson, a task force member and an associate professor of obstetrics and gynecology at the University of North Carolina School of Medicine in Chapel Hill.Dr. Nicholson said she recommended the drugs for some of her own higher-risk patients. Some take them; some choose not to."The take-home point for women is to have that initial conversation with their provider," she said.The task force recommendations are being published in draft form and are open for public comment until May 13. An analysis of research on which the recommendations were based was also being published in Annals of Internal Medicine. The advice matches that given by the task force in 2002 (the group re-evaluates many of its subjects once a decade), though the earlier report stopped short of telling doctors to offer to prescribe the drugs. Members of the group said they relied on a wealth of new data that helped confirm and clarify the risks and benefits of the two drugs, and how they measure up against one another.Tamoxifen and raloxifene have been recommended for years for women whose odds of developing breast cancer are higher than average. Both drugs block the effects of estrogen, and can lower the risk of the type of breast cancer whose growth is stimulated by the hormone. About 75 percent of breast cancers fall into that category. Tamoxifen is more commonly used to prevent recurrences in women who have already had breast cancer, and raloxifene is most often prescribed to prevent fractures in women with osteoporosis. Tamoxifen can also decrease the risk of fractures.Doctors may see these drugs as a rare opportunity to lower the risk of cancer, but some women see them as simply trading one risk for another. Many healthy women, even if they are at increased risk, refuse the drugs, asking why they should take pills to lower the odds of a disease they may never get anyway, especially when the drugs can have dangerous or unpleasant side effects.Besides increasing the risk of blood clots and strokes, the drugs can also cause hot flashes and vaginal problems like dryness and pain that can damage a woman's sex life. In addition, tamoxifen can lead to cataracts and uterine cancer.In the United States, 232,000 new cases of breast cancer are expected this year, and about 40,000 women will die from the disease.The group estimated that among 1,000 women with an increased risk of breast cancer, there would be 23.5 cases of invasive breast cancer over five years. If the women took one of the drugs, 7 to 9 cases would be prevented over five years.But an extra 4 to 7 women per 1,000 taking the drugs would develop blood clots during that time, and there would be 4 extra cases of uterine cancer per 1,000 women taking tamoxifen — an approximate doubling of both of those risks. Women who had surgery to remove the uterus would not have to worry about that type of cancer.The task force considered a woman likely to benefit from the drugs if her odds of developing breast cancer during the next five years were 3 percent or higher. One common method of estimating the risk uses an online tool that asks a series of questions about the patient's health and family history. It calculates her risk, and compares it to the average for women of that age.At age 40 the average woman has a 0.6 percent risk of developing breast cancer over the next five years; at age 50, 1.3 percent; at age 60, 1.8 percent; at age 70, 2.2 percent. Plugging risk factors into the calculator, like mothers or sisters with breast cancer, or a personal history of breast biopsies, makes the risk go up.But experts warn that although these estimates can be useful in predicting the risk for large populations, they do not work very well for individuals.The report from the task force states: "Most women identified as 'high risk' will not develop breast cancer, and the majority of breast cancer cases will arise in women who are not identified as having increased risk." The group also noted that the type of risk calculator generally used is not recommended for women with mutations in BRCA genes, which greatly increase the risk of breast cancer.Dr. Heidi Nelson, a research professor at Oregon Health and Science University in Portland, Oregon, led a team that analyzed several large controlled studies. They found that the drugs could reduce the incidence of invasive cancer by 30 percent to 68 percent, compared with placebos. A new finding is that tamoxifen had a greater protective effect than raloxifene. But it was more likely to cause blood clots. Women over 50 were more likely to develop blood clots from the drugs, or uterine cancer while taking tamoxifen.Dr. Nelson noted that some studies found women would be more willing to take the drugs if they could prevent breast cancer entirely, rather than just lowering the risk, or if the drugs had no side effects.One thing that might help doctors and patients, she said, is to keep in mind that the adverse effects were more common in older women. In addition, she said, younger women who had had biopsies showing a condition called atypical hyperplasia did seem to be at added risk and might be among the best candidates for taking the drugs. She said the data suggested that a five-year course of treatment could have protective effects that would continue even when the drugs were stopped.
Hospitals make money from their own mistakes because insurers pay them for the longer stays and extra care that patients need to treat surgical complications that could have been prevented, a new study finds.Changing the payment system, to stop rewarding poor care, may help to bring down surgical complication rates, the researchers say. If the system does not change, hospitals have little incentive to improve: in fact, some will wind up losing money if they take better care of patients.The study and an editorial were published Tuesday in The Journal of the American Medical Association. The study authors are from the Boston Consulting Group, Harvard's schools of medicine and public health, and Texas Health Resources, a large nonprofit hospital system.The study is based on a detailed analysis of the records of 34,256 people who had surgery in 2010 at one of 12 hospitals run by Texas Health Resources. Of those patients, 1,820 had one or more complications that could have been prevented, like blood clots, pneumonia or infected incisions.The median length of stay for those patients quadrupled to 14 days, and hospital revenue averaged $30,500 more than for patients without complications ($49,400 versus $18,900). Private insurers paid far more for complications than did Medicare or Medicaid, or patients who paid out of pocket.The authors said in an interview that they were not suggesting that hospitals were trying to make money by deliberately causing complications or refusing to address the problem."Absolutely not," said David Sadoff, a managing director of the Boston Consulting Group. "We don't believe that is happening at all."But, he said, the current payment system makes it difficult for hospitals to perform better because improvements can wind up costing them money.Susan Pisano, a spokeswoman for America's Health Insurance Plans, a trade group for insurance companies, said in an interview that the study illustrated that the entire health care system needed to move away from what she called "the perverse incentives of the old fee-for-service system that emphasized quantity over quality, and toward methods of payment that reward better care."The researchers say that to help reduce complications, insurers not only should quit paying for substandard care, but also should reward excellent care with bonuses. In addition, hospitals should be required to disclose their complication rates, because patients will shun those with high rates and force those hospitals to improve or shut down.Dr. Barry Rosenberg, an author and a managing director of Boston Consulting, said the study came about because his firm was working with Texas Health Resources to find ways to reduce its hospitals' surgical complication rates, which, at 5.3 percent, were in line with those reported by similar hospitals. Part of that work involved analyzing the costs, and he said the team was stunned to realize that lowering the complication rates would actually cost the hospital money."We said, 'Whoa, we're working our tails off trying to lower complications, and the prize we're going to get is a reduction in profits,' " Dr. Rosenberg said in an interview.The authors focused on one particular figure, called the contribution margin, which is an important measure of a hospital's income and ability to cover its costs. They said that when complications occurred, this measure tripled for patients with private insurance and doubled for those on Medicare.Dr. Mark C. Lester, a study author and the executive vice president of Texas Health Resources, said its hospitals had begun to use a checklist system to help prevent complications. Dr. Atul A. Gawande, a Harvard surgeon who is a pioneer in using checklists and who took part in the Texas study, helped develop the system. Surgical checklists involve deceptively simple-sounding practices like double-checking the patient's identification and what part of the body is being operated on, and making sure that drug allergies have been noted and proper medications given.Dr. Lester said it was not clear how low the complication rate could or should go. Zero would be great, but was not realistic, he said.As to whether the hospital would lose money if more patients needed less care and went home sooner after surgery, Dr. Lester said, "to us that doesn't have an impact.""Reducing complications and increasing safety is why we're there," he said. "If in doing that, some payments don't come our way, it's not of consequence. What's of consequence is that people who come to us are in a safer environment."Dr. Robert M. Wachter, an expert on medical errors who was not involved in the study, said in an e-mail that Medicare and other payers had tried to encourage better care by refusing to pay for certain kinds of medical errors and cutting reimbursement if too many patients were readmitted or gave the hospital bad marks on patient-satisfaction surveys. But the new study "shows that we still have miles to go," said Dr. Wachter, the associate chairman of the department of medicine at the University of California, San Francisco.Ms. Pisano, of the health insurance group, said Medicare and private insurers were already using a "never list" of things they will not pay for, like leaving a sponge or instrument inside a patient, or operating on the wrong organ or wrong limb.In an editorial, Uwe E. Reinhardt, an expert on medical economics from Princeton University, called the study's findings "troublesome but not surprising." He called the current payment system "untoward," adding that it "can tempt otherwise admirable people into dubious conduct."
NEW YORK (AP) — Bacteria commonly linked to raw milk and poultry is causing more and more food poisonings, health officials said Thursday.Cases of campylobacter grew by 14 percent over the last five years, a government study found.The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention report was based on foodborne infections in only 10 states — about 15 percent of the American population. But it is seen as a good indicator of food poisoning trends — the CDC refers to it as "the nation's annual food safety report card."Overall, food poisonings held fairly steady in recent years. There were no significant jumps in cases from most other food bugs, including salmonella and E. coli. But campylobacter rose, and last year accounted for more than a third of food poisoning illnesses in those states and about a 10th of the deaths.Health officials said it's not clear why campylobacter cases have increased, or which food or foods was the source of most of the added illnesses.The study had another piece of bad news: there were jumps in illness caused by a group of bacteria called vibrio, which are associated with shellfish. There were fewer than 200 vibrio cases reported last year, but that's a 43 percent increase from about five years ago.The CDC report focused on only nine types of food germs, and counted only cases that were lab confirmed. Investigators tallied about 20,000 such cases and 68 deaths in those 10 states. It compared 2012 statistics to reports in the years 2006 through 2008.Many illnesses never get reported. The CDC estimates that as many as 48 million Americans get sick from contaminated food each year.
NEW YORK (AP) — As people lay badly bleeding in the smoke of the Boston Marathon bombings, rescuers immediately turned to a millennia-old medical device to save their lives — the tourniquet.Using belts, shirts and other materials, they tied off bleeding limbs in fast-acting bids to prevent major blood loss, shock and death. Such fast work no doubt saved many lives, doctors at Boston area hospitals said.So it's interesting to note that if this had happened a decade ago, many emergency responders might have avoided the tourniquet. As recently as the early 2000s, the tourniquet was still enmeshed in a longstanding controversy about whether they were more trouble than they were worth."Some people saw them as lifesaving, and others said they were the instrument of the devil," said Dr. John F. Kragh Jr., an orthopedic surgeon with the U.S. Army's Institute of Surgical Research in Texas.Although tourniquets have been used to stem blood loss since at least the time of the Roman Empire, modern military surgeons had grown to doubt it. There were no good studies proving their benefit. And there was a common belief that some tourniquets could do more harm than good, cutting off blood and oxygen to limbs and resulting in amputations."There are a number of ways to mess it up," said Kragh, who is a leading researcher on methods to control bleeding. Sometimes tourniquets were not tight enough, causing bleeding to actually get worse. Some were not wide enough.In Vietnam, tourniquets were not often used because it was thought they led to many amputations, said Dr. Kevin Kirk, an Army lieutenant colonel who is chief orthopedic surgeon at San Antonio Military Medical Center.That's because tourniquets often were placed too high above the injury, leading to loss of tissue that otherwise might be saved, he said. Now they are used lower. "A lot of lives and limbs have been saved by the use of a tourniquet," Kirk said.The American Red Cross came to call tourniquets a last resort for stemming severe bleeding.The dust settled only in the last decade, according to some experts, following publication of studies from the Iraq war by Kragh and others that showed tourniquets were clear-cut lifesavers. Those studies showed timely use of tourniquets could raise survival rates as high as 90 percent, and tourniquets are now routinely issued to soldiers.However, some experts remain cautious. The Red Cross, for example, continues to worry that tourniquets may be used improperly or in situations when blood loss is not great enough to warrant their use."Clearly, if a leg is blown off, it's OK to go straight to tourniquet," said Dr. Richard Bradley, a member of the Red Cross's scientific advisory council.But the Red Cross continues to advise that direct pressure be applied to a wound in less extreme situations.Tourniquets should be at least 1½ inches wide, and pulled very tight, to properly shut off blood flow. Medical supply companies make tourniquets that do the job best.Bradley also stressed that it's important to use a real tourniquet if possible. News coverage of the Boston tragedy describes emergency responders using all sorts of things as makeshift tourniquets, including neck lanyards."Is a lanyard better than nothing? Probably," Bradley said. But other kinds of care, and rapid transport to hospitals, may have been at least as important as tourniquets, he added.Boston EMS began including tourniquets as standard equipment in recent years and they proved to be crucial on Monday, said Joseph Blansfield, Boston Medical Center's trauma program manager."Without a doubt, tourniquets were a difference-maker and saved lives," said Blansfield, who spent a year as chief nurse of a combat support hospital in Iraq. "Bleeding was able to be stanched and (patients) arrived in a better physiologic state and didn't require as much resuscitation as they otherwise would."EMS workers did much of the tourniquet work at the scene, but some improvisation was done by people with far less medical training. Monday's blasts injured at least 170 people near the finish line. Three spectators died and 13 people lost one or more limbs.Nicholas Yanni of Boston was with his wife and friends watching another friend cross the finish line when the explosion occurred. Yanni's wife had an injury to her lower left leg. Another woman with them had a leg injury, too. Yanni ducked into a nearby sports store for T-shirts that they tore to make a tourniquet.At Tufts Medical Center, surgeons fixed the smaller of the two bones in her lower left leg that was apparently shattered by shrapnel from the blast."My worst fear was that I could have lost my wife," Yanni said. "Other than that it was autopilot, adrenaline, chaos. There was a lot of just 'not-even-thinking,' sort of animalistic, you know, thought. What needs to be done, you do it."AP writers Rodrique Ngowi and Carla K. Johnson in Boston and Marilynn Marchione in Milwaukee contributed to this report.
WASHINGTON — The nation's infant mortality rate fell by 12 percent from 2005 through 2011, a promising pattern that researchers say may be due in part to a decline in premature births.The decline came after a period of stalled progress. Although the infant mortality rate dropped significantly over the 20th century, it remained static from 2000 to 2005, according to a report released Wednesday by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.By 2011, however, the rate had dropped to 6.05 deaths of babies less than 1 year old per 1,000 births, down from 6.87 in 2000. Some of the most striking improvements were in Southern states, which still have higher infant mortality rates than most of the country.The rate of infant deaths declined the most among black mothers — a drop of 16 percent from 2005 to 2011. Historically, infant mortality rates among black women have been more than twice those among white women."We are seeing a slight narrowing in the gap, and that's very encouraging," said Marian F. MacDorman, a senior statistician at the National Center for Health Statistics and an author of the report. "But the gap is still really big."The states with the steepest declines in infant deaths — Georgia, Louisiana, North Carolina and South Carolina — have long been plagued with some of the nation's highest infant mortality rates, Dr. MacDorman added. In all four states the rate dropped by more than 20 percent from 2005 to 2010, the latest year for which state data are available. The District of Columbia, which has expanded a home-visit program for poor pregnant women and stepped up other efforts to keep mothers and their babies healthy, saw the biggest drop: from 14.05 deaths per 1,000 births in 2005 to 7.86 in 2010.The states with the highest infant mortality rates are Mississippi and Alabama, according to the report. But even Mississippi saw its rate drop by 15 percent from 2005 to 2010.Dr. MacDorman said the nation's rate of premature births — babies born before 37 weeks of gestation — peaked at 12.8 percent in 2006 and had dropped every year since then. That is a likely factor in the decline of the infant mortality rate, she said. In 2009, the latest year for which C.D.C. data is available, two-thirds of all infant deaths in the United States were among preterm babies.Another possible factor is a recent emphasis on preventing planned early deliveries. A growing number of hospitals are not allowing mothers to schedule births before 39 weeks without a medical reason. In 2011, the March of Dimes started a public education campaign, Healthy Babies are Worth the Wait, to reduce medically unnecessary deliveries before 39 weeks of gestation. The Department of Health and Human Services began a similar effort, Strong Start, last year."It's been going on for a few years now and I think it has had an impact," Dr. MacDorman said of concerted efforts to discourage early deliveries. "It's maybe leading to just a little change in the culture."Infant mortality dropped in four of the five leading causes of death from 2005 to 2011: congenital malformations, short gestation/low birth weight, sudden infant death syndrome and maternal complications. The death rate from unintentional injuries rose slightly.The decline in deaths attributed to sudden infant death syndrome was particularly striking — the rate went down by 20 percent — but that could have resulted from changes in the way SIDS is diagnosed and reported, Dr. MacDorman said.While improving, the nation's infant mortality rate is still high compared with the rates in a number of other developed countries. In 2008, the United States ranked 27th in infant mortality among the 30 countries in the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development, according to the National Center for Health Statistics.Janice A. Freedman, executive director of the North Carolina Healthy Start Foundation, a nonprofit group focused on reducing infant death and illness, said that it was difficult to pinpoint reasons for the 20 percent drop in her state's infant mortality rate from 2005 to 2010, but that better education about preventing SIDS was probably one factor.At the same time, Ms. Freedman said she was concerned that state budget constraints would hamper continuing efforts to curb infant deaths."We are cutting budgets and so we are concerned that babies don't get lost in the politics," she said. "Numbers can bump up and down, and there are still racial disparities. So there's still a lot of work to be done."Dr. Kevin Ryan, chief of the women's and children's health section of the North Carolina Division of Public Health, said a particularly important goal was to improve the health of women before they become pregnant, focusing on diet, exercise and prevention of chronic diseases like diabetes."In years past, the key was access to early, high-quality prenatal care," Dr. Ryan said. "We're looking more and more at addressing the whole life cycle of girls and young women, not just focusing on the period of pregnancy. That's going to be critical to our success in continuing to improve birth outcomes."
Treating Those Injured in Boston Carnage: A conversation with Dr. R. Malcolm Smith, chief of orthopedic trauma service at Massachusetts General Hospital. Dr. Smith talks about treating the injured after the Boston Marathon Bombing Attack.BOSTON — For years, Dr. Michael J. Weaver, an orthopedic trauma surgeon, went to meetings of his professional society and heard surgeons from the military describe what they had learned treating blast injuries. Then he would return to his practice at Brigham and Women's Hospital in Boston, where he mostly treated people injured in auto accidents or falls.All that changed on Monday when victims of the bombings at the Boston Marathon arrived."We've seen similar injuries, but never of this magnitude," Dr. Weaver said. "This is completely different." The military experience, he added, "has been phenomenally helpful."But doctors said they had also prepared for a disaster, with regular drills. At Massachusetts General Hospital, for example, part of the emergency department's disaster preparedness included bins of special wristbands to identify disaster patients."We can't sit there and write names of patients" on wristbands, said Dr. R. Malcolm Smith, chief of the medical center's orthopedic trauma service. Instead, medical personnel in the emergency department slapped wristbands on patients that identified them with special disaster numbers. The bands said simply, Disaster Victim 001, Disaster Victim 002, and so on. Patients' names were added later.It turns out to be an art — and a delicate balancing act — to treat people with blast injuries that can pulverize muscle and rip blood vessels, that can drive pieces of metal into soft flesh and shatter bones. Trauma surgeons call it damage control, and say the military experience showed how important it is.The idea is not to try to solve all of a patient's medical problems at once, but instead to deal with the urgent and life-threatening ones immediately. Patients often have to return to the operating room again and again as their injuries are successively repaired.The first priority for those who were severely injured was to prevent them from dying, often from bleeding to death. Many had tourniquets on their legs when they arrived at the hospitals. But that was just a temporary measure to slow the bleeding. They needed immediate surgery to get their bleeding under control and prevent muscles and nerves from dying for lack of blood.That requires a vascular surgeon to repair the torn blood vessels and restore blood to legs and feet that may no longer have a blood supply. To do those repairs, surgeons often sew in part of a vein from the other leg, if it is uninjured, or from an arm. Or they use a synthetic tube.Meanwhile, an orthopedic surgeon must stabilize a bone that might be flopping because it is fractured in several places. Surgeons do that with a temporary solution — they drill into the bone from outside the leg and attach pins that they screw into a metal bar also outside the leg.Plastic surgeons clean the wound. In this case, blast victims had BBs or nails or debris embedded in their legs and feet. Everything the surgeons took out of the wounds was placed in plastic bags for the F.B.I., said Dr. Samuel J. Lin, a plastic surgeon at Beth Israel Deaconess Medical Center who helped care for blast victims."The crime scene extends to the hospital," Dr. Lin said.Patients then are sent back to intensive care or their hospital rooms for the next few days while doctors wait to assess the damage to muscles and nerves and blood vessels."With a blast injury in particular, we can't always be sure how widespread the soft tissue injury is," Dr. Smith said. Badly injured, dead tissue needs to be removed to avoid infection. And that may mean repeated visits to the operating room. But there are no other options."If we leave dead tissue in place, it gets infected," Dr. Smith said. And if the soft tissue dies, a leg might have to be amputated.The next priority is repairing soft tissue — muscle and nerves and skin. "Everything depends on soft tissue repair," Dr. Smith said. "If you don't have healthy soft tissue, bone will not survive." That means that plastic surgeons have to close what may be gaping wounds.Wound healing has been revolutionized by a vacuum device, Dr. Lin said. Patients with large wounds used to just be bandaged and have their dressings changed several times a day. Now, doctors put a black sponge over the wound, cover it with a thin sheet of plastic wrap, and attach it to a vacuum hose. Wounds heal faster, and patients are in less pain.A big advance, Dr. Weaver said, whose value was proved by the military, is taking tissue from smaller areas to close a large open wound. Surgeons used to take big chunks of muscle along with blood vessels from a person's abdomen or back and move it to the wound to repair the injury.Now, he said, they take much smaller pieces of tissue from places like the forearm or thigh. It means a smaller surgery and fewer complications.But uncertainty about the fate of soft tissue surrounding a wound can remain for days after a repair. If it dies, and if further attempts to trim the dead tissue and repair the wound fail, patients face amputations.When it comes time to repair shattered bones, orthopedists make use of stabilizing metal plates developed over the last decade or so that are vast improvements over earlier ones, Dr. Weaver said. They still have to attach the plates directly to the bone, where they will remain for the rest of the patient's life. But the new plates are designed to fit exactly against the shape of the bone, making the bone more stable."To restore the function of a knee or ankle, you have to put the pieces of bone together like a jigsaw puzzle," Dr. Weaver said.The military also greatly improved reconstruction, prosthetics, and rehabilitation for those who need amputations. Of course an amputation is still devastating, but now, with the improved prosthetics, many patients can walk, run and enjoy essentially normal lives, Dr. Weaver said.For many of the blast victims, the path to recovery will be long and arduous, with weeks in the hospital and rehabilitation lasting as long as a year. While bones can heal, patients may be left with stiffness from torn muscles, bad scars from the operations, and, if a joint was severely damaged, arthritis in it.The victims, Dr. Smith said, were mostly younger people who were watching the race. The blasts went off behind them, ripping the backs of their legs.Some know what they are facing in the months to come, Dr. Weaver said. But others, he added, do not. "Many who are critically ill in intensive care are still waking up," he said.
WASHINGTON — Fifteen-year-old Reilly woke up one morning with a sharp, stabbing pain in his left leg that soon spread to other parts of his body. The pain, which started early last year, forced him to quit soccer, and he spent the next four months being poked, prodded and scanned by doctors.The test results were inconclusive. "No one could tell him why he was in a ball on the floor unable to function," said Nina, his mother, who agreed to be interviewed only on the condition that the family's surname be withheld.Finally, last June, Dr. Sarah Rebstock, a pediatric anesthesiologist at Children's National Medical Center, gave Reilly a diagnosis of chronic regional pain syndrome. The nerve disorder is characterized by chronic and severe burning pain, pathological changes in bone and skin, excessive sweating, tissue swelling and extreme sensitivity to touch.Recently, Reilly stood in a half-lighted room of the hospital's new Pain Medicine Care Complex, playing a video game called TubeRunner as part of his physical therapy routine.The sight of the teenager reaching in the air and shuffling from side to side as his on-screen avatar hurled down an intergalactic tube racking up rings and gems seemed unremarkable. After all, game consoles like Microsoft's Xbox and Nintendo's Wii have become ubiquitous in American households, and many hospitals and clinics use them to add an element of fun to physical therapy.But TubeRunner is one of four of galaxy-themed video games created specifically for this complex, where pain specialists and game developers are piloting an approach to measuring pain. Dr. Julia Finkel hopes that using technical data from games and interactive activities to objectively identify and monitor pain can help determine how to evaluate the techniques used to treat it.Central to their effort to quantify pain, said Dr. Finkel, the chief of pain medicine here, is a squat, rectangular black box with three eyes peering up from below the screen. It was a Kinect, a motion sensor device that allows users to control games using gestures and spoken commands.More important for Dr. Finkel was the device's tracking of 24 points on Reilly's body in three dimensions, feeding data about his movements — angles, distance, speed, frequency — to a secure database. Custom software measures his heart rate and converts all of the data to graphics that a physical therapist can see on a tablet computer in real time."Since it's digital information, we can manipulate it, understand it, analyze it," Dr. Finkel said. "So from a research perspective, it's a treasure trove of information that would help us formulate new metrics in order to treat these patients."Danica Zimmerman, 14, saw more than 20 doctors for the burning pain that started last year in her right hand and quickly spread to her other limbs. Many of the doctors told her that the pain, which forced her to quit swimming and refuse hugs, was all in her head. She finally received a diagnosis of reflex sympathetic disorder, another name for chronic regional pain syndrome.As Danica walked around the complex recently, wearing smiley-faced pajama pants and attached to an IV containing ketamine, she stopped to play a game of Meteor Bounce.Dr. Rebstock, the director of the complex, said it was normal for her teenage patients to see a handful of doctors before getting the right diagnosis. The National Academies estimates that about 100 million adults in the United States suffer from chronic pain; hospital officials say that between a quarter and a half of children under 18 experience chronic pain lasting more than three months."Physicians don't often recognize pain as a pathology," Dr. Rebstock said. "And so patients end up seeing a lot of doctors trying to figure out what's wrong."The measures developed using the Kinect data could help reduce errors and could easily apply to pain treatment for adults, and even for other chronic conditions like autism, cancer and diabetes, Dr. Rebstock said.Microsoft released the Kinect for Windows last year as the company was encouraging researchers to explore health applications for the device, which was originally created for the Xbox game console.Using technical data to assess and treat pain could allow clinicians to replace current methods that Dr. Finkel said were trial and error. Current therapy relies on the patients and doctors to gauge pain by feelings and observations.
A group of Texas optometrists is lobbying the State Legislature for more power to negotiate contracts with health insurance companies, and the measure they are supporting could hit consumers' wallets, some business advocates say."The problem is that optometrists are just getting eaten up by insurance companies," said Dr. Thomas A. Lucas Jr., an optometrist and legislative chairman for the Texas Optometric Association. "It's very rare that the small-business optometrist has any say in what's actually in the contract."Senate Bill 632, by Senator John Carona, Republican of Dallas, would prohibit a common practice among insurers: contractually obligating optometrists to offer discounts on services and products that are not covered by the health plan, like a spare pair of glasses or cosmetic contact lenses that change eye color.The Senate approved the bill this month, and Representative J. M. Lozano, Republican of Kingsville, has agreed to sponsor the bill in the House.Kandice Sanaie, a lobbyist for the Texas Association of Business, argued that the restriction would mean that consumers would pay more for uncovered items. It could also raise insurance premiums, she said, if insurers began including uncovered services that were previously discounted in a health plan."There's nothing forcing providers to sign contracts with health insurance carriers in the first place," Ms. Sanaie testified last month at a legislative hearing on the bill.Optometrists who sign contracts with insurance networks, she added, receive client referrals from the insurer."Proposals to prohibit such offerings are anti-consumer, serving only to limit the ability of your constituents to obtain quality vision care at an affordable price," wrote a representative for America's Health Insurance Plans in a letter to Mr. Carona expressing the trade association's opposition to the bill. She added that the bill would reduce the number of employers who are able to provide vision coverage because of the increased costs.In 2011, Texas approved a similar law — also carried by Mr. Carona and Mr. Lozano — to prevent insurers from requiring discounted prices on uncovered dental services in contracts with dental providers.From 2011 to 2012, the Texas Optometric Association donated $15,000 to Mr. Carona and $3,000 to Mr. Lozano, according to a Texas Tribune analysis of campaign finance records.As dental and vision benefits are considered additions to health plans, they typically cover only basic preventive services to keep rates low and are subject to more stringent contract terms with health insurers, Dr. Lucas said. Insurers force doctors to offer discounts on uncovered products and services, he said, to make a health plan more attractive to consumers."All of that is borne onto the provider at a significant financial cost," Dr. Lucas said. When discounts are required on uncovered services, he said, optometrists raise rates. "Downstream, that hurts any consumer that is not covered by that policy," he said, "including the uninsured."
BOSTON (AP) — In a rebuttal to the terrorists and a tribute to stellar medical care, all of the more than 180 people injured in the Boston Marathon blasts one week ago who made it to a hospital alive now seem likely to survive.That includes several people who arrived with legs attached by just a little skin, a 3-year-old boy with a head wound and bleeding on the brain, and a little girl riddled with nails. Even a transit system police officer whose heart had stopped and was close to bleeding to death after a shootout with the suspects now appears headed for recovery."All I feel is joy," said Dr. George Velmahos, chief of trauma surgery at Massachusetts General Hospital, referring to his hospital's 31 blast patients. "Whoever came in alive, stayed alive."Three people did die in the blasts, but at the scene, before hospitals even had a chance to try to save them. A Massachusetts Institute of Technology police officer who police say was fatally shot Thursday by the suspects was pronounced dead when he arrived at Massachusetts General.The only person to reach a hospital alive and then die was one of the suspected bombers — 26-year-old Tamerlan Tsarnaev.But the remarkable, universal survival one week later of all others injured in the blasts is a testimonial to fast care at the scene, on the way to hospitals, then in emergency and operating rooms. Everyone played a part, from doctors, nurses and paramedics to strangers who took off belts to use as tourniquets and staunched bleeding with their bare hands.As of Monday, 51 people remained hospitalized, three of them in critical condition and five listed as serious. At least 14 people lost all or part of a limb; three of them lost more than one.Two children with leg injuries remain hospitalized at Boston Children's Hospital. A 7-year-old girl is in critical condition and 11-year-old Aaron Hern is in fair condition.The surviving bombing suspect, 19-year-old Dzhokhar Tsarnaev, is in serious condition at Beth Israel Deaconess Medical Center with a neck wound.
CHICAGO (AP) — Don't take the cinnamon challenge. That's the advice from doctors in a new report about a dangerous prank depicted in popular YouTube videos but which has led to hospitalizations and a surge in calls to U.S. poison centers.The fad involves daring someone to swallow a spoonful of ground cinnamon in 60 seconds without water. But the spice is caustic, and trying to gulp it down can cause choking, throat irritation, breathing trouble and even collapsed lungs, the report said.Published online Monday in Pediatrics, the report said at least 30 teens nationwide needed medical attention after taking the challenge last year.The number of poison control center calls about teens doing the prank "has increased dramatically," from 51 in 2011 to 222 last year, according to the American Association of Poison Control Centers."People with asthma or other respiratory conditions are at greater risk of having this result in shortness of breath and trouble breathing," according to an alert posted on the association's website.Thousands of YouTube videos depict kids attempting the challenge, resulting in an "orange burst of dragon breath" spewing out of their mouths and sometimes hysterical laughter from friends watching the stunt, said report co-author Dr. Steven E. Lipshultz, a pediatrics professor at the University of Miami Miller School of Medicine.Cinnamon is made from tree bark and contains cellulose fibers that don't easily break down. Animal research suggests that when cinnamon gets into the lungs, it can cause scarring, Lipshultz said.Dr. Stephen Pont, a spokesman for the American Academy of Pediatrics and an Austin, Texas pediatrician, said the report is "a call to arms to parents and doctors to be aware of things like the cinnamon challenge" and to pay attention to what their kids are viewing online.An Ypsilanti, Mich., teen who was hospitalized for a collapsed lung after trying the cinnamon challenge heartily supports the new advice and started her own website — http://nocinnamonchallenge.com — telling teens to "just say no" to the fad.Dejah Reed, 16, said she took the challenge four times — the final time was in February last year with a friend who didn't want to try it alone."I was laughing very hard and I coughed it out and I inhaled it into my lungs," she said. "I couldn't breathe."Her father, Fred Reed, said he arrived home soon after to find Dejah "a pale bluish color. It was very terrifying. I threw her over my shoulder" and drove to a nearby emergency room.Dejah was hospitalized for four days and went home with an inhaler and said she still has to use it when she gets short of breath from running or talking too fast. Her dad said she'd never had asthma or breathing problems before.Dejah said she'd read about the challenge on Facebook and other social networking sites and "thought it would be cool" to try.Now she knows "it's not cool and it's dangerous."
Electric fans growl like airplanes taking off and banks of green lights wink in a basement at Mount Sinai's medical school, where a new $3 million supercomputer makes quick work of huge amounts of genetic and other biological information.Just a couple of miles away, a competitor, Weill Cornell Medical College and NewYork-Presbyterian Hospital/Weill Cornell hospital are building a $650 million research tower. Across the street is a newly completed $550 million tower housing labs for another competitor, Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center.Major academic medical centers in New York and around the country are spending and recruiting heavily in what has become an arms race within the war on cancer. The investments are based on the belief that the medical establishment is moving toward the routine sequencing of every patient's genome in the quest for "precision medicine," a course for prevention and treatment based on the special, even unique characteristics of the patient's genes.Among other projects, Harvard Medical School has its Center for Biomedical Informatics, which among a broad array of approaches uses mathematical modeling to predict when genetic information could lead to more effective treatment. Phoenix Children's Hospital opened the Ronald A. Matricaria Institute of Molecular Medicine in December, recruiting researchers from Los Angeles and Baltimore and planning to sequence the genomes of 30 percent of their childhood cancer patients in their search for better therapies.Johns Hopkins, with its focus on public health, wants to develop a "systematic genomic sequencing program" over the next two years that will combine genomic analysis with a patient's environmental exposure, family history and other factors to support preventive medicine, said Scott Zeger, vice provost for research."There will be a moment in time when whole genome sequencing becomes ubiquitous throughout health care," said Peter Tonellato, director of the Harvard personalized medicine lab and a clinical investigator in pathology at Beth Israel Deaconess Medical Center in Boston. "Let's say we figure out all the individuals who might have a cancer, and we can predict that with a relatively high level of accuracy. Then presumably we can take steps to avoid those, let's say, decades of treatment."Sequencing an entire genome currently costs in the neighborhood of $5,000 to $10,000, not including the interpretation of the information. It is usually not reimbursed by insurance, which is more likely to cover tests for genetic mutations that are known to be responsive to drugs. The treatments themselves, which are sometimes covered, typically cost several times that.Even optimists warn that medicine is a long way from deriving useful information from routine sequencing, raising questions about the social worth of all this investment at a time of intense fiscal pressure on the health care system."What's the real health benefit?" said Dr. Robert C. Green, a Harvard professor and a medical geneticist at Brigham and Women's Hospital in Boston. "If you're a little bit cynical, you say, well, none, it's foolish."Dr. Green is part of a federally sponsored research project that is looking at the economic and medical impact of whole genome sequencing. "One of the most prominent downsides is you start chasing risks for a whole lot of disease you'll never have, and generate a lot of cost for little benefits," he said.He was not ready to dismiss the efforts of Mount Sinai and others, though. "The other side of the question is, what was there to look up on the Internet when the first person got a personal computer? Very little."The race entails large sums spent not only on construction and technology but also recruitment, salaries and incentives for scientists like Weill-Cornell's Dr. Lewis Cantley, who was lured from Harvard, or Eric E. Schadt, plucked from the biotech world to head the Mount Sinai Institute for Genomics and Multiscale Biology.NewYork-Presbyterian/Weill Cornell announced a new Institute for Precision Medicine, headed by a prostate cancer expert, in January. (The newly fashionable term "precision medicine" is an updated version of another genomics buzzword, "personalized medicine.") "I am not in this for competition," said Dr. Laurie Glimcher, dean of Weill Cornell Medical College. "I consider it collaboration, and I think we all have the same goal in mind, which is to cure disease."As Weill Cornell was courting Dr. Cantley, Memorial was pursuing another Harvard eminence, Dr. José Baselga, to be its physician in chief. "It's a small world," Dr. Baselga, a breast cancer specialist, said, recalling that he and Dr. Cantley had exchanged notes on what each was being offered.Memorial sequenced 16,000 tumors last year, mainly in lung cancer patients, Dr. Baselga said. In addition to the research building just completed on East 68th Street, a new outpatient building on East 74th Street, to be finished in 2018, will have whole floors dedicated to early-phase clinical trials.The promise of whole genome sequencing can be seen in trials like one for bladder cancer at Memorial, where the effects of a drug normally used for breast cancer were disappointing in all but one of about 40 patients, whose tumor went away, Dr. Baselga said. Investigators sequenced the patient's whole genome. "The patient had a mutation in one gene that was right on the same pathway as the therapy," Dr. Baselga said. "And that explained why this worked."
Nicole Michell Phipps, a soft-spoken 21-year-old woman in a furry hood who showed up at the Navy recruitment center in Harlem on Tuesday, said she was drawn to the military in search of more "structure" in her life.She was hesitating about signing up for the military because she knew she could be risking her life. At 18, she said, she had not been ready for such a choice."I would say, yeah, 18, you just come out of high school," Ms. Phipps said. "You're really not sure what to do. I would say 21 is probably the best."The same went for smoking, she said. Voting? "I think 18 is good for that," she said. "It's not causing harm to your body."When New York City officials proposed on Monday to raise the minimum age to legally buy tobacco in the city to 21 from 18 — which would make it the highest of any major city in the United States — people across the country, commenting on news Web sites, were outraged by a seeming inconsistency. Updating a well-traveled argument about minimum drinking ages, they considered it ludicrous that 18-year-olds would be able to fight in wars but not buy cigarettes.As it turned out, many of the young people walking into the military recruitment center on 125th Street the next day also saw the inconsistency. In general, they thought that it was true that they were not mature enough to make life-or-death decisions on their own before 21. That applied not only to smoking and drinking, but also to combat.They saw a dangerous world out there, and they wanted to be protected from it as long as they could be.If it were up to them, they said, no one could fight in a war until 21. And if the city wanted to act in loco parentis on something as bad as smoking, well then, that seemed right to them, too.Patrick Brown, a lanky 21-year-old with braces on his teeth, said that just three years ago, he would never have enlisted on his own. It would have to be "50-50" with his mother, and even now, he said, he had consulted her, and felt better knowing that "she was O.K. with it."Eighteen, Mr. Brown said, is too young to fight and die for your country.Is it too young to smoke? "If the parent condones it, then I guess it's acceptable," Mr. Brown, a nonsmoker, said.Ms. Phipps said she had once tried cigarettes but did not like them. Every decision is like a life lesson, Ms. Phipps said. "At 18, you are supposed to make bad decisions."Brain experts say that Ms. Phipps is right, that the teenage brain is different."The executive function, the portion of the brain which is capable of making certain types of decisions, is really not fully developed until actually over 21," said Cheryl G. Healton, dean of Global Public Health at New York University, and a supporter of the higher age minimum.Older adults with the benefit of a lot of hindsight might tend to agree. But a few veterans interviewed Tuesday saw the city's proposal as patronizing.Raul Gonzalez, 34, of the Bronx, who served in the Army in the late 1990s, smokes a pack of cigarettes a day as a way to take his mind off back pain from years of lifting heavy artillery."If you're old enough to serve your country, then you're old enough to make your own decisions on what you do to your body," he said while outside a Veterans Affairs center in Lower Manhattan.But a few moments later, he began to rethink his position. "It could help a lot of people out," noting that a week ago he buried his 60-year-old father, a heavy smoker who died from throat cancer. But Mr. Gonzalez added that for anyone under 21 who is serving in the military, "there should be exceptions" to the law.At the Harlem recruitment center, Dana Farmer Jr., 24, said he thought that 18-year-olds were not mature enough to make decisions about war or smoking, but also that raising the age to buy cigarettes would not stop them from smoking if they wanted to.He said he hoped to play tenor sax in the Navy band as a strategy to avoid being shot at in Afghanistan. He was considering signing up so he could pay off his college loans faster than if he continued to work for low wages at Duane Reade, but he knew he was potentially endangering his life. "You've got to take the good with the bad," he said.At 18, was he mature enough to figure that out? He answered instantly: "No, no, no."
EAST LANSING, Mich. — President Obama and the Democrats passed the 2010 health care law to make medical insurance available to more than 30 million people who do not have it. But with recent studies showing that as many as three-fourths of those people are unaware of their new options, health care providers are joining community organizers and insurance companies in an ambitious effort to spread the word in the six months remaining before the health plans become available.Here in Michigan, a small army of doctors and nurses, hospital employees, insurance agents and advocates for low-income people is mobilizing for the next phase of this revolution in domestic social policy: finding people who are eligible for health insurance and getting them enrolled.It will not be an easy task.The simmering political debate over Mr. Obama's health care law — which includes an expansion of Medicaid, the government program for low-income people, and the creation of "exchanges" to market subsidized private insurance — makes the work of these foot soldiers more difficult, but also more important.Michigan is, in many ways, a microcosm of what is going on around the country as people race toward the start of "open enrollment" on Oct. 1."Confusion, total confusion," said Jan M. Hudson, a consumer advocate, describing state efforts to help more than a million Michigan residents get insurance under the law.Ms. Hudson, a founder of Michigan Consumers for Healthcare, a coalition of consumer groups, led a recent conference of more than 200 experts and advocates who banded together here on the campus of Michigan State University to try to identify and enroll everyone in the state who might be eligible for coverage.Amy L. Allen, the director of health care reform at the Michigan Department of Community Health, said that delays and resistance by the State Legislature meant that more of the work must be done by community groups and the private sector. The Republican-controlled Legislature declined to set up a state insurance exchange, and Gov. Rick Snyder, a Republican, has met opposition within his own party to his proposal to expand Medicaid.Nevertheless, in Michigan, as in many states, advocates for poor people, blacks, Hispanics and people with disabilities are joining health care providers and insurers in a campaign to find the uninsured wherever they live, work, play or pray."Getting all these people enrolled will not necessarily be an easy task, but it's a great opportunity," said Anita M. Fete, who was one of the speakers at the conference and is the director of state assistance at Enroll America, a national nonprofit group set up to maximize enrollment.The Census Bureau estimates that 1.2 million people in Michigan are uninsured. Most will qualify for subsidized private insurance, or for Medicaid if the state chooses to expand the program.Nationally, the Congressional Budget Office predicts that 14 million uninsured people will get coverage next year. But that goal is ambitious.Studies for Enroll America and the Kaiser Family Foundation indicate that three-fourths of uninsured adults are unaware that they will have new insurance options.Among the people expected to sign up for coverage in the new online markets known as insurance exchanges, one in four speak a language other than English at home, and three out of four have a high school diploma or less.Citing those statistics, Christine P. Barber, a senior policy analyst at Community Catalyst, a consumer organization, said: "There is no time for turf battles. We need to come together to make this work."In California, the health insurance exchange faces an even more daunting task. It is trying to reach five million people who speak 13 different languages and are spread across 163,000 square miles. Nearly half of those in the state who are eligible for insurance subsidies are Hispanic.The fact that so many people are unaware of their new options has the potential to undermine the entire purpose of the health care law. Congress provided hundreds of billions of dollars for expanded coverage, but it did not fully account for the difficulty or expense of getting people to sign up. Also, Democrats did not anticipate the effects of continued Republican hostility to the law."Opponents' attacks seem to have taken a toll on the public's expectations, and Americans are now more likely to think the law will make things worse rather than better for their own families," the Kaiser Family Foundation said last month in a summary of its latest poll. "Americans' awareness of key elements of the law has declined somewhat since passage, when media attention was at its height."
WASHINGTON (AP) — The latest bad news in the hunt for an AIDS vaccine: The government halted a large U.S. study on Thursday, saying the experimental shots aren't preventing HIV infection.Nor did the shots reduce the amount of the AIDS virus in the blood when people who'd been vaccinated later became infected, the National Institutes of Health said."It's disappointing," said Dr. Anthony Fauci, head of NIH's National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases. But, "there was important information gained from this" study that will help determine what to try next.The study had enrolled 2,504 volunteers, mostly gay men, in 19 cities since 2009. Half received dummy shots, and half received a two-part experimental vaccine developed by the NIH. All were provided free condoms and given extensive counseling about the risks for HIV.It's a strategy known as "prime-boost." A DNA-based vaccine made with genetically engineered HIV material is given to prime the immune system to attack the AIDS virus. Then a different vaccine, encasing the same material inside a shell made of a disabled cold virus, acts as a booster shot to strengthen that response. Neither vaccine could cause HIV.The idea: Train immune cells known as T cells to spot and attack the very earliest HIV-infected cells in someone's body. The hope was that the vaccine could either prevent HIV infection, or help those infected anyway to fight it.A safety review this week found that slightly more study participants who had received the vaccine later became infected with HIV. It's not clear why. But the difference wasn't statistically significant, meaning it may be due to chance. Overall, there were 41 HIV infections in the vaccinated group and 30 among placebo recipients. When researchers examined only participants diagnosed after being in the study for at least 28 weeks — long enough for the shots to have done their job — there were 27 HIV infections among the vaccinated and 21 among the placebo recipients.The NIH said Thursday that it is stopping vaccinations in the study, known as HVTN 505, but that researchers will continue to study the volunteers' health.Josh Robbins, 30, of Nashville, Tenn., is among the participants who became infected. He said he's glad he was in the study, because its close monitoring meant he was diagnosed and treated much sooner than most people — and he's feeling great — and because the findings help science."We've got to keep moving forward," Robbins said. The study "certainly can lead us down a new direction to hopefully find something that might work."Multiple attempts at creating an AIDS vaccine have failed over the years. A 2009 study in Thailand is the only one ever to show a modest success, using a somewhat different prime-boost approach. Newer research suggests another approach — to try creating powerful antibodies that could work a step earlier than the T-cell attack, before HIV gets inside the first cell.Both approaches need continued research funding, said Mitchell Warren of the international AIDS Vaccine Advocacy Coalition."Clearly an AIDS vaccine remains critical," he said.
After most pregnancies, the placenta is thrown out, having done its job of nourishing and supporting the developing baby.But a new study raises the possibility that analyzing the placenta after birth may provide clues to a child's risk for developing autism. The study, which analyzed placentas from 217 births, found that in families at high genetic risk for having an autistic child, placentas were significantly more likely to have abnormal folds and creases."It's quite stark," said Dr. Cheryl K. Walker, an obstetrician-gynecologist at the Mind Institute at the University of California, Davis, and a co-author of the study, published in the journal Biological Psychiatry. "Placentas from babies at risk for autism, clearly there's something quite different about them."Researchers will not know until at least next year how many of the children, who are between 2 and 5, whose placentas were studied will be found to have autism. Experts said, however, that if researchers find that children with autism had more placental folds, called trophoblast inclusions, visible after birth, the condition could become an early indicator or biomarker for babies at high risk for the disorder."It would be really exciting to have a real biomarker and especially one that you can get at birth," said Dr. Tara Wenger, a researcher at the Center for Autism Research at Children's Hospital of Philadelphia, who was not involved in the study.The research potentially marks a new frontier, not only for autism, but also for the significance of the placenta, long considered an after-birth afterthought. Now, only 10 percent to 15 percent of placentas are analyzed, usually after pregnancy complications or a newborn's death.Dr. Harvey J. Kliman, a research scientist at the Yale School of Medicine and lead author of the study, said the placenta had typically been given such little respect in the medical community that wanting to study it was considered equivalent to someone in the Navy wanting to scrub ships' toilets with a toothbrush. But he became fascinated with placentas and noticed that inclusions often occurred with births involving problematic outcomes, usually genetic disorders.He also noticed that "the more trophoblast inclusions you have, the more severe the abnormality." In 2006, Dr. Kliman and colleagues published research involving 13 children with autism, finding that their placentas were three times as likely to have inclusions. The new study began when Dr. Kliman, looking for more placentas, contacted the Mind Institute, which is conducting an extensive study, called Marbles, examining potential causes of autism."This person came out of the woodwork and said, 'I want to study trophoblastic inclusions,' " Dr. Walker recalled. "Now I'm fairly intelligent and have been an obstetrician for years and I had never heard of them."Dr. Walker said she concluded that while "this sounds like a very smart person with a very intriguing hypothesis, I don't know him and I don't know how much I trust him." So she sent him Milky Way bar-size sections of 217 placentas and let him think they all came from babies considered at high risk for autism because an older sibling had the disorder. Only after Dr. Kliman had counted each placenta's inclusions did she tell him that only 117 placentas came from at-risk babies; the other 100 came from babies with low autism risk.She reasoned that if Dr. Kliman found that "they all show a lot of inclusions, then maybe he's a bit overzealous" in trying to link inclusions to autism. But the results, she said, were "astonishing." More than two-thirds of the low-risk placentas had no inclusions, and none had more than two. But 77 high-risk placentas had inclusions, 48 of them had two or more, including 16 with between 5 and 15 inclusions.Dr. Walker said that typically between 2 percent and 7 percent of at-risk babies develop autism, and 20 percent to 25 percent have either autism or another developmental delay. She said she is seeing some autism and non-autism diagnoses among the 117 at-risk children in the study, but does not yet know how those cases match with placental inclusions.Dr. Jonathan L. Hecht, associate professor of pathology at Harvard Medical School, said the study was intriguing and "probably true if it finds an association between these trophoblast inclusions and autism." But he said that inclusions were the placenta's way of responding to many kinds of stress, so they might turn out not to be specific enough to predict autism.Dr. Kliman calls inclusions a "check-engine light, a marker of: something's wrong, but I don't know what it is."That's how Chris Mann Sullivan sees it, too. Dr. Sullivan, a behavioral analyst in Morrisville, N.C., was not in the study, but sent her placenta to Dr. Kliman after her daughter Dania, now 3, was born. He found five inclusions. Dr. Sullivan began intensive one-on-one therapy with Dania, who has not been given a diagnosis of autism, but has some relatively mild difficulties."What would have happened if I did absolutely nothing, I'm not sure," Dr. Sullivan said. "I think it's a great way for parents to say, 'O.K., we have some risk factors; we're not going to ignore it.' "
For the second time in a matter of weeks, a group of researchers reported a link between the food people eat and bacteria in the intestines that can increase the risk of heart attacks.Two weeks ago, the investigators reported that carnitine, a compound found in red meat, can increase heart disease risk because of the actions of intestinal bacteria. This time they reported that the same thing happens with lecithin, which is abundant in egg yolks.The lecithin study, published Wednesday in The New England Journal of Medicine, is part of a growing appreciation of the role the body's bacteria play in health and disease. With heart disease, investigators have long focused on the role of diet and heart disease, but expanding the scrutiny to bacteria adds a new dimension."Heart disease perhaps involves microbes in our gut," said the study's lead researcher, Dr. Stanley Hazen, chairman of the department of cellular and molecular medicine at the Cleveland Clinic Lerner Research Institute.In the case of eggs, the chain of events starts when the body digests lecithin, breaking it into its constituent parts, including the chemical choline. Intestinal bacteria metabolize choline and release a substance that the liver converts to a chemical known as TMAO, for trimethylamine N-oxide. High levels of TMAO in the blood are linked to increased risk of heart attack and stroke.To show the effect of eggs on TMAO, Dr. Hazen asked volunteers to eat two hard-boiled eggs. They ended up with more TMAO in their blood. But if they first took an antibiotic to wipe out intestinal bacteria, eggs did not have that effect.To see the effects of TMAO on cardiovascular risk, the investigators studied 4,000 people who had been seen at the Cleveland Clinic. The more TMAO in their blood, the more likely they were to have a heart attack or stroke in the ensuing three years.Carnitine — the red meat chemical — and lecithin are chemically related, Dr. Hazen said. As with lecithin, when carnitine is digested, choline is released and can be acted on by intestinal bacteria.The results of the new studies, though, do not directly prove that reducing TMAO protects against heart disease. That would require large studies following people who lowered their TMAO levels, which should be possible with a vegetarian or high-fiber diet.Dr. Hazen said that people who are worried about heart attacks may want to consider reducing lecithin and choline in their diet, which would require eating less of foods high in fat and cholesterol. Dr. Hazen said it also may be wise to avoid supplements or vitamins with added choline.In an accompanying editorial, Dr. Joseph Loscalzo of Brigham and Women's Hospital in Boston suggested that in the future there may be other ways to reduce blood levels of TMAO. People might take probiotics to help grow bacteria that do not lead to an increase in TMAO. Or perhaps drugs could squelch the synthesis of TMAO. Those probiotics and drugs, though, do not yet exist, and even the specific bacteria responsible for the increase in TMAO are not yet identified.
Almost two weeks after the Boston Marathon bombings, which killed three and injured more than 260, the medical toll is becoming clearer, with many of the victims suffering complex wounds that are causing intense pain and that will require several more operations.Thirty-one victims remained hospitalized at the city's trauma centers on Thursday, including some who lost legs or feet. Sixteen people had limbs blown off in the blasts or amputated afterward, ranging in age from 7 to 71. But in a way, their cases are the simpler ones, said Dr. David King, a trauma surgeon at Massachusetts General Hospital.For some whose limbs were preserved, Dr. King said, the wounds were so littered with debris that five or six operations have been needed to decontaminate them."The idea is to spread out the physiological stress over multiple operations," he said.Some of the wounded also still need surgery to repair bones, veins and nerves. Many will need physical therapy as well. About 10 patients have already arrived at Spaulding Rehabilitation Hospital in Boston, said Timothy Sullivan, a spokesman, and that number could soon double.For many of the wounded, managing pain is a constant challenge. Dr. Alok Gupta, a trauma surgeon at Beth Israel Deaconess Medical Center, said the hospital was giving patients oral and intravenous narcotics and, where possible, regional nerve blocks using catheters.Dr. King said that for those who lost limbs, so-called phantom pain — which feels as if it is coming from the body part that is no longer there — can be excruciating and particularly hard to treat."You have to balance between taking the pain away," he said, "and them being interactive and able to participate in their own rehabilitation."The ailments are not just physical. Some patients are upbeat, doctors said, but others are angry, anxious and depressed.Joan Smith, the manager of social work services at Tufts Medical Center, said that virtually all of the 14 victims who came through the hospital were experiencing acute stress disorder."I also personally did a lot of work with family members who were trying to be strong for their children but at the same time were falling apart behind closed doors," said Ms. Smith, who made sure all the patients and their families had a list of mental health specialists to contact if they felt the need.Dr. Scott Ryan, chief of orthopedic trauma at Tufts, said he could not stop thinking about how traumatic it must have been for the victims, most of whom remained conscious after the blasts, to see the extent of their wounds as they were raced to hospitals."The most disturbing thing for me in treating these patients is that they were awake after it happened and looked down and saw these terrible wounds," he said. "Most of the time, patients with that bad injuries, they're from a car accident or motorcycle accident and by the time they get to hospital they're not with it enough to look down and say, 'Oh my God, look what happened to my leg.' "Those still hospitalized include Heather Abbott, 38, whose left foot, mangled in the first blast, was initially saved by doctors at Brigham and Women's Hospital. She chose to have her leg amputated a few inches below the knee this week, after doctors essentially told her that life would be harder with the foot than without it."I walked maybe 10 feet today on a walker and everybody was so proud of me," Ms. Abbott, a human resources manager from Newport, R.I., told reporters at the hospital on Thursday. "And I thought, 'Oh gosh, this is going to be a long time.' "Fund-raising Web pages for some victims describe their physical and emotional ordeals in raw detail. A page for Christian Williams, 41, an art director whose legs were gravely injured as he stood near the marathon finish line, included a note from Mr. Williams in which he described how he felt after his fourth operation on Monday. Although the doctors "managed to get my right leg closer to being closed," he wrote, "the meds weren't working and I couldn't hide from the pain."A video posted on a fund-raising page for Celeste Corcoran, 47, who lost both legs below her knees, shows her meeting with Sgt. Gabe Martinez, a Marine who lost his lower legs and came to give her a pep talk. "I can't do anything right now," Ms. Corcoran told him tearfully.
NEW YORK (AP) — They sweep. They swab. They sterilize. And still the germs persist.In U.S. hospitals, an estimated 1 in 20 patients pick up infections they didn't have when they arrived, some caused by dangerous 'superbugs' that are hard to treat.The rise of these superbugs, along with increased pressure from the government and insurers, is driving hospitals to try all sorts of new approaches to stop their spread:Machines that resemble "Star Wars" robots and emit ultraviolet light or hydrogen peroxide vapors. Germ-resistant copper bed rails, call buttons and IV poles. Antimicrobial linens, curtains and wall paint.While these products can help get a room clean, their true impact is still debatable. There is no widely-accepted evidence that these inventions have prevented infections or deaths.Meanwhile, insurers are pushing hospitals to do a better job and the government's Medicare program has moved to stop paying bills for certain infections caught in the hospital."We're seeing a culture change" in hospitals, said Jennie Mayfield, who tracks infections at Barnes-Jewish Hospital in St. Louis.Those hospital infections are tied to an estimated 100,000 deaths each year and add as much as $30 billion a year in medical costs, according to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. The agency last month sounded an alarm about a "nightmare bacteria" resistant to one class of antibiotics. That kind is still rare but it showed up last year in at least 200 hospitals.Hospitals started paying attention to infection control in the late 1880s, when mounting evidence showed unsanitary conditions were hurting patients. Hospital hygiene has been a concern ever since, with a renewed emphasis triggered by the emergence a decade ago of a nasty strain of intestinal bug called Clostridium difficile, or C-diff.The diarrhea-causing C-diff is now linked to 14,000 U.S. deaths annually. That's been the catalyst for the growing focus on infection control, said Mayfield, who is also president-elect of the Association for Professionals in Infection Control and Epidemiology.C-diff is easier to treat than some other hospital superbugs, like methicillin-resistant staph, or MRSA, but it's particularly difficult to clean away. Alcohol-based hand sanitizers don't work and C-diff can persist on hospital room surfaces for days. The CDC recommends hospital staff clean their hands rigorously with soap and water — or better yet, wear gloves. And rooms should be cleaned intensively with bleach, the CDC says.Michael Claes developed a bad case of C-diff while he was a kidney patient last fall at New York City's Lenox Hill Hospital. He and his doctor believe he caught it at the hospital. Claes praised his overall care, but felt the hospital's room cleaning and infection control was less than perfect."I would use the word 'perfunctory,'" he said.Lenox Hill spokeswoman Ann Silverman disputed that characterization, noting hospital workers are making efforts that patients often can't see, like using hand cleansers dispensers in hallways. She ticked off a list of measure used to prevent the spread of germs, ranging from educating patients' family members to isolation and other protective steps with each C-diff patient.The hospital's C-diff infection rate is lower than the state average, she said.Westchester Medical Center, a 643-bed hospital in the suburbs of New York City has also been hit by cases of C-diff and the other superbugs.Complicating matters is the fact that larger proportions of hospital patients today are sicker and more susceptible to the ravages of infections, said Dr. Marisa Montecalvo, a contagious diseases specialist at Westchester.There's a growing recognition that it's not only surgical knives and operating rooms that need a thorough cleaning but also spots like bed rails and even television remote controls, she said. Now there's more attention to making sure "that all the nooks and crannies are clean, and that it's done in as perfect a manner as can be done," Montecalvo said.Enter companies like Xenex Healthcare Services, a San Antonio company that makes a portable, $125,000 machine that's rolled into rooms to zap C-diff and other bacteria and viruses dead with ultraviolet light. Xenex has sold or leased devices to more than 100 U.S. hospitals, including Westchester Medical Center.The market niche is expected to grow from $30 million to $80 million in the next three years, according to Frost & Sullivan, a market research firm.Mark Stibich, Xenex's chief scientific officer, said client hospitals sometimes call them robots and report improved satisfaction scores from patients who seem impressed that the medical center is trotting out that kind of technology.At Westchester, workers still clean rooms, but the staff appreciates the high-tech backup, said housekeeping manager Carolyn Bevans."We all like it," she said of the Xenex.At Cooley Dickinson Hospital, a 140-bed facility in Northampton, Mass., the staff calls their machines Thing One, Thing Two, Thing Three and Thing Four, borrowing from the children's book "The Cat in the Hat."But while the things in the Dr. Seuss tale were house-wrecking imps, Cooley Dickinson officials said the ultraviolet has done a terrific job at cleaning their hospital of the difficult C-diff."We did all the recommended things. We used bleach. We monitored the quality of cleaning," but C-diff rates wouldn't budge, said nurse Linda Riley, who's in charge of infection prevention at Cooley Dickinson.A small observational study at the hospital showed C-diff infection rates fell by half and C-diff deaths fell from 14 to 2 during the last two years, compared to the two years before the machines.Some experts say there's not enough evidence to show the machines are worth it. No national study has shown that these products have led to reduced deaths or infection rates, noted Dr. L. Clifford McDonald of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.His point: It only takes a minute for a nurse or visitor with dirty hands to walk into a room, touch a vulnerable patient with germy hands, and undo the benefits of a recent space-age cleaning."Environments get dirty again," McDonald said, and thorough cleaning with conventional disinfectants ought to do the job.Beyond products to disinfect a room, there are tools to make sure doctors, nurses and other hospital staff are properly cleaning their hands when they come into a patient's room. Among them are scanners that monitor how many times a health care worker uses a sink or hand sanitizer dispenser.Still, "technology only takes us so far," said Christian Lillis, who runs a small foundation named after his mother who died from a C-diff infection.Lillis said the hospitals he is most impressed with include Swedish Covenant Hospital in Chicago, where thorough cleanings are confirmed with spot checks. Fluorescent powder is dabbed around a room before it's cleaned and a special light shows if the powder was removed. That strategy was followed by a 28 percent decline in C-diff, he said.He also cites Advocate Christ Medical Center in Oak Lawn, Ill., where the focus is on elbow grease and bleach wipes. What's different, he said, is the merger of the housekeeping and infection prevention staff. That emphasizes that cleaning is less about being a maid's service than about saving patients from superbugs."If your hospital's not clean, you're creating more problems than you're solving," Lillis said.
CHICAGO (AP) — A 2-year-old girl born without a windpipe now has a new one grown from her own stem cells, the youngest patient in the world to benefit from the experimental treatment.Hannah Warren has been unable to breathe, eat, drink or swallow on her own since she was born in South Korea in 2010. Until the operation at a central Illinois hospital, she had spent her entire life in a hospital in Seoul. Doctors there told her parents there was no hope and they expected her to die.The stem cells came from Hannah's bone marrow, extracted with a special needle inserted into her hip bone. They were seeded in a lab onto a plastic scaffold, where it took less than a week for them to multiply and create a new windpipe.About the size of a 3-inch tube of penne pasta, it was implanted April 9 in a nine-hour procedure.Early signs indicate the windpipe is working, Hannah's doctors announced Tuesday, although she is still on a ventilator. They believe she will eventually be able to live at home and lead a normal life."We feel like she's reborn," said Hannah's father, Darryl Warren."They hope that she can do everything that a normal child can do but it's going to take time. This is a brand new road that all of us are on," he said in a telephone interview. "This is her only chance but she's got a fantastic one and an unbelievable one."Warren choked up and his wife, Lee Young-mi, was teary-eyed at a hospital news conference Tuesday. Hannah did not attend because she is still recovering from the surgery. She developed an infection after the operation but now is acting like a healthy 2-year-old, her doctors said.Warren said he hopes the family can bring Hannah home for the first time in a month or so. Hannah turns 3 in August."It's going to be amazing for us to finally be together as a family of four," he said. The couple has an older daughter.Only about one in 50,000 children worldwide are born with the windpipe defect. The stem-cell technique has been used to make other body parts besides windpipes and holds promise for treating other birth defects and childhood diseases, her doctors said.The operation brought together an Italian surgeon based in Sweden who pioneered the technique, a pediatric surgeon at Children's Hospital of Illinois in Peoria who met Hannah's family while on a business trip to South Korea, and Hannah — born to a Newfoundland man and Korean woman who married after he moved to that country to teach English.Hannah's parents had read about Dr. Paolo Macchiarini's success using stem-cell based tracheas but couldn't afford to pay for the operation at his center, the Karolinska Institute in Stockholm. So Dr. Mark Holterman helped the family arrange to have the procedure at his Peoria hospital, bringing in Macchiarini to lead the operation. Children's Hospital waived the cost, likely hundreds of thousands of dollars, Holterman said.Part of OSF Saint Francis Medical Center, the Roman Catholic hospital considers the operation part of their mission to provide charity care, but also views it as a way to champion a type of stem-cell therapy that doesn't involve human embryos, the surgeons said. The Catholic church opposes using stem cells derived from human embryos in research or treatment.Macchiarini has been involved in 14 previous windpipe operations using patients' own stem cells — five using man-made scaffolds like Hannah's but in adults; and nine using scaffolds made from cadaver windpipes, including one in a 10-year-old British boy.He said only one patient died, a 30-year-old man from Abingdon, Md., who had the operation in November 2011 to treat late-stage cancer of the windpipe. He died about four months later of uncertain causes, Macchiarini said.Similar methods have been used to grow bladders, urethras and last year a girl in Sweden got a lab-made vein using her own stem cells and a cadaver vein.Scientists hope to eventually use the method to create solid organs, including kidneys and livers, said Dr. Anthony Atala, director of Wake Forest University's Institute for Regenerative Medicine. He said the operation on Hannah Warren "is really showing that the technique is workable."Hannah had breathing difficulties at birth and Korean doctors soon discovered the missing windpipe. They reconfigured her esophagus so that a breathing tube could go down it from her mouth to her lungs. The esophagus normally runs behind the windpipe and carries food to the stomach.Korean doctors said she couldn't live long with the tube and told her parents there was nothing more they could do.Hannah outlived their expectations and has thrived despite the grim prognosis and other abnormalities including an undeveloped voice box that prevented her from speaking. Now that she has a windpipe and can breathe more normally, doctors expect the larynx to grow and function normally. She will work with speech therapists to help her learn to talk.Holterman said Hannah will likely need a new windpipe in about five years, as she grows.She breathes with help from a ventilator but no longer has a tube in her mouth that she'd lived with since shortly after birth, Holterman said. She's not yet able to eat normally, but doctors let her have her first taste ever of food — a few licks on a lollipop. Her father said she already has discriminating taste and prefers chocolate Korean lollipops to the American kind."I asked her, 'Is it good?'" he said, "and she immediately nodded her head."
WASHINGTON (AP) — The government on Tuesday lowered to 15 the age at which girls can buy the morning-after pill without a prescription and said the emergency contraception no longer has to be kept behind pharmacy counters.The decision by the Food and Drug Administration is an attempt to find middle ground just days before a court-imposed deadline to lift all age restrictions on the drug.Today, Plan B One-Step is sold behind pharmacy counters, and buyers must prove they're 17 or older to buy it without a prescription. Tuesday's decision lowers the age limit to 15 — and will allow the pill to sit on drugstore shelves next to condoms and spermicides or other women's health products. But customers must prove their age at the cash register.Teva Women's Health, which makes Plan B, said it would begin over-the-counter sales in a few months.The question is whether Tuesday's action settles a larger court fight. Earlier this month, U.S. District Judge Edward Korman of New York blasted the Obama administration for imposing the age-17 limit, saying it had let election-year politics trump science and was making it hard for women of any age to obtain the emergency contraception in time. He ordered an end to all age restrictions by Monday, for Plan B and its generic versions.The FDA said Tuesday's decision was independent of the court case and wasn't intended to address it. Technically, the FDA approved Teva's application to sell Plan B in this manner.The Justice Department remained mum on whether it planned to appeal Korman's decision, and the White House had no immediate comment.The women's group that sued over the age limits said Tuesday's action is not enough, and it will continue the court fight if necessary.Lowering the age limit "may reduce delays for some young women but it does nothing to address the significant barriers that far too many women of all ages will still find if they arrive at the drugstore without identification," said Nancy Northup, president of the Center for Reproductive Rights.The FDA said the Plan B One-Step will be packaged with a product code that prompts the cashier to verify a customer's age. Anyone who can't provide such proof as a driver's license, birth certificate or passport wouldn't be allowed to complete the purchase. In most states, driver's licenses, the most common form of identification, are issued at age 16."These are daunting and sometimes insurmountable hoops women are forced to jump through in time-sensitive circumstances, and we will continue our battle in court to remove these arbitrary restrictions on emergency contraception for all women," Northup said."This decision is a step in the right direction for increased access to a product that is a safe and effective method of preventing unintended pregnancies," said Sen. Patty Murray, D-Wash. "It's also a decision that moves us closer to these critical availability decisions being based on science, not politics."Social conservatives had opposed any efforts to loosen restrictions on sale of the morning-after pill, arguing that it was important for parents and medical professionals to be involved in such decisions involving young girls.The group Concerned Women for America charged that health officials were putting politics and so-called progress ahead of the health of children as well as women."It makes no sense that kids need parental permission to take aspirin at school, but they're free to buy and administer Plan B," Penny Nance, CEO and president of CWA, said in a statement.Half the nation's pregnancies every year are unintended, and doctors' groups say more access to morning-after pills could cut those numbers. The pills contain higher doses of regular contraceptives, and if taken within 72 hours of unprotected sex, can cut the chances of pregnancy by up to 89 percent. But it works best if taken in the first 24 hours.The FDA had been poised to lift all age limits and let Plan B sell over-the-counter in late 2011, when Health and Human Services Secretary Kathleen Sebelius, in an unprecedented move, overruled her own scientists. Sebelius said some girls as young as 11 are physically capable of bearing children but shouldn't be able to buy the pregnancy-preventing pill on their own.President Barack Obama supported Sebelius' move and a spokesman said earlier this month that the president's position hadn't changed.The Justice Department could appeal Korman's ruling and seek a stay. If granted, the appeals process would move through the courts, while Plan B is sold over the counter whenever Teva has the product repackaged to meet FDA's requirements.Absent a stay, "we will want to go back to court as quickly as possible and ask the judge to hold them in contempt," said Janet Crepps, a senior counsel for the Center for Reproductive Rights.The FDA said Tuesday that Teva had provided data proving that girls as young as 15 could understand how Plan B works and use it properly, without the involvement of a health care provider. Teva plans to conduct a consumer-education program, and indicated it is willing to audit whether stores are following the age requirement, the agency said.FDA said its ruling applies only to Plan B One-Step, and not to generic versions of the pill which would remain behind pharmacy counters with the age-17 restriction.If a woman already is pregnant, the morning-after pill has no effect. It prevents ovulation or fertilization of an egg. According to the medical definition, pregnancy doesn't begin until a fertilized egg implants itself into the wall of the uterus. Still, some critics say Plan B is the equivalent of an abortion pill because it may also be able to prevent a fertilized egg from attaching to the uterus, a contention that many scientists — and Korman, in his ruling — said has been discredited.
WASHINGTON (AP) — The Obama administration on Wednesday appealed a federal judge's order to lift all age limits on who can buy morning-after birth control pills without a prescription.In appealing the ruling, the administration recommitted itself to a position Obama took during his re-election campaign that younger teens shouldn't have unabated access to emergency contraceptives, despite the insistence by physicians groups and much of his Democratic base that the pill should be readily available.A day earlier, the Food and Drug Administration lowered the age that people can buy the Plan B One-Step morning-after pill without a prescription to 15 — younger than the current limit of 17 — and decided that the pill could be sold on drugstore shelves near the condoms, instead of locked behind pharmacy counters.That decision appeared to fly in the face of a judge's decision last month that women of any age should be allowed to buy both Plan B and its cheaper generic competition as easily as they can buy aspirin. U.S. District Judge Edward Korman of New York gave the FDA 30 days to comply, and the Monday deadline was approaching fast, prompting the administration on Wednesday to ask the court to put the ruling on hold while it reconsiders.With the appeal, the Obama administration is making clear that it's willing to ease access to emergency contraception only a certain amount — not nearly as broadly as doctors' groups and contraception advocates have urged. Still, the FDA decision moving the pill from behind the counter to drugstore shelves reflected a societal shift in the long battle over women's reproductive rights, marking a major milestone for those who believe all forms of birth control should be easy to buy.Reluctant to get drawn in to a messy second-term spat over social issues, White House officials insisted Wednesday that both the FDA and the Justice Department were acting independently of the White House in deciding how to proceed. But the decision to appeal was certain to irk abortion-rights advocates who say they can't understand why a Democratic president is siding with social conservatives in favor of limiting women's reproductive choices."We are deeply disappointed that just days after President Obama proclaimed his commitment to women's reproductive rights, his administration has decided once again to deprive women of their right to obtain emergency contraception without unjustified and burdensome restrictions," said Nancy Northup, president of the Center for Reproductive Rights, which filed the lawsuit that prompted Korman's ruling.Current and former White House aides said Obama's approach to the issue has been heavily influenced by his experience as the father of two school-age daughters. Obama and Health and Human Services Secretary Kathleen Sebelius have also questioned whether there's enough data available to show the morning-after pill is safe and appropriate for younger girls, even though physicians groups insist that it is.In Wednesday's filing, the Justice Department said Korman exceeded his authority and that his decision should be suspended while that appeal is under way, meaning only Plan B One-Step would appear on drugstore shelves until the case is finally settled. If Korman's order isn't suspended during the appeals process, the result would be "substantial market confusion, harming FDA's and the public's interest" as drugstores receive conflicting orders about who's allowed to buy what, the Justice Department concluded.Rather than take matters into his own hands, the Justice Department argued to the 2nd U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals that Korman should have ordered the FDA to reconsider its options for regulating emergency contraception. The court cannot overturn the rules and processes that federal agencies must follow "by instead mandating a particular substantive outcome," the appeal states.The FDA actually had been poised to lift all age limits and let Plan B sell over the counter in late 2011, when Kathleen Sebelius overruled her own scientists. Sebelius said some girls as young as 11 were physically capable of bearing children but shouldn't be able to buy the pregnancy-preventing pill on their own.Sebelius' move was unprecedented, and Korman had blasted it as election-year politics — meaning he was overruling not just a government agency but a Cabinet secretary.More than a year later, neither side in the contraception debate was happy with the FDA's surprise twist, which many perceived as an attempt to find a palatable middle ground between imposing an age limit of 17 and imposing no limit at all.Any over-the-counter access marks a long-awaited change, but it's not enough, said Dr. Cora Breuner of the American Academy of Pediatrics, which supports nonprescription sale of the morning-after pill for all ages."We still have the major issue, which is our teen pregnancy rate is still too high," Breuner said.Even though few young girls likely would use Plan B, which costs about $50 for a single pill, "we know that it is safe for those under 15," she said.Most 17- to 19-year-olds are sexually active, and 30 percent of 15- and 16-year-olds have had sex, according to a study published last month by the journal Pediatrics. Sex is much rarer among younger teens. Likewise, older teens have a higher pregnancy rate, but that study also counted more than 110,000 pregnancies among 15- and 16-year-olds in 2008 alone.Contraception advocates see a double standard. No one is carded when buying a condom, but under the FDA's decision they would have to prove their age when buying a pill to prevent pregnancy if that condom breaks."This isn't a compromise. This is wrong," said Cynthia Pearson of the National Women's Health Network.Social conservatives were outraged by the FDA's move to lower the age limits for Plan B — as well as the possibility that Korman's ruling might take effect and lift age restrictions altogether."This decision undermines the right of parents to make important health decisions for their young daughters," said Anna Higgins of the Family Research Council.Obama aides bristled at the suggestion that the FDA decision was an attempt at political compromise, insisting the FDA merely responded to an application filed by Plan B's manufacturer. At the same time, however, White House spokesman Jay Carney said Obama's concern had been about girls younger than 15 having access, suggesting an age limit of 15 might be acceptable.If a woman already is pregnant, the morning-after pill has no effect. It prevents ovulation or fertilization of an egg. According to the medical definition, pregnancy doesn't begin until a fertilized egg implants itself into the wall of the uterus. Still, some critics say Plan B is the equivalent of an abortion pill because it may also be able to prevent a fertilized egg from attaching to the uterus, a contention that many scientists — and Korman, in his ruling — said has been discredited.Associated Press writer Pete Yost contributed to this report.
WASHINGTON — President Obama said Tuesday that his health care law was "working fine," and he played down concerns that the law could disrupt coverage or lead to higher premiums for people who already had health insurance .At the same time, federal officials released simplified application forms to be used by people seeking health insurance, tax credits and other government subsidies under the law, which Mr. Obama signed three years ago.The new application forms — one for individuals is three pages long, and another for families is seven pages — are significantly shorter than a 21-page draft that the administration circulated earlier this year.Major provisions of the law take effect next Jan. 1, when most Americans will be required to have health insurance.The law represents one of the biggest changes in domestic policy in decades, as significant in some ways as the creation of Social Security or Medicare. But at a news conference on Tuesday, Mr. Obama suggested that most Americans would not be affected by changes taking effect next year. And some of his comments may lower public expectations.Americans who already have insurance do not have to worry about "implementation issues," Mr. Obama said. These matters, he said, will affect a "small group of people, 10 to 15 percent of Americans — now, it's still 30 million Americans, but a relatively narrow group — who don't have health insurance right now, or are on the individual market and are paying exorbitant amounts for coverage that isn't that great.""What we're doing," Mr. Obama said, "is we're setting up a pool so that they can all pool together and get a better deal from insurance companies. And those who can't afford it, we're going to provide them with some subsidies."He added: "That's it. I mean, that's what's left to implement, because the other stuff's been implemented, and it's working fine."Consumer advocates, employers and insurers have been saying for months that the Obama administration needed to step up planning for the new health insurance options. Consumers can sign up in October for coverage that starts in January. Some employers, especially those with many part-time, temporary and seasonal employees, say they expect to have difficulty carrying out new requirements for employer-sponsored coverage.Tuesday was to have been the deadline for insurers to file applications describing the benefits and costs of health plans they wanted to sell to the public in marketplaces run by the federal government. But some insurers said they still had many unanswered questions and were having difficulty filing applications electronically, as required by the government.So the Obama administration extended the deadline by three days, to 8 p.m. on Friday.At a hearing two weeks ago, Senator Max Baucus, Democrat of Montana and chairman of the Senate Finance Committee, said that many of his constituents were confused about the new law, and that "education and outreach" efforts by the administration were inadequate."I just see a huge train wreck coming down," Mr. Baucus said.Asked about that comment on Tuesday, Mr. Obama said that most Americans would not be affected and that they should not fret."The main message I want to give to the American people here is — despite all the hue and cry and 'sky is falling' predictions about this stuff — if you've already got health insurance, then that part of Obamacare that affects you, it's pretty much already in place," he said. "And that's about 85 percent of the country."The president acknowledged that some people might encounter problems trying to obtain insurance."Even if we do everything perfectly, there will still be, you know, glitches and bumps, and there will be stories that can be written that say, 'Oh, look, this thing is, you know, not working the way it's supposed to, and this happened and that happened,' " Mr. Obama said. "And that's pretty much true of every government program that's ever been set up."Consumers will be able to use the same forms to apply for Medicaid and assistance with the cost of buying private insurance in the new marketplaces, known as exchanges.One of the new forms emphasizes that federal aid is not just for low-income people."You may qualify for a free or low-cost program even if you earn as much as $94,000 a year (for a family of four)," the application says.The president's comments came just hours after the Kaiser Family Foundation issued a poll showing that many Americans were confused about the 2010 law.Twelve percent of Americans said they believed that the law had been repealed by Congress, 7 percent said they thought it had been overturned by the Supreme Court and 23 percent said they did not know enough to say what the status of the law was.
NEW YORK (AP) — The suicide rate among middle-aged Americans climbed a startling 28 percent in a decade, a period that included the recession and the mortgage crisis, the government reported Thursday.The trend was most pronounced among white men and women in that age group. Their suicide rate jumped 40 percent between 1999 and 2010.But the rates in younger and older people held steady. And there was little change among middle-aged blacks, Hispanics and most other racial and ethnic groups, the report from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention found.Why did so many middle-aged whites — that is, those who are 35 to 64 years old — take their own lives?One theory suggests the recession caused more emotional trauma in whites, who tend not to have the same kind of church support and extended families that blacks and Hispanics do.The economy was in recession from the end of 2007 until mid-2009. Even well afterward, polls showed most Americans remained worried about weak hiring, a depressed housing market and other problems.Pat Smith, violence-prevention program coordinator for the Michigan Department of Community Health, said the recession — which hit manufacturing-heavy states particularly hard — may have pushed already-troubled people over the brink. Being unable to find a job or settling for one with lower pay or prestige could add "that final weight to a whole chain of events," she said.Another theory notes that white baby boomers have always had higher rates of depression and suicide, and that has held true as they've hit middle age. During the 11-year period studied, suicide went from the eighth leading cause of death among middle-aged Americans to the fourth, behind cancer, heart disease and accidents."Some of us think we're facing an upsurge as this generation moves into later life," said Dr. Eric Caine, a suicide researcher at the University of Rochester.One more possible contributor is the growing sale and abuse of prescription painkillers over the past decade. Some people commit suicide by overdose. In other cases, abuse of the drugs helps put people in a frame of mind to attempt suicide by other means, said Thomas Simon, one of the authors of the CDC report, which was based on death certificates.People ages 35 to 64 account for about 57 percent of suicides in the U.S.The report contained surprising information about how middle-aged people kill themselves: During the period studied, hangings overtook drug overdoses in that age group, becoming the No. 2 manner of suicide. But guns remained far in the lead and were the instrument of death in nearly half of all suicides among the middle-aged in 2010.The CDC does not collect gun ownership statistics and did not look at the relationship between suicide rates and the prevalence of firearms.For the entire U.S. population, there were 38,350 suicides in 2010, making it the nation's 10th leading cause of death, the CDC said. The overall national suicide rate climbed from 12 suicides per 100,000 people in 1999 to 14 per 100,000 in 2010. That was a 15 percent increase.For the middle-aged, the rate jumped from about 14 per 100,000 to nearly 18 — a 28 percent increase. Among whites in that age group, it spiked from about 16 to 22.Suicide prevention efforts have tended to concentrate on teenagers and the elderly, but research over the past several years has begun to focus on the middle-aged. The new CDC report is being called the first to show how the trend is playing out nationally and to look in depth at the racial and geographic breakdown.Thirty-nine out of 50 states registered a statistically significant increase in suicide rates among the middle-aged. The West and the South had the highest rates. It's not clear why, but one factor may be cultural differences in willingness to seek help during tough times, Simon said.Also, it may be more difficult to find counseling and mental health services in certain places, he added.Suicides among middle-aged Native Americans and Alaska Natives climbed 65 percent, to 18.5 per 100,000. However, the overall numbers remain very small — 171 such deaths in 2010. And changes in small numbers can look unusually dramatic.The CDC did not break out suicides of current and former military service members, a tragedy that has been getting increased attention. But a recent Department of Veterans Affairs report concluded that suicides among veterans have been relatively stable in the past decade and that veterans have been a shrinking percentage of suicides nationally.Associated Press writer Jeff Karoub in Detroit contributed to this report.
WASHINGTON (AP) — It's not a "Star Trek" tricorder, but by hooking a variety of gadgets onto a smartphone you could almost get a complete physical — without the paper gown or even a visit to the doctor's office.Blood pressure? Just plug the arm cuff into the phone for a quick reading.Heart OK? Put your fingers in the right spot, and the squiggly rhythm of an EKG appears on the phone's screen.Plug in a few more devices and you could have photos of your eardrum (Look, no infection!) and the back of your eye, listen to your heartbeat, chart your lung function, even get a sonogram.If this sounds like a little too much DIY medical care, well, the idea isn't to self-diagnose with Dr. iPhone. But companies are rapidly developing miniature medical devices that tap the power of the ubiquitous smartphone in hopes of changing how people monitor their own health."We wanted to make sure they have all the right tools available in their pocket" is how Joseph Flaherty of AgaMatrix describes his company's tiny glucose monitor. Diabetics can plug the iBGStar into the bottom of an iPhone and check blood sugar on the go without carrying an extra device.This mobile medicine also might help doctors care for patients in new ways. In March, prominent San Diego cardiologist Eric Topol tweeted "no emergency landing req'd" when he used his smartphone EKG to diagnose a distressing but not immediately dangerous irregular heartbeat in a fellow airplane passenger at 30,000 feet.And the University of California, San Francisco, hopes to enroll a staggering 1 million people in its Health eHeart Study to see whether using mobile technology, including smartphone tracking of people's heart rate and blood pressure, could help treat and prevent cardiovascular disease.The question: Do smartphone devices really work well enough for the average patient and primary care doctor to dive in, or are early adopters just going for the cool factor? Many of the tools cost $100 to $200, there's little public sales information yet and it's not clear how insurers will handle the fledgling trend."Technology sometimes evolves faster than we're ready for it," cautioned Dr. Glen Stream of the American Academy of Family Physicians. "We're recognizing more and more that not all care needs to be delivered face to face," but only if people measure the right things and have a relationship with a doctor to help make good use of the findings, he stressed.Addressing a recent TEDMED conference in Washington, Dr. Susan Desmond-Hellmann, UCSF's chancellor, put the challenge this way: "How does mobile monitoring become something more than a toy or something interesting? How does it connect to how I'm cared for by my caregiver?"About 300 doctors, health policy wonks and others attending that high-tech meeting received what was dubbed a "smartphone physical" from medical students using 10 of the latest devices. The Food and Drug Administration has approved a number of the gadgets for sale; others are experimental prototypes gathered for the demonstration by Nurture by Steelcase and the doctor website Medgadget."It's going to be our generation that adopts most of these," noted Shiv Gaglani, a Johns Hopkins medical student who helped organize the project.The FDA cites industry estimates that 500 million smartphone users worldwide will use some type of health app by 2015. Today's apps mostly are educational tools, digital health diaries or reminders and fitness sensors. The new trend is toward more sophisticated medical apps, some that work with plug-in devices, that provide information a doctor might find useful.Some of the devices sell by prescription or on drugstore shelves, while others like the diabetes monitor and blood pressure cuff have entered a new venue for medicine — the Apple store.Simplicity is part of the idea. Take the AliveCor Heart Monitor. Snap it on like a smartphone case, place fingers on the sensors — no sticky wires on the chest — and you've got an EKG recording in 30 seconds. The FDA approved sale of the $199 device in December for doctors to use in exams or to prescribe for patients to use on themselves.It doesn't measure as much as a full-scale EKG, and patients must email the recording to a doctor for analysis. But heart patients frequently experience palpitations that have ended by the time they reach a cardiologist — and emailing an on-the-spot EKG reading might help the doctor figure out what happened, said AliveCor co-founder Dr. Dave Albert."This is a brand-new technology. We're trying to understand how people will use it," said Albert, whose company also is seeking FDA permission to sell the device over the counter.Welch Allyn's iExaminer taps the smartphone's camera to photograph deep inside the eye — the orange view of the retina filling the phone's screen.Similarly, CellScope Inc. is developing an otoscope — that magnifier doctors use to peer into the ear — that can snap a photo of the eardrum. It's not for sale yet, but might parents one day email that kind of picture to the pediatrician before deciding whether Johnny needs an office visit?"It was great to see it on the phone, rather than the pinpoints we get to see" through a traditional scope, said Dr. Bertina Yen, a Los Angeles internist-turned-health IT specialist. She turned the tables during her smartphone physical, taking over some of the equipment to try it out herself.And University of Washington researchers are testing a way to measure lung function in people with asthma or emphysema as they blow onto the phone and it captures the sound. Usually patients blow into special machines at the doctor's office, while a use-anywhere version might help someone spot early signs of worsening before they see a doctor.Insurers are studying what smartphone technology to pay for. For example, health care giant Kaiser Permanente is about to begin a project in Georgia to sell the iBGStar alongside other diabetes monitors in its on-site pharmacies. The project will determine whether patients like the smartphone monitor, if it improves care — and if so, whether the readings should beam into patients' electronic health records, in Georgia and in other Kaiser regions.But ultimately these devices may have a bigger role in developing countries, where full-size medical equipment is in short supply but smartphones are becoming common. Even in rural parts of the U.S. it can take hours to drive to a specialist, while a primary care physician might quickly email that specialist a photo of, say, a diseased retina first to see whether the trip's really necessary."These tools make diagnosis at a distance much easier," said Dr. Nicholas Genes, an emergency medicine professor at New York's Mount Sinai School of Medicine, who helped with TEDMED's smartphone physical.
NEW YORK (AP) — Parents are reporting more skin and food allergies in their children, a big government survey found.Experts aren't sure what's behind the increase. Could it be that children are growing up in households so clean that it leaves them more sensitive to things that can trigger allergies? Or are mom and dad paying closer attention to rashes and reactions, and more likely to call it an allergy?"We don't really have the answer," said Dr. Lara Akinbami of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, the senior author of the new report released Thursday.The CDC survey suggests that about 1 in 20 U.S. children have food allergies. That's a 50 percent increase from the late 1990s. For eczema and other skin allergies, it's 1 in 8 children, an increase of 69 percent. It found no increase, however, in hay fever or other respiratory allergies.Already familiar with the trend in food allergies are school nurses, who have grown busier with allergy-related duties, like banishing peanuts at school parties or stocking emergency allergy medicine.Sally Schoessler started as school nurse in 1992 in New York state, and didn't encounter a child with a food allergy for a few years. But by the time she left school nursing in 2005, "there were children in the majority of classrooms" with the disorder, said Schoessler, who now works at the National Association of School Nurses in Silver Spring, Md.Food allergies tend to be most feared; severe cases may cause anaphylactic shock or even death from eating, say, a peanut. But many food allergies are milder and something children grow out of. Skin conditions like eczema, too, can be mild and temporary.It's been difficult getting exact numbers for children's allergies, and the new report isn't precise. It uses annual surveys of thousands of adults interviewed in person. The report compares answers from 1997-1999 to those from 2009-2011.Parents were asked if — in the previous year — their child had any kind of food or digestive allergy, any eczema or skin allergy, or any kind of respiratory allergy like hay fever.The researchers did not ask if a doctor had made the diagnosis or check medical records. So some parents may have been stating a personal opinion, and not necessarily a correct one."We see a lot of kids in clinic that really aren't" allergic to the foods their parents worry about, said Dr. Morton Galina, a pediatric allergist at Atlanta's Emory School of Medicine.For example, hives are sometimes blamed on a certain food when a virus was the actual cause, he added.But experts also said they believe there is a real — and unexplained — increase going on, too.One of the more popular theories is "the hygiene hypothesis," which says that exposure to germs and parasites in early childhood somehow prevents the body from developing certain allergies.The hypothesis argues that there is a downside to America's culture of disinfection and overuse of antibiotics. The argument has been bolstered by a range of laboratory and observational studies, including some that have found lower rates of eczema and food allergies in foreign-born children in the U.S.There could be other explanations, though. Big cities have higher childhood allergy rates, so maybe some air pollutant is the unrecognized trigger, said Dr. Peter Lio, a Northwestern University pediatric dermatologist who specializes in eczema.Some suspect the change has something to do with the evolution in how foods are grown and produced, like the crossbreeding of wheat or the use of antibiotics in cattle. But Lio said tests haven't supported that.Emory's Galina said the new CDC statistics may reflect a recent "sea change" in the recommendations for when young children should first eat certain foods.In families with a history of eczema or food allergies, parents were advised to wait for years before introducing their young children to foods tied to severe allergies, like peanuts, milks and eggs. But professional associations changed that advice a few years ago after research suggested that allergies were more likely in those kids when the foods were delayed.The old advice "was exactly the wrong thing to do," and could have contributed to some of the increased cases, Galina said.— Food and respiratory allergies are more common in higher-income families than the poor,— Eczema and skin allergies are most common among the poor.— More black children have the skin problems, 17 percent, compared to 12 percent of white children and about 10 percent of Hispanic children.The mother of a 13-year-old girl, who is black, runs an eczema support group in suburban Washington, D.C. Renee Dantzler says roughly half the families in her group are African-American. Eczema is an itchy skin condition, which often occurs on the arms or behind the knees. The cause isn't always clear.Her daughter, Jasmine, started getting rashes at 6 months and got much worse when she was 4."Her whole body would flare. If she ate something, you would kind of hold your breath," Dantzler said. "And she's allergic to every grass and tree God made."Her daughter took to wearing long sleeves and pants, even in hot weather, so people wouldn't see her skin scarred — and whitened in spots — from scratching. She began to improve about four years ago with steroid creams and other treatments and has gradually become less self-conscious about her skin, Dantzler said.She's now on a school track team, which means wearing shorts."She's the only one on the team with long socks," her mom said.
Suicide rates among middle-aged Americans have risen sharply in the past decade, prompting concern that a generation of baby boomers who have faced years of economic worry and easy access to prescription painkillers may be particularly vulnerable to self-inflicted harm.More people now die of suicide than in car accidents, according to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, which published the findings in Friday's issue of its Morbidity and Mortality Weekly Report. In 2010 there were 33,687 deaths from motor vehicle crashes and 38,364 suicides.Suicide has typically been viewed as a problem of teenagers and the elderly, and the surge in suicide rates among middle-aged Americans is surprising.From 1999 to 2010, the suicide rate among Americans ages 35 to 64 rose by nearly 30 percent, to 17.6 deaths per 100,000 people, up from 13.7. Although suicide rates are growing among both middle-aged men and women, far more men take their own lives. The suicide rate for middle-aged men was 27.3 deaths per 100,000, while for women it was 8.1 deaths per 100,000.The most pronounced increases were seen among men in their 50s, a group in which suicide rates jumped by nearly 50 percent, to about 30 per 100,000. For women, the largest increase was seen in those ages 60 to 64, among whom rates increased by nearly 60 percent, to 7.0 per 100,000.Suicide rates can be difficult to interpret because of variations in the way local officials report causes of death. But C.D.C. and academic researchers said they were confident that the data documented an actual increase in deaths by suicide and not a statistical anomaly. While reporting of suicides is not always consistent around the country, the current numbers are, if anything, too low."It's vastly underreported," said Julie Phillips, an associate professor of sociology at Rutgers University who has published research on rising suicide rates. "We know we're not counting all suicides."The reasons for suicide are often complex, and officials and researchers acknowledge that no one can explain with certainty what is behind the rise. But C.D.C. officials cited a number of possible explanations, including that as adolescents people in this generation also posted higher rates of suicide compared with other cohorts."It is the baby boomer group where we see the highest rates of suicide," said the C.D.C.'s deputy director, Ileana Arias. "There may be something about that group, and how they think about life issues and their life choices that may make a difference."The rise in suicides may also stem from the economic downturn over the past decade. Historically, suicide rates rise during times of financial stress and economic setbacks. "The increase does coincide with a decrease in financial standing for a lot of families over the same time period," Dr. Arias said.Another factor may be the widespread availability of opioid drugs like OxyContin and oxycodone, which can be particularly deadly in large doses.Although most suicides are still committed using firearms, officials said there was a marked increase in poisoning deaths, which include intentional overdoses of prescription drugs, and hangings. Poisoning deaths were up 24 percent over all during the 10-year period and hangings were up 81 percent.Dr. Arias noted that the higher suicide rates might be due to a series of life and financial circumstances that are unique to the baby boomer generation. Men and women in that age group are often coping with the stress of caring for aging parents while still providing financial and emotional support to adult children."Their lives are configured a little differently than it has been in the past for that age group," Dr. Arias said. "It may not be that they are more sensitive or that they have a predisposition to suicide, but that they may be dealing with more."Preliminary research at Rutgers suggests that the risk for suicide is unlikely to abate for future generations. Changes in marriage, social isolation and family roles mean many of the pressures faced by baby boomers will continue in the next generation, Dr. Phillips said."The boomers had great expectations for what their life might look like, but I think perhaps it hasn't panned out that way," she said. "All these conditions the boomers are facing, future cohorts are going to be facing many of these conditions as well."Nancy Berliner, a Boston historian, lost her 58-year-old husband to suicide nearly two years ago. She said that while the reasons for his suicide were complex, she would like to see more attention paid to prevention and support for family members who lose someone to suicide."One suicide can inspire other people, unfortunately, to view suicide as an option," Ms. Berliner said. "It's important that society becomes more comfortable with discussing it. Then the people left behind will not have this stigma."
WASHINGTON (AP) — Weight-loss surgery such as the type that New Jersey Gov. Chris Christie underwent may not just improve people's waistlines, but their health.Obesity causes or worsens myriad health problems, from diabetes to heart disease, severe sleep apnea to arthritic knees. Christie has revealed that after struggling with his weight for 20 years and the reality check of turning 50, the desire to be healthy for his four children motivated him to have an operation called stomach banding."He's doing the right thing," said Dr. Jaime Ponce, president of the American Society for Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery. "He's at the age he really needs to address his problem, to live longer, in a better way, with a better quality of life."Specialists perform about 160,000 weight-loss operations a year in the U.S., according to a recent analysis by the surgeons' group. Surgery isn't a panacea, it isn't for everyone — and some forms work better than others.Some questions and answers about the different types:Q: What is the most common form of weight-loss surgery?A: In the U.S., it's gastric bypass, sometimes called stomach-stapling. It generally results in the most weight loss. Doctors wall off a small pouch in the stomach, so that it can hold only a small amount of food. Then, they reroute that food past part of the intestine so the body also absorbs fewer calories.Q: How is stomach banding different?A: It's a less invasive operation, and unlike gastric bypass, it's reversible — the band can be removed if necessary. Best known by the brand name Lap-Band, an adjustable band is placed around the stomach to restrict how much food someone can eat at one time. As initial weight is lost, the band can be tightened. Typically, patients don't lose as much as with gastric bypass.Q: Are those the only options?A: The third major approach is called a gastric sleeve, which removes a large chunk of the stomach and thus cuts production of one of the body's hunger-stimulating hormones. Other, less used options including a complex operation called a duodenal switch that also involves rerouting food.Q: How well do these operations work?A: Over a year or two, weight-loss surgery can lead to loss of 50 percent to even 80 percent of the person's excess weight — if they stick with a healthy diet and exercise. More important, research shows weight-loss surgeries can reverse Type 2 diabetes in patients who lose enough weight and keep it off. Gastric bypass causes the fastest weight loss, and stomach banding a more gradual loss.But patients don't always benefit enough to justify surgery. The Agency for Healthcare Research and Quality cited reports that within five years, up to a third of stomach banding patients aren't maintaining their weight loss."You don't want somebody to always drink milkshakes because they're going to defeat the surgery over time," Ponce said.A: Most are done laparoscopically — through small incisions — and Ponce's group says the risk of death is lower than for operations to remove a gall bladder or replace a hip. However, patients may suffer infection, blood clots, and broken or leaking stitches or staples.After surgery, side effects can include vitamin deficiencies as food is digested differently, and vomiting as people learn to eat less and chew well. Gastric bypass patients also may suffer a complication that causes cramping and diarrhea, especially after eating sweets. The gastric band may slip out of place.A: Generally, someone who is about 100 pounds overweight and has failed other attempts to lose. Doctors evaluate body mass index, a measure of weight for height. Candidates have a BMI of at least 40, or a BMI of 35 along with a weight-related health problem. For example, someone who is 5-foot-10-inches and weighs 279 pounds has a BMI of 40.In 2011, The Food and Drug Administration relaxed the rules for stomach banding, allowing it for patients with a BMI as low as 30 who have a weight-related medical condition.Weight-loss surgery can cost anywhere from $14,000 to $20,000; insurance tends to cover it for people who are sicker and more obese.
DEERFIELD, Ill. (AP) — Baxter International Inc. says that a blood product it was testing failed to slow mental decline or to preserve physical function in a major study of 390 patients with mild to moderate Alzheimer's disease.The company says that people who received 18 months of infusions with its drug, Gammagard, fared no better than others given infusions of a dummy solution.Gammagard is immune globulin, natural antibodies culled from donated blood. Researchers thought these antibodies might help remove amyloid, the sticky plaque that clogs patients' brains, sapping memory and ability to think.Patients with moderate disease and those with a gene that raises risk of Alzheimer's who were taking the higher of two doses in the study seemed to benefit, although the study was not big enough to say for sure."The study missed its primary endpoints, however we remain interested by the prespecified sub-group analyses" in groups that seemed to benefit, Ludwig Hantson, president of Baxter's BioScience business, said in a statement.Gammagard is already sold to treat some blood disorders, and the results of the Alzheimer's study do not affect those uses. About 35 million people worldwide have dementia, and Alzheimer's is the most common type. In the U.S., about 5 million have Alzheimer's. Current medicines such as Aricept and Namenda just temporarily ease symptoms. There is no known cure.Excitement about Gammagard grew last summer, when researchers reported at a medical conference that the drug had stabilized Alzheimer's disease for as much as three years in four patients who had been receiving the highest dose of it for three years in the study. People typically go from diagnosis to death in about eight years, so to be stable for so long was considered remarkable.The new results on the full group of study participants are disappointing, said the study's leader, Dr. Norman Relkin, head of a memory disorders program at New York-Presbyterian Hospital/Weill Cornell Medical Center."The bar was set very high" for the drug to show improvement, and "there does appear to be a signal" that it helped the two-thirds of patients in the study who had the apoE4 gene that raises the risk of developing Alzheimer's, as well as those with moderate versus mild disease, Relkin said.No new side effects were seen in the study. About 5 percent of patients on the drug had a rash and decreases in hemoglobin, which carries oxygen in the blood. There were 17 serious reactions, 12 in the drug group and five in the placebo group.Full results will be presented in July at an Alzheimer's conference in Boston.Meanwhile, other studies are under way to test drugs earlier in the course of the disease. An experimental drug, Eli Lilly & Co.'s solanezumab, showed some promise in that setting in an earlier study.Shares of Baxter fell $2.53, or 3.6 percent, to $67.78 in morning trading.
We live in an epidemiological bubble and are for the most part blissfully unaware of it. Diseases that were routine hazards of childhood for many Americans living today now seem like ancient history. And while every mother could once identify measles in a heartbeat, now even the best hospitals have to call in their eldest staff members to ask: "Is this what we think it is?"To a remarkable extent, we owe our well-being, and in many cases our lives, to the work of one man and to events that happened 50 years ago this spring.At 1 a.m. on March 21, 1963, an intense, irascible but modest Merck scientist named Maurice R. Hilleman was asleep at his home in the Philadelphia suburb of Lafayette Hill when his 5-year-old daughter, Jeryl Lynn, woke him with a sore throat. Dr. Hilleman felt the side of her face and then the telltale swelling beneath the jaw indicating mumps. He tucked her back into bed, about the only treatment anyone could offer at the time.For most children, mumps was a nuisance disease, nothing worse than a painful swelling of the salivary glands. But Dr. Hilleman knew that it could sometimes leave a child deaf or otherwise permanently impaired.He quickly dressed and drove 20 minutes to pick up proper sampling equipment from his laboratory. Returning home, he woke Jeryl Lynn long enough to swab the back of her throat and immerse the specimen in a nutrient broth. Then he drove back to store it in the laboratory freezer.The name Maurice Hilleman may not ring a bell. But today 95 percent of American children receive the M.M.R. — the vaccine for measles, mumps and rubella that Dr. Hilleman invented, starting with the mumps strain he collected that night from his daughter.It was by no means his only contribution. At Dr. Hilleman's death in 2005, other researchers credited him with having saved more lives than any other scientist in the 20th century. Over his career, he devised or substantially improved more than 25 vaccines, including 9 of the 14 now routinely recommended for children."One person did that!" said Dr. Anthony S. Fauci, a longtime friend of Dr. Hilleman's and now director of the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases. "Truly amazing."As a young man in Montana, Maurice Hilleman had intended only to become a manager at the J. C. Penney store. He turned out not to have the perfect retail personality. (Asked later in life what he was proudest of in his career, he replied, "Being able to survive while being a bastard.")After getting a Ph.D. in microbiology at the University of Chicago, he went on to spend most of his career at Merck, but the corporate personality also eluded him. He had a sailor's vocabulary, and his brand of peer review often included shipboard expletives (though he used them "in a constructive way," Dr. Fauci said with a smile).But everyone recognized Dr. Hilleman's genius at discovering and perfecting vaccines, which he pursued, Dr. Fauci said, with a rare combination of "exquisite scientific knowledge" and an "amazingly practical get-it-done personality."Vaccines are tools for coaxing the immune system to resist a disease without producing the actual symptoms, and making them was as much an art as a science. "It's not like there was a formula for this," said Dr. Paul A. Offit, a Philadelphia pediatrician, vaccine developer and the author of "Vaccinated," a 2007 biography of Dr. Hilleman.The general practice was to isolate a disease organism, figure out how to keep it alive in the laboratory, then weaken or "attenuate" it by passing it over and over through a series of cells, typically from chicken embryos, until it could no longer reproduce in humans but could still elicit an immune response. Other steps followed, particularly for Dr. Hilleman, who was obsessed with safety and with stripping away unwanted side effects.That spring of 1963, the Food and Drug Administration also granted the first license for a vaccine against measles. Much of the early work on the virus had been done in the laboratory of John F. Enders at Boston Children's Hospital, but the vaccine still commonly produced rashes and fevers when Dr. Hilleman began to work on it.Under pressure from public health officials to stop a disease then killing more than 500 American children every year, Dr. Hilleman and Dr. Joseph Stokes, a pediatrician, devised a way to minimize the side effects by giving a gamma globulin shot in one arm and the measles vaccine in the other. It was the beginning of the end of the disease in this country.Dr. Hilleman then went on to refine the vaccine over the next four years, eventually producing the much safer Moraten strain that is still in use today. As always, he kept himself in the background: The name stands for "more attenuated enders."One other crucial event in the development of M.M.R. happened that spring of 1963: An epidemic of rubella began in Europe and quickly swept around the globe. In this country, the virus's devastating effect on first-trimester pregnancies caused about 11,000 newborns to die, according to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. An additional 20,000 suffered birth defects, including deafness, heart disease and cataracts.Dr. Hilleman was already testing his own vaccine as the epidemic ended in 1965. But he agreed to work instead with a vaccine being developed by federal regulators. It was, he later recalled, "toxic, toxic, toxic." By 1969, he had cleaned it up enough to obtain F.D.A. approval and prevent another rubella epidemic. Finally, in 1971, he put his vaccines for measles, mumps and rubella together to make M.M.R., replacing a series of six shots with just two.Or rather not finally. In 1978, having found a better rubella vaccine than his own, Dr. Hilleman asked its developer if he could use it in the M.M.R. The developer, Dr. Stanley Plotkin, then of the Wistar Institute in Philadelphia, was momentarily speechless. It was an expensive choice for Merck, and might have been a painful one for anyone other than Dr. Hilleman."It's not that he didn't have an ego. He certainly did," Dr. Plotkin recalled in a recent interview. "But he valued excellence above that. Once he decided that this strain was better, he did what he had to do," even if it meant sacrificing his own work.Given Dr. Hilleman's obsession with safety and effectiveness, it came as a bitter surprise toward the end of his life when his vaccine was at the center of what Dr. Offit called "a perfect storm of fear." In 1998, The Lancet, a respected British medical journal, published an article alleging that M.M.R. had caused an epidemic of autism.The lead author, Dr. Andrew Wakefield, became a media celebrity, and some parents began to balk at having their children immunized; the vaccine's very success had made them forget just how devastating measles, mumps and rubella could be. Dr. Hilleman, who might reasonably have been expected to win a Nobel Prize, got hate mail and death threats instead.Multiple independent studies would eventually demonstrate that there is no link between M.M.R. and autism, and Dr. Wakefield's work has been widely discredited. In 2010, the British medical authorities stripped him of the right to practice medicine, and The Lancet retracted the 1998 article.It came too late, not just for Dr. Hilleman, who by then had died of cancer, but also for many parents who mistakenly believed that avoiding the vaccine was the right way to protect their children. In 2011 alone, a measles outbreak in Europe sickened 26,000 people and killed 9. Because the disease is contagious enough to pick up from a traveler walking by in the airport, cases still also occur in this country among the unvaccinated.But Dr. Hilleman would probably still find reason to be encouraged. The Measles and Rubella Initiative, a global campaign organized in 2001, has given the M.M.R. vaccine to a billion children in this century, preventing 9.6 million deaths from measles alone, for less than $2 a dose. According to Dr. Stephen L. Cochi, a global immunization adviser at the C.D.C., the initiative is "on the verge of setting a target date" to eradicate the disease.In this country, the strain that Dr. Hilleman collected from his daughter that night in 1963 has reduced the incidence of mumps to fewer than 1,000 cases a year, from 186,000. Characteristically, he named it not for himself but for his daughter. Jeryl Lynn Hilleman, now a financial consultant to biotech start-ups in Silicon Valley, turns the credit back on her father.He was driven, she said in an interview, "by a need to be of use — of use to people, of use to humanity.""All I did," she added, "was get sick at the right time, with the right virus, with the right father."
Last year at this time, Christy Turlington Burns, the fashion model turned maternal-health advocate, asked mothers across America to celebrate No Mothers Day by not answering their phones or e-mail all day, even when their children called.The idea was to bring home what it feels like to suddenly be motherless, because around the world, about 800 women a day die in childbirth, 90 percent of them from preventable causes.This year, her charity, Every Mother Counts, has switched to something less controversial: Know Mothers Day. It will ask people to use social media like Pinterest to describe what they value about mothers. Donations to the cause will be welcome, but not solicited.Asked why she had dropped the first idea, Ms. Burns said: "We're small, and that was our record-scratch moment to say 'Hey, pay attention to us!' "There was a little backlash — some mothers didn't like giving up their special day, even for a good cause. Others felt a day of silence was too passive.Ms. Burns was moved to help mothers in poor countries after she herself nearly died in childbirth in 2003 — she hemorrhaged an hour after giving birth.Lives can be saved with simple interventions, such as training midwives to stop bleeding with uterine massage and an oxytocin injection.While studying for a master's degree in public health at Columbia, Ms. Burns made a documentary, "No Woman, No Cry." Released in 2010 at the Tribeca Film Festival, it tells the stories of four women with risky pregnancies in Bangladesh, Tanzania, Guatemala and the United States, and includes home footage of her own brush with death shot by her husband, the filmmaker Edward Burns.Her charity has given grants of $40,000 to $60,000 to support midwife education in Haiti, prenatal care for poor women in Florida and a service offering rides to the hospital for women in labor in Uganda.
Eating fish is good for your heart but taking fish oil capsules does not help people at high risk of heart problems who are already taking medicines to prevent them, a large study in Italy found.The work makes clearer who does and does not benefit from taking supplements of omega-3 fatty acids, the good oils found in fish such as salmon, tuna and sardines.Previous studies have suggested that fish oil capsules could lower heart risks in people with heart failure or who have already suffered a heart attack. The American Heart Association recommends them only for people who have high levels of fats called triglycerides in their blood, says the group's president, Dr. Donna Arnett of the University of Alabama at Birmingham.Fish oil capsules failed to prevent flare-ups of atrial fibrillation, a common heart rhythm problem, in a large study in 2010.The new study was led by the Mario Negri Institute for Pharmacological Research in Milan. It tested 1 gram a day of fish oil versus dummy capsules in 12,513 people throughout Italy. They had not suffered a heart attack but were at high risk of having one because of diabetes, high blood pressure, high cholesterol, smoking, obesity or other conditions. Most already were taking cholesterol-lowering statins, aspirin and other medicines to lower their chances of heart problems.Researchers at first planned to compare the rate of death, heart attacks and strokes in the two groups, but these were less frequent than anticipated. So they started measuring how long it was before people in either group suffered one of these fates or was hospitalized for heart-related reasons. After five years, the rate was the same — about 12 percent of each group had one of these problems."They're very high-risk people and so the level of other treatments was very high," Arnett said. "When you're being aggressively treated for all of your other risk factors, adding fish oil yielded no additional benefits."Results are published in Thursday's New England Journal of Medicine. Makers of fish oil supplements helped pay for the study.Eating fish is known to help protect against heart disease, and the Heart Association recommends it at least twice a week."People who choose to eat more fish are more likely to eat heart healthier diets and engage in more physical activity," and studies testing the benefit of supplements may not be able to completely adjust for differences like these, said Alice Lichtenstein, director of the cardiovascular nutrition lab at Tufts University in Boston.The results do show that people can't rely on a pill to make up for a bad diet, she said."It is sort of like breaking a fish oil capsule over a hot fudge sundae and expecting the effect of the calories and saturated fat to go away," she said.
WASHINGTON (AP) — Weight-loss surgery such as the type that New Jersey Gov. Chris Christie underwent may not just improve people's waistlines, but their health.Obesity causes or worsens myriad health problems, from diabetes to heart disease, severe sleep apnea to arthritic knees. Christie has revealed that after struggling with his weight for 20 years and the reality check of turning 50, the desire to be healthy for his four children motivated him to have an operation called stomach banding."He's doing the right thing," said Dr. Jaime Ponce, president of the American Society for Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery. "He's at the age he really needs to address his problem, to live longer, in a better way, with a better quality of life."Specialists perform about 160,000 weight-loss operations a year in the U.S., according to a recent analysis by the surgeons' group. Surgery isn't a panacea, it isn't for everyone — and some forms work better than others.Some questions and answers about the different types:Q: What is the most common form of weight-loss surgery?A: In the U.S., it's gastric bypass, sometimes called stomach-stapling. It generally results in the most weight loss. Doctors wall off a small pouch in the stomach, so that it can hold only a small amount of food. Then, they reroute that food past part of the intestine so the body also absorbs fewer calories.Q: How is stomach banding different?A: It's a less invasive operation, and unlike gastric bypass, it's reversible — the band can be removed if necessary. Best known by the brand name Lap-Band, an adjustable band is placed around the stomach to restrict how much food someone can eat at one time. As initial weight is lost, the band can be tightened. Typically, patients don't lose as much as with gastric bypass.Q: Are those the only options?A: The third major approach is called a gastric sleeve, which removes a large chunk of the stomach and thus cuts production of one of the body's hunger-stimulating hormones. Other, less used options including a complex operation called a duodenal switch that also involves rerouting food.Q: How well do these operations work?A: Over a year or two, weight-loss surgery can lead to loss of 50 percent to even 80 percent of the person's excess weight — if they stick with a healthy diet and exercise. More important, research shows weight-loss surgeries can reverse Type 2 diabetes in patients who lose enough weight and keep it off. Gastric bypass causes the fastest weight loss, and stomach banding a more gradual loss.But patients don't always benefit enough to justify surgery. The Agency for Healthcare Research and Quality cited reports that within five years, up to a third of stomach banding patients aren't maintaining their weight loss."You don't want somebody to always drink milkshakes because they're going to defeat the surgery over time," Ponce said.A: Most are done laparoscopically — through small incisions — and Ponce's group says the risk of death is lower than for operations to remove a gall bladder or replace a hip. However, patients may suffer infection, blood clots, and broken or leaking stitches or staples.After surgery, side effects can include vitamin deficiencies as food is digested differently, and vomiting as people learn to eat less and chew well. Gastric bypass patients also may suffer a complication that causes cramping and diarrhea, especially after eating sweets. The gastric band may slip out of place.A: Generally, someone who is about 100 pounds overweight and has failed other attempts to lose. Doctors evaluate body mass index, a measure of weight for height. Candidates have a BMI of at least 40, or a BMI of 35 along with a weight-related health problem. For example, someone who is 5-foot-10-inches and weighs 279 pounds has a BMI of 40.In 2011, The Food and Drug Administration relaxed the rules for stomach banding, allowing it for patients with a BMI as low as 30 who have a weight-related medical condition.Weight-loss surgery can cost anywhere from $14,000 to $20,000; insurance tends to cover it for people who are sicker and more obese.
WASHINGTON — A federal judge on Friday stepped up his criticism of the Obama administration, accusing the Justice Department of making "frivolous" and "silly" arguments in its attempt to delay making the morning-after emergency contraceptive pill available to women and girls of all ages without a prescription.Judge Edward R. Korman of the United States District Court for the Eastern District of New York ordered last month that the drug be made widely available and said that raw politics — not scientific evidence — was behind efforts by Kathleen Sebelius, the secretary of health and human services, to block easier distribution to young girls.On Friday, he denied the request by government lawyers to suspend his ruling while they appeal. In the process, he lashed out again at Ms. Sebelius in unusually harsh terms, questioning her credibility and integrity."If a stay is granted, it will allow the bad-faith, politically motivated decision of Secretary Sebelius, who lacks any medical or scientific expertise, to prevail — thus justifiably undermining the public's confidence in the drug approval process," Judge Korman wrote.Officials at the Justice Department and the Department of Health and Human Services declined to comment on Judge Korman's ruling, citing the continuing legal case.The issue of how broadly to distribute the morning-after pill is a politically charged one that puts President Obama's administration at the center of a clash involving some women's rights groups, conservative opponents of abortion and defenders of scientific integrity.In Friday's ruling, Judge Korman said that the government's appeal of his order was nothing more than an attempt to "vindicate the improper conduct of the secretary."Andrea Costello, a lawyer for the Partnership for Civil Justice Fund and counsel to plaintiffs in the case before Judge Korman, agreed with him, saying that "this is politics at its worst and the administration should be ashamed of its duplicitous conduct."Judge Korman postponed the enforcement of his order until Monday to allow lawyers for the Justice Department to take their request for a delay to the appeals court. If the government ultimately fails to secure a suspension of Judge Korman's order, it would clear the path for over-the-counter sales of the morning-after pill to very young girls, an outcome that the Obama administration has tried to block.In 2011, Ms. Sebelius overruled a decision by the Food and Drug Administration to allow the drug to be sold without a prescription to anyone. Instead, she required that the drug be kept behind the counter at pharmacies and sold without a prescription only to women 17 and older.Last week, the F.D.A. approved a change in that rule that would allow women and girls 15 and older to buy the drug without a prescription. At a hearing last week, Judge Korman said that decision was politically motivated and intended to "sugarcoat" the government's appeal. He indicated he believed the drug should be made more widely available.Judge Korman's rulings have been filled with harsh criticism of Ms. Sebelius and the administration's legal efforts to defend her decision. Friday's ruling on the request for a delay in the enforcement of his order was no exception.The judge repeatedly accused the government of operating in bad faith and said the process of denying broad distribution of the drug had been "corrupted by political interference" for years. He said he did not believe that ordering Ms. Sebelius or the F.D.A. to re-examine their decisions would make any difference."The cause of the rejection of over-the-counter sale of levonorgestrel-based emergency contraceptives was the secretary of health and human services," Judge Korman wrote. "She has not changed her position. A remand would thus be futile. More significantly, I have been there and done that.""Indeed, in my view, the defendants' appeal is frivolous and is taken for the purpose of delay," he wrote.At one point in his ruling, Judge Korman notes that lawyers for the administration insist that allowing over-the-counter access to the drug for everyone while the government appeals the case would mean "uncertainty" for girls and women about whether they could get the drug.The judge rejected that argument out of hand, saying that "this silly argument ignores the fact it is the government's appeal from the order that sustained the judgment of the commissioner of the F.D.A. that is the cause of any uncertainty, and that that appeal is taken solely to vindicate the improper conduct of the secretary and possibly for the purpose of further delaying greater access to emergency contraceptives for purely political reasons."He also rejected the government's argument that women might be confused about the drug's availability if it was made available to everyone without a prescription and then later restricted because the government won its appeal.Judge Korman called that argument "largely an insult to the intelligence of women."
NEW YORK (AP) — U.S. health officials say last year was the worst ever for West Nile virus deaths.The final tally reported Monday was 286 deaths — or two more than the record set in 2002.But there were far fewer illnesses overall, and fewer serious cases than in previous years.The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention had predicted it would be a bad year because of weather conditions that promote breeding of the mosquitoes that spread the virus to people.The CDC report Monday showed Texas had nearly a third of the serious cases, and about a third of the deaths.West Nile virus was first diagnosed in Uganda in 1937, but no cases were reported in the U.S. until 1999 in New York. It gradually spread to the West Coast.
In the Family: Heart Disease: How can a former Ironman triathlete get heart disease? For Rick Del Sontro and most of his family, there's no escape. It's a genetic defect that has plagued generation after generation.Early heart disease ran in Rick Del Sontro's family, and every time he went for a run, he was scared his heart would betray him. So he did all he could to improve his odds. He kept himself lean, stayed away from red meat, spurned cigarettes and exercised intensely, even completing an Ironman Triathlon."I had bought the dream: if you just do the right things and eat the right things, you will be O.K.," said Mr. Del Sontro, whose cholesterol and blood pressure are reassuringly low.But after his sister, just 47 years old, found out she had advanced heart disease, Mr. Del Sontro, then 43, and the president of Zippy Shell, a self-storage company, went to a cardiologist.An X-ray of his arteries revealed the truth. Like his grandfather, his mother, his four brothers and two sisters, he had heart disease. (One brother, Michael, has not received a diagnosis of the disease.)Now he and his extended family have joined an extraordinary federal research project that is using genetic sequencing to find factors that increase the risk of heart disease beyond the usual suspects — high cholesterol, high blood pressure, smoking and diabetes.The aim is to see if genetics can explain why heart disease strikes apparently healthy people. The hope is that a family like Mr. Del Sontro's could be a Rosetta stone for heart disease — that their arteries' profound but mysterious propensity to clog could reveal forces that do the same in millions of others."We don't know yet how many pathways there are to heart disease," said Dr. Leslie Biesecker, who directs the study Mr. Del Sontro joined. "That's the power of genetics. To try and dissect that."Researchers have long known that a family history of early death from heart disease doubles a person's risk independently of any other factors. Family history is defined as having a father or a brother who were given a diagnosis of heart disease before age 55 or a mother or sister before age 65.Scientists are studying the genetic makeup of each member of the Del Sontro family, searching for telltale mutations or aberrations in the long sequence of three billion chemicals that make up human DNA.Until very recently, such a project almost certainly would have been futile. Picking through DNA for tiny aberrations was so costly and time-consuming that it was impractical to take on for an entire family.Analyzing the deluge of data would have been overwhelming. But costs have plunged, and data analysis has advanced."With the right family, you may need only one family," said Dr. Robert C. Green of Harvard Medical School who studies genetics and medicine and is not involved in the study.Control of cardiovascular disease is one of medicine's great success stories. Over the past 45 years, heart disease death rates have steadily dropped 60 percent from their peak in the 1960s.But doctors still rely mostly on risk factors discovered decades ago — cholesterol levels, blood pressure, diabetes, smoking, obesity and a sedentary lifestyle."Risk factors are part of the canon now in medicine," said Dr. Gary H. Gibbons, the director of the National Heart, Lung and Blood Institute. "We use them every day. Still, people arrive at the hospital every day with heart attacks."And heart disease is still the leading killer of men and women. Each year, nearly 600,000 people in the United States die of heart disease. Though the average age for a first heart attack has steadily risen — it is now 66 for men, and 70 for women — many die much younger. And many had no obvious risk factors. What, researchers ask, are they missing?The old method of inquiry into heart disease was to start with basic laboratory research, test a hypothesis in animals, develop a drug and then test it in humans. That approach led to some expensive failures. Researchers now want to use human genetics."We need to understand disease biology in humans," said Dr. Elias Zerhouni, a former director of the National Institutes of Health and now president for global research and development at Sanofi. "The tools are here."But the greatest challenge is to figure out how to prevent heart disease in the first place. And that is where the Del Sontro family comes in.Mr. Del Sontro had been more or less in denial about his family's heart disease problem until one of his sisters, Robin Ashwood, found out she had it. One Saturday morning about six years ago, she was running on a treadmill when her arms began to feel sore, as if she had done a tough workout with weights. She ended her workout, and the pain went away.But it came back later that day while she was shopping with her younger sister, Tina Del Sontro. Ms. Del Sontro pressed her sister to go to an emergency room, asking "Do you really want to die on the floor of Sam's Club?"
WASHINGTON (AP) — New research is raising fresh concern that an age-old treatment for troubled pregnancies — bed rest — doesn't seem to prevent premature birth, and might even worsen that risk.Doctors have known for years that there's no good evidence that bed rest offers any benefit for certain pregnancy complications, and it can cause side effects in the mother, not to mention emotional and financial strain. Yet estimates suggest nearly 1 in 5 moms-to-be is told to cut her activity — ranging from quitting work to actually staying in bed all day — at some point during pregnancy.Now, spurred by the latest study, some specialists are issuing a call for strict studies to finally settle the controversy — and until then, for doctors not to assume that a prescription to take it easy can't hurt."Bed rest is misperceived as an inexpensive, innocuous, logical recommendation," Dr. Joseph Biggio Jr. of the University of Alabama at Birmingham wrote in the latest issue of Obstetrics & Gynecology, a journal read by thousands of OB-GYNs.In a separate review of past studies that failed to support bed rest, a trio of obstetricians and ethicists at the University of North Carolina, Chapel Hill, went a step farther: They said it's not ethical to keep prescribing bed rest unless the women are enrolled in a research study, like they are for other unproven treatments.So why is rest prescribed so often? There aren't a lot of good treatments to prevent prematurity and other problems."Patients want you to do something, and physicians want to do something," explained Dr. Catherine Spong, a maternal-fetal medicine specialist at the National Institutes of Health who co-authored the latest research.Spong and colleagues took a closer look at a study of treatments for women at risk of premature birth because of an increasingly diagnosed complication called a short cervix. Bed rest is a broad term that doesn't just mean staying in bed all the time — and during that treatment study, doctors were free to decide if the participants also should restrict their activities, essentially offering a real-world test of the effects. The prescriptions ranged from no sexual activity, to partial or complete work restrictions, to complete restriction of non-work activity as well.Nearly 40 percent of the 646 pregnant women enrolled in the study were prescribed some type of activity restriction in the second or third trimester. Most were told to restrict all three types of activity — sexual, work and non-work — what's usually considered bed rest.The surprise: Some 37 percent of women who took the precautions had a premature baby, compared with just 17 percent of the women who didn't scale back, the researchers report in Obstetrics & Gynecology."The data suggests that bed rest does not prevent preterm birth in this high-risk population, but it doesn't definitively answer that question," cautioned Spong. She wants to see a more strict study — the kind that randomly assigns women to rest or not — to prove if there's a difference.The study also raises questions about harm, although the women who rested merely may have been at higher risk for a preemie. They were older and had somewhat more serious cervical complications. But the researchers pointed to other studies that link bed rest to increased stress and anxiety, both of which are associated with prematurity and smaller babies.Plus, bed rest is well known to increase a mother's risk of a dangerous blood clot, as well as side effects including bone and muscle loss.Interestingly, the new study found those who rested were more likely to have private insurance, raising questions about the influence of social rather than medical factors.The American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists says bed rest shouldn't be "routinely recommended" for prevention of preterm birth. And women face a tough decision when their doctors do bring it up.Sandy Lutton spent the last 18 weeks of her pregnancy lying flat in bed, forbidden even to prop up with her laptop, hoping it would prevent her twins from being born too soon."I'm not going to sugarcoat it, it was stressful," said the McLean, Va., woman, whose twins, now 2, were born healthy. "I had a lot of time to sit and worry."Her first son had been born on time, but she'd lost a second baby due to a weak cervix. With the twins, her doctors stitched her cervix closed and recommended strict bed rest, while making it clear there was no proof it would make a difference. Lutton bombarded them with questions, but eventually decided she had to try. Ultrasound exams showed her cervix stayed fine until doctors removed the stitch and delivered her babies; she even cheated with a little extra movement on exam days.Amid the uncertainty, March of Dimes medical adviser Dr. Siobhan Dolan said women shouldn't hesitate to ask their doctors about the pros and cons of restricting activity."Sometimes you feel less regret if you did something even though it didn't change the outcome," acknowledged Dolan, who herself has prescribed bed rest less often in recent years.
CHICAGO (AP) — One of the world's most glamorous women had an operation that once was terribly disfiguring — removal of both breasts. But new approaches are dramatically changing breast surgeries, whether to treat cancer or to prevent it as Angelina Jolie just chose to do. As Jolie said, "the results can be beautiful."Jolie revealed on Tuesday that she had a double mastectomy and reconstruction with implants because she carries a gene mutation that puts her at high risk of developing breast cancer.For women who already have the disease, the choice used to be whether to have the lump or the whole breast removed. Now there are more options that allow faster treatment, smaller scars, fewer long-term side effects and better cosmetic results. It has led to a new specialty — "oncoplastic" surgery — combining oncology, which focuses on cancer treatment, and plastic surgery to restore appearance."Cosmetics is very important" and can help a woman recover psychologically as well as physically, said Dr. Deanna Attai, a Burbank, Calif., surgeon who is on the board of directors of the American Society of Breast Surgeons. Its annual meeting in Chicago earlier this month featured many of these new approaches.More women are getting chemotherapy or hormone therapy before surgery to shrink large tumors enough to let them have a breast-conserving operation instead of a mastectomy. Fewer lymph nodes are being removed to check for cancer's spread, sparing women painful arm swelling for years afterward.Newer ways to rebuild breasts have made mastectomy a more appealing option for some women. More of them are getting immediate reconstruction with an implant at the same time the cancer is removed rather than several operations that have been standard for many years. Skin and nipples increasingly are being preserved for more natural results. Jolie, for example, was able to keep her nipples and presumably her skin.Some doctors are experimenting with operating on breast tumors through incisions in the armpit to avoid breast scars. There's even a "Goldilocks" mastectomy for large-breasted women — not too much or too little removed, and using excess skin to create a "just right" natural implant.Finally, doctors are testing a way to avoid surgery altogether, destroying small tumors by freezing them with a probe through the skin."Breast surgery has become more minimalistic," said Dr. Shawna Willey of Georgetown's Lombardi Comprehensive Cancer Center."Women have more options. It's much more complex decision-making."Breast cancer is the most common cancer in women around the world. In the U.S. alone, about 230,000 new cases are diagnosed each year.Most can be treated by just having the lump removed, but that requires radiation for weeks afterward to kill any stray cancer cells in the breast, plus frequent mammograms to watch for a recurrence.Many women don't want the worry or the radiation, and choose mastectomy even though they could have less drastic surgery. Mastectomy rates have been rising. Federal law requires insurers to cover reconstruction for mastectomy patients, and many of the improvements in surgery are aimed at making it less disfiguring.Here are some of the major trends:Doctors used to think it wasn't good to start reconstruction until cancer treatment had ended — surgery, chemotherapy, radiation. Women would have a mastectomy, which usually involves taking the skin and the nipple along with all the breast tissue, followed by operations months later to rebuild the breast.Reconstruction can use tissue from the back or belly, or an implant. The first operation often is to place a tissue expander, a balloon-like device that's gradually inflated to stretch the remaining skin and make room for the implant. A few months later, a second surgery is done to remove the expander and place the implant. Once that heals, a third operation is done to make a new nipple, followed by tattooing to make an areola, the darkened ring around it.The new trend is immediate reconstruction, with the first steps started at the time of the mastectomy, either to place a tissue expander or an implant. In some cases, the whole thing can be done in one operation.Nationally, about 25 to 30 percent of women get immediate reconstruction. At the Mayo Clinic, about half do, and at Georgetown, it's about 80 percent.Jolie wrote in an op-ed piece in the New York Times that she had tissue expanders and then implants placed nine weeks later. "There have been many advances in this procedure in the last few years, and the results can be beautiful," she wrote.Doctors usually take the skin when they do a mastectomy to make sure they leave no cancer behind. But in the last decade they increasingly have left the skin in certain women with favorable tumor characteristics — and women having preventive mastectomies, such as Jolie. Attai compares it to removing the inside of an orange while leaving the peel intact."We have learned over time that you can save skin" in many patients, Willey said. "Every single study has shown that it's safe."Now they're going the next step: preserving the nipple, which is even more at risk of being involved in cancer than the skin is. Only about 5 percent of women get this now, but eligibility could be expanded if it proves safe. The breast surgery society has a registry on nipple-sparing mastectomies that will track such women for 10 years."You really have to pick patients carefully," because no one wants to compromise cancer control for cosmetic reasons, Attai said."The preliminary data are that nipple-sparing is quite good," but studies haven't been long enough to know for sure, Willey said. "It makes a huge difference in the cosmetic outcome. That makes the woman's breast recognizable to her."Dr. Judy Boughey, a breast surgeon at the Mayo Clinic, said the new approach even has swayed patients' treatment choices."We're seeing women choosing the more invasive surgery, choosing the mastectomy," because of doctors' willingness to spare skin and nipples, she said.It helped persuade Rose Ragona, a 51-year-old operations supervisor at O'Hare Airport in Chicago. She had both breasts removed on April 19 with the most modern approach: Immediate reconstruction, with preservation of her skin and nipples."To wake up and just see your breasts there helped me immensely," she said.She chose to have both breasts removed to avoid radiation and future worry."I felt it was a safer road to go," she said. "I can't live the rest of my life in fear. Every time there's a lump I'm going to worry."Attai, the California breast surgeon, is one of the researchers in a national study testing cryoablation. The technique uses a probe cooled with liquid nitrogen that turns tumors into ice balls of dead tissue that's gradually absorbed by the body. This has been done since 2004 for benign breast tumors and the clinical trial is aimed at seeing if it's safe for cancer treatment."The technology is amazing. This is done in the office under local anesthesia, a little skin puncture," Attai said.In the study, women still have surgery at some point after the freezing treatment to make sure all the cancer is destroyed. If it proves safe and effective, it could eliminate surgery for certain cancer patients."I'd love to see the day when we can offer women with small breast tumors a completely non-operative approach, and I do think that's coming soon," Attai said.
WASHINGTON (AP) — New research is raising fresh concern that an age-old treatment for troubled pregnancies — bed rest — doesn't seem to prevent premature birth, and might even worsen that risk.Doctors have known for years that there's no good evidence that bed rest offers any benefit for certain pregnancy complications, and it can cause side effects in the mother, not to mention emotional and financial strain. Yet estimates suggest nearly 1 in 5 moms-to-be is told to cut her activity — ranging from quitting work to actually staying in bed all day — at some point during pregnancy.Now, spurred by the latest study, some specialists are issuing a call for strict studies to finally settle the controversy — and until then, for doctors not to assume that a prescription to take it easy can't hurt."Bed rest is misperceived as an inexpensive, innocuous, logical recommendation," Dr. Joseph Biggio Jr. of the University of Alabama at Birmingham wrote in the latest issue of Obstetrics & Gynecology, a journal read by thousands of OB-GYNs.In a separate review of past studies that failed to support bed rest, a trio of obstetricians and ethicists at the University of North Carolina, Chapel Hill, went a step farther: They said it's not ethical to keep prescribing bed rest unless the women are enrolled in a research study, like they are for other unproven treatments.So why is rest prescribed so often? There aren't a lot of good treatments to prevent prematurity and other problems."Patients want you to do something, and physicians want to do something," explained Dr. Catherine Spong, a maternal-fetal medicine specialist at the National Institutes of Health who co-authored the latest research.Spong and colleagues took a closer look at a study of treatments for women at risk of premature birth because of an increasingly diagnosed complication called a short cervix. Bed rest is a broad term that doesn't just mean staying in bed all the time — and during that treatment study, doctors were free to decide if the participants also should restrict their activities, essentially offering a real-world test of the effects. The prescriptions ranged from no sexual activity, to partial or complete work restrictions, to complete restriction of non-work activity as well.Nearly 40 percent of the 646 pregnant women enrolled in the study were prescribed some type of activity restriction in the second or third trimester. Most were told to restrict all three types of activity — sexual, work and non-work — what's usually considered bed rest.The surprise: Some 37 percent of women who took the precautions had a premature baby, compared with just 17 percent of the women who didn't scale back, the researchers report in Obstetrics & Gynecology."The data suggests that bed rest does not prevent preterm birth in this high-risk population, but it doesn't definitively answer that question," cautioned Spong. She wants to see a more strict study — the kind that randomly assigns women to rest or not — to prove if there's a difference.The study also raises questions about harm, although the women who rested merely may have been at higher risk for a preemie. They were older and had somewhat more serious cervical complications. But the researchers pointed to other studies that link bed rest to increased stress and anxiety, both of which are associated with prematurity and smaller babies.Plus, bed rest is well known to increase a mother's risk of a dangerous blood clot, as well as side effects including bone and muscle loss.Interestingly, the new study found those who rested were more likely to have private insurance, raising questions about the influence of social rather than medical factors.The American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists says bed rest shouldn't be "routinely recommended" for prevention of preterm birth. And women face a tough decision when their doctors do bring it up.Sandy Lutton spent the last 18 weeks of her pregnancy lying flat in bed, forbidden even to prop up with her laptop, hoping it would prevent her twins from being born too soon."I'm not going to sugarcoat it, it was stressful," said the McLean, Va., woman, whose twins, now 2, were born healthy. "I had a lot of time to sit and worry."Her first son had been born on time, but she'd lost a second baby due to a weak cervix. With the twins, her doctors stitched her cervix closed and recommended strict bed rest, while making it clear there was no proof it would make a difference. Lutton bombarded them with questions, but eventually decided she had to try. Ultrasound exams showed her cervix stayed fine until doctors removed the stitch and delivered her babies; she even cheated with a little extra movement on exam days.Amid the uncertainty, March of Dimes medical adviser Dr. Siobhan Dolan said women shouldn't hesitate to ask their doctors about the pros and cons of restricting activity."Sometimes you feel less regret if you did something even though it didn't change the outcome," acknowledged Dolan, who herself has prescribed bed rest less often in recent years.
CHICAGO (AP) — Treating breast cancer almost always involves surgery, and for years the choice was just having the lump or the whole breast removed. Now, new approaches are dramatically changing the way these operations are done, giving women more options, faster treatment, smaller scars, fewer long-term side effects and better cosmetic results.It has led to a new specialty — "oncoplastic" surgery — combining oncology, which focuses on cancer treatment, and plastic surgery to restore appearance."Cosmetics is very important" and can help a woman recover psychologically as well as physically, said Dr. Deanna Attai, a Burbank, Calif., surgeon who is on the board of directors of the American Society of Breast Surgeons. Its annual meeting in Chicago earlier this month featured many of these new approaches.And they're in the news today — actress Angelina Jolie revealed she had both breasts removed preventively because she carries a gene that puts her at high risk of developing breast cancer. She was able to preserve her nipples and had a series of operations to reconstruct her breasts with implants. There have been many advances and "results can be beautiful," she wrote in a personal essay in the New York Times.Some of those advances:More women are getting chemotherapy or hormone therapy before surgery to shrink large tumors enough to let them have a breast-conserving operation instead of a mastectomy. Fewer lymph nodes are being removed to check for cancer's spread, sparing women painful arm swelling for years afterward.Newer ways to rebuild breasts have made mastectomy a more appealing option for some women. More of them are getting immediate reconstruction with an implant at the same time the cancer is removed rather than several operations that have been standard for many years. Skin and nipples increasingly are being preserved for more natural results.Some doctors are experimenting with operating on breast tumors through incisions in the armpit to avoid breast scars. There's even a "Goldilocks" mastectomy for large-breasted women — not too much or too little removed, and using excess skin to create a "just right" natural implant.Finally, doctors are testing a way to avoid surgery altogether, destroying small tumors by freezing them with a probe through the skin."Breast surgery has become more minimalistic," said Dr. Shawna Willey of Georgetown's Lombardi Comprehensive Cancer Center."Women have more options. It's much more complex decision-making."Breast cancer is the most common cancer in women around the world. In the U.S. alone, about 230,000 new cases are diagnosed each year.Most can be treated by just having the lump removed, but that requires radiation for weeks afterward to kill any stray cancer cells in the breast, plus frequent mammograms to watch for a recurrence.Many women don't want the worry or the radiation, and choose mastectomy even though they could have less drastic surgery. Mastectomy rates have been rising. Federal law requires insurers to cover reconstruction for mastectomy patients, and many of the improvements in surgery are aimed at making it less disfiguring.Here are some of the major trends:Doctors used to think it wasn't good to start reconstruction until cancer treatment had ended — surgery, chemotherapy, radiation. Women would have a mastectomy, which usually involves taking the skin and the nipple along with all the breast tissue, followed by operations months later to rebuild the breast.Reconstruction can use tissue from the back or belly, or an implant. The first operation often is to place a tissue expander, a balloon-like device that's gradually inflated to stretch the remaining skin and make room for the implant. A few months later, a second surgery is done to remove the expander and place the implant. Once that heals, a third operation is done to make a new nipple, followed by tattooing to make an areola, the darkened ring around it.The new trend is immediate reconstruction, with the first steps started at the time of the mastectomy, either to place a tissue expander or an implant. In some cases, the whole thing can be done in one operation.Nationally, about 25 to 30 percent of women get immediate reconstruction. At the Mayo Clinic, about half do, and at Georgetown, it's about 80 percent.Doctors usually take the skin when they do a mastectomy to make sure they leave no cancer behind. But in the last decade they increasingly have left the skin in certain women with favorable tumor characteristics. Attai compares it to removing the inside of an orange while leaving the peel intact."We have learned over time that you can save skin" in many patients, Willey said. "Every single study has shown that it's safe."Now they're going the next step: preserving the nipple, which is even more at risk of being involved in cancer than the skin is. Only about 5 percent of women get this now, but eligibility could be expanded if it proves safe. The breast surgery society has a registry on nipple-sparing mastectomies that will track such women for 10 years."You really have to pick patients carefully," because no one wants to compromise cancer control for cosmetic reasons, Attai said."The preliminary data are that nipple-sparing is quite good," but studies haven't been long enough to know for sure, Willey said. "It makes a huge difference in the cosmetic outcome. That makes the woman's breast recognizable to her."Dr. Judy Boughey, a breast surgeon at the Mayo Clinic, said the new approach even has swayed patients' treatment choices."We're seeing women choosing the more invasive surgery, choosing the mastectomy," because of doctors' willingness to spare skin and nipples, she said.It helped persuade Rose Ragona, a 51-year-old operations supervisor at O'Hare Airport in Chicago. She had both breasts removed on April 19 with the most modern approach: Immediate reconstruction, with preservation of her skin and nipples."To wake up and just see your breasts there helped me immensely," she said.She chose to have both breasts removed to avoid radiation and future worry."I felt it was a safer road to go," she said. "I can't live the rest of my life in fear. Every time there's a lump I'm going to worry."Attai, the California breast surgeon, is one of the researchers in a national study testing cryoablation. The technique uses a probe cooled with liquid nitrogen that turns tumors into ice balls of dead tissue that's gradually absorbed by the body. This has been done since 2004 for benign breast tumors and the clinical trial is aimed at seeing if it's safe for cancer treatment."The technology is amazing. This is done in the office under local anesthesia, a little skin puncture," Attai said.In the study, women still have surgery at some point after the freezing treatment to make sure all the cancer is destroyed. If it proves safe and effective, it could eliminate surgery for certain cancer patients."I'd love to see the day when we can offer women with small breast tumors a completely non-operative approach, and I do think that's coming soon," Attai said.
NEW YORK — In a story May 15 about a new SARS-like virus spreading from patients to health care workers in Saudi Arabia, The Associated Press reported erroneously the location of the 20 deaths attributed to the virus. There have been no deaths reported in France and Qatar, only in Saudi Arabia, Jordan, Germany and Britain.The story also said that the spread to health care workers was new. Health workers were previously infected in a cluster in Jordan before the new coronavirus had been identified.A corrected version of the story is below:2 Saudi Arabia health care workers get SARS-like virus; officials consider naming it MERSNEW YORK (AP) — A deadly new respiratory virus related to SARS has apparently spread from patients to health care workers in eastern Saudi Arabia, health officials said Wednesday.The Ministry of Health in Saudi Arabia told world health officials that two health care workers became ill this month after being exposed to patients with the virus. One is critically ill.Since September 2012, the World Health Organization has been informed of 40 confirmed cases of the virus, and 20 of the patients have died. The deaths occurred in Britain, Germany, Saudi Arabia, and Jordan.Experts have suggested calling the new virus MERS, for Middle East Respiratory Syndrome, but officials have not signed off on that yet.Experts are watching carefully for signs that the deadly virus can spread from person-to-person. Health officials say the virus has likely already spread between people in some circumstances, including hospital patients in France.The new virus has caused severe respiratory disease in patients, some of them needing mechanical ventilators to help them breathe.One of the Saudi health care workers is a 45-year-old man who is in critical condition. The other is a 43-year-old woman in stable condition. No other details about their jobs or where they work were released. Health workers were previously infected in a cluster in Jordan, though that was before the new coronavirus had been identified and before any special measures were taken to prevent its spread. That is not the case in Saudi Arabia and officials worry any new spread to health workers could suggest the virus is becoming more transmissible to people.The new virus has been compared to SARS, an unusual pneumonia that first surfaced in China in late 2002 and erupted into a deadly international outbreak in early 2003. Spread of the virus in hospitals was a key development in the epidemic.Ultimately, more than 8,000 cases were reported in about 30 countries, including eight people in the United States. The global tally included 774 deaths.The SARS outbreak was declared contained by the summer of 2003, thanks to such measures as quarantines, hospital isolation of suspected cases, travel restrictions and the screening of airline passengers.The WHO is currently not recommending any travel restrictions or special screening at airports or border crossings. Officials worry it will flare into an outbreak as big or worse. The new virus and SARS are both coronaviruses, a germ family that includes some cold viruses.The new virus is distinct from SARS, but health officials worry it has potential to flare into a SARS-like international outbreak. But many questions remain about how it is spread, where it originated, and how deadly it truly is.
CHICAGO (AP) — In the new psychiatric manual of mental disorders, grief soon after a loved one's death can be considered major depression. Extreme childhood temper tantrums get a fancy name. And certain "senior moments" are called "mild neurocognitive disorder."Those changes are just some of the reasons prominent critics say the American Psychiatric Association is out of control, turning common human problems into mental illnesses in a trend they say will just make the "pop-a-pill" culture worse.Says a former leader of the group: "Normal needs to be saved from powerful forces trying to convince us that we are all sick."At issue is the fifth edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, widely known as the DSM-5. The DSM has long been considered the authoritative source for diagnosing mental problems.The psychiatric association formally introduces the nearly 1,000-page revised version this weekend in San Francisco. It's the manual's first major update in nearly 20 years, and a backlash has taken shape in recent weeks:— Two new books by mental health experts, "Saving Normal" and "The Book of Woe," say the world's most widely used psychiatric guide has lost credibility.— A British psychologists' group is criticizing the DSM-5, calling for a "paradigm shift" away from viewing mental problems as a disease. An organization of German therapists also attacked the new guide.— Even the head of the U.S. National Institute of Mental Health complained that the book lacks scientific validity.This week, the NIMH director, Dr. Thomas Insel, tried to patch things up as he and the psychiatrists group issued a joint statement saying they have similar goals for improving the diagnosis and treatment of mental illness.The manual's release comes at a time of increased scrutiny of health care costs and concern about drug company influence over doctors. Critics point to a landscape in which TV ads describe symptoms for mental disorders and promote certain drugs to treat them."Way too much treatment is given to the normal 'worried well' who are harmed by it; far too little help is available for those who are really ill and desperately need it," Dr. Allen Frances writes in "Saving Normal." He is a retired Duke University professor who headed the psychiatry group's task force that worked on the previous handbook.He says the new version adds new diagnoses "that would turn everyday anxiety, eccentricity, forgetting and bad eating habits into mental disorders."Previous revisions were also loudly criticized, but the latest one comes at a time of soaring diagnoses of illnesses listed in the manual — including autism, attention deficit disorder and bipolar disorder — and billions of dollars spent each year on psychiatric drugs.The group's 34,000 members are psychiatrists — medical doctors who specialize in treating mental illness. Unlike psychologists and other therapists without medical degrees, they can prescribe medication. While there has long been rivalry between the two groups, the DSM-5 revisions have stoked the tensions.The most contentious changes include:— Diagnosing as major depression the extreme sadness, weight loss, fatigue and trouble sleeping some people experience after a loved one's death. Major depression is typically treated with antidepressants.— Calling frequent, extreme temper tantrums "disruptive mood dysregulation disorder," a new diagnosis. The psychiatric association says the label is meant to apply to youngsters who in the past might have been misdiagnosed as having bipolar disorder. Critics say it turns normal tantrums into mental illness.— Diagnosing mental decline that goes a bit beyond normal aging as "mild neurocognitive disorder." Affected people may find it takes more effort to pay bills or manage their medications. Critics of the term say it will stigmatize "senior moments."— Calling excessive thoughts or feelings about pain or other discomfort "somatic symptom disorder," something that could affect the healthy as well as cancer patients. Critics say the term turns normal reactions to a disease into mental illness.— Adding binge eating as a new category for overeating that occurs at least once a week for at least three months. It could apply to people who sometimes gulp down a pint of ice cream when they're alone and then feel guilty about it.— Removing Asperger's syndrome as a separate diagnosis and putting it under the umbrella term "autism spectrum disorder."Dr. David Kupfer, chairman of the task force that oversaw the DSM-5, said the changes are based on solid research and will help make sure people get accurate diagnoses and treatment.Dr. Jeffrey Lieberman, the psychiatry association's incoming president, said challenging the handbook's credibility "is completely unwarranted." The book establishes diagnoses "so patients can receive the best care," he said, adding that it takes into account the most up-to-date scientific knowledge.But Insel, the government mental health agency chief, wrote in a recent blog posting that the guidebook is no better than a dictionary-like list of labels and definitions.He told The Associated Press he favors a very different approach to diagnosis that is based more on biological information, similar to how doctors diagnose heart disease or problems with other organs.Yet there's scant hard evidence pinpointing what goes wrong in the brain when someone develops mental illness. Insel's agency two years ago began a research project to create a new way to diagnose mental illness, using brain imaging, genetics and other evolving scientific evidence. That project will take years.The revisions in the new guide were suggested by work groups the psychiatric association assigned to evaluate different mental illnesses and recent research advances. The association's board of trustees decided in December which recommendations to include.Advocacy groups have threatened Occupy-style protests and boycotts at this week's meeting."The psychiatric industry, allied with Big Pharma, have massively misled the public," the Occupy Psychiatry group contends. Organizers include Alaska lawyer Jim Gottstein, who has long fought against overuse of psychiatric drugs.The new manual "will drastically expand psychiatric diagnosis, mislabel millions of people as mentally ill, and cause unnecessary treatment with medication," says the website for the Committee to Boycott the DSM-5, organized by New York social worker Jack Carney.Committee member Courtney Fitzpatrick, whose 9-year-old son died seven years ago while hospitalized for a blood vessel disease, said she has joined support groups for grieving parents "and by no means are we mentally ill because we are sad about our kids that have died."Gary Greenberg, a Connecticut psychotherapist and author of "The Book of Woe," says pharmaceutical industry influence in psychiatry has contributed to turning normal conditions into diseases so that drugs can be prescribed to treat them.Many of the 31 task force members involved in developing the revised guidebook have had financial ties to makers of psychiatric drugs, including consulting fees, research grants or stock.Group leaders dismiss that criticism and emphasize they agreed not to collect more than $10,000 in industry money in the calendar year preceding publication of the manual.
One of the defining moments in the history of breast cancer occurred in 1974 when the first lady, Betty Ford, spoke openly about her mastectomy , lifting a veil of secrecy from the disease and ushering in a new era of breast cancer awareness.Now four decades later, another leading lady — the actress Angelina Jolie — has focused public attention on breast cancer again, but this time with an even bolder message: A woman at genetic risk should feel empowered to remove both breasts as a way to prevent the disease. Ms. Jolie revealed on Tuesday that because she carries a cancer-causing mutation, she has had a double mastectomy."She's the biggest name of all, and I think given her prominence and her visibility not only as a famous person but also a beautiful actress, it's going to carry a lot of weight for women," said Barron H. Lerner, a medical historian and the author of "The Breast Cancer Wars."Breast cancer experts and advocates applauded the manner in which Ms. Jolie explored her options and made informed decisions, saying it might influence some women with strong family histories of breast cancer to get genetic tests.But some doctors also expressed worry that her disclosure could be misinterpreted by other women, fueling the trend toward mastectomies that are not medically necessary for many early-stage breast cancers. In recent years, doctors have reported a virtual epidemic of preventive mastectomies among women who have cancer in one breast and decide to remove the healthy one as well, even though they do not have genetic mutations that increase their risk and their odds of a second breast cancer are very low.Ms. Jolie wrote on the Op-Ed page of The New York Times that she had tested positive for a genetic mutation known as BRCA1, which left her with an exceedingly high risk for developing breast and ovarian cancer. Her mother died at 56 after nearly a decade with cancer, though Ms. Jolie did not specify which type. After genetic counseling, Ms. Jolie opted to have both breasts removed and to undergo reconstructive surgery.Ms. Jolie, 37, who declined to be interviewed for this article, was treated at the Pink Lotus Breast Center in Beverly Hills, Calif., a clinic opened in 2009 by Dr. Kristi Funk, identified on its Web site as a former director of patient education at the breast center at Cedars-Sinai Medical Center in Los Angeles.Her condition is rare. Mutations in BRCA1 and another gene called BRCA2 are estimated to cause only 5 percent to 10 percent of breast cancers and 10 percent to 15 percent of ovarian cancers among white women in the United States. The mutations are found in other racial and ethnic groups as well, but it is not known how common they are.About 30 percent of women who are found to have BRCA mutations choose preventive mastectomies, said Dr. Kenneth Offit, chief of clinical genetics at Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center in New York. Those who have seen family members die young from the disease are most likely to opt for the surgery."It's important to make it clear that a BRCA mutation is a special, high-risk situation," said Dr. Monica Morrow, chief of the breast service at Sloan-Kettering. For women at very high risk, preventive mastectomy makes sense, but few women fall into that category, she said.For women's health advocates, the trend toward double mastectomies in women who do not have mutations is frustrating. Studies in the 1970s and 1980s proved that for many patients, lumpectomy was as safe as mastectomy, and the findings were seen as a victory for women.Even so, there is increasing demand for mastectomy. Dr. Morrow says that she has often tried to talk patients out of it without success. Some imagine their risk of new or recurring cancer to be far higher than it really is. Others think that their breasts will match up better if both are removed and reconstructed."She is a special case, and you can completely understand why she did it," said Dr. Susan Love, the author of a best-seller, "Dr. Susan Love's Breast Book," and a breast surgeon. "But what I hope that people realize is that we really don't have good prevention for breast cancer. When you have to cut off normal body parts to prevent a disease, that's really pretty barbaric when you think about it."
In a report that undercuts years of public health warnings, a prestigious group convened by the government says there is no good reason based on health outcomes for many Americans to drive their sodium consumption down to the very low levels recommended in national dietary guidelines.Those levels, 1,500 milligrams of sodium a day, or a little more than half a teaspoon of salt, were supposed to prevent heart attacks and strokes in people at risk, including anyone older than 50, blacks and people with high blood pressure, diabetes or chronic kidney disease — groups that make up more than half of the American population.Some influential organizations, including the American Heart Association, have said that everyone, not just those at risk, should aim for that very low sodium level. The heart association reaffirmed that position in an interview with its spokesman on Monday, even in light of the new report.But the new expert committee, commissioned by the Institute of Medicine at the behest of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, said there was no rationale for anyone to aim for sodium levels below 2,300 milligrams a day. The group examined new evidence that had emerged since the last such report was issued, in 2005."As you go below the 2,300 mark, there is an absence of data in terms of benefit and there begin to be suggestions in subgroup populations about potential harms," said Dr. Brian L. Strom, chairman of the committee and a professor of public health at the University of Pennsylvania. He explained that the possible harms included increased rates of heart attacks and an increased risk of death.The committee was not asked to specify an optimal amount of sodium and did not make any recommendations about how much people should consume. Dr. Strom said people should not eat too much salt, but he also said that the data on the health effects of sodium were too inconsistent for the committee to say what the upper limit of sodium consumption should be.Until about 2006, almost all studies on salt and health outcomes relied on the well-known fact that blood pressure can drop slightly when people eat less salt. From that, and from other studies linking blood pressure to risks of heart attacks and strokes, researchers created models showing how many lives could be saved if people ate less salt.The United States dietary guidelines, based on the 2005 Institute of Medicine report, recommend that the general population aim for sodium levels of 1,500 to 2,300 milligrams a day because those levels will not raise blood pressure. The average sodium consumption in the United States, and around the world, is about 3,400 milligrams a day, according to the Institute of Medicine — an amount that has not changed in decades.But more recently, researchers began looking at the actual consequences of various levels of salt consumption, as found in rates of heart attacks, strokes and death, not just blood pressure readings. Some of what they found was troubling.One 2008 study the committee examined, for example, randomly assigned 232 Italian patients with aggressively treated moderate to severe congestive heart failure to consume either 2,760 or 1,840 milligrams of sodium a day, but otherwise to consume the same diet. Those consuming the lower level of sodium had more than three times the number of hospital readmissions — 30 as compared with 9 in the higher-salt group — and more than twice as many deaths — 15 as compared with 6 in the higher-salt group.Another study, published in 2011, followed 28,800 subjects with high blood pressure ages 55 and older for 4.7 years and analyzed their sodium consumption by urinalysis. The researchers reported that the risks of heart attacks, strokes, congestive heart failure and death from heart disease increased significantly for those consuming more than 7,000 milligrams of sodium a day and for those consuming fewer than 3,000 milligrams of sodium a day.There are physiological consequences of consuming little sodium, said Dr. Michael H. Alderman, a dietary sodium expert at Albert Einstein College of Medicine who was not a member of the committee. As sodium levels plunge, triglyceride levels increase, insulin resistance increases, and the activity of the sympathetic nervous system increases. Each of these factors can increase the risk of heart disease."Those are all bad things," Dr. Alderman said. "A health effect can't be predicted by looking at one physiological consequence. There has to be a net effect."Medical and public health experts responded to the new assessment of the evidence with elation or concern, depending on where they stand in the salt debates.
CHICAGO — As the guitarist strums and softly sings a lullaby in Spanish, tiny Augustin Morales stops squirming in his hospital crib and closes his eyes.This is therapy in a newborn intensive care unit, and research suggests that music may help those born way too soon adapt to life outside the womb.Some tiny preemies are too small and fragile to be held and comforted by human touch, and many are often fussy and show other signs of stress. Other common complications include immature lungs, eye disease, problems with sucking, and sleeping and alertness difficulties.Recent studies and anecdotal reports suggest the vibrations and soothing rhythms of music, especially performed live in the hospital, might benefit preemies and other sick babies.Many insurers won't pay for music therapy because of doubts that it results in any lasting medical improvement. Some doctors say the music works best at relieving babies' stress and helping parents bond with infants too sick to go home.But amid beeping monitors, IV poles and plastic breathing tubes in infants' rooms at Chicago's Ann & Robert H. Lurie Children's Hospital, music therapist Elizabeth Klinger provides a soothing contrast that even the tiniest babies seem to notice"What music therapy can uniquely provide is that passive listening experience that just encourages relaxation for the patient, encourages participation by the family," Klinger said after a recent session in Augustin's hospital room.The baby's parents, Lucy Morales and Alejandro Moran, stood at the crib and whispered lovingly to their son as Klinger played traditional lullabies, singing in Spanish and English."The music relaxes him, it makes him feel more calm" and helps him sleep better too, Lucy Morales said. "Sometimes it makes us cry."Some families request rock music or other high-tempo songs, but Klinger always slows the beat to make it easier on tender ears."A lot of times families become afraid of interacting with their children because they are so sick and so frail, and music provides them something that they can still do," Klinger said, who works full time as a music therapist but her services are provided for free.Music therapists say live performances in hospitals are better than recorded music because patients can feel the music vibrations and also benefit from seeing the musicians.More than two dozen U.S. hospitals offer music therapy in their newborn intensive care units and its popularity is growing, said Joanne Loewy, a music therapist who directs a music and medicine program at Beth Israel Medical Center in New York.Preemies' music therapy was even featured on a recent episode of the hit TV show "American Idol," when show finalist Kree Harrison watched a therapist working with a tiny baby at Children's Hospital Los Angeles."Music is such a huge part of our lives and to do something like this, make it a sort of healing process, is a cool thing," Harrison said on the April 25 episode.Dr. Natalia Henner, a newborn specialist at Lurie hospital, said studies in nursing journals show music therapy for preemies "does help with promoting growth. And there's some good literature ... saying that the time to discharge is a little bit shorter in babies who've been exposed to more music therapy."She said it "definitely facilitates bonding" between parents of preemies and other babies too sick to go home.Loewy led a study published last month in the journal Pediatrics, involving 11 U.S. hospitals. Therapists in the study played special small drums to mimic womb sounds and timed the rhythm to match the infants' heartbeats. The music appeared to slow the infants' heartbeats, calm their breathing, and improve sucking and sleeping, Loewy said.Soozie Cotter-Schaufele, a music therapist at Advocate Children's Hospital-Park Ridge near Chicago, says soothing rhythmic sounds of music can mimic womb sounds and provide a comforting environment for preemies. She sings and plays a small harp or guitar, and says the sounds help calm tiny babies while they're undergoing painful medical procedures.Cotter-Schaufele said she recently heard from a woman whose daughter was born prematurely at her hospital six years ago. She had played the 1960s folk song "Today" for the infant.The mother reported her daughter "'still loves that song," She said 'She didn't learn that song from me, she learned it from you,'" Cotter-Schaufele said.
DOGS may be our best friends, but that doesn't necessarily make them the easiest exercise partners. The fitness trainer Angi Aramburu thinks otherwise, though, and this spring she started Go Fetch Run, an exercise class in which owners and their dogs can work out and play together.On a recent Monday evening a small group of people gathered with leashes in hand at the 15th Street entrance to Prospect Park in Brooklyn. As the sun was starting to set, Ms. Aramburu led them on a jog into the park, past the blooming magnolias.After spending an uneventful day indoors, the four dogs in attendance were gung ho, tails wagging, though compliance was another matter. As they trotted along, Ms. Aramburu, carrying a large bag of props, had them stop to practice sitting and staying. Oppa, a rambunctious 2-year-old Labrador-terrier mix who established herself as the class clown, remained standing, seeming to shake her head "no," turning her nose up at a cookie bribe.The group arrived at a grassy clearing next to the main road where runners and cyclists steadily flowed past. The humans began a cardio warm-up that included jump squats, while the dogs stood by, sussing out the smells. Then Millie, a 6-year-old flat-coated retriever, grabbed the leash from her owner and made a run for it, prompting a chase.Next there were power skips, forward walking lunges with kicks and a bear crawl — the owners going back and forth between pylons with the dogs at their sides. Then everyone was sent on the first of many trips sprinting up a nearby hill, where all did 10 push-ups or jumping jacks before returning, humans and dogs both catching their breath.Ms. Aramburu, 37, who has a Chihuahua and two small children, said she always had difficulty balancing her own need for exercise with that of her dog. But after joining and eventually becoming an instructor with Stroller Strides, an exercise class held in the park for parents with their babies, she hit on the idea. "I thought, you could do this with your dog," she said.She put together a 60-minute cross-training sequence that integrates cardio, strength, balance and agility. (She also created a 5K running program.) The idea, she explained, is to tire out the dogs, both mentally and physically. "A tired dog is a good dog," she said.This kind of activity is just what Michelle Herman, a nurse who lives in Park Slope, Brooklyn, needed for her mischievous, high-energy 2-year-old Labrador-collie mix, Eliot, who was showing signs of progress in this, his third class. As for Ms. Herman, 50, the workout was challenging, she said, but doing it with her companion was motivating."Exercising with my dog is so much more fun than doing it by myself," she said.The highlight of the session was an owner-dog obstacle course that included jumping over a pole and through a hoop, zigzagging across pylons, crawling through a tunnel and hopping over a rope ladder. Once everyone got the hang of it, the dogs and their masters seemed to have a ball.Later, as the owners did abdominal exercises in a circle, Oppa broke away, ran up to the top of the hill and then barreled down full-throttle toward the group. The other dogs nearly joined in the uprising, going into a momentary frenzy before order was quickly restored.By the end of class, the dogs were all quite subdued. Millie was lounging at the feet of her owner, Frances Largeman-Roth, 39, a cookbook author and dietitian who lives nearby. She said Millie hadn't been getting enough exercise lately, and since the dog was competing with two small children for attention, had been experiencing some neglect."She loved that I was spending time alone with her," Ms. Largeman-Roth said. "This showed me that I can actually get a good workout and hang with the dog at the same time."
BROWNSVILLE, Tex. — Becoming an American can be bad for your health.A growing body of mortality research on immigrants has shown that the longer they live in this country, the worse their rates of heart disease, high blood pressure and diabetes. And while their American-born children may have more money, they tend to live shorter lives than the parents.The pattern goes against any notion that moving to America improves every aspect of life. It also demonstrates that at least in terms of health, worries about assimilation for the country's 11 million illegal immigrants are mistaken. In fact, it is happening all too quickly."There's something about life in the United States that is not conducive to good health across generations," said Robert A. Hummer, a social demographer at the University of Texas at Austin.For Hispanics, now the nation's largest immigrant group, the foreign-born live about three years longer than their American-born counterparts, several studies have found.Why does life in the United States — despite its sophisticated health care system and high per capita wages — lead to worse health? New research is showing that the immigrant advantage wears off with the adoption of American behaviors — smoking, drinking, high-calorie diets and sedentary lifestyles.Here in Brownsville, a worn border city studded with fast-food restaurants, immigrants say that happens slowly, almost imperceptibly. In America, foods like ham and bread that are not supposed to be sweet are. And children lose their taste for traditional Mexican foods like cactus and beans.For the recently arrived, the quantity and accessibility of food speaks to the boundless promise of the United States. Esther Angeles remembers being amazed at the size of hamburgers — as big as dinner plates — when she first came to the United States from Mexico 15 years ago."I thought, this is really a country of opportunity," she said. "Look at the size of the food!"Fast-food fare not only tasted good, but was also a sign of success, a family treat that new earnings put in reach."The crispiness was delicious," said Juan Muniz, 62, recalling his first visit to Church's Chicken with his family in the late 1970s. "I was proud and excited to eat out. I'd tell them: 'Let's go eat. We can afford it now.' ""You work so hard, you want to use your money in a smart way," said Aris Ramirez, a community health worker in Brownsville, explaining the thinking. "So when they hear 'twice the fries for an extra 49 cents,' people think, 'That's economical.' "For Ms. Angeles, the excitement of big food eventually wore off, and the frantic pace of the modern American workplace took over. She found herself eating hamburgers more because they were convenient and she was busy in her 78-hour-a-week job as a housekeeper. What is more, she lost control over her daughter's diet because, as a single mother, she was rarely with her at mealtimes.Robert O. Valdez, a professor of family and community medicine and economics at the University of New Mexico, said, "All the things we tell people to do from a clinical perspective today — a lot of fiber and less meat — were exactly the lifestyle habits that immigrants were normally keeping."As early as the 1970s, researchers found that immigrants lived several years longer than American-born whites even though they tended to have less education and lower income, factors usually associated with worse health. That gap has grown since 1980. Less clear, however, was what happened to immigrants and their American-born offspring after a lifetime in the United States.Evidence is mounting that the second generation does worse. Elizabeth Arias, a demographer at the National Center for Health Statistics, has made exploratory estimates based on data from 2007 to 2009, which show that Hispanic immigrants live 2.9 years longer than American-born Hispanics. The finding, which has not yet been published, is similar to those in earlier studies.
WASHINGTON — New research is challenging medical guidelines that say people with a heart-zapping device in their chests should avoid intense sports like basketball and soccer in favor of golf or bowling.Lots of patients ignore that take-it-easy advice and stay in the game, and Monday's findings suggest vigorous exercise may be safe for many of them after all.A registry tracked 372 people who stuck with competitive sports after having a defibrillator surgically implanted to guard against dangerous irregular heartbeats — and found that the lifesaving device worked when needed despite the physical exertion."This is good guidance for many of the sports. It should be reassuring that in fact many people can participate," said Dr. Gordon Tomaselli, a former American Heart Association president who wasn't involved with the new study — and cautions that questions remain.More than 100,000 defibrillators are implanted in U.S. patients every year, devices that can detect when an abnormal heartbeat is forming and automatically shock the heart to help it get back into rhythm. Most recipients are older people with heart failure, too sick to worry about sports.But increasingly, teenagers and younger adults receive these implants, people who may be more active and fit but have some underlying heart abnormality that puts them at risk of an arrhythmia. Last year, Utah State forward Danny Berger collapsed on the basketball court, was revived and had a defibrillator implanted; he has said he hopes to play again. Harder still is how to advise people who get the implants as a precaution, before any symptoms of trouble.The big questions: Do the implants fire properly under the physical duress of competitive sports? Do they emit painful shocks more often? Might they break with a hit to the chest?To begin finding out, Yale University heart specialist Dr. Rachel Lampert opened a national registry that, over 2½ years, tracked defibrillator patients who decided to stick with sports. They included some high school and college athletes, as well as people who participated in community-level basketball, soccer, tennis and other sports or were runners, skiers, even a few rock climbers.The implants did have to fire more often during physical activity, whether the people were playing ball or running for the bus. But they did their job — no one died, had to be resuscitated or experienced a shock-related injury, Lampert reported Monday in the journal Circulation.During the study, 77 people received shocks: 10 percent during sports, 8 percent during other physical activities and 6 percent while resting. About two-thirds who received a shock did return to their sport rather than deciding to give it up, Lampert said."Despite the fact that people got shocked, they didn't have anything dangerous happen to them: The device worked," she said."It doesn't mean every patient can be doing every sport," Lampert added, advising that implant recipients talk with their doctors first. But, "we probably don't need the blanket restrictions in place."However, the study is small and Tomaselli, the former heart association president, warned among the top concerns is whether contact sports, such as football and hockey, might loosen the implant. Too few of those patients enrolled in the registry to draw conclusions.In addition, some patients with a rare heart condition required multiple shocks when they had an irregular heartbeat.Still, "one of the reasons for having a defibrillator is to restore as much of a normal life as you possibly can," Tomaselli noted. To many people, "taking away competitive athletics is taking away a part of them."When people do continue sports with the implant, Tomaselli said coaches, family and others must be fully aware of the risks — and there should be an external defibrillator available during competition and practice in case the implant fails and emergency resuscitation is needed.The study was paid for by three defibrillator manufacturers.
In a medical first, doctors used plastic particles and a 3-D laser printer to create an airway splint to save the life of a baby boy who used to stop breathing nearly every day.It's the latest advance from the booming field of regenerative medicine, making body parts in the lab.In the case of Kaiba (KEYE'-buh) Gionfriddo, doctors didn't have a moment to spare. Because of a birth defect, the little Ohio boy's airway kept collapsing, causing his breathing to stop and often his heart, too. Doctors in Michigan had been researching artificial airway splints but had not implanted one in a patient yet.In a single day, they "printed out" 100 tiny tubes, using computer-guided lasers to stack and fuse thin layers of plastic instead of paper and ink to form various shapes and sizes. The next day, with special permission from the Food and Drug Administration, they implanted one of these tubes in Kaiba, the first time this has been done.Suddenly, a baby that doctors had said would probably not leave the hospital alive could breathe normally for the first time. He was 3 months old when the operation was done last year and is nearly 19 months old now. He is about to have his tracheotomy tube removed; it was placed when he was a couple months old and needed a breathing machine. And he has not had a single breathing crisis since coming home a year ago."He's a pretty healthy kid right now," said Dr. Glenn Green, a pediatric ear, nose and throat specialist at C.S. Mott Children's Hospital of the University of Michigan in Ann Arbor, where the operation was done. It's described in Thursday's New England Journal of Medicine.Independent experts praised the work and the potential for 3-D printing to create more body parts to solve unmet medical needs."It's the wave of the future," said Dr. Robert Weatherly, a pediatric specialist at the University of Missouri in Kansas City. "I'm impressed by what they were able to accomplish."So far, only a few adults have had trachea, or windpipe transplants, usually to replace ones destroyed by cancer. The windpipes came from dead donors or were lab-made, sometimes using stem cells. Last month, a 2-year-old girl born without a windpipe received one grown from her own stem cells onto a plastic scaffold at a hospital in Peoria, Ill.Kaiba had a different problem — an incompletely formed bronchus, one of the two airways that branch off the windpipe like pant legs to the lungs. About 2,000 babies are born with such defects each year in the United States and most outgrow them by age 2 or 3, as more tissue develops.In severe cases, parents learn of the defect when the child suddenly stops breathing and dies. That almost happened when Kaiba was 6 weeks old at a restaurant with his parents, April and Bryan Gionfriddo, who live in Youngstown, in northeast Ohio."He turned blue and stopped breathing on us," and his father did CPR to revive him, April Gionfriddo said.More episodes followed, and Kaiba had to go on a breathing machine when he was 2 months old. Doctors told the couple his condition was grave."Quite a few of them said he had a good chance of not leaving the hospital alive. It was pretty scary," his mother said. "We pretty much prayed every night, hoping that he would pull through."Then a doctor at Akron Children's Hospital, Marc Nelson, suggested the experimental work in Michigan. Researchers there were testing airway splints made from biodegradable polyester that is sometimes used to repair bone and cartilage.Kaiba had the operation on Feb. 9, 2012. The splint was placed around his defective bronchus, which was stitched to the splint to keep it from collapsing. The splint has a slit along its length so it can expand and grow as the child does — something a permanent, artificial implant could not do.The plastic is designed to degrade and gradually be absorbed by the body over three years, as healthy tissue forms to replace it, said the biomedical engineer who led the work, Scott Hollister.Green and Scott Hollister have a patent pending on the device and Hollister has a financial interest in a company that makes scaffolds for implants.Dr. John Bent, a pediatric specialist at New York's Albert Einstein College of Medicine, said only time will tell if this proves to be a permanent solution, but he praised the researchers for persevering to develop it."I can think of a handful of children I have seen in the last two decades who suffered greatly ... that likely would have benefited from this technology," Bent said.
NEW YORK — The nation's record-low teen birth rate stems from robust declines in nearly every state, but most dramatically in several Mountain States and among Hispanics, according to a new government report.All states but West Virginia and North Dakota showed significant drops over five years. But the Mountain States of Arizona, Colorado, Idaho, Nevada and Utah saw rates fall by 30 percent or more.In 22 states, teen Hispanic birth rates plunged at least 40 percent, which was described as "just amazing," by the report's lead author, Brady Hamilton of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.What's driving the declines? No one can say for sure. Experts believe the explanation is complicated and probably varies a bit from state to state. The national figure has been falling since 1991, aside from a brief interruption in 2006 and 2007.The CDC report released Thursday is based on birth certificates for 2007 through 2011. Last year, the CDC announced the overall improvement in teen births: a record low of 31 births per 1,000 teens ages 15 to 19. That compares with 42 births per 1,000 five years earlier.The new report focuses on state figures in 2011:— Lowest rates are in New Hampshire, Massachusetts, Connecticut and Vermont, each with rates under 17 per 1,000.— Highest rates overall continue to be in the South, led by Arkansas and Mississippi, each with rates of about 50 per 1,000. In Arkansas, the majority of teen births are to white moms. In Mississippi, the majority are black.— White teens continue to have the lowest birth rate nationally — about 22 births per 1,000. Black teens saw a larger improvement, but their rate was still more than twice the white rate, at 47 per 1,000.— Overall, the Hispanic rate plummeted from 75 to 49 per 1,000, now virtually a tie with the black rate.The teen drop in the last five years coincided with an overall decline in births, which experts attribute to a weak economy that dampened enthusiasm for having children.Hispanic women have been part of that trend, possibly due to the economy and to illegal immigration crackdowns in some states that reduce the number of young Hispanic females entering the country from Mexico and other nations, said John Santelli, a Columbia University professor of population and family health.That means new immigrants are having less impact on birth statistics, and second- and third-generation families are having more influence.As time goes on, Hispanics — like other immigrant groups before them — tend to adopt American customs and practices."There is more attention on education, career, and the future," said Dr. Janet Realini, head of Healthy Futures of Texas, a San Antonio-based organization focused on preventing teen and unplanned pregnancies.Hispanic rates, though, continue to be much higher than those for blacks and whites in most of the states with the largest Hispanic populations, including California, Texas, New York, New Jersey, Arizona, Colorado, New Mexico and Georgia.Texas has the highest number of teen births in the nation, with nearly 43,000 in 2011. Nearly two-thirds were to Hispanic moms.The overall improvement, though, is something to celebrate, said Bill Albert, chief program officer of the National Campaign to Prevent Teen and Unplanned Pregnancy."Geography, politics, or policy alone simply cannot explain the widespread declines," Albert said in an email. "Credit goes to teens themselves who are clearly making better decisions about sex, contraception, and their future."
YORBA LINDA, Calif. — Wet rag in hand, the older woman was trying to clean her filthy, packed garage to comply with a warning that she was violating city codes. As two officials approached to check on her progress, she proudly pointed to an open box in which she had placed two dead rats.For maximum display, she had perched the box atop one of the garage's many dense, waist-high piles: bins overflowing with clothes and cans, a bicycle frame, a mildewed mop.Darren Johnson, an inspector with the Orange County Fire Authority, and Mary Lewis, a city code enforcement officer, smiled encouragingly. They maneuvered into the woman's townhouse, its passageways blocked by the detritus of a troubled life. Both are members of the Orange County Task Force on Hoarding, trained not to gag at the stench, even as their shoes squished on newspapers slippery with rat urine.Mr. Johnson, who with Ms. Lewis accompanied a reporter into the woman's home on the condition that she not be identified, shined a flashlight over tangled electrical cords and ancient magazines. If a fire broke out, he told the woman, "my guys would have a tough time getting inside.""So we'd have to get you out through the window," he told her. "But it would be hard for you to climb through this stuff to get there."The fire inspector added softly, "Can you let us help you clean this up, to save yourself and not put everyone else at risk?"An estimated 3 percent to 5 percent of Americans suffer from hoarding, which was officially recognized as a disorder this month in a psychiatric diagnostic manual. But the impact of hoarding extends beyond the afflicted individual and relatives in the home: the behavior can also put immediate neighbors at risk, by creating perfect conditions for explosive house fires and infestations of vermin and disease.Across the country, local officials like Mr. Johnson and Ms. Lewis have begun grappling with hoarding as a serious public health hazard. More than 85 communities — from San Jose, Calif., to Wichita, Kan., to Portland, Me. — have established task forces, hoping to stave off catastrophes and help hoarders turn their lives around.The task forces on hoarding are finding their mandates daunting. With each case, officials must weigh when their authority to intervene trumps an individual's right to privacy."The nature of the disorder demands multiple resources," said Christiana Bratiotis, an assistant professor of social work at the University of Nebraska, Omaha. "No one discipline has all the expertise needed."The task forces typically include people from support as well as enforcement perspectives, added Dr. Bratiotis, a co-author of "The Hoarding Handbook," an intervention guide. "There is value in the carrot-and-stick approach."Hoarding disorder is poorly understood, complex and often recurring: over decades, cases wax, wane and become chronic. It is distinct from cluttering or insatiable collecting. The self-soothing need to acquire, coupled with a paralyzing inability to discard, significantly impairs one's ability to function.Over the years, a hoarder's health and hygiene become dangerously compromised. Because stoves, sinks and tubs are used for storage, cooking and bathing become impossible. Sleep becomes a relative term. When the queen-size bed of a rocket engineer Mr. Johnson tried to help became buried under mounds, the man simply hoisted a twin mattress on top. In 2010, a Chicago couple was found buried alive under years of possessions.The possibility of a hot, hungry fire increases over time. First, utility bills become buried under snowdrifts of paper, so people forget to pay them. Electricity is turned off. Then residents use candles for light and gas burners for heat, inches from swaying towers of cherished trash.In October 2011, a couple died in a fire in Dana Point, Calif. — a home that officials had tried for years to get cleaned up. Last October, a fire in Old Greenwich, Conn., destroyed a home that officials called inaccessible, leaving a woman critically burned.In November, a Chicago man was burned, five of his dogs died and a neighbor's home was scorched. Pat Brennan, a chief with the Chicago Fire Department, told reporters at the scene: "He was a hoarder. It impeded our progress."And the problem is not confined to the United States: a 2009 study found that the homes of hoarders accounted for 24 percent of preventable residential fires in Melbourne, Australia.
Hoarding was once considered a type of obsessive compulsive disorder, but studies have shown that only 20 percent of people who hoard also have O.C.D. Some 50 percent of hoarders, however, suffer from major depression . In the new Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, hoarding is now defined as distinct disorder.In a study published in the Archives of General Psychiatry, brain scans of patients who hoarded were compared to those of O.C.D. patients and healthy control subjects. When asked to throw out junk mail and newspapers, the hoarders registered abnormal activity in decision-making areas of the brain, while brain activity in the other groups appeared normal.Although the disorder is often discovered in isolated older people, many patients show emerging signs in adolescence. Men and women suffer in equal numbers.According to Randy O. Frost, a Smith College psychologist and a co-author of "Stuff: Compulsive Hoarding and the Meaning of Things,"  some patients have greater difficulty with acquiring while others cannot discard so much as a plastic bag. They acquire to self-soothe or feel a rush—an urge fed by dollar stores, yard sales, big box warehouses and shopping channels."There is safety, comfort and value in their possessions," Dr. Frost said.Many sufferers understand they have a problem, but cannot figure out how to solve it. "They have difficulty with organizing and processing information," he said.Lee Shuer, 38, a peer counselor with a Massachusetts mental health agency, struggles with hoarding. "I'd see groups of items at one-day sales," he said, "so I'd buy 10 Simpsons action figures and suddenly I'd have a collection. It's harder to let go of a collection than just one item."Collections filled boxes, covered floors, then all flat surfaces in his East Hampton home. His basement disappeared. But then he led peer-group sessions based on another book co-written by Dr. Frost, "Buried in Treasures," which includes cognitive behavioral techniques, intended to redirect hoarding impulses.The program initially addressed discarding, and then strategies for reducing what came into the home. Mr. Shuer suggested reversing the order, because tossing first had the unintended consequence of creating more space, a lure to keep acquiring.The workshops manual is available free online. Mr. Shuer says he has let go of many collections: "I was feeling better about myself and needed them less. I was freed."
Is there a doctor on board? Surprisingly often, there is — in half of in-flight medical emergencies — and sick airline passengers almost always survive, a new study finds.The research is the largest look yet at what happens to people who develop a medical problem on a commercial flight — about 44,000 of the 2.75 billion passengers worldwide each year, researchers estimate.Most cases don't require diverting a plane as the study's leader, Dr. Christian Martin-Gill, advised a pilot to do two years. He works for MD-STAT, a service at the University of Pittsburgh Medical Center that advises about 20 major airlines on how to handle in-flight emergencies. Another large service is based in Phoenix.Martin-Gill handled a call when a passenger seemed to be having a heart attack on a flight from Europe to the U.S. The man's implanted defibrillator had shocked his heart five times to try to restore normal rhythm."The aircraft was in the middle of its destination, flying over the Atlantic," so he recommended landing at Newfoundland off the Canadian coast to get the man to the nearest hospital, Martin-Gill said.The federally funded study reviewed about 12,000 cases handled by the Pittsburgh center over nearly three years. Results are in Thursday's New England Journal of Medicine. Researchers found:—The odds of a medical emergency are 1 per 604 flights, or 16 per 1 million passengers.—Planes had to be diverted for emergency help in only 7 percent of cases.—Doctors were on board and volunteered to help in 48 percent of cases; nurses and other health workers were available in another 28 percent. Only one-third of cases had to be handled by flight attendants alone.—The most common problems: Dizziness or passing out (37 percent of cases); trouble breathing (12 percent) and nausea or vomiting (10 percent).—About one-fourth of passengers were evaluated at a hospital after landing and 9 percent were admitted, usually with stroke, respiratory or cardiac symptoms.—Out of nearly 12,000 cases, a defibrillator was applied 137 times, including in 24 cases of cardiac arrest, where the heart had stopped. (Sometimes defibrillators are used to analyze an irregular heart rhythm to help doctors figure out what to do, not necessarily to deliver a shock.)—Of the cases in this study, only 36 deaths occurred, 30 of them during the flight and the others after landing.—Pregnancy-related problems were generally rare — 61 cases, in this study — and two-thirds of them involved women less than 24 weeks along with possible miscarriages. Air travel is considered safe up to the 36th week, or the last month, of pregnancy. Only three cases of women in labor beyond 24 weeks of pregnancy led to a plane being diverted.Dr. Lisa Rosenbaum, a University of Pennsylvania cardiologist, helped in a case like that in 2007, on a flight from Boston to Portland, Ore. The passenger was three months from her due date but was having contractions every minute — something that can often be stopped with drugs and treatment at a hospital but not in midair."It was clear to me that labor was imminent and that we needed to land the plane," so, on her advice, the pilot diverted to upstate New York, Rosenbaum said. "It was one of the scariest experiences of my life. It's not like taking care of a patient in the hospital."Dr. David Rogers, a pediatric surgeon at the University of Alabama at Birmingham School of Medicine, felt that fear five years ago when an elderly woman had trouble breathing during a flight to Atlanta from Toledo, Ohio.Being a specialist at treating children rather than adults, "my first reaction was to look around and hope there would be somebody else" more qualified to help, he said.Luckily, a flight attendant had already given the woman an oxygen mask and she seemed to be improving, so he felt the plane could continue to Atlanta, the woman's home. Trying to determine whether to divert a plane was a tough call, he said."I'm making a decision that's going to affect a plane full of people," not just the patient, Rogers said.Some passengers may fear liability if they help in such situations, but a Good Samaritan law protects those who do so, the study notes. And although health workers are not legally obliged to help, they have a moral obligation to do so, the authors write.And you never know what kind of help will be requested. Martin-Gill said a partner once was consulted when a dog suffered a cardiac arrest during a flight. He didn't know how things turned out.
CHICAGO — Infections in U.S. hospitals kill tens of thousands of people each year, and many institutions fight back by screening new patients to see if they carry a dangerous germ, and isolating those who do. But a big study suggests a far more effective approach: Decontaminating every patient in intensive care.Washing everyone with antiseptic wipes and giving them antibiotic nose ointment reduced bloodstream infections dramatically in the study at more than 40 U.S. hospitals.The practice could prove controversial, because it would involve even uninfected patients and because experts say it could lead to germs becoming more resistant to antibiotics. But it worked better than screening methods, now required in nine states.The study found that 54 patients would need to be decontaminated to prevent one bloodstream infection.Nevertheless, the findings are "very dramatic" and will lead to changes in practice and probably new laws, said Dr. William Schaffner, a Vanderbilt University infectious-disease specialist who was not involved in the research. Some hospitals are already on board.The study targeted ICU patients, who tend to be older, sicker, weaker and most likely to be infected with dangerous bacteria, including drug-resistant staph germs.The decontamination method worked like this: For up to five days, 26,000 ICU patients got a nose swab twice a day with bacteria-fighting ointment, plus once-daily bathing with antiseptic wipes.Afterward, they were more than 40 percent less likely to get a bloodstream infection of any type than patients who had been screened and isolated for a dangerous germ called MRSA, or methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus.In the year before the experiment began, there were 950 bloodstream infections in intensive care patients at the hospitals studied. The results suggest that more than 400 of those could have been prevented if all hospitals had used the decontamination method."We've definitively shown that it is better to target high-risk people," not high-risk germs, said lead author Dr. Susan Huang, a researcher and infectious-disease specialist at the University of California, Irvine.The hospitals in the study are all part of the Hospital Corporation of America system, the nation's largest hospital chain. HCA spokesman Ed Fishbough said the 162-hospital company is adopting universal ICU decontamination.The study was published online Wednesday in the New England Journal of Medicine.The study focused on the MRSA germ. It can live on the skin or in the nose without causing symptoms but can be life-threatening when it reaches the bloodstream or vital organs. It is especially dangerous because it is resistant to many antibiotics.More than 70,000 ICU patients were randomly selected to get one of three treatments: MRSA screening and isolation; screening, isolation and decontamination of MRSA carriers only; and universal decontamination without screening. Partial decontamination worked better than just screening, and universal decontamination was best.About a decade ago, hospital-linked invasive MRSA infections sickened more than 90,000 people nationwide each year, leading to roughly 20,000 deaths.As hospitals improved cleanliness through such measures as better hand-washing and isolating carriers of deadly germs, those numbers dropped by about a third, with fewer than 10,000 deaths in 2011, according to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.The CDC has been recommending screening and isolation in certain cases. Now it's having experts review the results and help determine whether the agency should revise its recommendations, said the CDC's Dr. John Jernigan."It is a very important finding. It advances our understanding of how best to control infections caused by MRSA" and other germs, Jernigan said.The CDC and the federal Agency for Healthcare Research and Quality helped pay for the study. Dr. Carolyn Clancy, who heads the research agency, said the findings have "the potential to influence clinical practice significantly and create a safer environment where patients can heal without harm."Jernigan said the decontamination approach is much simpler than screening and isolation. But he said its costs need to be studied.Huang said the five-day nose treatment costs about $35 for brand-name ointment but only $4 for a generic version. The antiseptic wipes cost only about $3 to $5 more per day than usual washing methods, she said. But those costs might be offset by other savings from avoiding widespread screening and isolation, she said.Intensive care patients are already routinely bathed. The study just swapped soap with wipes containing a common antiseptic. Some study authors have received fees from makers of antiseptic wipes or have done research or unpaid consulting for those companies.The nose ointment treatment is more controversial because it could cause more germs to become resistant to the antibiotic, Jernigan said."That's something we're going to have to very closely monitor if this practice is implemented widely," he said.An editorial accompanying the study voices similar concerns and notes that research published earlier this year found that using just antiseptic wipes on ICU patients reduced bloodstream infections. Two infection control specialists at Virginia Commonwealth University wrote the editorial.Editorial co-author Dr. Michael Edmond said his university's hospital is among those that already use antiseptic wipes on ICU patients.While MRSA screening and isolation is widely accepted, Edmond said that approach "takes a toll on patients." Isolating patients who test positive for MRSA but don't have symptoms makes patients angry and depressed, and studies have shown that isolated patients are visited less often by nurses and tend to have more bedsores and falls, he said.
Is there a doctor on board? Surprisingly often, there is — in half of in-flight medical emergencies — and sick airline passengers almost always survive, a new study finds.The research is the largest look yet at what happens to people who develop a medical problem on a commercial flight — about 44,000 of the 2.75 billion passengers worldwide each year, researchers estimate.Most cases don't require diverting a plane as the study's leader, Dr. Christian Martin-Gill, advised a pilot to do two years. He works for MD-STAT, a service at the University of Pittsburgh Medical Center that advises about 20 major airlines on how to handle in-flight emergencies. Another large service is based in Phoenix.Martin-Gill handled a call when a passenger seemed to be having a heart attack on a flight from Europe to the U.S. The man's implanted defibrillator had shocked his heart five times to try to restore normal rhythm."The aircraft was in the middle of its destination, flying over the Atlantic," so he recommended landing at Newfoundland off the Canadian coast to get the man to the nearest hospital, Martin-Gill said.The federally funded study reviewed about 12,000 cases handled by the Pittsburgh center over nearly three years. Results are in Thursday's New England Journal of Medicine. Researchers found:—The odds of a medical emergency are 1 per 604 flights, or 16 per 1 million passengers.—Planes had to be diverted for emergency help in only 7 percent of cases.—Doctors were on board and volunteered to help in 48 percent of cases; nurses and other health workers were available in another 28 percent. Only one-third of cases had to be handled by flight attendants alone.—The most common problems: Dizziness or passing out (37 percent of cases); trouble breathing (12 percent) and nausea or vomiting (10 percent).—About one-fourth of passengers were evaluated at a hospital after landing and 9 percent were admitted, usually with stroke, respiratory or cardiac symptoms.—Out of nearly 12,000 cases, a defibrillator was applied 137 times, including in 24 cases of cardiac arrest, where the heart had stopped. (Sometimes defibrillators are used to analyze an irregular heart rhythm to help doctors figure out what to do, not necessarily to deliver a shock.)—Of the cases in this study, only 36 deaths occurred, 30 of them during the flight and the others after landing.—Pregnancy-related problems were generally rare — 61 cases, in this study — and two-thirds of them involved women less than 24 weeks along with possible miscarriages. Air travel is considered safe up to the 36th week, or the last month, of pregnancy. Only three cases of women in labor beyond 24 weeks of pregnancy led to a plane being diverted.Dr. Lisa Rosenbaum, a University of Pennsylvania cardiologist, helped in a case like that in 2007, on a flight from Boston to Portland, Ore. The passenger was three months from her due date but was having contractions every minute — something that can often be stopped with drugs and treatment at a hospital but not in midair."It was clear to me that labor was imminent and that we needed to land the plane," so, on her advice, the pilot diverted to upstate New York, Rosenbaum said. "It was one of the scariest experiences of my life. It's not like taking care of a patient in the hospital."Dr. David Rogers, a pediatric surgeon at the University of Alabama at Birmingham School of Medicine, felt that fear five years ago when an elderly woman had trouble breathing during a flight to Atlanta from Toledo, Ohio.Being a specialist at treating children rather than adults, "my first reaction was to look around and hope there would be somebody else" more qualified to help, he said.Luckily, a flight attendant had already given the woman an oxygen mask and she seemed to be improving, so he felt the plane could continue to Atlanta, the woman's home. Trying to determine whether to divert a plane was a tough call, he said."I'm making a decision that's going to affect a plane full of people," not just the patient, Rogers said.Some passengers may fear liability if they help in such situations, but a Good Samaritan law protects those who do so, the study notes. And although health workers are not legally obliged to help, they have a moral obligation to do so, the authors write.And you never know what kind of help will be requested. Martin-Gill said a partner once was consulted when a dog suffered a cardiac arrest during a flight. He didn't know how things turned out.
An analysis published Wednesday by the American Medical Association said children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder who take stimulant medication do not have a lower risk over all for later substance abuse, contradicting the longstanding and influential message that such medicines tend to deter those with the disorder from abusing other substances.The paper, written by three researchers at the University of California, Los Angeles, examined data from 15 previous studies on the subject and determined that, on average, medications like Adderall and Ritalin had no effect one way or the other on whether children abused alcohol, marijuana, nicotine or cocaine later in life.A 2003 study in the journal Pediatrics had concluded that the introduction of stimulant medication to children with A.D.H.D. reduced the risk of such abuse later in life, a finding that has been repeated by doctors and pharmaceutical companies not only to assuage parents' fears of medication but also to suggest that the pills would protect their children from later harm."I always doubted the whole 'protection' argument, and I wasn't the only one, but that message was really out there," said Liz Jorgensen, an adolescent addiction specialist at Insight Counseling in Ridgefield, Conn. "Hopefully, this message will be heard loud and clear."The study comes amid growing concern about the persistent rise in A.D.H.D. diagnoses and prescriptions for medication among children. A recent New York Times analysis of data collected by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention found that 11 percent of all children ages 4 through 17 — 6.4 million over all — had received a diagnosis of A.D.H.D. from a medical professional. The diagnosis rate rose to 19 percent for boys of high school age.Stimulant medication is by far the most prevalent treatment for childhood A.D.H.D., with the vast majority of children at least trying medication and about 60 percent of them staying on it long term. Stimulants can drastically improve the lives of children with severe A.D.H.D. but are also increasingly abused by high school and college students for their jolts of focus toward schoolwork.Side effects can include appetite and growth suppression, sleep disturbance and occasionally psychosis, especially when the stimulants are abused.The paper released Wednesday in the journal JAMA Psychiatry analyzed data from studies conducted from 1980 to 2012, and included more than 2,500 children with A.D.H.D. from the United States, Canada and Germany. They were followed from an average age of 8 into young adulthood.Steve S. Lee, an associate professor of psychology at U.C.L.A. and the study's senior author, said the data had distinct limitations — primarily that his team knew only whether a child had ever taken medication at all, not at what age, which medication, how much or for how long.Dr. Lee also acknowledged that while his study found no average effect of stimulant medication on future substance abuse, that net of zero could have resulted from the counterbalance of two groups: children who were deterred from later abuse (because they felt no need to self-medicate) and children whose use of stimulant medication desensitized them to other mind-altering substances."There may be subgroups based on gosh knows what factors that could alter that risk up or down — even though the effect right now is statistically zero," Dr. Lee said.Ms. Jorgensen said her clinic sees several new cases each month of adolescents whose introduction to drugs came from an A.D.H.D. diagnosis and prescription."It teaches them very boldly that this is the way to feel different — this is the way to feel better," she said. "Aversion to prescription drugs can be lifted at that early age."
WASHINGTON — The new health care law is injecting more competition into health insurance markets nationwide, drawing additional insurance companies into states long dominated by a few carriers, Obama administration officials said Thursday.Such competition offers the prospect of more choices for millions of consumers who will be shopping for insurance this fall. Companies entering the market could also put downward pressure on prices, partly offsetting factors that tend to increase premiums. The competition could pose new challenges to Blue Cross and Blue Shield plans, which dominate the individual insurance markets in many states.The administration gave a snapshot of applications filed by insurers in 19 states where the new insurance markets, or exchanges, will be run entirely by the federal government. The data was preliminary and incomplete and could not be independently verified. It was supplemented by federal officials with information from California and several other states that have released data on applications from insurers.These states account for 80 percent of the seven million people expected to obtain coverage next year through the government-run markets being established under President Obama's health care law.The 2010 law promotes competition by standardizing many features of insurance policies and creating Web sites where consumers can compare costs and benefits. The Web sites will also make it easier for insurers to market their products."The majority of states will have new health insurance choices that are not available today," the administration said in a memorandum summarizing its analysis. In about three-fourths of states with exchanges run by the federal government, it said, "at least one new insurance company intends to enter the market."More than 120 insurance companies have filed applications with the federal government, and it appears that most consumers will be able to choose from health plans offered by five or more insurers, the administration said.One-fourth of insurance companies proposing to offer coverage in these federal exchanges have recently entered the individual market, the administration said.Experts on health policy said the filing of applications was only the beginning of a race to the market for insurers. After scrutinizing applications, federal and state officials could demand changes in benefits and rates, and insist that insurers expand their proposed networks of doctors and hospitals.Paul B. Ginsburg, the president of the nonpartisan Center for Studying Health System Change, said: "The individual insurance market is now up for grabs. Blue Cross plans will face a lot more competition. Many products sold in the insurance exchanges will have more limited networks of doctors and hospitals than has been the norm in employer-based coverage."Moreover, Mr. Ginsburg said: "Consumers will receive federal subsidies based on their income, not on the plans they choose. That creates a strong incentive for consumers to seek plans with lower premiums."Federal officials said that consumers shopping for private insurance in the exchanges would often benefit from the same type of competition Medicare patients see when choosing prescription drug plans. Many industry experts doubted that stand-alone drug coverage could succeed, but Medicare beneficiaries now have a choice of more than 20 drug plans in every state, and the average premiums have been relatively stable in the last few years.May 3 was the deadline for insurers to file applications to participate in markets run by the federal government, but administration officials said they were still trying to expand the options available in states where they wanted more competition.The upbeat assessment by federal officials follows months of criticism by Republicans and some Democrats who said the administration had fumbled the rollout of the new health care law. Senator Mitch McConnell of Kentucky, the Republican leader, predicted recently that the law would be "the biggest issue" in Congressional elections next year.In at least 31 states, administration officials said, consumers will be able to sign up for a new kind of product offered by private insurers under contract with the federal Office of Personnel Management, the agency that arranges health benefits for federal employees.These multistate plans will be available in all states by 2017. They were included in the health care law as a substitute for a pure government-run insurance program — the "public option" sought by liberal Democrats and reviled by Republicans.The health care law classifies insurance into several categories, based on the generosity of coverage. In its preview of the market in 2014, the administration said that "consumers will have multiple options in each tier of coverage: catastrophic, bronze, silver, gold and platinum."On average, it said, insurers intend to offer more than 15 health plans per state, with some being offered in just part of a state.People are generally enrolled in plans for a year at a time, but can switch if they want lower costs or more extensive coverage in later years.Starting in October, consumers will be able to enroll in new health plans, for coverage beginning on Jan. 1, 2014, when most Americans will be required to have insurance.For years, the American Medical Association has complained that "highly concentrated health insurance markets are a problem for physicians," and Mr. Obama says they are an even bigger problem for consumers."In 29 states," the administration's memo said, "one insurer covered more than 50 percent of all enrollees in the individual insurance market" last year. In 11 states, it said, the largest two insurers accounted for 85 percent or more of the individual market.
A group of 25 men and women jumped to the beat of Lady Gaga's "Americano" in a darkened room amid the glittering of a disco ball, the flashing of neon lights and the streaking of green, blue and red lasers. The scene could have been mistaken for a happening nightclub, but it was actually a recent class at JumpLife, a fitness studio in TriBeCa where the bouncing takes place on personal, low-to-the-ground trampolines, not a dance floor.JumpLife opened in October and quickly built a following by providing a setting unlike that of a more traditional workout class. "I wanted to make working out fun but also hard and safe at the same time," said Montserrat Markou, the studio's owner.Ms. Markou, 50, is an acupuncturist and a massage therapist with a practice in Great Neck, N.Y. She said that her clients were frequently visiting her with ailments caused by exercise routines."The runners would have knee pain, spinners had tight shoulders from being hunched over on bikes, and the yogis had tight necks," she said. "They would ask me for advice on what workout they could do which wouldn't cause any injuries."She discovered that a childhood playtime activity — bouncing on a trampoline — could do wonders for adults as well. It offers a low-impact workout that can help tone the core muscles used for stabilizing the body while jumping. But just because the trampoline is easier on the body than high-impact activities doesn't mean that it's relaxing.The JumpDance class at Ms. Markou's studio, which simulates a nightclub, is a 45-minute high-intensity session that will leave any serious gymgoer panting. With fast-paced music as a motivator, students follow instructors in nonstop moves including jumps, jumping jacks, squat jumps and running in place. Each trampoline has a handlebar for gripping.The studio also offers more toned-down classes in a less frenetic setting. These classes, called JumpGym sessions, incorporate push-ups, sit-ups and arm exercises with light weights.Danielle Percoco, 27, who works in corporate retail and lives in Manhattan, has been a regular at the JumpDance classes since the studio opened and says that she signed up because she wanted a challenging workout that wouldn't cause her pain. "I used to run and do other aerobics, which gave me a great high but always left me with a sore back and knees," she said. "The sweat that I get from the JumpDance classes is way more than with anything else I used to do, but they don't hurt my body."Mike Brannigan, 27, who works in advertising and lives in the financial district, also attends JumpDance sessions a few times a week and says he looks forward to going because of the atmosphere. "I go with a group of friends, and it feels like we are partying in a club," he said. "But it's the best kind of club there is, because I've lost 10 pounds and can see my stomach muscles for the first time I can remember in a while."
MERRICK, N.Y. — Deirdre Yapalater's recent colonoscopy at a surgical center near her home here on Long Island went smoothly: she was whisked from pre-op to an operating room where a gastroenterologist, assisted by an anesthesiologist and a nurse, performed the routine cancer screening procedure in less than an hour. The test, which found nothing worrisome, racked up what is likely her most expensive medical bill of the year: $6,385.That is fairly typical: in Keene, N.H., Matt Meyer's colonoscopy was billed at $7,563.56. Maggie Christ of Chappaqua, N.Y., received $9,142.84 in bills for the procedure. In Durham, N.C., the charges for Curtiss Devereux came to $19,438, which included a polyp removal. While their insurers negotiated down the price, the final tab for each test was more than $3,500."Could that be right?" said Ms. Yapalater, stunned by charges on the statement on her dining room table. Although her insurer covered the procedure and she paid nothing, her health care costs still bite: Her premium payments jumped 10 percent last year, and rising co-payments and deductibles are straining the finances of her middle-class family, with its mission-style house in the suburbs and two S.U.V.'s parked outside. "You keep thinking it's free," she said. "We call it free, but of course it's not."In many other developed countries, a basic colonoscopy costs just a few hundred dollars and certainly well under $1,000. That chasm in price helps explain why the United States is far and away the world leader in medical spending, even though numerous studies have concluded that Americans do not get better care.Whether directly from their wallets or through insurance policies, Americans pay more for almost every interaction with the medical system. They are typically prescribed more expensive procedures and tests than people in other countries, no matter if those nations operate a private or national health system. A list of drug, scan and procedure prices compiled by the International Federation of Health Plans, a global network of health insurers, found that the United States came out the most costly in all 21 categories — and often by a huge margin.Americans pay, on average, about four times as much for a hip replacement as patients in Switzerland or France and more than three times as much for a Caesarean section as those in New Zealand or Britain. The average price for Nasonex, a common nasal spray for allergies, is $108 in the United States compared with $21 in Spain. The costs of hospital stays here are about triple those in other developed countries, even though they last no longer, according to a recent report by the Commonwealth Fund, a foundation that studies health policy.While the United States medical system is famous for drugs costing hundreds of thousands of dollars and heroic care at the end of life, it turns out that a more significant factor in the nation's $2.7 trillion annual health care bill may not be the use of extraordinary services, but the high price tag of ordinary ones. "The U.S. just pays providers of health care much more for everything," said Tom Sackville, chief executive of the health plans federation and a former British health minister.Colonoscopies offer a compelling case study. They are the most expensive screening test that healthy Americans routinely undergo — and often cost more than childbirth or an appendectomy in most other developed countries. Their numbers have increased manyfold over the last 15 years, with data from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention suggesting that more than 10 million people get them each year, adding up to more than $10 billion in annual costs.Largely an office procedure when widespread screening was first recommended, colonoscopies have moved into surgery centers — which were created as a step down from costly hospital care but are now often a lucrative step up from doctors' examining rooms — where they are billed like a quasi operation. They are often prescribed and performed more frequently than medical guidelines recommend.The high price paid for colonoscopies mostly results not from top-notch patient care, according to interviews with health care experts and economists, but from business plans seeking to maximize revenue; haggling between hospitals and insurers that have no relation to the actual costs of performing the procedure; and lobbying, marketing and turf battles among specialists that increase patient fees.While several cheaper and less invasive tests to screen for colon cancer are recommended as equally effective by the federal government's expert panel on preventive care — and are commonly used in other countries — colonoscopy has become the go-to procedure in the United States. "We've defaulted to by far the most expensive option, without much if any data to support it," said Dr. H. Gilbert Welch, a professor of medicine at the Dartmouth Institute for Health Policy and Clinical Practice.In coming months, The New York Times will look at common procedures, drugs and medical encounters to examine how the economic incentives underlying the fragmented health care market in the United States have driven up costs, putting deep economic strains on consumers and the country.Hospitals, drug companies, device makers, physicians and other providers can benefit by charging inflated prices, favoring the most costly treatment options and curbing competition that could give patients more, and cheaper, choices. And almost every interaction can be an opportunity to send multiple, often opaque bills with long lists of charges: $100 for the ice pack applied for 10 minutes after a physical therapy session, or $30,000 for the artificial joint implanted in surgery.The United States spends about 18 percent of its gross domestic product on health care, nearly twice as much as most other developed countries. The Congressional Budget Office has said that if medical costs continue to grow unabated, "total spending on health care would eventually account for all of the country's economic output." And it identified federal spending on government health programs as a primary cause of long-term budget deficits.While the rise in health care spending in the United States has slowed in the past four years — to about 4 percent annually from about 8 percent — it is still expected to rise faster than the gross domestic product. Aging baby boomers and tens of millions of patients newly insured under the Affordable Care Act are likely to add to the burden.With health insurance premiums eating up ever more of her flat paycheck, Ms. Yapalater, a customer relations specialist for a small Long Island company, recently decided to forgo physical therapy for an injury sustained during Hurricane Sandy because of high out-of-pocket expenses. She refused a dermatology medication prescribed for her daughter when the pharmacist said the co-payment was $130. "I said, 'That's impossible, I have insurance,' " Ms. Yapalater recalled. "I called the dermatologist and asked for something cheaper, even if it's not as good."The more than $35,000 annually that Ms. Yapalater and her employer collectively pay in premiums — her share is $15,000 — for her family's Oxford Freedom Plan would be more than sufficient to cover their medical needs in most other countries. She and her husband, Jeff, 63, a sales and marketing consultant, have three children in their 20s with good jobs. Everyone in the family exercises, and none has had a serious illness.Like the Yapalaters, many other Americans have habits or traits that arguably could put the nation at the low end of the medical cost spectrum. Patients in the United States make fewer doctors' visits and have fewer hospital stays than citizens of many other developed countries, according to the Commonwealth Fund report. People in Japan get more CT scans. People in Germany, Switzerland and Britain have more frequent hip replacements. The American population is younger and has fewer smokers than those in most other developed countries. Pushing costs in the other direction, though, is that the United States has relatively high rates of obesity and limited access to routine care for the poor.A major factor behind the high costs is that the United States, unique among industrialized nations, does not generally regulate or intervene in medical pricing, aside from setting payment rates for Medicare and Medicaid, the government programs for older people and the poor. Many other countries deliver health care on a private fee-for-service basis, as does much of the American health care system, but they set rates as if health care were a public utility or negotiate fees with providers and insurers nationwide, for example."In the U.S., we like to consider health care a free market," said Dr. David Blumenthal, president of the Commonwealth Fund and a former adviser to President Obama. "But it is a very weird market, riddled with market failures."Consumers, the patients, do not see prices until after a service is provided, if they see them at all. And there is little quality data on hospitals and doctors to help determine good value, aside from surveys conducted by popular Web sites and magazines. Patients with insurance pay a tiny fraction of the bill, providing scant disincentive for spending.Even doctors often do not know the costs of the tests and procedures they prescribe. When Dr. Michael Collins, an internist in East Hartford, Conn., called the hospital that he is affiliated with to price lab tests and a colonoscopy, he could not get an answer. "It's impossible for me to think about cost," he said. "If you go to the supermarket and there are no prices, how can you make intelligent decisions?"Instead, payments are often determined in countless negotiations between a doctor, hospital or pharmacy, and an insurer, with the result often depending on their relative negotiating power. Insurers have limited incentive to bargain forcefully, since they can raise premiums to cover costs."It all comes down to market share, and very rarely is anyone looking out for the patient," said Dr. Jeffrey Rice, the chief executive of Healthcare Blue Book, which tracks commercial insurance payments. "People think it's like other purchases: that if you pay more you get a better car. But in medicine, it's not like that."As the cases of bottled water and energy drinks stacked in the corner of the Yapalaters' dining room attest, the family is cost conscious — especially since a photography business long owned by the family succumbed eight years ago in the shift to digital imaging. They moved out of Manhattan. They rent out their summer home on Fire Island. They have put off restoring the wallpaper in their dining room.And yet, Ms. Yapalater recalled, she did not ask her doctors about the cost of her colonoscopy because it was covered by insurance and because "if a doctor says you need it, you don't ask." In many other countries, price lists of common procedures are publicly available in every clinic and office. Here, it can be nearly impossible to find out.Until the last decade or so, colonoscopies were mostly performed in doctors' office suites and only on patients at high risk for colon cancer, or to seek a diagnosis for intestinal bleeding. But several highly publicized studies by gastroenterologists in 2000 and 2001 found that a colonoscopy detected early cancers and precancerous growths in healthy people.They did not directly compare screening colonoscopies with far less invasive and cheaper screening methods, including annual tests for blood in the stool or a sigmoidoscopy, which looks at the lower colon where most cancers occur, every five years."The idea wasn't to say these growths would have been missed by the other methods, but people extrapolated to that," said Dr. Douglas Robertson, of the Department of Veterans Affairs, which is beginning a large trial to compare the tests.Experts agree that screening for colon cancer is crucial, and a colonoscopy is intuitively appealing because it looks directly at the entire colon and doctors can remove potentially precancerous lesions that might not yet be prone to bleeding. But studies have not clearly shown that a colonoscopy prevents colon cancer or death better than the other screening methods. Indeed, some recent papers suggest that it does not, in part because early lesions may be hard to see in some parts of the colon.But in 2000, the American College of Gastroenterology anointed colonoscopy as "the preferred strategy" for colon cancer prevention — and America followed.Katie Couric, who lost her husband to colorectal cancer, had a colonoscopy on television that year, giving rise to what medical journals called the "Katie Couric effect": prompting patients to demand the test. Gastroenterology groups successfully lobbied Congress to have the procedure covered by Medicare for cancer screening every 10 years, effectively meaning that commercial insurance plans would also have to provide coverage.Though Medicare negotiates for what are considered frugal prices, its database shows that it paid an average of $531 for a colonoscopy in 2011. But that does not include the payments to anesthesiologists, which could substantially increase the cost. "As long as it's deemed medically necessary," said Jonathan Blum, the deputy administrator at the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, "we have to pay for it."If the American health care system were a true market, the increased volume of colonoscopies — numbers rose 50 percent from 2003 to 2009 for those with commercial insurance — might have brought down the costs because of economies of scale and more competition. Instead, it became a new business opportunity.Just as with real estate, location matters in medicine. Although many procedures can be performed in either a doctor's office or a separate surgery center, prices generally skyrocket at the special centers, as do profits. That is because insurers will pay an additional "facility fee" to ambulatory surgery centers and hospitals that is intended to cover their higher costs. And anesthesia, more monitoring, a wristband and sometimes preoperative testing, along with their extra costs, are more likely to be added on.In Mount Kisco, N.Y., Maggie Christ had two colonoscopies two months apart, after her doctor decided it was best to remove a growth that had been discovered during the first procedure. They were performed by the same doctor, with the same sedation. The first, in an outpatient surgery department, was billed at $9,142.84 (insurance paid $5,742.67). The second, in the doctor's office, was billed at $5,322.76 (insurance eventually paid $2,922.63) because there was no facility fee. "The location was about accommodating the doctor's schedule," Ms. Christ said. "Why would an insurance company approve this?"Ms. Yapalater, a trim woman who looks far younger than her 64 years, had two prior colonoscopies in doctor's offices (one turned up a polyp that required a five-year follow-up instead of the usual 10 years). But for her routine colonoscopy this January, Ms. Yapalater was referred to Dr. Felice Mirsky of Gastroenterology Associates, a group practice in Garden City, N.Y., that performs the procedures at an ambulatory surgery center called the Long Island Center for Digestive Health. The doctors in the gastroenterology practice, which is just down the hall, are owners of the center."It was very fancy, with nurses and ORs," Ms. Yapalater said. "It felt like you were in a hospital."That explains the fees. "If you work as a 'facility,' you can charge a lot more for the same procedure," said Dr. Soeren Mattke, a senior scientist at the RAND Corporation. The bills to Ms. Yapalater's insurer reflected these charges: $1,075 for the gastroenterologist, $2,400 for the anesthesia — and $2,910 for the facility fee.When popularized in the 1980s, outpatient surgical centers were hailed as a cost-saving innovation because they cut down on expensive hospital stays for minor operations like knee arthroscopy. But the cost savings have been offset as procedures once done in a doctor's office have filled up the centers, and bills have multiplied.It is a lucrative migration. The Long Island center was set up with the help of a company based in Pennsylvania called Physicians Endoscopy. On its Web site, the business tells prospective physician partners that they can look forward to "distributions averaging over $1.4 million a year to all owners," "typically 100 percent return on capital investment within 18 months" and "a return on investment of 500 percent to 2,000 percent over the initial seven years."Dr. Leonard Stein, the senior partner in Gastroenterology Associates and medical director of the surgery center, declined to discuss patient fees or the center's profits, citing privacy issues. But he said the center contracted with insurance companies in the area to minimize patients' out-of-pocket costs.In 2009, the last year for which such statistics are available, gastroenterologists performed more procedures in ambulatory surgery centers than specialists in any other field. Once they bought into a center, studies show, the number of procedures they performed rose 27 percent. The specialists earn an average of $433,000 a year, among the highest paid doctors, according to Merritt Hawkins & Associates, a medical staffing firm.Hospitals and doctors say that critics should not take the high "rack rates" in bills as reflective of the cost of health care because insurers usually pay less. But those rates are the starting point for negotiations with Medicare and private insurers. Those without insurance or with high-deductible plans have little weight to reduce the charges and often face the highest bills. Nassau Anesthesia Associates — the group practice that handled Ms. Yapalater's sedation — has sued dozens of patients for nonpayment, including Larry Chin, a businessman from Hicksville, N.Y., who said in court that he was then unemployed and uninsured. He was billed $8,675 for anesthesia during cardiac surgery.For the same service, the anesthesia group accepted $6,970 from United Healthcare, $5,208.01 from Blue Cross and Blue Shield, $1,605.29 from Medicare and $797.50 from Medicaid. A judge ruled that Mr. Chin should pay $4,252.11.Ms. Yapalater's insurer paid $1,568 of the $2,400 anesthesiologist's charge for her colonoscopy, but many medical experts question why anesthesiologists are involved at all. Colonoscopies do not require general anesthesia — a deep sleep that suppresses breathing and often requires a breathing tube. Instead, they require only "moderate sedation," generally with a Valium-like drug or a low dose of propofol, an intravenous medicine that takes effect quickly and wears off within minutes. In other countries, such sedative mixes are administered in offices and hospitals by a wide range of doctors and nurses for countless minor procedures, including colonoscopies.Nonetheless, between 2003 and 2009, the use of an anesthesiologist for colonoscopies in the United States doubled, according to a RAND Corporation study published last year. Payments to anesthesiologists for colonoscopies per patient quadrupled during that period, the researchers found, estimating that ending the practice for healthy patients could save $1.1 billion a year because "studies have shown no benefit" for them, Dr. Mattke said.But turf battles and lobbying have helped keep anesthesiologists in the room. When propofol won the approval of the Food and Drug Administration in 1989 as an anesthesia drug, it carried a label advising that it "should be administered only by those who are trained in the administration of general anesthesia" because of concerns that too high a dose could depress breathing and blood pressure to a point requiring resuscitation.Since 2005, the American College of Gastroenterology has repeatedly pressed the F.D.A. to remove or amend the restriction, arguing that gastroenterologists and their nurses are able to safely administer the drug in lower doses as a sedative. But the American Society of Anesthesiologists has aggressively lobbied for keeping the advisory, which so far the F.D.A. has done.A Food and Drug Administration spokeswoman said that the label did not necessarily require an anesthesiologist and that it was safe for the others to administer propofol if they had appropriate training. But many gastroenterologists fear lawsuits if something goes wrong. If anything, that concern has grown since Michael Jackson died in 2009 after being given propofol, along with at least two other sedatives, without close monitoring.'Too Much for Too Little'The Department of Veterans Affairs, which performs about a quarter-million colonoscopies annually, does not routinely use an anesthesiologist for screening colonoscopies. In Austria, where colonoscopies are also used widely for cancer screening, the procedure is performed, with sedation, in the office by a doctor and a nurse and "is very safe that way," said Dr. Monika Ferlitsch, a gastroenterologist and professor at the Medical University of Vienna, who directs the national program on quality assurance.But she noted that gastroenterologists in Austria do have their financial concerns. They are complaining to the government and insurers that they cannot afford to do the 30-minute procedure, with prep time, maintenance of equipment and anesthesia, for the current approved rate — between $200 and $300, all included. "I think the cheapest colonoscopy in the U.S. is about $950," Dr. Ferlitsch said. "We'd love to get half of that."Dr. Cesare Hassan, an Italian gastroenterologist who is the chairman of the Guidelines Committee of the European Society of Gastrointestinal Endoscopy, noted that studies in Europe had estimated that the procedure cost about $400 to $800 to perform, including biopsies and sedation. "The U.S. is paying way too much for too little — it leads to opportunistic colonoscopies," done for profit rather than health, he said.Some doctors in the United States are campaigning against the overuse of the procedure, like Dr. James Goodwin, a geriatrician at the University of Texas. He estimates that about a quarter of Medicare patients undergo the screening test more often than recommended, even though the risks of complications, like long recovery times and poor tolerance of sedation, increase for older people. Routine screening is not recommended for all people over 75.And some large employers have begun fighting back on costs. Three years ago, Safeway realized that it was paying between $848 and $5,984 for a colonoscopy in California and could find no link to the quality of service at those extremes. So the company established an all-inclusive "reference price" it was willing to pay, which it said was set at a level high enough to give employees access to a range of high-quality options. Above that price, employees would have to pay the difference. Safeway chose $1,250, one-third the amount paid for Ms. Yapalater's procedure — and found plenty of doctors willing to accept the price.Still, the United States health care industry is nimble at protecting profits. When Aetna tried in 2007 to disallow payment for anesthesiologists delivering propofol during colonoscopies, the insurer backed down after a barrage of attacks from anesthesiologists and endoscopy groups. With Medicare contemplating lowering facility fees for ambulatory surgery centers, experts worry that physician-owners will sell the centers to hospitals, where fees remain higher.And then there is aggressive marketing. People who do not have insurance or who are covered by Medicaid typically get far less colon cancer screening than they need. But those with insurance are appealing targets.Nineteen months after Matt Meyer, who owns a saddle-fitting company near Keene, N.H., had his first colonoscopy, he received a certified letter from his gastroenterologist. It began, "Our records show that you are due for a repeat colonoscopy," and it advised him to schedule an appointment or "allow us to note your reason for not scheduling." Although his prior test had found a polyp, medical guidelines do not recommend such frequent screening."I have great doctors, but the economics is daunting," Mr. Meyer said in an interview. "A computer-generated letter telling me to come in for a procedure that costs more than $5,000? It was the weirdest thing."This article has been revised to reflect the following correction: An article last Sunday about the high cost of colonoscopies in the United States misstated the year that Michael Jackson died, after which gastroenterologists became more cautious about administering the sedative propofol for fear of lawsuits. It was 2009, not 2010. This article has been revised to reflect the following correction: An article on June 2 about the high cost of colonoscopies in the United States, using information provided by the federal government's Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, described the average payment for a colonoscopy incorrectly. The price of $531 does indeed include the payment for the facility fee; those fees are not extra. (As the article correctly noted, the $531 does not include the cost of an anesthesiologist's services.)
CHICAGO — New research suggests that bad genes may be responsible for more breast cancer cases in black women than has been previously known. About 1 in 5 African-American women with the disease have an inherited mutation that drastically raises their risk for breast and ovarian cancer, according to a study released Monday.It may help explain why black women have higher rates of breast cancer at young ages, a more aggressive form of the disease, and worse survival. It doesn't mean that all black women are at risk or even that all blacks with cancer need genetic counseling or testing, said the study's leader, Dr. Jane Churpek of the University of Chicago.Experts offer some advice about what to make of this information:Q. What are the genes?A. Mostly BRCA1 and BRCA2. Everyone has two copies of these genes, and a mutation in one can give a woman up to an 87 percent risk of developing breast cancer and up to a 54 percent risk for ovarian cancer. Sixteen other genes also can raise risk but are thought to be less common.Q. Why might blacks have high risk?A. African-Americans' genes are more diverse than those of many other racial and ethnic groups. Most of the mutations identified in this study were novel, or unique to each woman, Churpek said. It's possible that more detailed tests in whites and other groups might find a higher prevalence of mutations than previous studies have found in them, too.Q. Should more black women be tested?A. National guidelines do not specify any groups that should be tested except Eastern European (Ashkenazi) Jewish women with breast or ovarian cancer or a close relative who has had one of those diseases. Genetic counseling should be offered to black women who develop breast cancer before age 50, who have a close relative with the disease, or who have "triple-negative" breast cancer. Triple negative means tumors that are not fueled by estrogen, progesterone or the gene that the drug Herceptin targets.Q. What can be done if a gene mutation is found?A. Women who find the mutation after they have breast cancer may want to consider removing both breasts or their ovaries. Those who are screened before cancer develops can consider more frequent screening and prevention measures ranging from hormone-blocking drugs to removal of breasts and ovaries. They also can let relatives know about potential family risk.Q. Why did this study find so many more gene flaws?A. Standard tests look for just a few common mutations in BRCA1 and BRCA2. The tests cost around $3,000, and insurance will often cover them if a woman has a family history suggesting high risk. A second $750 test is needed to look for a different type of genetic flaw. That test often is not done or covered by insurance.In the Chicago study, researchers decoded, or sequenced, all 18 genes tied to breast cancer risk, so it could pick up all types of mutations in any of them.
CHICAGO — Gene flaws that raise the risk of breast cancer are surprisingly common in black women with the disease, according to the first comprehensive testing in this racial group. The study found that one-fifth of these women have BRCA mutations, a problem usually associated with women of Eastern European Jewish descent but recently highlighted by the plight of Angelina Jolie.The study may help explain why black women have higher rates of breast cancer at young ages — and a worse chance of survival.Doctors say these patients should be offered genetic counseling and may want to consider more frequent screening and prevention options, which can range from hormone-blocking pills to breast removal, as Jolie chose to do."We were surprised at our results," said the study leader, Dr. Jane Churpek, a cancer specialist at the University of Chicago. Too few black women have been included in genetic studies in the past and most have not looked for mutations to the degree this one did, "so we just don't have a good sense" of how much risk there is, she said.Churpek gave results of the study Monday at an American Society of Clinical Oncology conference in Chicago. The researchers include Mary-Claire King, the University of Washington scientist who discovered the first breast cancer predisposition gene, BRCA1.Jolie revealed a few weeks ago that she carries a defective BRCA1 gene, giving her up to an 87 percent risk of developing breast cancer and up to a 54 percent risk for ovarian cancer. The actress's mother had breast cancer and died of ovarian cancer, and her maternal grandmother also had ovarian cancer. An aunt recently died of breast cancer.Children of someone with a BRCA mutation have a 50 percent chance of inheriting it.In the U.S., about 5 to 10 percent of breast cancers are thought to be due to bad BRCA genes. Among breast cancer patients, BRCA mutations are carried by 5 percent of whites and 12 percent of Eastern European (Ashkenazi) Jews. The rates in other groups are not as well known.The study involved 249 black breast cancer patients from Chicago area hospitals. Many had breast cancer at a young age, and half had a family history of the disease.They were given complete gene sequencing for all 18 known breast cancer risk genes rather than the usual tests that just look for a few specific mutations in BRCA genes.Gene flaws were found in 56, or 22 percent, of study participants; 46 of them involved BRCA1 or BRCA2 and the rest were less commonly mutated genes.Harmful mutations were found in 30 percent of black women with "triple-negative breast cancer" — tumors whose growth is not fueled by estrogen, progesterone or the gene that the drug Herceptin targets. Doctors have long known that these harder-to-treat cases are more common in black women.The National Cancer Institute, the Breast Cancer Research Foundation and Komen for the Cure paid for the study.It included many younger women and those with a family history of cancer, and they are known to have higher rates of gene mutations that raise risk, said Rebecca Nagy, a genetics counselor at Ohio State University and president of the National Society of Genetic Counselors.Still, "it has always stumped us" to see black families with lots of breast cancer but no mutations that can be found in ordinary testing for BRCA genes, she said.That was the situation for Alicia Cook, 44, a Chicago woman whose grandmother died of breast cancer, mother died of ovarian cancer and two sisters have had breast cancer. When she was first diagnosed with breast cancer nearly 10 years ago, a test for BRCA mutations was negative.Doctors said, "I'm sure there's something going on genetically" but they didn't have the tools to find it, Cook said.Last year, she had a recurrence and a sister who was diagnosed with the disease learned she carried a BRCA1 mutation. Cook was retested for the same mutation and found to have it. Now she is telling her relatives in hopes that more of them will seek genetic counseling and be aware of their risk."You don't want to put people in fear, but knowledge is power," she said.
Government officials, drug companies and medical experts, faced with outbreaks of antibiotic -resistant "superbugs," are pushing to speed up the approval of new antibiotics, a move that is raising safety concerns among some critics.The need for new antibiotics is so urgent, supporters of an overhaul say, that lengthy studies involving hundreds or thousands of patients should be waived in favor of directly testing such drugs in very sick patients. Influential lawmakers have said they are prepared to support legislation that allows for faster testing.The Health and Human Services Department last month announced an agreement under which it will pay $40 million to a major drug maker, GlaxoSmithKline, to help it develop medications to combat antibiotic resistance and biological agents that terrorists might use. Under the plan, the federal government could give the drug company as much as $200 million over the next five years."We are facing a huge crisis worldwide not having an antibiotics pipeline," said Dr. Janet Woodcock, director of the Center for Drug Evaluation and Research at the Food and Drug Administration. "It is bad now, and the infectious disease docs are frantic. But what is worse is the thought of where we will be five to 10 years from now."Annually, tens of thousands of Americans die from infections, largely acquired in hospitals, that are resistant to antibiotics, experts say.Doctors, faced with dwindling options and little time to decide, are often left with agonizing choices over how to save a patient's life. For example, some doctors, in extreme cases, are again using Colistin, an older antibiotic that was largely abandoned years ago because of the damage it can cause the kidneys."A drug like Colistin would not be developed today because it is too toxic," said Dr. Helen W. Boucher, an infectious disease expert at Tufts University in Boston.Under a plan proposed by a professional medical group, the Infectious Disease Society of America, new antibiotics approved through quicker testing would carry a special label specifying that their use be limited to very sick patients.But critics of the plan argue that merely putting a restrictive label on a medicine is not enough, and that limited tests might not be adequate to determine a drug's safety and effectiveness. They say they worry that the new medications, without the more comprehensive testing, could then be used on healthier patients who do not necessarily need them."There is really no way of knowing how these drugs are going to perform," said Dr. John H. Powers, a former F.D.A. antibiotics reviewer who is now an associate professor at George Washington University in Washington.The overuse of antibiotics in people and animals, often for conditions for which the drugs are ineffective or not needed, is seen as a driving force in the development of resistant bacteria. As these organisms have evolved and developed resistance, the development of new drugs has not kept pace.Pharmaceutical companies have frequently chosen to put their resources into developing drugs with bigger payoffs than antibiotics. Also, the F.D.A., after a scandal several years ago involving an antibiotic called Ketek, which the agency approved on the basis of fraudulent data and was subsequently linked to severe liver damage, has been cautious in approving new drugs, infectious disease experts say."It has been progressively more difficult to usher a new anti-infective to market," said Dr. Vance G. Fowler Jr., an infectious disease expert at Duke University.Efforts to develop new antibiotics are not limited to the United States. In Europe, several big producers including GlaxoSmithKline and AstraZeneca recently became part of a joint government and industry initiative to develop antibiotics that kill resistant strains of bacteria. As part of the project, companies are pooling their resources and research data.Along with the recent grant to GlaxoSmithKline, federal officials have also been giving grants to drug makers worth tens of millions of dollars to help them underwrite the costs of developing new antibiotics.In addition, Congress passed legislation last year that gives producers five more years of market exclusivity for effective drugs. The measure also directed the F.D.A. to review and approve new antibiotics more quickly, though it did not give specifics.In April, two senators, Michael F. Bennet, Democrat of Colorado, and Orrin Hatch, Republican of Utah, said they saw legislation as a way to circumvent the time it takes for the Food and Drug Administration to change its testing procedures. A letter they sent to the F.D.A. highlighted the plan championed by the Infectious Diseases Society of America.
WASHINGTON — If worry about skin cancer doesn't make you slather on sunscreen, maybe vanity will: New research provides some of the strongest evidence to date that near-daily sunscreen use can slow the aging of your skin.Ultraviolet rays that spur wrinkles and other signs of aging can quietly build up damage pretty much anytime you're in the sun — a lunchtime stroll, school recess, walking the dog — and they even penetrate car windows.Researchers in sunny Australia used a unique study to measure whether sunscreens really help amid that onslaught. Participants had casts made of the top of their hands to measure fine lines and wrinkles that signal sun-caused aging.The research found that even if you're already middle-aged, it's not too late to start rubbing some sunscreen on — and not just at the beach or pool. The study of 900 people under 55 compared those randomly assigned to use sunscreen daily to those who used it when they deemed it necessary.Daily sunscreen use was tough — participants did cheat a little. But after 4½ years, those who used sunscreen regularly had younger-looking hands, with 24 percent less skin aging than those who used sunscreen only some of the time.Both young adults and the middle-aged experienced skin-saving effects, concluded the study, financed by Australia's government and published Monday in the journal Annals of Internal Medicine."These are meaningful cosmetic benefits," lead scientist Dr. Adele Green of the Queensland Institute of Medical Research said in an email interview. More importantly, she added, less sun-caused aging decreases the risk of skin cancer in the long term.Dermatologists have long urged year-round sunscreen use — especially for constantly exposed skin on the face, hands and women's neck and upper chest — but say too few people heed that advice. Women may have better luck, as increasingly the cosmetics industry has added sunscreen to makeup and moisturizers. Skin experts hope the new study draws attention to the issue."Regular use of sunscreen had an unquestionable protective effect," said Dr. Richard Glogau, a clinical professor of dermatology at the University of California, San Francisco, who has long studied sun's skin effects. He wasn't involved with the Australian research.The consumer message: "They can get a two-for-one with sunscreen. They can do something that will keep them healthier and also keep them better-looking," Glogau said.In his clinic near Philadelphia, Dr. Eric Bernstein lectures patients who insist they're not in the sunshine enough for it to be causing their wrinkles, brown spots and dilated blood vessels. Even 15 minutes every day adds up over many years, he tells them — and if they're using one bottle of sunscreen a year, they're probably not using enough."No one thinks they're in the sun, and they're in the sun all the time," said Bernstein, also a clinical professor at the University of Pennsylvania. "I say, 'How did you get here — did you tunnel here?'"The news comes just as tougher Food and Drug Administration rules for U.S. sunscreens are taking effect. For the first time, they ensure that sunscreens labeled "broad-spectrum" protect against both the ultraviolet-B rays that cause sunburn and those deeper-penetrating ultraviolet-A rays that are linked to premature wrinkles and skin cancers.Sunburns, especially in childhood, have been linked to a greater risk for melanoma, the deadliest skin cancer. But overall UV exposure plays a role both in melanoma and in other skin cancers that usually are curable but can be disfiguring if not caught early.Australia has one of the world's highest rates of skin cancer, and Monday's aging research actually stems from a larger cancer-prevention study done in the 1990s. Researchers tracked participants for a decade before concluding that regular sunscreen use indeed lowered their cancer risk.Green's team dug back through old study files to examine what's called photoaging —using those casts that had been made of some participants' hands.Skin stretches and recoils thanks to elastic fibers supporting it. UV rays damage that elasticity, something scientists previously have measured using biopsies of the tissue just under the skin's top layer. With enough damage, the skin on top starts to sag and wrinkle. Young people have very fine, barely visible lines on their skin. Sun-damaged fibers correlate with increasingly visible lines, in a sort of cross-hatch pattern. Hand casts allowed the Australian researchers to grade that amount of damage.The researchers figured out who really used sunscreen by periodically weighing the bottles donated by a sunscreen maker. Green's team calculated that three-quarters of the people assigned to daily sunscreen use actually applied it at least three to four days a week. Only a third of the comparison group said they used sunscreen that often.The study also tested whether a dietary supplement, beta carotene, might slow photoaging, and found no evidence that it helped.Sunscreens aren't perfect, so don't forget dermatologists' other advice: Limit exposure during the peak UV hours of 10 a.m. to 4 p.m., and wear a hat, sunglasses and protective clothing when possible.UCSF's Glogau noted that today's sunscreens are superior to those used two decades ago when the study started — meaning people who regularly use it now might see more benefit."I'm fond of telling people that if they start using sunscreen on a regular basis and don't do anything else, over a period of time they'll see an improvement in the appearance of their skin," Glogau said. "It's never too late."
CHICAGO — Obesity surgery worked much better at reducing and even reversing diabetes than medication and lifestyle changes in one of the most rigorous studies of its kind. But the researchers and others warn that possible serious complications need to be considered.The yearlong study indicates that the most common weight-loss surgery, gastric bypass, can effectively treat diabetes in patients with mild to moderate obesity — about 50 to 70 pounds overweight, the researchers reported Tuesday in the Journal of the American Medical Association.Other studies have shown the operation can reverse diabetes in severely obese patients, although sometimes the disease comes back.About a third of the 60 adults who got bypass surgery in the new study developed serious problems within a year of the operation, though some cases were not clearly linked with the surgery. That rate is similar to what's been seen in previous studies.But for the most serious complications — infections, intestinal blockages and bleeding — the rate was 6 percent, slightly higher than in earlier research.The most dangerous complication occurred in one patient when stomach contents leaked from the surgery site, leading to an overwhelming infection, leg amputation and brain injury. Lead author Dr. Sayeed Ikramuddin, an obesity surgeon at the University of Minnesota, called that case "a fluke."A journal editorial says such devastating complications are rare, but that "the frequency and severity of complications ... is problematic" in the study and that the best way to treat patients with both obesity and diabetes "remains unknown."A research review in the journal said more long-term evidence on risks and benefits is needed to determine if obesity surgery is an appropriate way to treat diabetes in patients who aren't severely obese — at least 100 pounds overweight.More than 20 million Americans have Type 2 diabetes; most are overweight or obese. Diabetics face increased risks for heart disease and strokes, and poorly controlled diabetes can damage the kidneys, eyes and blood vessels.About 160,000 people nationwide undergo various types of obesity surgery each year. Bypass surgery, the type studied, involves stapling the stomach to create a small pouch and attaching it to a lower part of the intestines.The American Society for Metabolic & Bariatric Surgery says obesity surgery is safe and that the death rate is less than 1 percent, lower than for gallbladder and hip replacement surgery.The study involved 120 patients at five hospitals in New York, Minnesota and Taiwan. All patients got medicines for diabetes, obesity, cholesterol and/or high blood pressure. They all were advised to cut calories and increase physical activity.Sixty patients also had surgery, and the two groups were compared after one year.The surgery group lost on average nearly 60 pounds and 75 percent lowered blood sugar levels to normal or near normal levels. The non-surgery group lost an average 17 pounds and just 30 percent reached the blood-sugar goal. The surgery group also needed less medication after the operation.The researchers say the diabetes changes were likely due to the weight loss but that hormonal changes affecting blood sugar may have contributed.The surgery group showed a trend toward having less high blood pressure and elevated cholesterol — both major risk factors for heart disease, although those between-group differences could have been due to chance.Ikramuddin, the lead author, said the study results don't mean that all mildly obese diabetics should have obesity surgery, but that "in the correct patient, surgery might be an important thing to consider."
For many years, smoking and drinking were considered the dominant risk factors for cancers of the throat. But on Monday, The Guardian, a British newspaper, reported that the actor Michael Douglas believed that his throat cancer was caused by an infection acquired during oral sex, highlighting a trend that has alarmed many scientists.Mr. Douglas, 68, had previously speculated that years of smoking and drinking played a role in his disease, and his spokesman later said that although the actor had discussed oral sex's link to cancer, he did not say it was the cause of his own cancer. But The Guardian quoted Mr. Douglas as saying, "Without wanting to get too specific, this particular cancer is caused by HPV, which actually comes from cunnilingus."Indeed, in recent years scientists have documented a steep rise in throat cancers caused by a strain of HPV that can be transmitted through oral sex. The virus, human papillomavirus Type 16, also causes many cases of cervical cancer in women.In the 1980s, only a small number of throat cancers were linked to HPV infection. Historically, patients who developed the disease were in their 70s and were heavy smokers and drinkers.Now, about 70 percent of all throat cancers are caused by HPV, up from roughly 15 percent three decades ago. Patients are now more frequently middle-aged husbands and fathers who are economically well off, nonsmokers and not particularly heavy drinkers. Men are three times more likely to be diagnosed than women with HPV-related throat cancer.There are many strains of HPV, and the virus is so common that at some point most sexually active adults are exposed to it. A majority of people fight off the infection and do not develop symptoms. But in a very small number of people chronic infection causes oropharyngeal cancers near the base of the tongue and the area just behind the mouth.Throat cancers caused by HPV are easier to treat than those caused by tobacco, doctors say. Rates of these cancers are increasing but are still fairly uncommon, striking about 3 in 100,000 people. Studies have not proved that vaccines against HPV prevent throat cancers, but many doctors believe they will.The cancers typically occur decades after initial infection with HPV, and the diagnosis can raise delicate questions for spouses who wonder how partners were infected and worry that they, too, may contract the virus."It is a sexually transmitted virus, so that by itself obviously creates uncomfortable discussions between my patients and their partners," said Dr. Robert I. Haddad, the disease center leader of the head and neck oncology program at the Dana-Farber Cancer Institute in Boston.In 2009, Tony Simotes, 62, learned that he had a tumor in his throat, which was diagnosed as Stage 3 oropharyngeal cancer. Mr. Simotes had never been a smoker or a drinker. He and his wife, Lucy, were relieved at first to learn the cancer was HPV-related, because that raised the odds that he could be cured."But then I started going through all the motions of what does that mean for me, too?" said Ms. Simotes, 50. "Because this cancer came from a virus, and I may or may not have it."She said she had a Pap test that came back negative.Because both partners had been previously married, they were comfortable discussing the cancer and its cause, said Mr. Simotes, the artistic director and president of Shakespeare & Company in Lenox, Mass. "We know that we've lived pretty full lives until we met each other," he said. "The reality is that a lot of times people carry the virus and it doesn't affect them."Mr. Simotes underwent chemotherapy and radiation, and his cancer is in remission.In a study presented last weekend at a conference of the American Society of Clinical Oncology, Dr. Haddad and other researchers showed for the first time that the partners of people with throat cancers caused by HPV were not at greater risk of developing oral HPV infections themselves. The study involved more than 200 people followed for about a year.Dr. Haddad said the findings suggest that spouses and longtime partners do not need to take special precautions or change their sexual behavior.
CHICAGO — The early success of a new class of cancer drugs, revealed in test results released here over the last several days, has raised hope among the world's top cancer specialists that they may be on the verge of an important milestone in the fight against the disease.The excitement has spread to Wall Street. Shares of Merck and Bristol-Myers Squibb, which are developing such drugs, rose more than 3 percent on Monday after data from their studies was presented over the weekend at the meeting of the American Society of Clinical Oncology.The drugs, still generally in early testing, work in an entirely new way, by unleashing the immune system to attack cancer cells much as it attacks bacteria. That could be an alternative to often-debilitating chemotherapy.Finding ways to use the body's own defenses has been a goal since the late 1800s, when a New York surgeon named William B. Coley noticed that cancer disappeared in a patient who had a severe bacterial infection.He then began injecting bacteria into cancer patients to rev up their immune systems. His claims of success were disputed and most attempts since then to harness the immune system have not worked.The new drugs work by disabling a brake on the immune system called the programmed death 1 receptor, or PD-1. And although the data presented at the meeting was from the earliest stage of testing only, the drugs were the center of attention here, with some doctors predicting that cancer treatment was about to shift."If you look five years out, most of this meeting will be about immunotherapy," said Dr. Mario Sznol, a professor of medical oncology at Yale.Analysts, who predict billions of dollars in sales, are trying to determine which of the three front-runners — Merck, Bristol-Myers and Roche — have the best drug and how soon the drugs could reach the market. Some think it could be as early as a year and a half from now."I think all of you recognize this is a very special moment in oncology," Dr. Roger M. Perlmutter, head of research and development at Merck, told analysts Sunday at a standing-room-only meeting.Harnessing the immune system is appealing for several reasons. It might be applicable to many different types of cancer. It might produce longer lasting remissions than can be achieved by chemotherapy or the newer targeted drugs. And it seems somehow more natural and holistic."It seems the right thing to do to stimulate our body's defense rather than take some kind of poison," said Therese Bocklage, a cancer patient and pathologist from Albuquerque.Dr. Bocklage thought she had bruised her leg moving a Christmas tree in late 2011. It turned out to be the return of the melanoma she thought had been successfully eradicated by surgery 20 years earlier.She has been taking Merck's experimental PD-1 inhibitor, lambrolizumab, as part of a clinical trial since January 2012, and her tumors have disappeared. "If I had had this turn up not last year but six years ago, most likely I'd be dead," she said.But there are reasons to be cautious. This is cancer, after all. Many other hoped-for miracles have failed to materialize. This is a conference that has hailed drugs that extend lives by only a few weeks as breakthroughs."We're so used to failure, we get excited very easily," said Dr. Kim Margolin, an expert on melanoma and immune therapies at the Seattle Cancer Care Alliance.Most of what is known about the PD-1 drugs is that they shrink tumors significantly in 15 to 50 percent of patients. It is still not clearly established, though there are some hints, that the drugs will let people live longer.And results seen in trials, under idealized conditions, do not translate perfectly to the real world. One poster presented here looked at use in Britain of Yervoy, a melanoma drug approved in 2011 that disables a different immune system brake. Median survival has been only about half of what was seen in clinical trials.Moreover, just because the immune system is involved does not make something safe. Ask anyone with lupus, multiple sclerosis or other diseases caused by an aberrant immune system.Yervoy, made by Bristol-Myers, has some serious side effects caused by overstimulation of the immune system. The newer PD-1 drugs seem remarkably well tolerated so far, though lung inflammation is seen in some patients.
In the United States, some very premature babies are swaddled in sterile plastic wrap to keep their body temperature from dropping dangerously. Now a study of newborns in Zambia suggests that the technique can be duplicated cheaply and effectively in poorer countries — using simple plastic bags."These are regular plastic bags, similar to grocery bags," said an author of the study, Dr. Waldemar A. Carlo, a neonatal care specialist at the University of Alabama at Birmingham. "We bought them for as little as 2 cents each. That's the beauty of it."The skin of premature babies is very thin, and water evaporates quickly through it, sometimes leading to life-threatening heat loss, especially in a poor country where heat on neonatal wards can be unsteady.In the hospital in Lusaka, Zambia, where the study was conducted, the average temperature in the birth wards was near 80 degrees, Dr. Carlo said, but it fluctuated when heaters were moved and windows were opened.The babies were placed on their mothers' chests right after birth in typical "kangaroo care," he said. But kangaroo care is not always enough to warm a child, and when babies were taken to be weighed or observed or because the mother fell asleep or needed medical treatment, putting them in a plastic bag before wrapping them in a blanket did a better job of keeping them warm than a blanket alone.In the study, published in the journal Pediatrics, there were no instances of overheating or of skin rashes from bag contact.
WASHINGTON — The organ transplant network has placed a dying 10-year-old girl on the adult waiting list for a donated lung, complying with a judge's unusual order.Health and Human Services Secretary Kathleen Sebelius said Thursday that Sarah Murnaghan also remains on the priority list for a lung from a pediatric donor.Sebelius said the Organ Procurement and Transplantation Network made the change last night, after the government relayed the judge's ruling.The girls' parents had challenged existing transplant policy that made children under 12 wait for pediatric lungs to become available, or be offered lungs donated by adults after adolescents and adults on the waiting list had been considered. The ruling applies only to Sarah, who has end-stage cystic fibrosis and has been awaiting a transplant at Children's Hospital of Philadelphia.
The federal Office for Human Research Protections announced on Wednesday that it would suspend action against the University of Alabama at Birmingham, which it said in March did not adequately inform parents about the risks to their premature infants of enrollment in a large research trial.In a letter dated Tuesday, the watchdog office still maintained that researchers had not properly informed parents, and that it could still require that the university and 22 other trial sites, which include many of the country's top research universities, take corrective action. But it also acknowledged that federal guidelines about a researcher's obligations needed to be clarified and issued. On the office's Web site, the federal Department of Health and Human Services announced that a public meeting to debate such guidelines was forthcoming.The timing of the letter coincided with the publication on the Web site of The New England Journal of Medicine of an opinion article by leaders of the National Institutes of Health that took issue with the agency's initial condemnation of the Surfactant, Positive Pressure, and Oxygenation Randomized Trial, widely known as Support. Both the agency and the N.I.H. are branches of Health and Human Services.The Journal also published a letter, signed by 46 doctors and scholars, that criticized the office's initial action as overreaching and having a potentially chilling effect on essential research.At the center of the uproar, which has engendered commentary from scientists, is whether researchers needed to disclose to parents the risks of a randomized trial of higher and lower oxygen levels administered to premature infants. The levels of oxygen concentration given to the infants were within the range of 85 percent to 95 percent, the standard treatment recommended by the American Academy of Pediatrics. Researchers wanted to pinpoint more precisely the level at which the risks of eye damage or neurological damage, or even death, were abated.There were risks to the infants at either end of the narrow band. The results, published in The New England Journal of Medicine in 2010, showed that lowering the oxygen levels led to greater mortality rates than expected.But as the office wrote, "Some physicians, recognizing the particular concerns about risks near the low (85 percent) and high (95 percent) ends of that range, might choose to avoid one or both of those regions."Dr. Joel E. Frader, a pediatrician and professor of medical humanities and bioethics at Northwestern, who signed the letter in The Journal, felt that the office initially did overreach, but also that the researchers did not properly inform parents of all risks. Because there was a band of oxygen saturation levels, he said, there was no clear standard of care for these infants, only an "acceptable range." And parents should have been told that, he said."It's the obligation of investigators to say, 'Here's the debate, here's how we're trying to answer the question, and that involves the possibility that there is an additional risk with being a research subject,' " he said.He applauded the effort to clarify guidelines for disclosure, even in standard-of-care trials. Researchers should not shy away from fully informing subjects, he said. "There is no empirical evidence that transparency and clarity decreases participation in clinical research," he said.
A type of group therapy designed for trauma victims has proved extraordinarily helpful for survivors of sexual violence in Democratic Republic of Congo, enabling women to overcome the shame, nightmares and terrifying flashbacks that had left them unable to work or take care of their families or themselves, researchers report.An article about the therapy, published Wednesday in The New England Journal of Medicine, is a rare event: a rigorous study of a treatment meant to heal the mental and emotional scars of women in a part of Africa where rape has become a routine weapon of war. Congo, with two decades of civil war, has been called the rape capital of the world by the United Nations. The country has little or no treatment for those with mental health problems.A team of researchers from Johns Hopkins University, the University of Washington in Seattle and the International Rescue Committee brought a type of treatment called cognitive processing therapy to Congo. They adapted the method to treat women who could not read or write, and taught it to local health workers who had a high school education or less. The workers then conducted group therapy sessions in five languages with survivors of sexual attacks who had severe anxiety, depression and post-traumatic stress disorder. In Swahili, the treatment was called "mind and heart" therapy.Hundreds of thousands of Congolese females, from toddlers to grandmothers — possibly as many as two million, according to one study — have been raped by rebel fighters or government troops. Notoriously brutal attacks have included gang rapes and penetration with guns, knives and other objects that have torn apart women's reproductive systems and intestines, sometimes beyond repair.The study included women from 15 rural villages in eastern Congo, an area of rolling green hills and farmland bordered by dense forests where rebels often hide and venture out to conduct raids. Researchers estimate that about 40 percent of the women in the region have been victims of sexual violence.The therapy technique employed in the study has been used successfully with rape victims and others with post-traumatic stress in the United States. It involves teaching people to think rationally about the troubled thoughts, feelings and beliefs that can linger after an attack.For instance, women who were raped often blame themselves. They left a window open. They went out alone. They made eye contact with a man who later attacked them. Their clothing somehow invited the assault.The therapy urges them to question those beliefs. Have women been raped in other circumstances? If so, then how can a woman blame herself?The program is highly structured, based on a manual for counselors, with topics defined for each therapy session and homework assignments for participants.Seven villages, with 157 women, were picked at random to receive the group therapy. Eight other villages, with 248 women, were offered "individual support," meaning that the women could ask for personal counseling and referrals for medical, legal and economic problems.The group therapy consisted of one individual session with a counselor, and 11 weekly two-hour group meetings. The women's symptoms were assessed and graded three times: before the treatment program, when it ended and six months afterward. Sixty-five percent of the women in group therapy completed all three assessments, as did 52 percent of those who got individual support.The improvement from group therapy was striking, the researchers found. Six months after treatment, only 9 percent of the women who received group therapy still had anxiety, depression or PTSD. By comparison, 42 percent of the women who had individual support still had those problems.Catherine Poulton, an adviser to the International Rescue Committee, said the group hoped to work with the country's Health Ministry to offer the therapy to more women through national health centers. She said her organization also hoped to provide the treatment in other countries where it was needed. One of the treatment's advantages, she said, is that people without university degrees can learn it.
WASHINGTON — A panel of experts convened in response to the school shooting last year in Newtown, Conn., gave the federal government an ambitious set of priorities on Wednesday for research on guns, ending what experts said has been a 17-year hiatus in the study of gun violence after Congress took away federal money for the topic in the 1990s.President Obama has included $10 million for gun-related research in his 2014 budget, the first federal financing for the topic in years, and the panel's chairman, Alan I. Leshner, said the report was a first step to deepen evidence about the public health implications of guns. The panel was assembled by the Institute of Medicine and the National Research Council at President Obama's request."Policies are made on the basis of facts and values, and we are the facts people," said Mr. Leshner, who is the chief executive of the American Association for the Advancement of Science. "We are trying to provide a tool for the country to address this very difficult issue more productively than it has been able to do in the past."Among the panel's recommendations was a call for better data on guns. For example, there is no national count of how many guns there are in the country. And while federal law enforcement authorities, like the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives, gather data on specific guns, they track only those used in crimes, and often the details are not accessible to researchers. One database, the National Violent Death Reporting System, which compiles information on deaths from police departments and medical examiners' offices, covers only about a third of the states."Basic information about gun possession, distribution, ownership, acquisition and storage is lacking," the experts concluded. They added that "without good data, it is virtually impossible to answer fundamental questions" about gun violence or to evaluate programs intended to reduce that violence.Public health researchers, who have long complained that a lack of solid information hobbles their work, applauded the request. But it may prove contentious. Many gun advocates have opposed additional reporting requirements, warning that more detailed information begins to look a lot like a national gun registry, which they have vigorously opposed and which federal law explicitly bans.A spokesman for the National Rifle Association said that the organization's researchers were reviewing the report, which was more than 90 pages long. He did not immediately have a comment.Mr. Leshner emphasized that the panel was not recommending that federal authorities create a registry. Common databases that combine different sources of information and are publicly accessible could have people's identities stripped out, he said, much as databases of genetic information do. Such data would also help in evaluations of interventions to reduce gun violence."We need a science base so we are not wasting money on things that don't work," he said.Experts said that the panelists' efforts were prodigious, but that it remained to be seen how much their recommendations would advance research. Progress will depend on financing from Congress, which recently voted down measures endorsed by President Obama with bipartisan support."I'm elated that the Institute of Medicine was asked to do this," said Daniel Webster, director of the Johns Hopkins Center for Gun Policy and Research at the Johns Hopkins Bloomberg School of Public Health in Baltimore. "This is a very important step forward."Still, "given that we are in very lean budget times, the C.D.C. will be faced with difficult decisions about setting priorities," he added, referring to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.The panel also recommended that researchers look into patterns of gun ownership across demographic groups, how young people get access to guns, and the potential risks and benefits of having a gun at home. To make their recommendations, panelists reviewed scientific literature and identified gaps in knowledge.Some lines of inquiry were rejected as not worth pursuing. Ronald C. Kessler, a professor of health care policy at Harvard Medical School, led a discussion on whether media, including television and video games, were a motivating factor for gun violence.He said the panel "looked deeply" into the question and concluded that it was not a research priority.
More than 70 medical, research and advocacy organizations active in 41 countries and including the National Institutes of Health announced Wednesday that they had agreed to create an organized way to share genetic and clinical information. Their aim is to put the vast and growing trove of data on genetic variations and health into databases — with the consent of the study subjects — that would be open to researchers and doctors all over the world, not just to those who created them.Millions more people are expected to get their genes decoded in coming years, and the fear is that this avalanche of genetic and clinical data about people and how they respond to treatments will be hopelessly fragmented and impede the advance of medical science. This ambitious effort hopes to standardize the data and make them widely availabl e."We are strong supporters of this global alliance," said Dr. Francis Collins, director of the National Institutes of Health. "There is lots of momentum now, and we really do want to move quickly."In just the past few years, the price of determining the sequence of genetic letters that make up human DNA has dropped a millionfold, said Dr. David Altshuler, deputy director and chief academic officer at the Broad Institute of Harvard and M.I.T. As a result, instead of having access to just a few human genomes — the complete genetic material of a person, including genes and regions that control genes — researchers can now study tens of thousands of them, along with clinical data on peoples' health and how they fared on various treatments.In the next few years, Dr. Altshuler said, researchers expect that millions of people will have their genomes sequenced."The question is whether and how we make it possible to learn from these data as they grow, in a manner that respects the autonomy and privacy choices of each participant," he said. No one wants to put DNA sequences and clinical data on the Internet without the permission of patients, he said, so it also is important to allow people to decide if they want their data — with no names or obvious identifiers attached — to be available to researchers.But there are no agreed-upon standards for representing genetic data or sharing them, experts say. And there are no common procedures for assuring that patients consent to sharing their information."Each institution has its own approach," Dr. Altshuler said.In cancer research, for example, medical centers test cancer cells to find gene mutations. The goal of these tests is to help diagnose and identify treatments that might help individual patients. But there are no common methods for doing these tests or analyzing the data, and each research group keeps its data to itself, said Dr. Charles L. Sawyers, chairman of the human oncology and pathogenesis program at Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center.As a result, the centers often have too little experience with a particular mutation to know what it really means. A person might be told at one cancer center that a new treatment would help and at another that it would not."That's scary," said Dr. Sawyers, who is also president of the American Association for Cancer Research, a nonprofit group.Medical researchers say the best way forward is to have shared databases. Do patients with a particular genetic aberration tend to do well with a particular therapy? Do patients with another mutation have greater odds of developing cancer?Dr. Collins said that cancers are so genetically complex that, most of the time, a mutation seen in a cancer patient will be uncommon. To figure out its significance, data from hundreds of thousands of patients — the world's collected data — on that mutation are needed."You need very large numbers of patients," Dr. Collins said.Pooled data are also needed to understand mutations that lead to rare diseases in children, Dr. Altshuler said. A disease might occur in one in 1,000 or one in 100,000 babies, he said. A medical center might never see a child with that disease, or might see just one. "Since everyone sees zero or one, no one ever learns," Dr. Altshuler said.Brad Margus, an advocate for children with rare diseases, enthusiastically supports the idea of data sharing. As the father of two sons with a rare disease, ataxia telangiectasia, and founder and volunteer president of the A-T Children's Project, he says he learned how progress is made."There is this perception that the key to the next breakthrough is from someone finding a gene that is sitting somewhere and someone having a eureka moment," Mr. Margus said. "What I learned is that it does not usually happen that way." Often what is needed are huge data sets, he added, "so people can be proactive when they have an idea."Pooled data are also needed to understand the genesis of big killers like heart disease, researchers said.Recently, for example, Dr. Sekar Kathiresan, director of preventive cardiology at Massachusetts General Hospital and a geneticist at the Broad Institute, sought to find out whether high density lipoprotein, or HDL, the so-called good cholesterol, actually protects people against heart disease. Do people who happen to have genetic changes that result in lifelong high levels of HDL have a lower risk, he asked?They do not, he concluded, but his study required genetic data from more than 100,000 people collected in 20 studies by researchers from around the world. It took three years to gather the data, put them in a form that allowed investigators to analyze them and to do the analysis."We need standard formats so we don't have to spend two years figuring out how to merge data together," Dr. Collins said.Over the past couple of years, genetics researchers puzzled over the data-sharing problem, seeing it as central to making progress. On Jan. 28, 50 leading researchers from eight countries met and agreed on the need for a global alliance. The group, which included ethicists and disease advocates, stressed that because individual study subjects had to be able to decide whether to share their genetic and clinical information, the system for data sharing had to include ways to track and manage these permissions.The group wrote a white paper and a letter of intent that has now been endorsed by an ever-growing international group. "For us, this is a gratifying development," Dr. Collins said.
WASHINGTON — Officials with the national Organ Procurement and Transplantation Network voted in an emergency meeting on Monday to create a new avenue for children seeking lung transplants after two families filed lawsuits challenging the rules.The families of Sarah Murnaghan, 10, of Newtown Square, Pa., and Javier Acosta, 11, of New York City, sued last week in the hope of changing a rule that keeps children under 12 from qualifying for adult lungs unless eligible adolescent and adult patients in the same geographic region have turned them down. Judge Michael M. Baylson of Federal District Court in Philadelphia ordered the Department of Health and Human Services, which oversees the transplant network, to at least temporarily put Sarah and Javier, patients at Children's Hospital of Philadelphia, on the adult waiting list.The case has drawn widespread attention, with critics saying the courts have no business intervening in complex organ transplant policy and supporters of the two sick children saying the rules are grossly unfair. Both children have cystic fibrosis, a genetic disease that ravages the lungs. Sarah's doctors have said she may have only weeks to live without a transplant.On Monday, the executive committee of the Organ Procurement and Transplantation Network did not drastically change the rules for lung allocation. But it voted to allow children under 12 awaiting a lung transplant to have their cases reviewed by a national board of lung transplant surgeons. Based on the severity of their condition, the board may allow such children to get on the adolescent and adult waiting lists for lungs while also keeping their spot on the pediatric list.According to the network, 1,659 people nationwide are waiting for a lung transplant, but only about 30 of them are younger than 12. Since 2007, there has been only one transplant of adult lungs into a child younger than 12 in the United States, the network said."The number of patients potentially affected by this policy is very small and unlikely to have a significant impact on the larger pool of transplant candidates," said Anne Paschke, a spokeswoman for the network, in a statement after the vote.The rules for lung transplants used to be based on how long a patient had been on the waiting list. But under that system, people who suddenly became very ill and joined the list had virtually no chance of receiving transplants in time to save their lives; others who were less ill and could afford to wait longer nonetheless got transplants first, just because they had been on the list longer. Doctors recognized that patients were dying needlessly, and about eight years ago, the system was redesigned to take into account the severity of illness.The changes were widely considered successful, and a much fairer way to allocate organs. But they applied only to adults and to children over 12.Dr. Joshua R. Sonett, a thoracic surgeon at NewYork-Presbyterian/Columbia University Medical Center, said that at the time, there was not enough data about lung disease in younger children for doctors to determine whether altering the rules for them in the same way would be of any help."Those 12-and-under kids are still stuck in the old system," Dr. Sonett said.In addition to adding the review process for children, the executive committee voted to re-examine the rules for allocating lungs to children over the next year with the intent of making more transplants available to them. The revision allowing for the review process will expire in July 2014, although the committee could decide to renew it at that point.The vote came after the committee heard testimony from several doctors who expressed medical and ethical concerns about changing the rules on an emergency basis. Although donor lungs can be "downsized" to fit a smaller recipient's chest, some data suggest the outcomes are poor.The failure to change the system for children when it was changed for adults was not "mean or capricious," Dr. Sonett said."As a lung transplant surgeon, I don't want lawyers or nonmedical professionals trying to tell us the best way or adjudicating ways to transplant the patients," he said. "On the other hand, as a patient advocate, I want all the patients to get transplanted in a fair manner. These children are being disadvantaged in a system that hasn't been revisited in the eight years since it was created."He added, "Maybe this is not the best way for it to come to light and be reviewed, but it's forcing us medically to reassess how we do this."Stephen Harvey, the lawyer representing the Acosta and Murnaghan families, said he was pleased with the vote. But he said he would ask Kathleen Sebelius, the secretary of health and human services, to keep Sarah and Javier on the adult waiting list until their cases were heard by the review board, which could take weeks. If she refuses, Mr. Harvey said, he will ask Judge Baylson to keep his order in place. A hearing in the court case is scheduled for Friday.
A student-professor team at Case Western Reserve University has invented a hand-held malaria detector that works on an unusual principle: Malaria parasites are stuffed with iron, so their innards can be magnetized.The team, which has incorporated itself as the Disease Diagnostic Group, is seeking investors to pay for field tests to prove that its device works as well on the African front lines as it does in a Cleveland lab. Its pitch is that its battery-powered box, which costs $250 to make, can undercut the price of current chemical-based rapid test kits by at least 50 cents per test and pay for itself quickly. The company claims its test is far more accurate than the kits at detecting low-level infections.It has long been known that malaria parasites eat the hemoglobin in red blood cells but cannot digest its iron nor excrete it. Each parasite has a holding tank called a food vacuole filled with iron-rich crystallized hemozoin. A proposal to gently microwave malaria victims to explode the parasites was based on that fact.The Case Western device dilutes a drop of blood with water, places a magnetic field around it and shines a laser through it. If the blood has parasites, the water splits them and the needle-shaped hemozoin crystals line up in the magnetic field, partly blocking the laser.In tests on stored blood samples from Papua New Guinea, said Brian T. Grimberg, a Case Western biologist, the magnet-laser box was almost twice as accurate as a microscope technician at finding parasites, and more than three times as accurate as the kits.The rapid kits, introduced in the last decade, have sped up malaria diagnoses in rural clinics, but they cost at least $1 each and expire in hot climates, Dr. Grimberg added.His device failed to win grant support from the Bill & Melinda Gates Foundation, Dr. Grimberg said, but that was before the recent blood tests. A foundation spokeswoman said that she did not know why any single one of thousands of applications was denied, but that the foundation was interested in iron-based malaria detection.
BOSTON — Here at Beth Israel Deaconess Medical Center, a black mouse lies on a miniature exam table, his tail dangling off the end. A plastic tube carries anesthetic to his nose and mouth. He is asleep.Before he was born, the mouse was injected with two mutated genes often found in human prostate cancer. As he lies on the table, a technician is measuring his two-millimeter prostate tumor with a petite ultrasound machine — the very exam a man would undergo, only on a dollhouse scale."There's the tumor," says the technician, Bhavik Padmani, sliding a probe over the mouse as a bright white amoebalike shape comes into view.The animal is in what is called a "mouse hospital," a new way of using mice to study cancer. Although mice have been studied in regular labs for years, the results often have been disappointing. Usually, the cancers were implanted under their skin, not in the organs where they originated. And drugs that seemed to work in mice often proved useless in humans.The mouse hospital at Beth Israel Deaconess and a few similar ones elsewhere are at the forefront of a new approach to studying human cancers. The mice are given genes that make them develop tumors in the same organs as humans, which means the researchers need scanners to watch the tumors' growth inside the animals' bodies. So the mouse hospitals have tiny ultrasound machines, CT and PET scanners, and magnetic resonance imaging machines with little stretchers to slide the mice into the machines. They also have mouse pharmacies to formulate medicines in mouse-size doses and mouse clinical laboratories specially designed to do analyses on minute drops of mouse blood and vanishingly small quantities of mouse urine. That lets them follow cancers' growth and responses to treatments.What's more, with genetic advances in studies of human tumors, the researchers do not have to implant human cancer cells in all their complexity into mice to study the cancers; instead, they can give the mice just a few mutated genes that seem to drive a tumor.They genetically alter the mice before they are born and then, with scanners, watch what happens as a cancer develops in the expected organ — the prostate, in this case. Then they can try out drugs designed to attack those gene mutations and the cancers they cause. The result, so far, has been astonishing. The mice with just a few cancer genes developed prostate cancer when they grew up. The cancer responded to the standard treatment — castration or, in the case of patients, chemical castration with a drug that shuts off testosterone production in the testes. Then, as often happens in men with advanced prostate cancer, the tumors in the mice started growing again, resistant to the castration treatment.But because so few genes were involved in the mouse prostate cancer, the investigators, including Andrea Lunardi of Beth Israel Deaconess, could pinpoint the genetic roots of the treatment resistance. Researchers had studied prostate tumors before, asking how and why they grew resistant to treatment, but were stymied by the hundreds of mutations in cancer cells and unable to figure out which ones were important to the treatment resistance.In retrospect, the solution seems obvious, said Dr. Pier Paolo Pandolfi, scientific director at Beth Israel Deaconess Medical Center. By making mice with only one or a few suspect mutations at a time, scientists cut through the chaotic genetic noise."The data were in front of our eyes, but we did not see them because the patients had many other things going on," Dr. Pandolfi said.Understanding the roots of the treatment resistance in mice, the investigators could try out rational ways to circumvent it in the animals, based on their genetic insights. It turned out to require more than one drug, which was not surprising.The work is reported in Nature Genetics.Many cancer researchers have suggested that the best way to treat cancer will be with more than one drug, blocking the cancer's paths of escape. But the trouble was choosing which drug combinations to try."If we start randomly throwing every combination together, there are not enough patients on earth to test them," said Dr. Lewis C. Cantley, director of the cancer center at Weill Cornell Medical College and NewYork-Presbyterian Hospital who worked with Dr. Pandolfi on the prostate cancer study. "We need a scientific rationale for picking a particular combination of drugs."The investigators just started one clinical trial to see if the mouse studies predict what will happen in patients, and are about to start another. And, they say, they could never have gotten this far without the mice with human cancer genes and the mouse hospital to study them."It's a very clever, innovative way to try to improve patient care," said Dr. Scott Eggener, a director of the prostate cancer program at the University of Chicago, who was not involved with the research. "Now it is incumbent on them to show it works in humans."That, of course, is the goal of the two clinical trials. Each participant will be matched with collections of mouse proxies, with each group of mice engineered to carry different combinations of a few major human prostate cancer genes. The mice will develop tumors, just as the men did, and will receive the same treatments as the men. But since each mouse will have only one or a few of the critical cancer mutations, researchers will be able to see if a treatment is doing what it should and analyze the reason for resistance, if it develops. These trials will be the first to test treatments in mice and men simultaneously, Dr. Pandolfi said.
WASHINGTON — Don't look for the morning-after pill to move next to the condoms on drugstore shelves right away — but after a decade-plus fight, it appears it really will happen. Backed into a corner by a series of court rulings, the Obama administration has agreed to let the Plan B One-Step brand of emergency contraception sell over the counter to anyone of any age.There still are a lot of details to be worked out, including whether a federal judge agrees that the government has gone far enough or whether cheaper generics can be sold without restrictions too.But the move does mark a major societal shift in the long battle over women's reproductive rights, and influential doctors' groups welcomed the step Tuesday."Allowing unrestricted access to emergency contraception products is a historic step forward in protecting the health of our patients who are sexually active," said Dr. Thomas McInerny, president of the American Academy of Pediatrics. "The science has always been clear: Emergency contraception is a safe, effective tool to prevent unintended pregnancy in adolescents of any reproductive age."On the other side, social conservatives argue that the drug's availability undermines parental supervision, and accuse the administration of politicking."We are disappointed that this administration has once again sided with its political allies and ignored the safety of girls and the rights of parents," said Anna Higgins of the Family Research Council.A look at the medical, legal and political issues surrounding over-the-counter sales of backup birth control:Q: How quickly will emergency contraceptives be sold on the drugstore shelves?A: "I don't expect to see the product at the neighborhood pharmacy instantly," cautioned Susannah Baruch of the Reproductive Health Technologies Project.First, U.S. District Judge Edward Korman in New York must decide whether the Obama administration's decision complies with his April order that the government lift all age restrictions on nonprescription sale of morning-after pills. Korman wanted unrestricted access to all brands, not just the best-selling Plan B One-Step. Generic versions are cheaper, and the judge didn't want to place a disproportionate burden on the poor and minorities. But he did say the government could try to make the case that one-pill versions like Plan B One-Step are better than the two-pill versions.Court case aside, manufacturer Teva Women's Health must submit an application to the Food and Drug Administration to begin sales with no age limits. Teva didn't say Tuesday how quickly that might happen.Q: What if my condom breaks in the meantime?A: The old rules remain in effect. Four or five versions of emergency contraceptives are sold without a prescription only to customers who can prove to a pharmacist that they're 17 or older.For Plan B One-Step, the age was soon to drop to 15, but those sales haven't begun yet. It's a moot point now anyway.Q: Why did the Obama administration change course?A: The administration gave in because it already had lost multiple rounds in court, and it appeared it would lose again. Just last week, an appeals court said girls of any age could buy the two-pill generic emergency contraception without a prescription while the government appealed Korman's initial ruling. That set the stage for massive confusion in drugstores and signaled that the appeal could fail. If the messy battle reached the Supreme Court, it would be a big distraction to President Barack Obama's second-term goals, including immigration legislation, a budget deal and efforts to combat climate change.Since some version was going to be sold over the counter no matter what, the FDA said it should be the simpler one-dose Plan B One-Step, not two-pill versions originally designed to be taken 12 hours apart — even though studies show taking them simultaneously is OK."It was the decision, given that court ruling, to proceed with making the simpler version of Plan B available, because at the very least, that addresses some of the concerns about the ability of younger girls to use that medication," White House spokesman Jay Carney said.Q: Generics are cheaper; will they be sold over the counter too?A: That's not clear. Plan B One-Step may get some exclusive marketing rights that would affect how and when other one-pill versions could sell, and the FDA has no plans to allow unrestricted sales of two-pill generics. Women's groups pledged to continue pushing for all versions to be treated the same. Plan B One-Step costs about $40 to $50, and generics typically cost $30 to $40.Q: How did this controversy start?A: Back in 2011, the FDA was preparing to allow over-the-counter sales of the morning-after pill with no age limits when Health and Human Services Secretary Kathleen Sebelius overruled her own scientists in an unprecedented move. She was worried that girls as young as 11 would use the pill with no supervision, a concern that Obama echoed.Doctors' groups and contraceptive advocates, however, argue that easier access to emergency contraception could cut unintended pregnancies, and that the drug is safe even at younger ages. Korman said hardly any 11-year-olds would use the pill, calling Sebelius' decision political pandering in an election year.Legally, the requirement is that over-the-counter drugs are safe and effective if used as intended, said Nancy Northup of the Center for Reproductive Rights, noting that parents don't know whether their 11-year-old is buying Tylenol to treat a hangover either.Q: Why was there opposition?A: Social conservatives argued that easier availability would encourage girls to become sexually active, and that it wasn't safe for them to take the pills without a doctor's or parent's involvement. And some groups argued that Plan B is the equivalent of an abortion pill because it may be able to prevent a fertilized egg from attaching to the uterus — a contention that has been scientifically discredited.Q: Wait, doesn't this mean that people will have easier access to emergency contraception than to some cold medicines?A: Age wasn't the concern with cold medicines; it was a law enforcement issue. A federal law required an ID for purchases of cold medicines containing a particular ingredient, pseudoephedrine, because it can be used to manufacture methamphetamine.Q: So if emergency contraception is OK over the counter, what about regular birth control pills?A: Stay tuned. Just last fall, the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists — the doctors who make money writing prescriptions for the pill — say it's safe enough to be sold without a prescription too. But no manufacturer has indicated it wants to try.Associated Press writer Josh Lederman contributed to this report.
WASHINGTON — A federal advisory panel said Friday that Congress should move immediately to cut payments to hospitals for many services that can be provided at much lower cost in doctors' offices.The Medicare Payment Advisory Commission said the current payment disparities had created incentives for hospitals to buy physician practices, driving up costs for the Medicare program and for beneficiaries. Hospital buyouts of doctors, turning independent practitioners into hospital employees, have also led to higher spending by private insurers and higher co-payments for their policyholders, the commission said.Congress often adopts ideas suggested by the commission, and hospital executives fear that could happen again as lawmakers search for ways to squeeze savings out of Medicare.Medicare uses different fee schedules and formulas to pay for services provided in doctors' offices and in hospital clinics."In many cases, a physician's practice that is purchased by a hospital stays in the same location and treats the same patients," but "Medicare and beneficiaries pay more for the same services," the 17-member commission said in a report to Congress.For example, it said, Medicare pays $58 for a 15-minute visit to a doctor's office and 70 percent more — $98.70 — for the same consultation in the outpatient department of a hospital. The patient also pays more: $24.68, rather than $14.50.Likewise, the commission said, when a Medicare beneficiary receives a certain type of echocardiogram in a doctor's office, the government and the patient together pay a total of $188. They pay more than twice as much — $452 — for the same test in the outpatient department of a hospital. (The test is used to evaluate the functioning of the heart.) The commission urged Congress to "equalize payment rates" or at least reduce the disparities, for doctor's office visits and hospital clinic visits in which similar patients receive the same or similar services.Variations in payment "urgently need to be addressed because many ambulatory services have been migrating from physicians' offices to the usually higher-paid outpatient department setting, as hospital employment of physicians has increased," the panel said.Under the changes outlined by the commission, hospital clinics could lose 5 percent of their Medicare revenue. But the Medicare program and beneficiaries could save $1.8 billion a year, the panel said.Hospitals strenuously oppose the cuts, saying they have many costs that doctors practicing on their own do not have."Medicare already underpays hospitals for caring for patients in an outpatient setting, and the commission's proposals would worsen that," said Joanna Kim, a vice president of the American Hospital Association. "Hospitals might be forced to curtail services, threatening access for the poor and patients with multiple chronic conditions."Full-service hospitals, unlike doctors' offices, have emergency rooms and "standby capacity" to care for victims of accidents, natural disasters, epidemics and terrorist actions. And hospitals are subject to more stringent regulation.Jonathan D. Blum, deputy administrator of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, said the Obama administration had "no official position" on the commission's proposal. But at a Congressional hearing on Friday, Mr. Blum said he supported the general goal of "site-neutral payments," meaning that Medicare would pay about the same amount for a service, regardless of where it was provided.The new health care law encourages doctors and hospitals to join forces, coordinate care and hold down costs. But the Medicare commission cited another reason for collaboration, saying, "Hospitals often choose to employ physicians to ensure a stable stream of tests, admissions and referrals to specialists."From 2010 to 2011, the commission said, the number of echocardiograms provided to Medicare beneficiaries in doctors' offices declined by 6 percent, but the number in hospital outpatient clinics increased by nearly 18 percent.The shift reflects "financial incentives in Medicare's payment systems" and coincides with "rapid growth in hospitals' employment of cardiologists," the panel said, noting that the share of cardiologists who are employed by hospitals tripled, to 35 percent in 2012, from 11 percent in 2007.In a separate section of its report, the panel explored broader changes in Medicare, under which each beneficiary would receive a fixed amount of federal money to buy insurance from a private health plan or to help pay for coverage under the traditional Medicare program.Republicans have championed such proposals as a way to increase choices for beneficiaries and save money for Medicare. President Obama and other Democrats have denounced the idea, saying it would turn Medicare into a voucher program and expose beneficiaries to higher costs.The nonpartisan Medicare commission said the proposals were not necessarily good or bad but were "worth investigating."The effects on beneficiaries and the potential savings, it said, depend on the answers to crucial questions: whether all plans would offer the same benefits, how the federal contribution would be set, how it would increase over time and whether the traditional Medicare program would compete directly with plans offered by private insurers.
SACRAMENTO — The State Legislature passed a major piece of the federal Affordable Care Act on Saturday, opting to expand Medicaid to 1.4 million low-income people in California as it rushed to meet its deadline to complete a state budget.The action came a day after lawmakers passed the main budget bill outlining a $96.3 billion spending plan for the fiscal year that starts in July."We don't know for certain that this will contain the costs; that's certainly the goal," said Senator Mark Leno, a Democrat from San Francisco. But he said the action was also intended to "make sure that health care is not considered a privilege of the fortunate few, but as a basic human right. That's what we're implementing today. This is a big deal."Republicans raised concerns about whether California can afford the expansion over the long run, especially once the federal government drops its commitment from 100 percent to 90 percent.Democrats included a provision in the legislation that allows for future lawmakers to reconsider the expansion if the federal government's share drops below 70 percent."I worry about expectations that we set out for individuals with A.C.A. in California and having the rug pulled out from underneath us without a funding mechanism," said Senator Ted Gaines, a Republican of Rocklin. "Can we as a state handle that financial burden? I'm very concerned about this."Democrats said the expansion would help save lives, keep workers healthy and attract billions of dollars from the federal government into the state.The president pro tem of the Senate, Darrell Steinberg, a Democrat of Sacramento, noted that taxpayers and those who have health insurance already are paying for the medical care of those who now go without insurance. The Medicaid expansion will cover many of those who now receive uncompensated care, he said.
When a typical 40-year-old uninsured woman in Maine goes to the new state exchange to buy health insurance this fall, she may have just two companies to choose from: the one that already sells most individual policies in the state, and a complete unknown — a nonprofit start-up.Her counterpart in California, however, will have a much wider variety of choices: 13 insurers are likely to offer plans, including the state's largest and best-known carriers.With only a few months remaining before Americans will start buying coverage through the new state insurance exchanges under President Obama's health care law, it is becoming clear that the millions of people purchasing policies in the exchanges will find that their choices vary sharply, depending on where they live.States like California, Colorado and Maryland have attracted an array of insurers. But options for people in other states may be limited to an already dominant local Blue Cross plan and a few newcomers with little or no track record in providing individual coverage, including the two dozen new carriers across the country created under the Affordable Care Act.Maine residents, for example, will not see an influx of new insurers. The state has an older population and strict rules that already have discouraged many insurers from selling policies, so choices will probably be limited to the state's dominant carrier, Anthem Blue Cross, and Maine Community Health Options."What we're seeing is a reflection of the market that already exists," said Timothy S. Jost, a law professor at Washington and Lee University in Virginia who closely follows the health care law.Obama administration officials estimate that most Americans will have a choice of at least five carriers when open enrollment begins in October. There are signs of increased competition, with new insurers and existing providers working harder to design more affordable and innovative plans. In 31 states, officials say there will be insurers that offer plans across state lines. The exchanges will be open to the millions of Americans who are uninsured or already buying individual coverage. Many will be eligible for federal subsidies.But the insurance landscape will be highly varied, with some of the states that have been slow to embrace the law potentially offering the fewest options — and plans with the highest premiums — in the first year.People in certain parts of the country may not have the robust choice of insurers that the law sought as a way to keep premiums lower and customer responsiveness high. These people are likely to have few brand-name options to choose from, and they will be gambling on plans offered by insurers new to the individual market as well as brand-new carriers. The choice of providers and costs could also vary as a result.As people become aware of the differences among the exchanges, "some of the laggard states are going to end up changing," said Ron Pollack, the executive director for Families USA, a consumer advocacy group that supports the law.Whether the law ultimately accomplishes its aim of making the insurance markets nationwide more competitive — and plans more affordable — will only become clear over time. Experts expect some insurers to drop out after a year or so, while some other companies may decide to enter, depending on how the markets evolve. Insurers will have to figure out how to offer plans that most people can afford but still provide coverage to those with expensive medical conditions — and, for investor-owned plans, how to make a profit in the meantime."A rush to judgment will be just that," said Dan Mendelson, the chief executive of Avalere Health, a consulting group. "It's not going to be possible in 2014 to make a strong valid judgment of whether the exchanges are working or not."Insurers already active in the market are the most likely to show up on the exchanges. Blue Cross plans, for example, have already established relationships with local hospitals and physician groups, as well as state regulators. "We don't have to recreate the wheel because the Blue plans are already there," said Daniel J. Hilferty, the chief executive of Independence Blue Cross, a nonprofit headquartered in Philadelphia.In California, Anthem Blue Cross, Health Net, Kaiser Permanente and Blue Shield of California will remain big players. Most likely to be missing from any given exchange are many of the national insurers, whose business is focused mainly on providing coverage to workers through their employers — companies liked UnitedHealth Group, Aetna and Cigna.
WASHINGTON — Medicare begins a major change next month that could save older diabetics money and time when they buy crucial supplies to test their blood sugar — but it also may cause some confusion as patients figure out the new system.On July 1, Medicare opens a national mail-order program that will dramatically drop the prices the government pays for those products but patients will have to use designated suppliers. The goal is to save taxpayers money but seniors should see their copays drop, too.Don't care about the convenience of mail delivery? Just over half of the 4.2 million diabetics with traditional Medicare coverage used mail-order last year, but starting July 1 beneficiaries also can get the new lower price at drugstores enrolled in the Medicare program."Those who like the face-to-face interaction with the pharmacist have that choice," stressed Jonathan Blum, Medicare deputy administrator. "We want to preserve both options."It's the biggest expansion yet of a larger, and somewhat controversial, initiative that's predicted to save taxpayers nearly $26 billion over the next decade by cracking down on waste and fraud in the medical equipment industry. Diabetics aren't the only Medicare patients affected. Depending on where they live, patients who rent home oxygen gear and hospital beds, or who need power wheelchairs, walkers and certain other equipment also could see changes in their suppliers and lower prices as a pilot test of this so-called competitive bidding program expands from nine metro areas to a total of 100 on July 1. Medicare is supposed to apply the lower pricing nationally by 2016.The diabetes initiative is the first to go nationwide — and Blum said it should put an end to unscrupulous practices such as shipping cartons of supplies to diabetics who haven't run out yet and billing Medicare for the cost.The concern: Potentially hundreds of thousands of older patients may have to switch mail-order suppliers. The American Diabetes Association worries they won't get the word before their supplies run short — or might be pressured to switch to a cheaper brand of blood-sugar monitor and the matching supplies even though that's against the rules."We're sort of torn, truthfully," said Krista Maier, the association's associate director of public policy. "It will save the Medicare program money, which is good for its sustainability. The challenge is ensuring that beneficiaries' testing of their blood glucose isn't disrupted."Here are some questions and answers about the program:A: Until now, hundreds of mail-order companies could bill Medicare for the test strips, lancets and other supplies that diabetics use to measure and track their blood sugar. Under the new national program, Medicare patients can order from only 18 mail-order companies that won government contracts and will be subject to more oversight. (The change doesn't apply to Medicare Advantage patients.)Check the list at www.medicare.gov/supplier or by calling 1-800-MEDICARE. Some companies operate under multiple names.Q: What if the new companies don't sell my brand?A: Medicare's list shows different suppliers sell a mix of top-selling brands as well as generics — and you're not required to change your existing monitor. But you may need to shop around or get a doctor's note that specifies you need a specific type, so plan ahead.A: Medicare has paid about $78 for 100 test strips and lancets, just over a month's supply for someone who tests his or her blood sugar three times a day. Remarkably, that rate was higher than other insurers typically pay. Starting July 1, that reimbursement will drop to about $22. The patient copay is 20 percent, so it will drop from about $15 to less than $5.Q: What if I want to buy at my local drugstore instead?A: Ask if it accepts "Medicare assignment," meaning it has to honor the July 1 prices. Some large chains are reassuring customers that they're participating. But pharmacies that aren't enrolled in Medicare are allowed to charge patients more.Q: How did the program work in the nine test cities?A: Medicare says patients had plenty of supplies. But surprisingly, mail-order claims dropped the first year. The Department of Health and Human Services' inspector general discovered that some suppliers were billing Medicare for drugstore-sold supplies — which at the time were reimbursed at a higher rate — even though they actually shipped cheaper mail-order supplies. Congress later closed that loophole, mandating the same reimbursement for drugstores and mail-order starting July 1.A: That part of the initiative has hit some bumps. Medicare had awarded contracts to nearly 800 suppliers of those items but it turned out that some didn't have certain licenses required by state authorities. Medicare says it has voided 30 of 96 supplier contracts in Tennessee, but that enough remain to do the job. It is investigating the situation in Maryland.The home supply industry's American Association for Homecare, which opposes Medicare's competitive bidding program, says the licensing issue is a symptom of broader problems. Members of Congress last week asked Medicare to delay the program's expansion, but that's not expected to happen.
ATLANTA — Fewer U.S. adults are smoking, a new government report says.Last year, about 18 percent of adults participating in a national health survey described themselves as current smokers.The nation's smoking rate generally has been falling for decades, but had seemed to stall at around 20 to 21 percent for about seven years. In 2011, the rate fell to 19 percent, but that might have been a statistical blip.Health officials are analyzing the 2012 findings and have not yet concluded why the rate dropped, a spokesman for the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention said. The CDC released its study Tuesday.Smoking is the leading cause of preventable illness and death in the United States. It's responsible for the majority of lung cancer deaths and is a deadly factor in heart attacks and a variety of other illnesses.Concerned about the stalled smoking rate, the CDC launched a graphic advertising campaign last year that was the agency's largest and starkest anti-smoking push. The campaign triggered an increase of 200,000 calls to quit lines, and CDC officials said thousands of smokers probably went on to kick the habit. The CDC did a second wave of the ads earlier this year.The new report is from a survey of about 35,000 U.S. adults. Current smokers were identified as those who said they had smoked more than 100 cigarettes in their lifetime and now smoke every day or some days.The rate was only 9 percent for people ages 65 and older, but about 20 percent for younger adults. More men than women described themselves as current smokers.The report did not include teens. About 16 percent of high school students were smokers in 2011, according to an earlier CDC report.Patrick Reynolds, executive director of the Foundation for a SmokeFree America, told The Associated Press that he was elated that the adult smoking rate, for years at about 20 percent, had dropped below that longstanding plateau.He said factors he thinks have contributed to fewer adults smoking include rising state and federal tobacco taxes, more spending on prevention and cessation programs, and more laws banning smoking in public."This is a real decline in smoking in America. I'm ecstatic about it. It's proof that we are winning the battle against tobacco," he said by telephone from Los Angeles.
ATLANTA — A vaccine against a cervical cancer virus cut infections in teen girls by half in the first study to measure the shot's impact since it came on the market. The results impressed health experts and a top government top health official called them striking.The research released Wednesday echoes studies done before the HPV vaccine became available in 2006. But the new study is the first evidence of just how well it works now that it is in general use.Only about half of teen girls in the U.S. have gotten at least one dose of the expensive vaccine, and just a third of teen girls have had all three shots, according to the latest government figures."These are striking results and I think they should be a wake-up call that we need to increase vaccination rates," said Dr. Thomas Frieden, director of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.Cervical cancer is caused by certain types of the common sexually transmitted virus called HPV, for human papillomavirus. The vaccine, which costs about $130 per dose, protects against a few of those strains, including two blamed for 70 percent of cervical cancers. The shots work best if given before someone is sexually active so the emphasis has been on giving the shots to 11- and 12-year olds.The CDC study compared infection rates in girls ages 14 to 19 before and after the vaccine became available. The proportion infected with the targeted HPV strains dropped 56 percent, from about 12 percent before the vaccine was sold to 5 percent. That result was for all teens after it was on the market, whether or not they were vaccinated.Among girls who had gotten the vaccine, the drop in HPV infections was higher — 88 percent.There are two vaccines against HPV, but the study mainly reflects the impact of Gardasil, the Merck & Co. vaccine that came on the market in 2006. A second vaccine approved in 2009 — GlaxoSmithKline's Cervarix — probably had relatively little bearing on the results, said the CDC's Dr. Lauri Markowitz, the study's lead author.Both vaccines are approved for use in males and females — in ages 9 to 26 for females, and 9 to 21 in males. The vaccine was only recommended for boys in late 2011, and the CDC has not yet reported data on how many boys have gotten the shot since then. HPV vaccination requires three shots over 6 months.An estimated 75 to 80 percent of men and women are infected with HPV during their lifetime. Most don't develop symptoms and clear it on their own. But some infections lead to genital warts, cervical cancer and other cancers. The study didn't look at cervical cancer rates. It can take many years for such cancers to develop, and not enough time has passed to know the vaccine's impact on cancer rates, CDC officials said.The study involved interviews and physical examinations of nearly 1,400 teen girls in 2003 through 2006 and of 740 girls in 2007 through 2010.The vaccine's impact was seen even though only 34 percent of the teens in the second group had received any vaccine. That could be due to "herd immunity" — when a population is protected from an infection because a large or important smaller group is immune.Only about 20 percent of those vaccinated got all three doses. That result will likely feed an ongoing discussion about whether all three doses are necessary, Markowitz said.Overall, the study found no significant change over time in the proportion of teens who'd ever had sex and in those who had multiple sex partners. However, it did find that a higher percentage of vaccinated teens said they'd had three or more sex partners.That could have driven down infection rates, Markowitz noted, if the teens who got vaccinated were the ones at highest risk of getting an infection and spreading it.The research was released online by the Journal of Infectious Diseases.
WASHINGTON — The morning-after pill is finally going over-the-counter.The Food and Drug Administration on Thursday approved unrestricted sales of Plan B One-Step, lifting all age limits on the emergency contraceptive.The move came a week after the Obama administration ended months of back-and-forth legal battles by promising a federal judge it would take that step. Women's health advocates had pushed for easier access to next-day birth control for more than a decade."Over-the-counter access to emergency contraceptive products has the potential to further decrease the rate of unintended pregnancies in the United States," FDA drug chief Dr. Janet Woodcock said in a statement announcing the approval.It wasn't clear how quickly Plan B One-Step would move from behind pharmacy counters to sit on drugstore shelves. Until now, customers could buy that morning-after pill and competing generic versions without a prescription only if they proved to a pharmacist that they were 17 or older. FDA said the product will have to be repackaged to reflect the change; maker Teva Women's Health didn't immediately respond. FDA has not lifted age limits on competing generics.The morning-after pill contains a higher dose of the hormone in regular birth control pills. Taking it within 72 hours of rape, condom failure or just forgetting regular contraception can cut the chances of pregnancy by up to 89 percent, but it works best within the first 24 hours. If a girl or woman already is pregnant, the pill, which prevents ovulation or fertilization of an egg, has no effect.Back in 2011, the FDA was preparing to allow over-the-counter sales of emergency contraceptives with no limits when Health and Human Services Secretary Kathleen Sebelius overruled her own scientists in an unprecedented move. She said she worried that girls as young as 11 could use the pill with no supervision, a concern that President Barack Obama echoed.In April, U.S. District Judge Edward Korman blasted that decision as putting politics ahead of science and ordered the FDA to allow unrestricted sales of emergency contraceptives. He said hardly any 11-year-olds would use the pill, which costs about $50. The Obama administration lost a round in the appeals court, too, before telling the judge it would approve the one-pill brand.Doctors' groups and contraceptive advocates have long argued that easier access to emergency contraceptives would cut unintended pregnancies and said the drugs are safe even when used at young ages.Social conservatives, in contrast, complain that lifting prescription requirements undermines the rights of parents and could endanger girls.
The Success of the HPV Vaccine: The Times's Pam Belluck on how the HPV vaccine has helped drastically reduce the number of human papillomavirus cases among teenage girls.The prevalence of dangerous strains of the human papillomavirus — the most common sexually transmitted infection in the United States and a principal cause of cervical cancer — has dropped by half among teenage girls in recent years, a striking measure of success for a vaccine against the virus that was introduced only in 2006, federal health officials said on Wednesday.The sharp decline in the infection rate comes at a time of deepening worry among doctors and public health officials about the limited use of the HPV vaccine in the United States. Health departments across the country are scrambling for ways to increase vaccination rates, while nonprofit groups are using postcard reminders and social media campaigns and pediatricians are being encouraged to convince families of the vaccine's benefits.There are some signs that resistance to the vaccine may be growing. A study published in the journal Pediatrics in March found that 44 percent of parents in 2010 said they did not intend to vaccinate their daughters, up from 40 percent in 2008. Because it prevents a sexually transmitted infection, the vaccine comes with a stigma. Some parents worry it promotes promiscuity. And it has been controversial. During the Republican primary in 2011, Representative Michele Bachmann, Republican of Minnesota, said the vaccine could have "dangerous side effects," a concern that health officials say is unfounded.The magnitude of the decline in HPV infections surprised public health experts because only about a third of teenage girls in the United States have been vaccinated with the full course of three doses. By comparison, vaccination rates in countries like Denmark and Britain are above 80 percent. Even Rwanda, in East Africa, has reached 80 percent.Yet even with relatively low vaccination rates in the United States, infection with the viral strains that cause cancer dropped to 3.6 percent among girls ages 14 to 19 in 2010, from 7.2 percent in 2006, the officials said."These are striking results," said Dr. Thomas R. Frieden, director of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. "They should be a wake-up call that we need to increase vaccination rates. The bottom line is this: It is possible to protect the next generation from cancer, and we need to do it."The findings, published online Wednesday in The Journal of Infectious Diseases, covered the years 2003 to 2010 and were based on a national survey that is conducted every two years and is considered the gold standard on health indicators. Government health workers interviewed more than 8,000 girls and women ages 14 to 59 and collected vaginal swabs that were evaluated by the C.D.C.The infection rate for girls fell even further when the two strains of the virus that cause genital warts were included, with a 56 percent drop over the period of the study. The rate was flat in the years before the vaccine was introduced, giving researchers even more assurance that the vaccine was driving the decline. Health officials began monitoring HPV prevalence in boys only this year. The first data will be available in 2015.There are about 12,000 cases of cervical cancer and 4,000 deaths a year in the United States. At current vaccination rates, the vaccine would prevent 45,000 cases of cervical cancer and 14,000 deaths among girls now age 13 and younger over the course of their lifetimes, according to C.D.C. estimates. Increasing the rate to 80 percent could prevent an additional 53,000 cancers and nearly 17,000 deaths.Federal officials on Wednesday sought to dispel fears about the vaccine, and emphasized its role in preventing cervical cancer."This is an anticancer vaccine," Dr. Frieden said.About 79 million Americans, most in their late teens and early 20s, are infected with HPV, or about a quarter of the American population. Each year, about 14 million people become infected. The virus causes about 19,000 cancers in women every year, and 8,000 in men, according to the C.D.C. Cervical cancer is the most common among women; among men, throat cancer is most common.Health officials offered several possible explanations for why the drop was so sharp even though most girls in the United States are still not fully vaccinated.One possible reason is a phenomenon known as herd immunity, in which people who are vaccinated reduce the overall prevalence of the virus in society, decreasing the chances that unvaccinated people would be exposed to someone who is infected. Another is the unexpected effectiveness of a partial dosage of the HPV vaccine, said Dr. Lauri E. Markowitz, a medical epidemiologist at the C.D.C. and the lead author of the study. About half of teenage girls in the United States have received at least one dose of the vaccine.
Doctors are reporting a major step toward an "artificial pancreas," a device that would constantly monitor blood sugar in people with diabetes and automatically supply insulin as needed.A key component of such a system — an insulin pump programmed to shut down if blood-sugar dips too low while people are sleeping — worked as intended in a three-month study of 247 patients.This "smart pump," made by Minneapolis-based Medtronic Inc., is already sold in Europe, and the U.S. Food and Drug Administration is reviewing it now. Whether it also can be programmed to mimic a real pancreas and constantly adjust insulin based on continuous readings from a blood-sugar monitor requires more testing, but doctors say the new study suggests that's a realistic goal."This is the first step in the development of the artificial pancreas," said Dr. Richard Bergenstal, diabetes chief at Park Nicollet, a large clinic in St. Louis Park, Minn. "Before we said it's a dream. We have the first part of it now and I really think it will be developed."He led the company-sponsored study and gave results Saturday at an American Diabetes Association conference in Chicago. They also were published online by the New England Journal of Medicine.The study involved people with Type 1 diabetes, the kind usually diagnosed during childhood. About 5 percent of the 26 million Americans with diabetes have this type. Their bodies don't make insulin, a hormone needed to turn food into energy. That causes high blood-sugar levels and raises the risk for heart disease and many other health problems.Some people with the more common Type 2 diabetes, the kind linked to obesity, also need insulin and might also benefit from a device like an artificial pancreas. For now, though, it's aimed at people with Type 1 diabetes who must inject insulin several times a day or get it through a pump with a narrow tube that goes under the skin. The pump is about the size of a cellphone and can be worn on a belt or kept in a pocket.The pumps give a steady amount of insulin, and patients must monitor their sugar levels and give themselves more insulin at meals or whenever needed to keep blood sugar from getting too high.A big danger is having too much insulin in the body overnight, when blood-sugar levels naturally fall. People can go into comas, suffer seizures and even die. Parents of children with diabetes often worry so much about this that they sneak into their bedrooms at night to check their child's blood-sugar monitor.In the study, all patients had sensors that continuously monitored their blood sugar. Half of them had ordinary insulin pumps and the others had pumps programmed to stop supplying insulin for two hours when blood-sugar fell to a certain threshold.Over three months, low-sugar episodes were reduced by about one-third in people using the pump with the shut-off feature. Importantly, these people had no cases of severely low blood sugar — the most dangerous kind that require medical aid or help from another person. There were four cases in the group using the standard pump."As a first step, I think we should all be very excited that it works," an independent expert, Dr. Irl Hirsch of the University of Washington in Seattle, said of the programmable pump.The next step is to test having it turn off sooner, before sugar falls so much, and to have it automatically supply insulin to prevent high blood sugar, too.Dr. Anne Peters, a diabetes specialist at the University of Southern California, said the study "represents a major step forward" for an artificial pancreas.One participant, Spears Mallis, 34, a manager for a cancer center in Gainesville, Ga., wishes these devices were available now. He typically gets low-sugar about 8 to 10 times a week, at least once a week while he's asleep."I would set an alarm in the middle of the night just to be sure I was OK. That will cause you to not get a good night of rest," he said.His "smart pump" stopped giving insulin several times during the study when his sugar fell low, and he wasn't always aware of it. That's a well-known problem for people with Type 1 diabetes — over time, "you become less and less sensitive to feeling the low blood sugars" and don't recognize symptoms in time to drink juice or do something else to raise sugar a bit, he said.Besides Medtronic, Johnson & Johnson and several other research groups are working on artificial pancreas devices.
Cherries have been having their moment these last few weeks at Los Angeles farmers' markets. They're in everybody's market bags and on menus all over town, and not just on dessert lists. At the Westside Tavern in Los Angeles I recently ordered an appetizer billed as "Cherries and Goat Cheese" in bold print with "almond pesto, arugula, white balsamic vinaigrette" in finer print. What arrived was an attractive salad — a white rectangular platter lined with baby arugula tossed with a light vinaigrette and topped with halved cherries, small dabs of goat cheese and a nutty pesto. I'm not one for adding fruits like blueberries and cranberries to salads, but I found that I liked this combination a lot. Even sweet cherries have a tart edge to them, and the combination of their sweet/tart flavor and juicy but firm texture with the pungent arugula, creamy goat cheese and crunchy nuts worked well. The salad inspired me to work with cherries in other savory recipes.Fresh cherries, particularly the ubiquitous Bing variety as well as Hartlands and Early Black, which are sold at many farmers' markets, are very high in anthocyanins, those inflammation-reducing nutrients that are present in many red, purple and blue fruits and vegetables. It's always a good idea to let cherries dominate our fruit purchases at this time of year, because this is the only time of year when we can get locally grown cherries. And this phytonutrient-rich fruit begins to lose its antioxidant potential soon after it is picked, reports Jo Robinson in the recently published "Eating on the Wild Side." The freshest ones will be at your local farmers' market, and you should seek out those that are organically grown, as American cherries are subject to high doses of several different kinds of pesticides.This was inspired by a dish billed as "Cherries and Goat Cheese" on the menu at Westside Tavern in Los Angeles. I don't know why they didn't bill the arugula in bold too, as the dish turned out to be a very pleasant salad.Scant 1/4 cup pistachios or almonds, (about 1 ounce), lightly toasted and chopped1. Combine the arugula, cherries, half the nuts and the tarragon in a large bowl.2. Whisk together the vinegars, salt and pepper and olive oil. Toss with the salad. Arrange on a platter, sprinkle the goat cheese and remaining pistachios over the top, and serve.Advance preparation: You can have the salad and the dressing prepared a few hours ahead, but don't toss until just before serving.Nutritional information per serving: 212 calories; 18 grams fat; 5 grams saturated fat; 2 grams polyunsaturated fat; 10 grams monounsaturated fat; 11 milligrams cholesterol; 9 grams carbohydrates; 2 grams dietary fiber; 87 milligrams sodium (does not include salt to taste); 6 grams proteinMartha Rose Shulman is the author of "The Very Best of Recipes for Health."
Hoping to cut medical costs, employers are experimenting with a new way to pay for health care, telling workers that their company health plan will pay only a fixed amount for a given test or procedure, like a CT scan or knee replacement. Employees who choose a doctor or hospital that charges more are responsible for paying the additional amount themselves.Although it is in the early stages, the strategy is gaining in popularity and there is some evidence that it has persuaded expensive hospitals to lower their prices.In California, a large plan for public employees has been especially aggressive in using the tactic, and the results are being watched closely by employers and hospital systems elsewhere.Under the program, some employees are being given the choice of going to one of 54 hospitals, including well-known medical centers like Cedars-Sinai and Stanford University Hospital, that have agreed to charge no more than $30,000 for a hip or knee replacement. Prices for the operation normally vary widely in the state, with hospitals billing from $15,000 to $110,000 for the same operation, a spread that is typical for much of the nation."It's a symptom of the completely irrational pricing structure hospitals have," said Ann Boynton, a benefits executive for the California Public Employees' Retirement System, known as Calpers, which worked with the insurer Anthem Blue Cross, a unit of WellPoint, to introduce the program.Overall costs for operations under the program fell 19 percent in 2011, the program's first year, with the average amount it paid hospitals for a joint replacement falling to $28,695, from $35,408, according to an analysis by WellPoint's researchers that was released Sunday at a health policy conference.The study found no impact on quality of care."It's a race to value," said Dr. Samuel R. Nussbaum, the chief medical officer for WellPoint. One of the nation's largest health insurers, WellPoint operates Blue Cross plans in 14 states.The hospitals might have been willing to drop their prices because Calpers has such clout, said James C. Robinson, a health economist at the University of California, Berkeley, who also analyzed the results.The California plan, which is one of the nation's largest buyers of health care benefits, is "viewed as a bellwether of what other large employers will do," Mr. Robinson said. He and colleagues calculated the savings from the program for the first two years at $5.5 million.While relatively few companies fully embrace the strategy now, more employers are experimenting with it. Using a technique called "reference pricing," the employer sets a cap, based on what can be an average price for the service or a price that allows employees to select from a wide group of hospitals or doctors but still excludes the very high-priced providers. The idea is to exert pressure on prices for certain procedures without limiting the individual's choice of hospital or doctor for all kinds of care."There will be acute interest and focus on prices and price variation," said Ron Fontanetta, a benefits consultant at Towers Watson, who said that programs like this represented one approach. About 15 percent of large employers say they expect to try the technique next year, compared with just 5 percent this year, according to a 2013 survey by the firm."This seems something that's a no-brainer," said Steve Wojcik, a vice president for public policy at the National Business Group on Health, which represents employers offering health benefits to their workers. "Why pay more if you can get it for less?"Last year, WellPoint worked with the Kroger Company, a large grocery chain, to start a similar program in which payments for certain M.R.I.'s and CT scans were capped at around $800, and employees were given a list of places that would charge that amount or less.
WASHINGTON — The Obama administration announced new steps to expand coverage under the federal health care law on Monday, less than a week after the Government Accountability Office, a nonpartisan investigative arm of Congress, found that the federal government and many states were "behind schedule" in setting up marketplaces where Americans are supposed to be able to buy insurance.The steps — establishing a Web site and a telephone call center to provide information to consumers — are in preparation for what the government anticipates will be a flood of people buying health insurance starting Oct. 1.Kathleen Sebelius, the secretary of health and human services, said the call center would be in operation 24 hours a day. The phone number is 800-318-2596. The Web site, www.healthcare.gov, provides information promoting the 2010 health care law and describing new insurance options. The Web site and call center currently have only general information about coverage.Details about the prices and benefits of health insurance plans to be offered by Blue Cross and Blue Shield and companies like Humana and Kaiser Permanente will be available later this summer. Consumers can file online applications starting Oct. 1. Coverage is to begin on Jan. 1, when most Americans will be required to have insurance.In a statement, Ms. Sebelius said, "The new Web site and the toll-free number have a simple mission: to make sure every American who needs health coverage has the information they need to make choices that are right for themselves and their families or their businesses."The Congressional Budget Office predicts that seven million people will buy private insurance next year through marketplaces, or exchanges, while nine million people will gain coverage through Medicaid. By 2016, it says, the number of uninsured, now estimated at 56 million Americans, may be reduced by 25 million as a result of the law.The federal government will be running insurance exchanges in more than half the states. The administration had said previously that the federal exchanges would be open — at least in 2014 — to any insurers that met basic federal standards.But Ms. Sebelius, a former Kansas insurance commissioner, told reporters on Monday that "we will be negotiating for rates across the country." She emphasized the federal role, saying that "we intend to do rate negotiation to make sure that plans are going to offer consumers the best possible choices."Federal officials said the negotiations would focus on rates that were much higher or much lower than those proposed by other insurers.The Web site asks consumers for information about their household incomes, to determine if they may be eligible for federal subsidies, in the form of tax credits, to help pay premiums.Ms. Sebelius said "we are very concerned" that low-income people in some states will not have access to either Medicaid or subsidies for the purchase of private insurance. However, she said, "there is no timetable" for states to expand Medicaid, and states that rejected the expansion of eligibility this year could reconsider next year.The federal Web site acknowledges that some states are not expanding Medicaid. "Under the health care law," it says, "states have the choice to cover more people."The Web site says that people eligible for Medicaid should not try to buy insurance in the exchange, because they will not receive subsidies. "A marketplace plan will be more expensive than Medicaid and usually won't give you additional coverage or benefits," it says. "You wouldn't be eligible for any savings on marketplace insurance and would have to pay the whole cost."In states that do not expand Medicaid, insurance subsidies will generally be available to people with incomes from the poverty level up to four times that amount ($23,550 to $94,200 a year for a family of four). But in those states, the subsidies will not be available to some of the neediest — people with incomes below the poverty level who will generally not qualify for the new financial assistance with health insurance.More than half of all people without health insurance live in states that are not planning to expand Medicaid.Marketing insurance in those states "will be complicated," Ms. Sebelius said.Administration officials said the call center would eventually have 9,000 customer service representatives fielding calls. Consumers can also seek information in live Web chats.
WASHINGTON — It's official: The National Institutes of Health plans to end most use of chimpanzees in government medical research, saying humans' closest relatives "deserve special respect."The NIH announced Wednesday that it will retire about 310 government-owned chimpanzees from research over the next few years, and keep only 50 others essentially on retainer — available if needed for crucial medical studies that could be performed no other way."These amazing animals have taught us a great deal already," said NIH Director Dr. Francis Collins. He said the decision helps usher in "a compassionate era."The NIH's decision was long expected, after the prestigious Institute of Medicine declared in 2011 that nearly all use of chimps for invasive medical research no longer can be justified. Much of the rest of the world already had ended such research with this species that is so like us.Any future biomedical research funded by the NIH with chimps, government-owned or not, would be allowed only under strict conditions after review by a special advisory board. In five years, the NIH will reassess if even that group of 50 government-owned apes still is needed for science."This is an historic moment and major turning point for chimpanzees in laboratories, some who have been languishing in concrete housing for over 50 years," said Wayne Pacelle, president and CEO of The Humane Society of the United States. "It is crucial now to ensure that the release of hundreds of chimpanzees to sanctuary becomes a reality."What's unclear is exactly where the retiring chimps, which have spent their lives in research facilities around the country, now will spend their final years. NIH said they could eventually join more than 150 other chimps already in the national sanctuary system operated by Chimp Haven in northwest Louisiana. In that habitat, the chimps can socialize at will, climb trees and explore different play areas.But NIH officials said currently there's not enough space to handle all of the 310 destined for retirement. They're exploring additional locations, and noted that some research facilities that currently house government-owned chimps have habitats similar to the sanctuary system.The other hurdle is money: Congress limited how much the NIH can spend on caring for chimps in the sanctuary system. Negotiations are under way to shift money the agency has spent housing the animals in research facilities toward supporting their retirement."Everybody should understand this is not something that is going to happen quickly," Collins cautioned.One chimp center, the Texas Biomedical Research Institute, said keeping just 50 of the animals for ongoing research isn't enough and could hamper efforts to fight not just human illnesses but diseases that kill apes, too.Moreover, moving retired chimpanzees to the federal sanctuary "would take them away from their caregivers, many of whom they have known all of their lives," said an institute statement that argued the animals would fare better if they stayed put.The NIH's decision came two weeks after the Fish and Wildlife Service called for protection of all chimpanzees as endangered. Until now there was a "split listing" that labeled wild chimps as endangered but those in captivity as threatened, a status that offers less protection.That move also would affect any future use of chimps in medical research, and NIH said it would work with its government counterpart to ensure compliance.Chimps rarely have been used for drug testing or other invasive research in recent years; studies of chimp behavior or genetics are a bit more common. Of nine biomedical projects under way, the NIH said six would be ended early. Of another 13 behavioral or genetic studies involving chimps, five would be ended early. NIH would not identify the projects, but Collins said potential future need for chimps could be in creating a vaccine against hepatitis C.
ATLANTA — Overdose deaths in the U.S. are rising fastest among middle-aged women, and their drug of choice is usually prescription painkillers, the government reported Tuesday."Mothers, wives, sisters and daughters are dying at rates that we have never seen before," said Dr. Thomas Frieden, director of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, which compiled the data.The problem is one of the few health issues the CDC is working on that are clearly getting worse, he added.For many decades, the overwhelming majority of U.S. overdose deaths were men killed by heroin or cocaine. But by 2010, 40 percent were women — most of them middle-aged women who took prescription painkillers.Skyrocketing female overdose death rates are closely tied to a boom in the overall use of prescribed painkillers. The new report is the CDC's first to spotlight how the death trend has been more dramatic among women.The CDC found that the number and rate of prescription painkiller overdose deaths among females increased about fivefold 1999 to 2010. Among men, such deaths rose about 3½ times.Overall, more men still die from overdoses of painkillers and other drugs; there were about 23,000 such deaths in 2010, compared with about 15,300 for women. Men tend to take more risks with drugs than women, and often are more prone to the kind of workplace injuries that lead to their being prescribed painkillers in the first place, experts say.But the gap has been narrowing dramatically.Studies suggest that women are more likely to have chronic pain, to be prescribed higher doses, and to use pain drugs longer than men. Some research suggests women may be more likely than men to "doctor shop" and get pain pills from several physicians, CDC officials said.But many doctors may not recognize these facts about women, said John Eadie, director of a Brandeis University program that tracks prescription-drug monitoring efforts across the United States.The report highlights the need for "a mindset change" by doctors, who have traditionally thought of drug abuse as a men's problem, he said. That means doctors should consider the possibility of addiction in female patients, think of alternative treatments for chronic pain, and consult state drug monitoring programs to find out if a patient has a worrisome history with painkillers.The CDC report focuses on prescription opioids like Vicodin and OxyContin and their generic forms, methadone, and a powerful newer drug called Opana, or oxymorphone."These are dangerous medications and they should be reserved for situations like severe cancer pain," Frieden said. He added that there has not been a comparable increase in documented pain conditions in the U.S. public that would explain the boom in painkiller prescriptions in the last 10 or 15 years.Some experts said the increase in prescriptions can be traced to pharmaceutical marketing campaigns.CDC researchers reviewed death certificates, which are sometimes incomplete. Specific drugs were not identified in every death. In others, a combination of drugs was involved, such as painkillers taken with tranquilizers.CDC officials think more than 70 percent of the overdose deaths were unintentional.One striking finding: The greatest increases in drug overdose deaths were in women ages 45 through 54, and 55 through 64. The rate for each of those groups more than tripled between 1999 and 2010.In 2010, overdose deaths in those two groups of middle-aged women added up to about 7,400 — or nearly half the female total, according to CDC statistics.It's an age group in which more women are dealing with chronic pain and seeking help for it, some experts suggested.Many of these women probably were introduced to painkillers through a doctor's prescriptions for real pain, such as persistent aches in the lower back or other parts of the body. Then some no doubt became addicted, said Dr. Andrew Kolodny, a psychiatrist who specializes in addiction at Maimonides Medical Center in New York City.There aren't "two distinct populations of people being helped by opioid painkillers and addicts being harmed. There's overlap," said Kolodny, president of a 700-member organization Physicians for Responsible Opioid Prescribing.
As the scientists peered into the darkness, their headlamps revealed an eerie sight. Hundreds of eyes glinted back at them from the walls and ceiling. They had discovered, in a crumbling, long-abandoned village half-buried in sand near a remote town in southwestern Saudi Arabia, a roosting spot for bats.It was an ideal place to set up traps.The search for bats is part of an investigation into a deadly new viral disease that has drawn scientists from around the world to Saudi Arabia. The virus, first detected there last year, is known to have infected at least 77 people, killing 40 of them, in eight countries. The illness, called MERS, for Middle Eastern respiratory syndrome, is caused by a coronavirus, a relative of the virus that caused SARS (severe acute respiratory syndrome), which originated in China and caused an international outbreak in 2003 that infected at least 8,000 people and killed nearly 800.As the case count climbs, critical questions about MERS remain unanswered. Scientists do not know where it came from, where the virus exists in nature, why it has appeared now, how people are being exposed to it, or whether it is becoming more contagious and could erupt into a much larger outbreak, as SARS did. The disease almost certainly originated with one or more people contracting the virus from animals — probably bats — but scientists do not know how many times that kind of spillover to humans has occurred, or how likely it is to keep happening.There is urgency to the hunt for answers. Half the known cases have been fatal, though the real death rate is probably lower, because there almost certainly have been mild cases that have gone undetected. But the virus still worries health experts, because it can cause such severe disease and has shown an alarming ability to spread among patients in a hospital. It causes flulike symptoms that can progress to severe pneumonia.The disease is a chilling example of what health experts call emerging infections, caused by viruses or other organisms that suddenly find their way into humans. Many of those diseases are "zoonotic," meaning they are normally harbored by animals but somehow manage to jump species."As the population continues to grow, we're bumping up against wildlife, and they happen to carry some nasty viruses we've never seen before," said Peter Daszak, a disease ecologist and the president of EcoHealth Alliance, a scientific group that studies links between human health, the health of wild and domestic animals, and the environment.Saudi Arabia has had the most patients so far (62), but cases have also originated in Jordan, Qatar and the United Arab Emirates. Travelers from the Arabian peninsula have taken the disease to Britain, France, Italy and Tunisia, and have infected a few people in those countries. Health experts are also worried about the Hajj, the Muslim pilgrimage that will draw millions of visitors to Saudi Arabia in October.MERS has not reached the United States, but health officials have told doctors to be on the lookout for patients who get sick soon after visiting the Middle East. So far, more than 40 people in 20 states have been tested, all with negative results, according to Dr. Anne Schuchat, the director of the National Center for Immunizations and Respiratory Diseases at the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.The illness can be spread by coughs and sneezes, or contaminated surfaces, and people with chronic diseases seem especially vulnerable. More men than women have fallen ill, possibly because women have been protected by their veils. A cluster of cases that began in a Saudi hospital in April ultimately involved 23 people, including several family members and health workers. One man infected seven people, each of whom spread the disease to at least one other person.Regardless of where they emerge, new illnesses are just "a plane ride away," said Dr. Thomas Frieden, the director of the C.D.C.And while MERS is not highly contagious like the flu, he said, "the likelihood of spread is not small."In May, Saudi health officials asked an international team of doctors to help investigate the hospital cluster. One concern was that a number of cases were in patients at a dialysis clinic, and doctors feared that dialysis machines or solutions might be spreading the disease."It was pretty easy to figure out that couldn't have been the case," said a member of the team, Dr. Connie S. Price, the chief of infectious diseases at Denver Health Medical Center.The patients' records did not point to dialysis as the culprit, she said, and there were clear cases of transmission in other parts of the hospital that had no connection to dialysis.Why, then, the outbreak among dialysis patients? The answer seems to be that they were older, chronically ill and often diabetic; diabetes can suppress the immune system's ability to fight off infections. So, when one dialysis patient contracted MERS, others who happened to be in the clinic at the same were easy targets for the virus."Introducing it into a dialysis center gives it the perfect environment to spread among vulnerable patients sitting in open bays for many hours," Dr. Price said.Some health experts have suggested that MERS, like SARS, may fade away. The SARS outbreak erupted in early 2003, but ended by that summer. Much of the success was attributed to infection control in hospitals and also to eliminating animals like civet cats, which were thought to have caught the virus from bats and to be infecting people in markets where the civets were being sold live to be killed and eaten.But Dr. Allison McGeer, a microbiologist and infectious disease specialist at Mount Sinai Hospital in Toronto who is also part of the team that studied the Saudi hospital outbreak, said there were no signs that MERS was going away."Absolutely not," she said. "There are ongoing cases of disease acquired in the community. The first we know about is April 2012 in Jordan. There has been a steady and continuing number of cases."The fact that the disease has apparently emerged in geographically disparate places, with widely scattered cases in four Middle Eastern countries, also makes Dr. McGeer doubt that it is simply going to fizzle out.
It is one of a doctor's most important final acts in caring for a patient, even though the patient is no longer around to appreciate it.I refer, of course, to filling out the death certificate, a document that has myriad benefits for the living: establishing a legal basis for life insurance and estate settlements; providing critical information to survivors and descendants in an era of burgeoning advances in genetics; advancing knowledge about diseases, accidents and other causes of death; and much else.For all these reasons, the accuracy of the certificates should be a paramount concern for public health, both nationally and internationally. And that is why two recent studies of doctors in New York City teaching hospitals are so unsettling.The studies, published in the May issue of the journal Preventing Chronic Disease, support what researchers have long suspected: that heart disease is overreported as a cause of death, while diseases like pneumonia and cancer tend to be underreported. Equally disturbing, one of the studies suggests that the health system is far too cavalier about the accuracy of death certificates.That study surveyed resident doctors in specialty training in 26 hospitals where about 40 percent of the city's deaths occur. Of 521 respondents, 54 percent said they had knowingly reported what they believed was an inaccurate cause of death. Only one-third of the respondents believed that the system accurately documents the cause of death.The reasons varied. Some doctors said they had never learned the proper procedures, or were too busy to fill out the documents correctly. Because of restrictions in duty hours, many resident doctors had to enter a cause even though they did not know the patients — they just assumed care through transfers at the end of work shifts.Some said data codes forced them to enter diagnoses that did not match their medical judgments: The electronic system rejected causes like sepsis from infection or acute respiratory distress syndrome, and hospital administrators instructed the doctors to certify another cause of death.Frustrated with the system and the time pressures, doctors may take the easy way out by "just putting something down that would be easily accepted," an author of the study, Dr. Keith M. Rose of St. Luke's-Roosevelt Hospital Center in Manhattan, said in an interview.Particularly disturbing is that most doctors said they had no formal training in filling out death certificates, either in medical school or in their residency programs.Since the study was conducted — in spring 2010, based on respondents' experience in the preceding three years — the New York City Department of Health and Mental Hygiene says it has been a national leader in improving the quality of death certificate information. In 2009 the department introduced a training program in eight hospitals that accounted for 10 percent of all deaths in New York City.The second study, which followed doctors in that program, dealt directly with the issue of overreporting heart disease as the cause of death, particularly among older patients. Heart disease is considered the nation's leading killer, and doctors may list it by default without evaluating other possibilities. The practice tends to obscure the incidence of other serious ailments.A health department team led by Dr. Teeb Al-Samarrai found that heart disease dropped by 54 percent as a cause of death in the hospitals where the program was given, compared with a decrease of 6 percent or less in hospitals where it was not.The educational effort also led to an increase in four other categories. Influenza and pneumonia almost tripled as causes of death — rising to 11 percent of certified deaths, from 4 percent. Chronic lower respiratory disease rose to 5 percent from 2 percent. Cerebrovascular disease, including strokes and aneurysms, rose to 4 percent from 2 percent. And cancer rose to 16 percent from 11 percent.Documenting deaths is a local responsibility. North American colonists followed the European custom of churches' being responsible for recording deaths, just as for christenings and marriages. In 1639, the Massachusetts Bay Colony transferred such registrations to the courts.Before 1900, the United States lagged behind European countries in developing a centralized death registration system. By 1910, the country had developed a standard model death certificate, Dr. Randy Hanzlick wrote in a 1996 history of death registration for The Journal of Forensic Sciences.Filling out a death certificate blends fact and professional judgment. That combination often makes it difficult to certify the precise cause, particularly among older patients who die with more than one ailment. Assigning one of the competing causes as the responsible one can be challenging. Occasionally, families may pressure doctors not to list suicide, AIDS or other health problems as the cause of death, perhaps because of stigma and perhaps because of restrictions in life insurance policies.A doctor's role is to describe the chain of medical events or conditions leading to death, based on four categories. One is the immediate cause of death, the specific ailment that directly preceded it. The second is intermediate causes, those that created the immediate cause.The third is the underlying cause, the ailment that set off the chain of events. ("Cardiac arrest" is never acceptable as the underlying cause of death, because it is a tautology: The heart stops in every death, and cardiac arrest can result from hundreds of ailments.) Last, doctors are asked to list the patient's other ailments, even though they did not cause death.The chain of causes is often long and complicated, and sometimes the starting point is not clear.For example, was the cause of a drowning the inability to swim? Being pushed or falling into water? A heart attack, abnormal heart rhythm or a stroke? Inebriation? The side effects of a prescribed or illicit drug? Or hot weather?In general, a government medical examiner must be informed in cases of criminal neglect or violence; drug and chemical overdose and poisoning; workplace accidents; sudden death when in apparent good health; a death in which no physician has cared for the patient in the preceding 31 days; and injuries like falls, among other causes.Eventually, the certified cause of death becomes part of a long statistical trail, from the local physician to city and state health officials, and then is listed among the official vital statistics of the United States.  And once in a while, an absurd entry, usually a result of miscoding — Alzheimer's disease in a 2-year-old, prostate cancer in a woman, cervical cancer in a man — is caught and corrected.Dr. Barbara A. Wexelman, who conducted the study with Dr. Rose when she was a surgical resident in New York City, said she encountered some resistance from colleagues, who chided her for studying a subject they considered obscure and unimportant.She had a ready comeback. "Death certificates are really important," she says she told the skeptics. "We owe it to our patients to be able to accurately record why they die" — and thus, she went on, to "help the living."
PORTSMOUTH, Ohio — Prescription pain pill addiction was originally seen as a man's problem, a national epidemic that began among workers doing backbreaking labor in the coal mines and factories of Appalachia. But a new analysis of federal data has found that deaths in recent years have been rising far faster among women, quintupling since 1999.More women now die of overdoses from pain pills like OxyContin than from cervical cancer or homicide. And though more men are dying, women are catching up, according to the analysis by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. And the problem is hitting white women harder than black women, and older women harder than younger ones.In this Ohio River town on the edge of Appalachia, women blamed the changing nature of American society. The rise of the single-parent household has thrust immense responsibility on women, who are not only mothers, but also, in many cases, primary breadwinners. Some who described feeling overwhelmed by their responsibilities said they craved the numbness that drugs bring. Others said highs made them feel pretty, strong and productive, a welcome respite from the chaos of their lives."I thought I was supermom," said Crystal D. Steele, 42, a recovering addict who said she began to take medicine for back pain she developed working at Kentucky Fried Chicken. "I took one kid to football, the other to baseball. I went to work. I washed the car. I cleaned the house. I didn't even know I had a problem."Ms. Steele, now a patient at the Counseling Center, a rehabilitation center here, remembers getting calls about deaths of high school classmates while working at an answering service for a local funeral home. She counted about 50 women she had known who had drug-related deaths. She believes that had it not been for a 40-day stint in jail for stealing pain pills, she would have been among them."I felt like I sold my soul somewhere along the way," said Ms. Steele, whose father was an alcoholic and abusive. "I didn't feel like I deserved to be given a second chance. I thought my kids would be better off without me."For years, drug overdose deaths in the United States were seen as mostly an urban problem that hit blacks hardest. But opioid abuse, which exploded in the 1990s and 2000s and included drugs like OxyContin, Vicodin and Percocet, has been worst among whites, often in rural places. The C.D.C. analysis found that the overdose death rate for blacks in 2010, the most recent year for which there was final data, was less than half the rate for whites. Asians and Hispanics had the lowest rates.According to the report, 6,631 women died of opioid overdoses in 2010, compared with 10,020 men.While younger women in their 20s and 30s tend to have the highest rates of opioid abuse, the overdose death rate was highest among women ages 45 to 54, a finding that surprised clinicians. The range indicates that at least some portion of the drugs may have been prescribed appropriately for pain, Dr. Nora Volkow, director of the National Institute on Drug Abuse, said in an interview. If death rates were driven purely by abuse, then one would expect the death rates to be highest among younger women who are the biggest abusers.Deaths among women have been rising for some time, but Dr. Thomas R. Frieden, the C.D.C. director, said the problem had gone virtually unrecognized. The study offered several theories for the increase. Women are more likely than men to be prescribed pain drugs, to use them chronically, and to get prescriptions for higher doses.The study's authors hypothesized that it might be because the most common forms of chronic pain, like fibromyalgia, are more common in women. A woman typically also has less body mass than a man, making it easier to overdose.Women are also more likely to be given prescriptions of psychotherapeutic drugs, like antidepressants and antianxiety medications, Dr. Volkow said. That is significant because people who overdose are much more likely to have been taking a combination of those drugs and pain medication.Broader social trends, like unemployment, an increase in single-parent families, and their associated stressors, might have also contributed to the increase in abuse, but they are slow moving and unlikely to be a direct explanation, Dr. Volkow said.
Researchers in Japan have used human stem cells to create tiny human livers like those that arise early in fetal life. When the scientists transplanted the rudimentary livers into mice, the little organs grew, made human liver proteins, and metabolized drugs as human livers do.They and others caution that these are early days and this is still very much basic research. The liver buds, as they are called, did not turn into complete livers, and the method would have to be scaled up enormously to make enough replacement liver buds to treat a patient. Even then, the investigators say, they expect to replace only 30 percent of a patient's liver. What they are making is more like a patch than a full liver.But the promise, in a field that has seen a great deal of dashed hopes, is immense, medical experts said."This is a major breakthrough of monumental significance," said Dr. Hillel Tobias, director of transplantation at the New York University School of Medicine. Dr. Tobias is chairman of the American Liver Foundation's national medical advisory committee."Very impressive," said Eric Lagasse of the University of Pittsburgh, who studies cell transplantation and liver disease. "It's novel and very exciting."The study was published on Wednesday in the journal Nature.Although human studies are years away, said Dr. Leonard Zon, director of the stem cell research program at Boston Children's Hospital, this, to his knowledge, is the first time anyone has used human stem cells, created from human skin cells, to make a functioning solid organ, like a liver, as opposed to bone marrow, a jellylike organ.Ever since they discovered how to get human stem cells — first from embryos and now, more often, from skin cells — researchers have dreamed of using the cells for replacement tissues and organs. The stem cells can turn into any type of human cell, and so it seemed logical to simply turn them into liver cells, for example, and add them to livers to fill in dead or damaged areas.But those studies did not succeed. Liver cells did not take up residence in the liver; they did not develop blood supplies or signaling systems. They were not a cure for disease.Other researchers tried making livers or other organs by growing cells on scaffolds. But that did not work well either. Cells would fall off the scaffolds and die, and the result was never a functioning solid organ.Researchers have made specialized human cells in petri dishes, but not three-dimensional structures, like a liver.The investigators, led by Dr. Takanori Takebe of the Yokohama City University Graduate School of Medicine, began with human skin cells, turning them into stem cells. By adding various stimulators and drivers of cell growth, they then turned the stem cells into human liver cells and began trying to make replacement livers.They say they stumbled upon their solution. When they grew the human liver cells in petri dishes along with blood vessel cells from human umbilical cords and human connective tissue, that mix of cells, to their surprise, spontaneously assembled itself into three-dimensional liver buds, resembling the liver at about five or six weeks of gestation in humans.Then the researchers transplanted the liver buds into mice, putting them in two places: on the brain and into the abdomen. The brain site allowed them to watch the buds grow. The investigators covered the hole in each animal's skull with transparent plastic, giving them a direct view of the developing liver buds. The buds grew and developed blood supplies, attaching themselves to the blood vessels of the mice.The abdominal site allowed them to put more buds in — 12 buds in each of two places in the abdomen, compared with one bud in the brain — which let the investigators ask if the liver buds were functioning like human livers.They were. They made human liver proteins and also metabolized drugs that human livers — but not mouse livers — metabolize.The approach makes sense, said Kenneth Zaret, a professor of cellular and developmental biology at the University of Pennsylvania. His research helped establish that blood and connective tissue cells promote dramatic liver growth early in development and help livers establish their own blood supply. On their own, without those other types of cells, liver cells do not develop or form organs."They were letting nature do its thing rather than trying to conceive of what the right signals might be," Dr. Zaret said. But, he said, the mice were studied for only a couple of months. He would like to see what happens over a longer time."We don't know if the cells will grow out of control or will poop out," Dr. Zaret said.Even if the liver buds never fulfill their clinical promise, they still could be enormously important for pharmaceutical research, Dr. Zon said. Drugs must be tested to see if they damage the liver, a major site of drug toxicity. Companies do this with liver cells taken from cadavers and grown in petri dishes. But the liver buds could be a big improvement and offer a large supply of rudimentary livers for testing."That would be huge," Dr. Zon said. "It would open up lots of drugs in the pipeline and bring them to the clinic much more quickly."Dr. Takebe and his colleagues, though, are more focused on scaling up their process so they can think of trying to take it to the clinic, perhaps to treat babies and children whose livers have failed. Dr. Takebe estimates they would need hundreds of thousands, perhaps millions, of liver buds to replace 30 percent of the liver."This is obviously the wave of the future," he said.
BAKERSFIELD, Calif. — In 36 years with the Los Angeles police, Sgt. Irwin Klorman faced many dangerous situations, including one routine call that ended with Uzi fire and a bullet-riddled body sprawled on the living room floor.But his most life-threatening encounter has been with coccidioidomycosis, or valley fever, for which he is being treated here. Coccidioidomycosis, known as "cocci," is an insidious airborne fungal disease in which microscopic spores in the soil take flight on the wind or even a mild breeze to lodge in the moist habitat of the lungs and, in the most extreme instances, spread to the bones, the skin, the eyes or, in Mr. Klorman's case, the brain.The infection, which the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention has labeled "a silent epidemic," is striking more people each year, with more than 20,000 reported cases annually throughout the Southwest, especially in California and Arizona. Although most people exposed to the fungus do not fall ill, about 160 die from it each year, with thousands more facing years of disability and surgery. About 9 percent of those infected will contract pneumonia and 1 percent will experience serious complications beyond the lungs.The disease is named for the San Joaquin Valley, a cocci hot spot, where the same soil that produces the state's agricultural bounty can turn traitorous. The "silent epidemic" became less silent last week when a federal judge ordered the state to transfer about 2,600 vulnerable inmates — including some with H.I.V. — out of two of the valley's eight state prisons, about 90 miles north of here. In 2011, those prisons, Avenal and Pleasant Valley, produced 535 of the 640 reported inmate cocci cases, and throughout the system, yearly costs for hospitalization for cocci exceed $23 million.The transfer, affecting about a third of the two prisons' combined population, is to be completed in 90 days, a challenge to a prison system already contending with a federal mandate to reduce overcrowding. Jose Antonio Diaz, 44, who has diabetes and was recently relocated to Avenal, is feeling "very scared of catching it," said his wife, Suzanne Moreno.Advocates for prisoners have criticized state agencies for not moving the inmates sooner. "If this were a factory, a public university or a hotel — anything except a prison — they would shut these two places down," said Donald Specter, the executive director of the Prison Law Office, which provides free legal assistance to inmates.The pending transfer has underscored the complexities and mysteries of a disease that continues to baffle physicians and scientists. In Arizona, a study from the Department of Health Services showed a 25 percent risk of African-Americans with newly diagnosed valley fever developing complications, compared with 6 percent of whites."The working hypothesis has to do with genetic susceptibility, probably the interrelationships of genes involved in the immune system," said Dr. John N. Galgiani, a professor at the University of Arizona and the director of the Valley Fever Center for Excellence, founded in 1996. "But which ones? We're clueless."Kandis Watson, whose son Kaden, 8, almost died, had a gut feeling that "something was not right," she said, when Kaden began feeling sick two years ago. The pediatrician prescribed antibiotics, but Kaden's health deteriorated, with a golf ball-size mass developing at the base of his neck. The infection enveloped Kaden's chest, narrowing his trachea.Kaden was essentially breathing through an opening the size of a straw, said Dr. James M. McCarty, the medical director of pediatric infectious diseases at Children's Hospital Central California in Madera, where Kaden spent six months. Today the boy is back to his mischievous self, surreptitiously placing a green plastic lizard in his mother's hair.But how he contracted valley fever is still guesswork. "I think he got it being a boy, digging in the dirt," Mrs. Watson said.Kern County, where Bakersfield is located, had more than 1,800 reported cases last year. At Kern Medical Center, Dr. Royce H. Johnson and his colleagues have a roster of nearly 2,000 patients. Many, like Mr. Klorman, have life-threatening cocci meningitis."I got a bad break," said Mr. Klorman, who is known as Joe. Until illness forced his retirement, he preferred a squad car to a desk job. Now he travels four hours round trip three times a week so Dr. Johnson can inject a powerful antifungal drug into his spinal fluid. In other patients, the disease has been known to eat away ribs and vertebrae."It destroys lives," said Dr. Johnson, whose daughter contracted a mild form. "Divorces, lost jobs and bankruptcy are incredibly common, not to mention psychological dislocation."Once athletic, Deandre Zillendor, 38, dropped to 145 pounds from 220 in two weeks, and lesions erupted on his face and body. "You keep it forever, like luggage," he said of the disease.
BALTIMORE — Alberta Hough struggles to feed herself a snack, her arms shaking badly from Parkinson's disease. Days earlier, the 84-year-old fell while eating, sliding off her kitchen chair.The rest of Hough's day isn't much easier to navigate. She wobbles into a bathtub with no grab bar. Her feet catch on damaged floor tiles. Part of the banister she needs to steady herself on the stairs has pulled out of the wall. At the back door, a rickety wooden ramp no longer supports the scooter that helps her get around.The environment in which you live can be as disabling as a disease, and too often, older Americans wind up in a nursing home not because they're super-sick but because they can't get through their days safely at home.Now a major research project will bring handymen, occupational therapists and nurses into the homes of 800 low-income seniors in Baltimore to test if some inexpensive fix-ups and strategies for daily living can keep them independent longer, and save millions in taxpayer dollars spent on nursing home care."Very small changes can make a big difference," said Sarah Szanton, a Johns Hopkins University associate nursing professor who leads the project. "We're not saying, 'What's your blood pressure?' We're focusing on function: What do they want to do?"Losing independence is a leading fear as people age. But a recent poll shows that too few comprehend the changes in lifestyle needed to offset the chronic illnesses and gradual slowdown that hit just about everyone in the 70s, 80s and beyond.Asked about their choice of living situation when they're older, Americans 40 and over say their top priorities are a one-level home with no stairs, that's close to their children and medical care, according to the poll by the AP-NORC Center for Public Affairs Research.Chances are, that won't be enough.For Hough, No. 1 is feeding herself without everything tumbling off the fork."I'm shaking all the time," she quietly told Hopkins occupational therapist Allyson Evelyn-Gustave.Hough's other priority is not falling, and stairs are only one of her home's hazards.To Hopkins' Szanton, bridging the gap between what older adults are able to do and what their homes allow them to do is key to maintaining independence.The Capable study aims to prove how. During 10 home visits over four months, the Hopkins team is tailoring interventions — including about $1,100 in home repairs or modifications provided for free — to help low-income seniors who are having trouble caring for themselves.Drills buzzed in Hough's house as carpenters installed a new banister and added grab bars and a raised toilet seat in the bathroom. They replaced patches of flooring to prevent trips and prepared to tackle the ramp.As for eating, Evelyn-Gustave recommended a little-known tool: utensils and cups that are specially weighted to counter Hough's tremors."It'll be easier for you to hold," she promised.The set of utensils costs only about $20, one of the affordable tips the study is generating. Hough's daughter had thought the only solution was an aide to feed her mother, which the older woman hates."I always said I wouldn't let my mom go to a nursing home," said Gloria J. Hawks, 66, who is determined to care for her mother in the house the two share.The Capable project — it stands for Community Aging in Place, Advancing Better Living for Elders — is being closely watched by Medicaid officials in other states as a way to coordinate care and improve the functional problems that lead to pricey, and sometimes preventable nursing home admissions. Today, it's difficult for Medicaid patients to get these services.With more than $8 million in research money from the National Institutes of Health and the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the project goes beyond home repair for health. It starts with a full-scale assessment of each participant's needs.In one home, a Hopkins nurse discovered that an 82-year-old woman was taking all of her 26 daily medications at once instead of staggered throughout the day, leaving her disoriented and sedentary until she became too weak to get out of bed without help.First the nurse fixed the medication schedule. Then the occupational therapist taught the woman leg-strengthening exercises and installed $30 steel risers to make it easier for her to get in and out of bed. Add new banisters, and soon she was moving around on her own.Whether it is the cost or emotional ties, many people grow old in the same home where they spent their younger, more agile years. An AARP survey in 2010 found nearly 90 percent of seniors wanted to remain in their current home for as long as possible.Yet government figures show nearly 1 in 5 seniors living in the community have trouble with at least one activity of daily living, such as walking or bathing.Those physical limitations become more difficult with doorways too narrow for walkers, toilets that are lower than chairs, and kitchen counters too tall to sit while cooking. Plus, nearly one-third of older adults experience a fall every year, and most who are injured fell inside the home, according to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention."You don't think about that stuff," said Hattie Watties, who can't imagine leaving her Baltimore home of 36 years, that's near children and grandchildren. "You just do what you have to."For Watties, 74, that meant climbing onto kitchen counters to reach too-high cabinets. Steep, dark stairs to the basement laundry only had a partial railing, so she threw clothes down and inched her way after them.No more: Carpenter Tyrone White lowered Watties' cabinets to a comfortable reach, installed railings, and showed how an energy-saving compact fluorescent light bulb provided more light than a regular bulb in the dim stairway.In homes where it's even darker, White sticks motion-sensing lights by each step to show where to aim your foot. They're less than $15 for a two-pack and run on batteries, so no rewiring is needed.The work that perhaps has the biggest impact seen so far is a double railing for stairs lets people rest their weight on both sides.The handymen, employed by the urban service corps Civic Works, also insist on installing carbon monoxide monitors, which have detected leaking gas stoves in some homes.Do these solutions really save money?The four-month intervention costs about $4,000 per participant, including the home modifications and specialists' salaries. The average cost for nursing home care in the U.S. is $6,700 a month, so even a modest delay could add up fast. Szanton will track participants long term and, based on results from an earlier pilot test of 40 high-risk seniors, hopes to delay nursing home entry by up to a year in this frail population.For families, perhaps the bigger question is how long the solutions will last. Evelyn-Gustave teaches families to brainstorm options as new challenges crop up."We can't be there forever. They need the skill to carry on," she said.
A toddler who in April became the youngest person ever to receive a bioengineered organ has died, surgeons involved in her treatment said Sunday.The girl, Hannah Warren, who was born without a trachea, died on Saturday at Children's Hospital of Illinois in Peoria, where she had undergone the experimental surgery on April 9. She would have turned 3 in August.In the operation, Dr. Paolo Macchiarini, a specialist in the field of regenerative medicine who is affiliated with the Karolinska Institute in Stockholm, implanted a bioengineered windpipe made from plastic fibers to which the girl's own cells, taken from her bone marrow, were added. It was only the sixth surgery of its kind and the first to be performed in the United States.But that operation had also involved surgery on the girl's esophagus, which never healed properly. She underwent another operation a month ago to correct the problem and died from complications arising from the second operation, said Dr. Mark J. Holterman, a pediatric surgeon at the hospital."The trachea was never a problem," Dr. Macchiarini said Sunday. "It was her native tissue that was very fragile." He said he would continue with similar operations, including one he is performing this week in Stockholm. "But all these cases are so complex and so difficult," he said.Being born without a windpipe is an extremely rare condition that is eventually fatal in 99 percent of cases. Until this year the girl, whose father is Canadian and mother is Korean, had spent her life in a newborn intensive care unit in a Korean hospital, breathing through a tube inserted in her mouth.The April surgery had been approved by the Food and Drug Administration under rules that allow experimental procedures when the patient otherwise has little hope of survival.The goal of regenerative medicine, or tissue engineering, is to create or regrow tissues and organs to ease transplant shortages or treat conditions that do not have an effective cure. After years of scant progress, tissue engineers have begun to make advances as they have gained a better understanding of the role that stem cells — basic cells that can become tissue-specific ones — play in signaling the body to grow and repair itself.Dr. Macchiarini has performed other windpipe implants similar to this one. Another patient, an American man who was operated on in Stockholm, died. An Eritrean man has lived the longest, more than two and a half years since the surgery.After the April surgery, officials at the Peoria hospital had talked about developing plans to become a center for regenerative medicine. Dr. Holterman said it was too early to talk about what the girl's death means for those plans, although in general the feeling was that "we should get back on the horse and try again.""Hannah was a pioneer," he said. "We knew going into this that she wasn't the best surgical candidate.""At this point," he said, "we're all just raw with pain."
ATLANTA — The homicide rate for older children and young adults has hit its lowest point in at least three decades, but the decline has been slowing, according to a new government report.In 2010, the homicide rate for victims ages 10 to 24 was less than half the rate seen in 1993, when there was an explosion in crime tied to crack cocaine.The report released Thursday echoes earlier findings about a national decline in killings and other crimes, but offers a more focused look at what is one of the most affected groups. Ages 10 to 24 account for about a third of slaying victims. The highest homicide rates are consistently seen in people in their late teens and 20s."That's what drives the national numbers. That's the ballgame," said David Hemenway, director of the Harvard University's Injury Control Research Center. He was not involved in the new study.There are various theories for the drop in youth killings and other crimes since the early 1990s, ranging from the economy to police work or public health campaigns. None completely explain the trend, said Hemenway, a member of a National Academy of Sciences' group examining crime trends.For the report, researchers from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention searched a death statistics database that goes back to 1981.About 4,800 youths ages 10 to 24 were killed in 2010, the most recent year in the analysis. That translates to a homicide rate of 7.5 per 100,000 people — the lowest since 1981. It also appears to be lower than rates in the 1970s, a CDC spokeswoman said.But it hasn't been a steady trend down. The rate dropped a bit in the early 1980s and then rose sharply, peaking at about 16 per 100,000 in 1993. It plummeted for several years before the decline slowed. The rate inched down about 1 percent a year, on average, from 2000 to 2010, the CDC found.The study showed youth homicide rates fell across the board — in males, females, whites, blacks and Hispanics. However, males and blacks continued to be killed at far higher rates than females or people in other racial and ethnic groups. The 2010 rate for blacks was nearly four times higher than the average for all youths that age.The rate of gun-related slayings was about four times higher than of the rate of homicides using other weapons.Based on overall rates for 2010, homicide last year fell off the nation's top 15 causes of death for the first time in almost half a century. It continues to rank among the top three leading causes of death for people ages 10 to 24, however.
WASHINGTON — The Food and Drug Administration announced on Monday that it had approved the first brain wave test to help diagnose attention deficit hyperactivity disorder in children.The test uses an electroencephalogram, or EEG, with sensors attached to a child's head and hooked by wires to a computer to measure brain waves. It traces different types of electrical impulses given off by nerve cells in the brain and records how many times those impulses are given off each second.The test takes 15 to 20 minutes, and measures two kinds of brain waves — theta and beta. Certain combinations of those waves tend to be more prevalent in children with A.D.H.D., the Food and Drug Administration said in a news release.The disorder is one of the most common behavioral disorders in children. About 9 percent of adolescents have A.D.H.D. and the average age of diagnosis is 7, the drug agency said, citing the American Psychiatric Association. Children who have it tend to be hyperactive, impulsive and exhibit behavioral problems.The maker of the testing device, NEBA Health of Augusta, Ga., gave the F.D.A. data from a study of 275 children and adolescents, ages 6 to 17, with attention or hyperactivity problems. Clinicians used the device, called a Neuropsychiatric EEG-Based Assessment Aid, in combination with traditional testing methods, like listing the criteria in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, behavioral questionnaires and I.Q. testing.An outside group of researchers then reviewed the data and decided whether the child had the disorder. The results showed that the device helped doctors make a more accurate diagnosis than using traditional methods alone, the F.D.A. said.An agency spokeswoman said it did not release the study's data.William E. Pelham, the director of the Center for Children and Families at Florida International University, which conducts research on the disorder and treats children who have it, was skeptical about the test. Traditional methods of diagnosing the disorder are relatively accurate, he said, and years of research on brain function have not added much to those methods. The NEBA device, he said, only supplements other types of tests and would serve only to increase the cost of diagnosis."What's the point?" he said. "We're not going to run out and buy one of these machines to do diagnoses, because it is totally unnecessary."Christy Foreman, director of the Office of Device Evaluation at the F.D.A.'s Center for Devices and Radiological Health, said in a statement that the device would help health care providers more accurately determine whether A.D.H.D. was the cause of a particular behavioral problem.
BOSTON — Memory problems that are often dismissed as a normal part of aging may not be so harmless after all.Noticing you have had a decline beyond the occasional misplaced car keys or forgotten name could be the very earliest sign of Alzheimer's, several research teams are reporting.Doctors often regard people who complain that their memory is slipping as "the worried well," but the new studies show they may well have reason to worry, said Maria Carrillo, a senior scientist at the Alzheimer's Association.One study found that self-reported memory changes preceded broader mental decline by about six years. Another tied these changes to evidence on brain scans that dementia is setting in."Maybe these people know something about themselves" that their doctors don't, "and maybe we should pay attention to them," said Dorene Rentz, a Massachusetts General Hospital psychologist. She helped run one of the studies, which were discussed Wednesday at the Alzheimer's Association International Conference in Boston.About 35 million people worldwide have dementia, and Alzheimer's disease is the most common type. It causes a slow decline in thinking and reasoning ability. Memory trouble that disrupts daily life is one symptom.Don't panic, though: The researchers are not talking about "senior moments," those small, temporary lapses most everyone has, said Creighton Phelps, a neuroscientist with the U.S. National Institute on Aging. They are talking about real memory loss, in which the information doesn't come back to you later, not even when people remind you of what you forgot, he explained.A true decline is a change in your normal pattern. "You're starting to forget things now that you normally didn't — doctor appointments, luncheon engagements, the kids are coming over ... things that a year or two ago you wouldn't," said Dr. Ronald Petersen, director of the Mayo Clinic's Alzheimer's Disease Research Center.Pati Hoffman, of Carol Stream, Ill., near Chicago, used to design menus and organize events for restaurants but began forgetting where she filed things in her computer."I really just kind of started struggling. Something wasn't right. I would have to bring my work home, spread it all over the floor, sort it and then try to get it done so that nobody at work would know I was having this difficulty," she said. Driving to familiar places, "I would think, 'I know where I am, but I don't know how to get out of here.'"Two neurologists said it was just stress and anxiety, and one prescribed an antidepressant. A third finally diagnosed her with early-onset Alzheimer's disease four years ago. She was 56.The new studies were on "subjective cognitive decline" — when people first notice they are having trouble, even if they test normal on mental ability tests:— Richard Kryscio at the University of Kentucky led a study of 531 people, average age 73. Those who reported a change in memory or thinking abilities since their last doctor visit were nearly twice as likely to be diagnosed with dementia or mild cognitive impairment about six to nine years later.— Researchers from the French government's health agency and Brigham and Women's Hospital in Boston studied 3,861 nurses at least 70 years old who were asked about memory symptoms and periodically tested for them later. About 900 of them carried a gene that raises their risk for dementia. Among the gene carriers, worry about a single memory symptom predicted verbal memory decline on tests over the next six years. In the others without the gene, worry about three or more memory symptoms was linked to memory decline on tests.— Rebecca Amariglio and other Harvard researchers found that complaints about memory decline matched how much sticky plaque researchers saw on brain scans of 189 people 65 and older. This confirms an earlier study of 131 people that tied memory complaints to these brain plaques, the hallmark of Alzheimer's disease.— Reports of memory impairment were closely tied to a decline later in the ability to recall events in a study of 2,230 people, average age 80, by researchers at the University of Bonn in Germany.— Petersen said that a study he and others soon will report shows that complaints about memory predicted who would later develop mild cognitive impairment — what used to be called "pre-Alzheimer's" — in a random sample of 1,500 people in the community near the Mayo Clinic in Rochester, Minn."If you notice a change in your pattern of either yourself or a loved one, seek a health care professional's evaluation," said Heather Snyder, the Alzheimer's Association's director of medical and scientific operations. "It could be a lack of sleep or nutritional, but it may be something more than that."But don't worry about small, common memory slips, said Dr. Reisa Sperling, director of the Alzheimer's center at Brigham and Women's Hospital."Every time you forget someone's name, you don't need to go running to the doctor," she said.The Alzheimer's Association lists 10 warning signs of the disease:— Difficulty completing familiar tasks at home, at work or at leisure.— New problems with words in speaking or writing.— Misplacing things and losing the ability to retrace steps.— Changes in mood and personality.
Individuals buying health insurance on their own will see their premiums tumble next year in New York State as changes under the federal health care law take effect , Gov. Andrew M. Cuomo announced on Wednesday.State insurance regulators say they have approved rates for 2014 that are at least 50 percent lower on average than those currently available in New York. Beginning in October, individuals in New York City who now pay $1,000 a month or more for coverage will be able to shop for health insurance for as little as $308 monthly. With federal subsidies, the cost will be even lower.Supporters of the new health care law, the Affordable Care Act, credited the drop in rates to the online purchasing exchanges the law created, which they say are spurring competition among insurers that are anticipating an influx of new customers. The law requires that an exchange be started in every state."Health insurance has suddenly become affordable in New York," said Elisabeth Benjamin, vice president for health initiatives with the Community Service Society of New York. "It's not bargain-basement prices, but we're going from Bergdorf's to Filene's here.""The extraordinary decline in New York's insurance rates for individual consumers demonstrates the profound promise of the Affordable Care Act," she added.Administration officials, long confronted by Republicans and other critics of President Obama's signature law, were quick to add New York to the list of states that appear to be successfully carrying out the law and setting up exchanges."We're seeing in New York what we've seen in other states like California and Oregon — that competition and transparency in the marketplaces are leading to affordable and new choices for families," said Joanne Peters, a spokeswoman for the Department of Health and Human Services.The new premium rates do not affect a majority of New Yorkers, who receive insurance through their employers, only those who must purchase it on their own. Because the cost of individual coverage has soared, only 17,000 New Yorkers currently buy insurance on their own. About 2.6 million are uninsured in New York State.State officials estimate as many as 615,000 individuals will buy health insurance on their own in the first few years the health law is in effect. In addition to lower premiums, about three-quarters of those people will be eligible for the subsidies available to lower-income individuals."New York's health benefits exchange will offer the type of real competition that helps drive down health insurance costs for consumers and businesses," said Mr. Cuomo.The plans to be offered on the exchanges all meet certain basic requirements, as laid out in the law, but are in four categories from most generous to least: platinum, gold, silver and bronze. An individual with annual income of $17,000 will pay about $55 a month for a silver plan, state regulators said. A person with a $20,000 income will pay about $85 a month for a silver plan, while someone earning $25,000 will pay about $145 a month for a silver plan.The least expensive plans, some offered by newcomers to the market, may not offer wide access to hospitals and doctors, experts said.While the rates will fall over all, apples-to-apples comparisons are impossible from this year to next because all of the plans are essentially new insurance products.The rates for small businesses, which are considerably lower than for individuals, will not fall as precipitously. But small businesses will be eligible for tax credits, and the exchanges will make it easier for them to select a plan. Roughly 15,000 plans are available today to small businesses, and choosing among them is particularly challenging."Where New York previously had a dizzying array of thousands upon thousands of plans, small businesses will now be able to truly comparison-shop for the best prices," said Benjamin M. Lawsky, the state's top financial regulator.Officials at the state Department of Financial Services say they have approved 17 insurers to sell individual coverage through the New York exchange, including eight that are just entering the state's commercial market. Many of these are insurers specializing in Medicaid plans that cater to low-income individuals.
ATLANTA — If you're 65 and living in Hawaii, here's some good news: Odds are you'll live another 21 years. And for all but five of those years, you'll likely be in pretty good health.Hawaii tops the charts in the government's first state-by-state look at how long Americans age 65 can expect to live, on average, and how many of those remaining years will be healthy ones.Retirement-age Mississippians fared worst, with only about 17½ more years remaining and nearly seven of them in poorer health.U.S. life expectancy has been growing steadily for decades, and is now nearly 79 for newborns. The figures released Thursday by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention estimate life expectancy for people 65 years old, and what portion will be free of the illnesses and disabilities suffered late in life."What ultimately matters is not just the length of life but the quality of life," said Matt Stiefel, who oversees population health research for Kaiser Permanente.The World Health Organization keeps "healthy life expectancy" statistics on nearly 200 countries, and the numbers are used to determine the most sensible ages to set retirement and retirement benefits. But the measure is still catching on in the United States; the CDC study is the first to make estimates for all 50 states.Overall, Americans who make it to 65 have about 19 years of life ahead of them, including nearly 14 in relatively good health, the CDC estimated.But the South and parts of the Midwest clearly had lower numbers. That's not a surprise, experts said.Southern states tend to have higher rates of smoking, obesity, diabetes, heart disease, and a range of other illnesses. They also have problems that affect health, like less education and more poverty.These are issues that build up over a lifetime, so it's doubtful that moving to Hawaii after a lifetime in the South will suddenly give you more healthy years, they said.After Mississippi, Kentucky, West Virginia and Alabama had the lowest numbers for both life expectancy and healthy life expectancy. States with the best numbers included Florida — a magnet for healthy retirees — as well as Connecticut and Minnesota.The estimates were made using 2007 through 2009 data from the census, death certificates and telephone surveys that asked people to describe their health. The CDC's Paula Yoon cautioned not to make too much of the differences between states. Results could have been swayed, for example, by how people in different states interpreted and answered the survey questions.— Nationally, women at 65 can expect nearly 15 more years of healthy life. Men that age can expect about 13 years.— Blacks fared much worse than whites. They could expect 11 years of healthy life, compared to more than 14 for whites.The CDC report makes "painfully clear" the disparities in the health of whites and blacks in their final years, said Ellen Meara, a health economist at Dartmouth College.
The gap in life expectancy between black and white Americans is at its narrowest since the federal government started systematically tracking it in the 1930s, but a difference of nearly four years remains, and federal researchers have detailed why in a new report.They found that higher rates of death from heart disease, cancer, homicide, diabetes and infant mortality accounted for more than half the black disadvantage in 2010, according to the report by the National Center for Health Statistics, the federal agency that tracks vital statistics for the United States.Still, blacks have made notable gains in life expectancy in recent decades that demographers say reflect improvements in medical treatment as well as in the socioeconomic position of blacks in America. Life expectancy at birth was up by 17 percent since 1970, far higher than the 11 percent increase for whites over the same period.Demographers credit declining rates of AIDS and homicide, which ravaged black neighborhoods in many American cities in the 1980s and '90s, as well as reduced death rates from heart disease. Blacks, who have higher rates of heart disease, have benefited disproportionately from improved treatment of it, said Samuel Preston, a demographer and sociologist at the University of Pennsylvania. But there is still a lot of room for improvement, especially to prevent heart disease in blacks, experts said.Life expectancy for blacks rose to 75 years in 2010, up from 64 years in 1970. For whites, it rose to 79 years from 72 years in the same period. In 1930, life expectancy stood at 48 for blacks and at 60 for whites.Higher infant mortality among blacks also contributes to the gap, but less than it used to. The infant mortality rate for blacks fell by 16 percent from 2005 to 2011, compared with a 12 percent drop for whites, said Kenneth M. Johnson, a demographer at the University of New Hampshire.Heart disease was the single biggest drag on black life expectancy, accounting for a full year of the 3.8-year difference between whites and blacks. The second-biggest factor was cancer, accounting for about eight months of the difference.The report's lead author, Kenneth D. Kochanek, said that 1994 was the last time his office published a report that focused on what was driving life expectancy disparities. At that time, researchers were exploring a surprising decline in life expectancy for blacks between 1984 and 1989 that was driven in part by AIDS and homicide among black men, and AIDS and diabetes among black women.The new report analyzed data from 2010. Preliminary statistics for 2011 show that the gap has continued to narrow to 3.7 years.Whites have suffered a setback in a category known as unintentional injuries, which includes the surge in prescription drug overdoses that has disproportionately affected whites since the 1990s.Blacks also had lower death rates than whites from suicide, Alzheimer's and Parkinson's diseases, and respiratory diseases like emphysema, as well as chronic liver disease.Sam Harper, an assistant professor of epidemiology and biostatistics at McGill University in Montreal who has done extensive work on disparities in life expectancy, said some drivers of black disadvantage are preventable, like heart disease. Public health efforts should focus on reducing risk factors like smoking, poor diet and hypertension, he said.Policy makers should also make sure that blacks are benefiting from improvements in medical treatments for cancer and heart disease, he said. "Redoubling our efforts on these two diseases would go a long way toward reducing the black-white life expectancy gap further."
The man complained of memory problems but seemed perfectly normal. No specialist he visited detected any decline."He insisted that things were changing, but he aced all of our tests," said Rebecca Amariglio, a neuropsychologist at Brigham and Women's Hospital in Boston. But about seven years later, he began showing symptoms of dementia. Dr. Amariglio now believes he had recognized a cognitive change so subtle "he was the only one who could identify it."Patients like this have long been called "the worried well," said Creighton Phelps, acting chief of the dementias of aging branch of the National Institute on Aging. "People would complain, and we didn't really think it was very valid to take that into account."But now, scientists are finding that some people with such complaints may in fact be detecting early harbingers of Alzheimer's.Studies presented Wednesday at an Alzheimer's Association conference in Boston showed that people with some types of cognitive concerns were more likely to have Alzheimer's pathology in their brains, and to develop dementia later. Research presented by Dr. Amariglio, for example, found that people with more concerns about memory and organizing ability were more likely to have amyloid, a key Alzheimer's-related protein, in their brains.And, in a significant shift highlighted at the conference, leading Alzheimer's researchers are identifying a new category called "subjective cognitive decline," which is people's own sense that their memory and thinking skills are slipping even before others have noticed."The whole field now is moving to this area, and saying 'Hey, maybe there is something to this, and maybe we should pay attention to these people,' " said Dr. Ronald C. Petersen, chairman of the advisory panel to the federal government's new National Alzheimer's Project.Dr. Petersen, director of the Mayo Clinic's Alzheimer's center, said preliminary results of a Mayo study of healthy older adults in Minnesota suggested something similar."Lo and behold, those who had a concern about their memory in fact had more likelihood" of later developing mild cognitive impairment, an early phase of dementia, he said. He said study participants with memory concerns were 56 percent more likely to be given a diagnosis of such impairment, even when results were adjusted for factors like education, genetic risk and psychiatric issues like anxiety and depression."These people are sensing something, and there's some biological signals that correlate," Dr. Petersen said. "I think it's real."Experts emphasize that many people with such complaints will not develop dementia. Some memory decline reflects normal aging, they say, and some concerns reflect psychological angst. People who forget what they wanted in the kitchen or the names of relatively unfamiliar people are probably aging normally. People who forget important details of recent events, get lost in familiar places or lose track of book or television plots may not be, especially if they have more problems than others their age.And much remains unknown about subjective concerns. In some studies, like Dr. Amariglio's, highly educated people noticed changes more readily, but in other studies, less educated people did. Some studies suggest people who worry more about memory deficits have more dementia risk, but it is unclear if the worry reflects the changes they sense or if worrying itself increases risk. People with family histories of dementia could be reporting problems simply because they know about the disease and its genetic component. And, while a study presented Wednesday found slight correlations between subjective concerns and the highest-risk genetic mutation, ApoE4, that relationship remains unclear.Experts are not yet suggesting doctors regularly screen people for "subjective cognitive decline" because much more research is needed and no effective dementia treatment now exists.Dr. Richard Caselli, a neurology professor at the Mayo Clinic in Arizona, said that when patients cited cognitive problems, he ruled out "reversible things," but did not recommend testing for Alzheimer's because "if we do a scan and say, 'Hey, we found some amyloid in your brain,' there's really nothing you can do."
I used green peppers only for this stir-fry. Try to use a mix of hot and sweet peppers, and feel free to use red, yellow or orange ones if you want to introduce some color. The chicken is "velveted" before stir-frying; a good name for this technique as the texture of the chicken remains velvety and moist after stir-frying.1 pound boneless, skinless chicken breast, cut across the grain in 1/4-inch thick slices1 pound green peppers, with at least one of them a hot pepper such as an Anaheim1. In a large bowl stir together the egg white, cornstarch, 1 1/2 teaspoons of the rice wine or sherry, salt to taste and 1 1/2 teaspoons water. When you can no longer see any cornstarch add the chicken and stir together until coated. Cover the bowl and place in the refrigerator for 30 minutes.2. Combine the remaining rice wine or sherry, the hoisin sauce, soy sauce, and sugar in a small bowl and set it near your wok.3. Fill a medium-size saucepan with water and bring to a boil. Add 1 tablespoon of the oil and turn the heat down so that the water is at a bare simmer. Carefully add the chicken to the water, stirring so that the pieces don't clump. Cook until the chicken turns opaque on the surface but is not cooked through, about 1 minute. Drain in a colander set over a bowl.4. Heat a 14-inch flat-bottomed wok or 12-inch steel skillet over high heat until a drop of water evaporates within a second or two when added to the pan. Add the remaining oil by pouring it down the sides of the pan and swirling the pan, then add the garlic, ginger and chile and stir-fry for no more than 10 seconds. Add the peppers and stir-fry for 1 minute. Add the chicken, cashews and hoisin sauce mixture and salt to taste. Stir-fry for 1 to 2 minutes, until the chicken is cooked through, and serve with grains or noodles.Advance preparation: This is all last-minute though the vegetables can be prepped well in advance and refrigerated.Nutritional information per serving: 286 calories; 14 grams fat; 3 grams saturated fat; 3 grams polyunsaturated fat; 6 grams monounsaturated fat; 73 milligrams cholesterol; 13 grams carbohydrates; 2 grams dietary fiber; 216 milligrams sodium (does not include salt to taste); 27 grams proteinMartha Rose Shulman is the author of "The Very Best of Recipes for Health."
The mice were eating their usual chow and exercising normally, but they were getting fat anyway. The reason: researchers had deleted a gene that acts in the brain and controls how quickly calories are burned. Even though they were consuming exactly the same number of calories as lean mice, they were gaining weight.So far, only one person — a severely obese child — has been found to have a disabling mutation in the same gene. But the discovery of the same effect in mice and in the child — a finding published Wednesday in the journal Science — may help explain why some people put on weight easily while others eat all they want and seem never to gain an ounce. It may also offer clues to a puzzle in the field of obesity: Why do studies find that people gain different amounts of weight while overeating by the same amount?Scientists have long thought explanations for why some people get fat might lie in their genes. They knew body weight was strongly inherited. Years ago, for example, they found that twins reared apart tended to have similar weights and adoptees tended to have weights like their biological parents, not the ones who reared them. As researchers developed tools to look for the actual genes, they found evidence that many — maybe even hundreds — of genes may be involved, stoking appetites, making people voraciously hungry.This rare gene-disabling mutation, though, is intriguing because it seems to explain something different, a propensity to pile on pounds even while eating what should be a normal amount of food. Investigators are now searching for other mutations of the same gene in fat people that may have a similar, but less extreme effect. The hope is that in the long term, understanding how this gene affects weight gain might lead to treatments for obesity that alter the rate at which calories are burned."The history of obesity for many many years has been one of blaming people for lack of self control," said Dr. Joseph Majzoub, chief of endocrinology at Boston Children's Hospital and lead author of the new paper. "If some of it is due to a slow metabolism, that would completely change the perspectives of parents and patients. It really would change the way we think of the disease."In their paper, Dr. Majzoub and his colleagues describe figuring out how the gene they deleted, known as MRAP2, acts in the brain to control weight. They discovered that it is a helper gene. It normally acts in the brain to signal another gene already known to be involved in controlling appetite. So they developed a hypothesis. If the helper gene was deleted, the brakes should come off the gene that controls appetite. Animals should eat voraciously.The first thing they noticed was that the mice got fat, ending up weighing twice as much as their normal siblings, with most of that extra weight due to fat accumulation."During the mouse equivalent of childhood and adolescence they were becoming rapidly obese," Dr. Majzoub said.The surprise came when the researchers figured out why. When the mice were young, they had normal appetites. The researchers measured what they and their normal siblings ate and determined they were eating the same amount of food. Yet the mice with the deleted gene still gained weight. The only way the obesity-prone mice could be kept slim was to be fed 10 to 15 percent less than their siblings.But as adults, the mice with the missing gene developed monstrous appetites. Given a chance, they ate much more than their siblings, exacerbating the effects of their tendency to turn food into fat.That led the researchers to ask if the same genetic phenomenon could be making people obese. They contacted Dr. Sadaf Farooqui of the University of Cambridge, whose group has been mapping the genes of massively obese children, and studied the data on 500 of the children, searching for mutations that disabled the same gene they had deleted in mice.
ATLANTA — Another reason to eat breakfast: Skipping it may increase your chances of a heart attack.A study of older men found those who regularly skipped breakfast had a 27 percent higher risk of a heart attack than those who ate a morning meal. There's no reason why the results wouldn't apply to other people, too, the Harvard researchers said.Other studies have suggested a link between breakfast and obesity, high blood pressure, diabetes and other health problems seen as precursors to heart problems."But no studies looked at long-term risk of heart attack," said Eric Rimm, one of the study authors at the Harvard School of Public Health.Why would skipping breakfast be a heart attack risk?Experts aren't certain, but here's what they think: People who don't eat breakfast are more likely to be hungrier later in the day and eat larger meals. Those meals mean the body must process a larger amount of calories in a shorter amount of time. That can spike sugar levels in the blood and perhaps lead to clogged arteries.But is a stack of syrupy pancakes, greasy eggs and lots of bacon really better than eating nothing?The researchers did not ask what the study participants ate for breakfast, and were not prepared to pass judgment on whether a fatty, sugary breakfast is better than no breakfast at all.Other experts agreed that it's hard to say."We don't know whether it's the timing or content of breakfast that's important. It's probably both," said Andrew Odegaard, a University of Minnesota researcher who has studied a link between skipping breakfast and health problems like obesity and high blood pressure."Generally, people who eat breakfast tend to eat a healthier diet," he added.The new research was released Monday by the journal Circulation. It was an observational study, so it's not designed to prove a cause and effect. But when done well, such studies can reveal important health risks.The researchers surveyed nearly 27,000 men about their eating habits in 1992. About 13 percent of them said they regularly skipped breakfast. They all were educated health professionals — like dentists and veterinarians — and were at least 45.Over the next 16 years, 1,527 suffered fatal or non-fatal heart attacks, including 171 who had said they regularly skipped breakfast.In other words, over 7 percent of the men who skipped breakfast had heart attacks, compared to nearly 6 percent of those who ate breakfast.The researchers calculated the increased risk at 27 percent, taking into account other factors like smoking, drinking, diet and health problems like high blood pressure and obesity.As many as 18 percent of U.S. adults regularly skip breakfast, according to federal estimates. So the study could be important news for many, Rimm said."It's a really simple message," he said. "Breakfast is an important meal."
WASHINGTON — Hair loss is one of chemotherapy's most despised side effects, not because of vanity but because it fuels stigma_revealing to the world an illness that many would rather keep private.Now U.S. researchers are about to put an experimental hair-preserving treatment to a rigorous test: To see if strapping on a cap so cold it numbs the scalp during chemotherapy really works well enough to be used widely in this country, as it is in Europe and Canada.The first time Miriam Lipton had breast cancer, her thick locks fell out two weeks after starting chemotherapy. But when the disease struck again, she used a cold cap during treatment and kept much of her hair, making her fight for survival seem a bit easier."I didn't necessarily want to walk around the grocery store answering questions about my cancer," recalled Lipton, 45, of San Francisco. "If you look OK on the outside, it can help you feel, 'OK, this is manageable, I can get through this.'"Near-freezing temperatures are supposed to reduce blood flow in the scalp, making it harder for cancer-fighting drugs to reach and harm hair follicles. But while several types of cold caps are sold around the world, the Food and Drug Administration hasn't approved their use in the U.S.Scalp cooling is an idea that's been around for decades, but it never caught on here in part because of a concern: Could the cold prevent chemotherapy from reaching any stray cancer cells lurking in the scalp?"Do they work and are they safe? Those are the two big holes. We just don't know," said American Cancer Society spokeswoman Kimberly Stump-Sutliff, an oncology nurse who said studies abroad haven't settled those questions. "We need to know."To Dr. Hope Rugo of the University of California, San Francisco, the impact of hair loss has been overlooked, even belittled, by health providers. She's had patients delay crucial treatment to avoid it, and others whose businesses suffered when clients saw they were sick and shied away.With more people surviving cancer, "we need to make this experience as tolerable as possible, so there's the least baggage at the end," Rugo said."Quite frankly, it's the first or second question out of most patients' mouths when I tell them I recommend chemotherapy. It's not, 'Is this going to cure me? It's, 'Am I going to lose my hair?'" adds Dr. Susan Melin of North Carolina's Wake Forest Baptist Medical Center.Later this summer, Rugo and Melin, along with researchers at a few other hospitals in New York and California, will begin enrolling 110 early stage breast cancer patients in a study of the DigniCap brand of scalp cooling. The tight-fitting, insulated cap is attached to a cooling machine to stay around a shivery 41 degrees as patients undergo chemo. Participants' hair will be photographed for experts to assess, and they'll be compared with a small group of similarly ill patients who get chemo alone.Lipton was among 20 U.S. patients who pilot-tested the DigniCap in 2011, most of whom kept more than half of their hair. Lipton's thinned quite a bit at the crown, where the cap didn't fit snugly. But because her bangs and surrounding hair remained, the mother of two covered the thinning with a headband, not a wig. The side effect: Pain and a headache as the cold set in."It wasn't perfect, but it was easier," said Lipton, who's healthy today. "I felt normal much more quickly."If the larger study is successful, Sweden's Dignitana AB plans to seek FDA approval to market the medical device in the U.S. The move could open the way for other brands and insurance coverage.Clearly there's demand: Despite the lack of FDA approval, a growing number of U.S. patients are renting a similar product, called Penguin Cold Caps, from a British company for $455 a month. Patients haul a collection of caps to chemo sessions on dry ice, or store them in special freezers provided by about 50 hospitals. It's deliberately separate from doctors' and nurses' care — typically, patients bring a friend to help them switch caps every 20 to 30 minutes when one loses its chill."I know I'm sick, but I don't want to look it," said Vanessa Thomas, 57, of Baltimore, who is using the Penguin caps at the recommendation of her doctor at MedStar Harbor Hospital. Halfway through her breast cancer treatment, Thomas says her hair feels only a little thinner.The FDA declined comment on the Penguin caps.Beyond breast cancer, advocates say the caps may be useful with other solid tumors as well.What's the evidence behind scalp cooling? A recent review by oncologists in the Netherlands found numerous overseas studies conclude scalp cooling can work — but it's far from clear which patients are most likely to benefit, even how cold the scalp should be. That's because most of the research so far has been from observational studies that can't provide proof. But it seems harder to save hair with higher doses and certain types of chemo.Researchers at New York's Weill Cornell Breast Center reported at a recent meeting of the American Society for Clinical Oncology that among just over a dozen Penguin cap users tracked so far, one lost enough hair to use a wig.As for safety, UCSF's Rugo said a recurring tumor in the scalp is incredibly rare."If it matters to our patients, it should matter to us," she said. "It's really not more complicated than that."
CHICAGO — Falling televisions sent nearly 200,000 U.S. children to the emergency room over 20 years and the injury rate has climbed substantially for these sometimes deadly accidents, a study found.Doctors and safety experts say better awareness is needed about the dangers — especially the risks of putting heavier, older model TV sets on top of dressers and other furniture young children may try to climb on.Most injuries are in kids under 5; head and neck injuries including concussions are the most common."This is a problem that is increasing at an alarming rate," said lead author Dr. Gary Smith, a pediatric emergency specialist and president of the Child Injury Prevention Alliance in Columbus, Ohio.Smith said it is unclear from the data what type of TV sets are involved in the accidents or whether older, heavier models are the most common culprit.The study was published online Monday in the journal Pediatrics.In 2011, 12,300 children nationwide got ER treatment for TV-related injuries, compared with 5,455 in 1990. The injury rate nearly doubled, from 0.85 injuries per 10,000 children aged 17 and younger in 1990 to 1.66 per 10,000 in 2011, the study found.The researchers examined national ER data on non-fatal television-related injuries to kids from 1990-2011. In many cases, the set had been placed on a dresser and the child used open drawers as stairs to climb up and reach the TV, toppling it.Over those two decades, 215 children died from these injuries, government data show, and news reports indicate that since January 2012, at least six young children have been killed nationwide by falling TVs.Scott Wolfson, spokesman for the government's Consumer Product Safety Commission, said as flat screen TVs have become more popular, many families move heavier old TVs to bedrooms, placing them on dressers or other unsteady furniture not designed to hold them.The commission urges parents to anchor furniture to the wall or floor with brackets or other specially designed tethers. TVs also should be anchored to sturdy surfaces, the commission recommends.
Don't look to online calculators of "biological age" for an answer. Those focus mainly on risk factors for diseases, and say little about normal aging, the slow, mysterious process that turns children to codgers.In fact, scientists are still hunting for biological markers of age that reliably register how fast the process is unfolding. Seemingly obvious candidates won't do. Wrinkles, for example, often have more to do with sun exposure than aging. Markers like age-related increases in blood pressure are similarly problematic, often confounded by factors unrelated to aging.But recently researchers have identified some particularly good indicators of time's largely hidden toll on our bodies and how fast it's increasing. Developing an "easy way to measure biological age will have a wide array of applications in prediction and prevention of age-related diseases, drug discovery and forensics," said Dr. Kang Zhang, founding director of the Institute for Genomic Medicine at the University of California, San Diego.The quest for truly revealing biomarkers of aging could tell us a lot about our current and future health. Tracking these indexes before and after starting a new diet or exercise program, for instance, might show you whether it was actually pushing off your decline and fall. Aging-rate tests could help scientists evaluate possible anti-aging compounds in humans without prohibitively long studies.Experts on aging generally agree that acceptable biomarkers of aging should foretell the remaining life span of a middle-aged person more accurately than chronological age does. Further, they should offer a consistent picture of biological age, said Dr. Richard A. Miller, a gerontologist at the University of Michigan: "Do those 50-year-olds with the best retention of immune function also tend to have the least cataracts, good sense of smell, least osteoporosis, lowest blood pressure and best memory?"Proposed biomarkers of aging haven't yet convincingly cleared these hurdles, he added. But some provocatively telling ones have come to light.In a 2010 study, Dr. Miller and colleagues analyzed medical records of 4,097 women, collected over two decades beginning when they were in their 60s, to sift out 13 factors that best predicted future mortality from different causes.Oddly, contrast sensitivity — as measured by a test of the eye's ability to pick out very lightly shaded images on white backgrounds — was among the most predictive of the 377 factors evaluated, as was the number of rapid step-ups on a low platform that the subjects could complete in 10 seconds. Taken together, the 13 factors "characterize the clinical presentation of healthy aging" in older women, the study concluded.More recently, novel technologies that can detect thousands of age-associated molecular changes in cells have come to the fore in the biomarker hunt.Earlier this year Dr. Zhang and his colleagues in San Diego reported that a kind of molecular aging clock is embedded in our genomes whose speed can be measured via blood testing. The moving parts of the clock consist of chemical tags on DNA molecules that control whether genes are active in cells. The researchers found that the patterns of the tags, called epigenetic markers, predictably change with age. In a study published in January in Molecular Cell, the scientists scrutinized around 485,000 of these tags in blood cells of 656 people aged 19 to 101. Some 70,387 tags were predictive of chronological age, the scientists found.Collectively these tags spell out a "signature for age" that is "largely not changed by disease or ethnic background," said Ronald Kohanski, an expert on biomarkers of aging at the National Institute on Aging. That means these markers may be less muddied by confounders than other factors tied to aging.Of the markers, 71 most indicative of chronological age were selected to measure the speed at which people are growing old. That was calculated by comparing a subject's epigenetic tags to the norm for his or her age — a 40-year-old whose pattern closely resembled the typical one for 50-year-olds, for example, would apparently be aging 25 percent faster than normal.Already the molecular clock has yielded interesting findings. Men appear to age on average 4 percent faster than women, the scientists have found, which may largely explain why women's life expectancy exceeds men's by about 6 percent worldwide. And the research has shed intriguing light on cancer: The clock indicated that tumor cells have aged, on average, 40 percent more than normal cells taken from the same patients."We're still far from having a diagnostic for biological aging," said Trey Ideker, the chief of genetics at U.C.S.D and a co-author of the study with Dr. Zhang. "But this opens the door to an exciting new approach" to the problem.Researchers at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill recently implanted a firefly gene into mice, engineering animals whose cells light up as they age and become "senescent," losing the ability to divide and renew damaged tissue. This loss is tied to aging-related ills in many species, including degenerative diseases and dwindling muscle mass.  Surprisingly, the brightness levels weren't closely tied to longevity in the animals, suggesting that cellular senescence is just part of the larger aging puzzle. The researchers also found that noncancerous cells near nascent tumors emitted a remarkably strong glow: early-stage cancers apparently set off hot spots of accelerated cellular aging.That means "we can literally see the earliest molecular stages of cancer" unfolding in the mice, said Dr. Norman E. Sharpless, a professor of medicine and genetics at U.N.C. who led the study, published in January in the journal Cell.If this continuing research pans out, aging-rate tests may someday be standard in annual physicals, and tracking the results over time would offer unprecedented insights on health risks. But such tests also may well raise fractious privacy and social equity issues.Insurers might demand that customers take them in order to set premiums for life and health care policies. The tests may also reveal how factors like exposure to environmental toxins and the stress of job loss accelerate aging, and by how much — fodder for lawsuits.Some of us will be relatively short-lived, fast-aging "less fortunate," and others will be long-lived, slow-aging "more fortunates," predicted John K. Davis, a philosophy professor at California State University, Fullerton. And age discrimination will gain an entirely new meaning.
Aflatoxins — poisons produced by fungi that grow on moldy peanuts and corn — may be worsening Africa's AIDS epidemic by helping suppress the immune systems of newly infected people, a new study has found.The study, by researchers at the University of Alabama at Birmingham and published recently in the World Mycotoxin Journal, measured blood levels of aflatoxins and H.I.V. in 314 Ghanaians who had never taken antiviral drugs.The more aflatoxins they had, the more likely they were to have high blood levels of H.I.V. — even those with higher levels of CD4 blood cells, meaning they had not been infected long and were not yet eligible for triple-therapy cocktails under the latest World Health Organization guidelines.The toxins, produced by aspergillus fungi that grow on damp grains, nuts and beans, are so common as to be almost unavoidable in humid climates, but so dangerous that federal law limits concentrations in food to 20 parts per billion. American peanut-butter makers are always on the watch for them. Ground peanuts are a staple food of West Africa.In high doses, aflatoxins can be deadly. A 2004 outbreak in Kenya killed 125 people; samples of moldy corn had up to 8,000 parts per billion. Regular exposure to low doses can cause liver cancer.The authors suggested that aflatoxins either contribute proteins that help H.I.V. reproduce or somehow lessen the numbers of the white blood cells that the virus targets, making its attack on the immune system more potent.
WASHINGTON — Moving closer to a decision on whether to ban menthol in cigarettes, the Food and Drug Administration released a scientific review on Tuesday that found the mint flavoring made it easier to start smoking and harder to quit, and solicited public comment on "potential regulation" of menthol flavored cigarettes.These steps pleased smoking opponents who have been calling for F.D.A. action since 2009, when Congress exempted menthol from a ban on flavors in cigarettes, leaving the agency to decide whether its use is a danger to public health. Menthol cigarettes account for about a third of all cigarettes sold in the United States and are particularly popular among black smokers, about four out of five of whom report smoking them, according to federal surveys.Still, the action was only an intermediate step in what advocates say has been a prolonged regulatory process and comes at a time when menthol smoking rates for young adults have been increasing.Many had expected the F.D.A. to act on menthol in 2011 after a Congressionally mandated committee of outside experts, convened by the agency, found that menthol had a negative effect on public health. The findings by the agency on Tuesday echoed those conclusions, leaving smoking opponents frustrated that it had not clearly signaled an intent to ban menthol."This is either a way to take the heat off, or the beginning of a meaningful process," said Matthew L. Myers, president of the Campaign for Tobacco-Free Kids, an advocacy group. "That's the book the jury is still out on."Mitchell Zeller, the new director of the drug agency's Center for Tobacco Products, said the steps the agency took Tuesday showed that it was moving forward as fast as it could, but he emphasized that they did not foreshadow a ban. The public comment period will be open for 60 days."The F.D.A. is a regulatory agency," Mr. Zeller said on a conference call with journalists. "As a regulatory agency, we can only go as far as the regulatory science will take us."Lorillard, the biggest manufacturer of menthol cigarettes in the United States, said in a statement that "the best available science demonstrates that menthol cigarettes have the same health effects as nonmenthol cigarettes and should be treated no differently."Indeed, the F.D.A.'s review found that menthol cigarettes did not increase the risk of disease compared with smoking nonmenthol cigarettes. The agency did find, however, that the mint flavoring made people more likely to start smoking, and led to greater dependence on nicotine and decreased rates of quitting, conclusions that opponents of smoking say should spur the agency to action.Mr. Myers said the timing of the announcement was most likely linked to an international trade dispute. The United States has until Wednesday to comply with a World Trade Organization ruling that the American ban on clove cigarettes under the 2009 law violated Indonesia's trade rights if the United States itself continued to allow the sale of menthol-flavored cigarettes.Indonesia, a maker of clove cigarettes, brought the suit. The United States contended that menthol posed a different public health risk, but the trade organization did not accept its argument.Menthol flavoring makes an otherwise harsh cigarette more palatable for young people who are first-time smokers, smoking opponents say. And while smoking rates have been declining across the nation, rates for menthol cigarettes among 18- to 25-year-olds have climbed — to 16 percent in 2010 from 13 percent in 2004, according to a 2011 federal report.Young blacks are particularly vulnerable, smoking opponents say. More than three-quarters of black adolescent and young adult smokers use Newports, a menthol cigarette produced by Lorillard, according to a 2004 study.A 2011 study led by a Stanford University researcher found that stores within walking distance of California high schools attended by large numbers of black students were more likely to advertise menthol cigarettes. It also found that Newports, the most popular brand of menthol cigarettes, tended to be cheaper.Lorillard disagreed with the conclusion, saying that it marketed its products "uniformly throughout California," and that retailers themselves set prices.The issue of race has complicated discussions of menthol, said Valerie Yerger, a researcher at the University of California, San Francisco, who provided testimony to the drug agency and its expert panel in 2010. Several black groups lobbied against a ban on grounds that it would discriminate against blacks, since a larger proportion of them prefer menthol cigarettes.The racial politics are delicate, experts said, though it is not clear whether they are contributing to the slowness of the regulatory process.Many smoking opponents seem willing to give Mr. Zeller, a 55-year-old lawyer named in March to lead the F.D.A.'s tobacco unit, the benefit of the doubt. He began his career at the Center for Science in the Public Interest, a consumer health advocacy group, and many smoking opponents see him as a strong public health proponent."I'm cautiously optimistic that he's going to move to meaningful action on menthol," said Joelle Lester, a Minnesota-based lawyer with the Tobacco Control Legal Consortium, a nonprofit network of legal centers for tobacco control policy.The F.D.A. also announced that it would conduct a public education campaign focused on young people this year, and said it was commissioning three new pieces of research related to menthol, including one on genetic differences in taste perceptions that might explain why some racial and ethnic populations are more likely to smoke menthol cigarettes."The bottom line is, we need more information," Mr. Zeller said. "We also need input from the public."
ATLANTA — Only about half of U.S. teenage girls have gotten a controversial cervical cancer vaccine — a rate that's changed little in three years."We're dropping the ball," said Dr. Thomas Frieden, head of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. "This is a huge disappointment."About 54 percent of teenage girls have received at least one of the three HPV shots. Only a third was fully immunized with all three doses.Last year's rates were essentially unchanged from 2011, and up only slightly from 2010. Rates for other vaccines aimed at adolescents have risen much faster.A big part of the problem: Family doctors aren't prodding patients to get HPV shots as forcefully as they recommend other vaccines, health officials said.The vaccine, introduced in 2006, protects against human papillomavirus, or HPV. The sexually transmitted bug can cause cervical cancer and genital warts. The vaccine was first recommended for girls ages 11 and 12 because it works best if given before a teen starts to have sex. In 2011, it was also recommended for boys that age to help prevent the virus's spread.More than 20 states have considered adding HPV to the vaccines required for school attendance but only Virginia and the District of Columbia did so. Most states abandoned it after political fights triggered by funding woes, concerns about the vaccine's safety and worries that the shots would promote promiscuity.CDC studies have shown no significant side effects, and that girls who got the shots did not start having sex earlier than girls who didn't. Still, some parents, teens and their doctors have been hesitant.Dr. Anne Schuchat, who oversees the CDC's immunization programs, said school requirements aren't necessarily needed because the girls are already coming in for shots against bacterial meningitis and for whooping cough that are required in some states. Those shots have been recommended for teens roughly about as long as HPV but vaccinations rates are much higher — 70 percent in 2011.The new CDC report shows that 84 percent of the teen girls who hadn't gotten an HPV shot had been to a clinic or doctor for another vaccine. If they had gotten an HPV shot at the same time, the rate for at least one dose could be nearly 93 percent instead of 54 percent, CDC officials estimated.Price has been an issue in the past — three doses of HPV vaccine sell for more than $400, more than other vaccines. But today, health insurers cover that cost and uninsured kids get the shots paid for through government health programs."We can do a better job," said Dr. Thomas McInerny, president of the American Academy of Pediatrics. He joined Frieden on a call with reporters and said his association would push its members to get more teens vaccinated.The CDC rates are derived from national telephone surveys and checks of medical records for girls ages 13 to 17. Vaccination rates for boys aren't available yet.HPV is so common that nearly all sexually active men and women will get at least one type of HPV at some point in their lives, health officials say. Most show no obvious symptoms and eventually clear the virus.
WASHINGTON — Adjusting Medicare payments to reward doctors and hospitals in regions that provide high-quality care at low cost would be a bad idea, the National Academy of Sciences said Wednesday.After a three-year study, the academy's Institute of Medicine rebuffed arguments by members of Congress from states like Minnesota and Iowa who say Medicare has shortchanged their health care providers for decades.Congress should not create a "value index" to funnel Medicare money to areas that provide high-quality services at relatively low cost, the academy said.The 19-member panel said such an index would be unfair because it would "reward inefficient providers in low-cost regions and punish more efficient providers in high-cost regions."President Obama has said the nation could save huge sums if all doctors and hospitals were as efficient as those in lower-cost states like Iowa, Minnesota, Washington and Wisconsin. But the academy said a regional value index made no sense because spending for doctors and hospitals in a single region often varied as much as spending for providers in different regions.In its report, the group debunked some widely held beliefs about geographic variations in health spending. It found that the 10 local areas with the lowest Medicare spending per beneficiary — after adjusting for local wages and prices and the health of patients — were all in New York, California and Oregon. The areas included Rochester, Sacramento, Buffalo and the Bronx.The panel found that the 10 areas with the highest Medicare spending per beneficiary were all in Florida, Texas and Louisiana. They included Miami; McAllen, Tex.; Houston; Baton Rouge, La.; and Fort Lauderdale, Fla."Areas that are high spenders in Medicare are not necessarily high spenders in the commercial insurance market," the panel said.Moreover, it said, neither Medicare spending nor commercial insurance spending is closely correlated with total health spending, which also includes payments for Medicaid beneficiaries and the uninsured.Joseph P. Newhouse, a professor at Harvard and the chairman of the panel, said regional differences in Medicare spending reflected differences in the use of services like home health care, skilled nursing care and hospice. By contrast, he said, regional differences in spending for people with commercial insurance are more likely to reflect differences in prices paid to doctors and hospitals by private health plans.Doctors and hospitals often negotiate prices with commercial insurers. But, Dr. Newhouse said, the traditional Medicare program does not negotiate prices.In one of the study's notable insights, Dr. Newhouse said, "we did not find any relation between the quality of care and spending, in either Medicare or the commercial insurance sector."Representative Betty McCollum, Democrat of Minnesota, said: "I'm disappointed that this study failed to provide more recommendations to address geographic variation."But Susan Van Meter, a vice president of the Healthcare Association of New York State, said, "We are pleased that there was no recommendation for a value index." She suggested that the comparatively low level of Medicare spending in the Bronx reflected aggressive efforts by one of its largest providers, the Montefiore Medical Center, to coordinate care for patients.For more than three decades, researchers at the Dartmouth medical school have been documenting significant geographic differences in Medicare spending and the quality of care. Elliott S. Fisher, director of the Dartmouth Institute for Health Policy and Clinical Practice, said it would be a mistake for employers and insurers to ignore regional differences in the use of care by people with commercial insurance."Both price and utilization are important," Dr. Fisher said. "Sometimes it's easier for employers and insurers to control the overuse or inappropriate use of care."
The very low vaccination rate for teenage girls against the human papillomavirus — the most common sexually transmitted infection and a principal cause of cervical cancer — did not improve at all from 2011 to 2012, and health officials on Thursday said a survey found that doctors were often failing to bring it up or recommend it when girls came in for other reasons.Only 33 percent of teenage girls had finished the required three doses of the vaccine in 2012, officials said, putting the United States close to the bottom of developed countries in coverage.Dr. Thomas R. Frieden, head of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, said on a call with reporters that coverage for girls "has not increased at all from one year to the next. Zero." Coverage rates for new vaccines typically increase by about 10 percentage points a year, he said.Experts began recommending in 2007 that all girls be vaccinated at age 11 or 12, though the vaccine is approved for children as young as 9. The same guidance was issued for boys in 2011. The virus causes about 19,000 cancers in women every year, and 8,000 in men, according to the C.D.C. Women most commonly get cervical cancer as a result of the virus, while men are most likely to get throat cancer.Officials had suspected that parents were not getting their children vaccinated because the girls were older and going to the doctor less frequently, making it inconvenient to get all three doses.But the results of a survey showed that teenagers were going to the doctor and getting other vaccines, just not the one that inoculates against HPV. Parents often told researchers that their doctor did not mention the HPV vaccine. If teenage girls had gotten the HPV vaccine at the same time they got another vaccine, the coverage rate for at least one dose would be almost double what it actually is, Dr. Frieden said."The doctor is the single most influential factor that determines whether kids get vaccinated," he said.Dr. Thomas K. McInerny, the president of the American Academy of Pediatrics, exhorted doctors to urge parents to get their children vaccinated. He suggested sending reminders by text message and having nurses ask during visits if children had been immunized."Parents trust your opinion more than anyone else's when it comes to immunizations," Dr. McInerny said. "We have a powerful tool to prevent cancer. Let's use it."Officials said that cost was not a major barrier, since many private insurers now covered the vaccine and a federal program made it free for those without insurance. Parents used to say that they worried getting the vaccine might give girls a green light for sex, but Dr. McInerny said that worry had become less common.
WASHINGTON — An influential government health panel recommended on Monday that heavy smokers get an annual CT scan to check for lung cancer, a major change in policy that experts said had the potential to save 20,000 lives a year.Until recently, the medical consensus has been that there is too little evidence to justify lung cancer screening, largely because a chest X-ray — the usual screening technique — seldom catches the cancer early enough for lifesaving surgery.But that changed in 2010, when a large-scale clinical trial involving 53,000 patients that was conducted by the National Cancer Institute found that a CT scan, which detects much smaller tumors, could reduce mortality by 16 percent among patients at the highest risk of lung cancer. The findings provide the principal basis for the federal panel's recommendation on Monday.Lung cancer claims about 160,000 lives a year — more than a quarter of all cancer deaths and greater than the toll from colorectal, breast, pancreatic and prostate cancers combined. Nearly 90 percent of patients with lung cancer die from it, in part because it is discovered too late.The recommendation by the United States Preventive Services Task Force, still in draft form, could change medical practice by making annual CT screening the standard of care for the highest-risk smokers.And because insurers cover procedures strongly recommended by the task force, eligible patients would no longer have to bear the cost themselves. Under President Obama's health care law, those who are eligible for the scan would have no co-pay. The procedure's average price is about $170, according to the Advisory Board Company, a health care research firm in Washington, which polled oncology professionals.Medicare would also begin reimbursing for the scan. A Medicare spokesman said the agency would not immediately comment on how much the new screenings could cost taxpayers.The task force's final recommendation will be issued three to six months after a public comment period, which ends on Aug. 26, a spokeswoman said.Dr. Harold E. Varmus, the director of the National Cancer Institute, said the recommendation would "change the way people think about lung cancer."But he added that screening should not give smokers a false sense of security. "The main message is unchanged," he said. "Don't smoke." Smoking is the culprit in about 85 percent of all lung cancer deaths.The recommendation is aimed at a high-risk population of current and former smokers: about 10 million people ages 55 to 80 who have smoked at least a pack a day for 30 years, or the equivalent, even if they quit as long as 15 years ago, said Dr. Michael LeFevre, a professor of medicine at the University of Missouri and a member of the task force. The task force did not recommend screening for people who could not tolerate subsequent treatment, like surgery.Using modeling, the task force estimated that the screening would prevent about 14 percent of the 160,000 lung cancer deaths per year, Dr. LeFevre said.The low-dose CT scan being recommended has the potential to change the course of the disease by detecting it early enough for treatment to be effective.The scan can detect much smaller tumors than chest X-rays can, said Dr. Mary Reid, an associate professor of oncology at the Roswell Park Cancer Institute in Buffalo."Imagine looking at a plum versus the end of your pen," she said, describing the difference in size. "This kind of screening really shifts things to an earlier stage."But Dr. Kenneth Lin, a primary care physician who is also an associate professor of family medicine at the Georgetown University School of Medicine, was more cautious. "I'll bring it up with patients," he said of screening, "but I won't necessarily push it hard."Dr. Lin noted that the National Cancer Institute study found the benefits of screening to be overwhelmingly among the highest-risk participants.For the lower-risk participants, he said, the harms of early screening could outweigh the benefits. CT scans can pick up abnormalities that look like cancer but will not ultimately harm the patient, leading to unnecessary surgery or invasive tests like biopsies. The task force mentioned the potential harm of overdiagnosis but said it did not outweigh the benefits of screening in the target population.Dr. Lin added that little was known about the cumulative risks of years of CT scans. The task force also noted the risk of radiation, but the number of lives saved by the screening would far outnumber the lives lost from cancers from radiation exposure.Dr. Peter B. Bach, a pulmonologist at Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center in New York, said that the National Cancer Institute's trial was conducted at top clinical research centers, where the scans and their interpretations were top-notch. But broader use of the scans in places with lower-quality medical care, he said, could lead to many more medical procedures that were not needed in the first place."This is going to be very hard to replicate in real life," Dr. Bach said of the outcome of the trial.Because the benefits of screening vary greatly depending on how much an individual has smoked, Dr. Bach has developed an online tool for people to assess whether they would be good candidates for screening.
WASHINGTON — Fifty years ago this summer, the nation was transfixed by a medical drama that is now largely forgotten: the desperate struggle to save the life of Patrick Bouvier Kennedy, the first baby born to a sitting president and first lady since the 19th century.Five and a half weeks premature, delivered by Caesarean section on Aug. 7, 1963, at Otis Air Force Base on Cape Cod, Patrick weighed a relatively robust 4 pounds 10 1/2 ounces. But he immediately began having trouble breathing, three of his doctors recalled in recent interviews — the first they have given publicly.His father, President John F. Kennedy, kept asking them, "Will he be retarded?," one of the doctors said. (His younger sister Rosemary was born mentally retarded.)With the answer unknowable, a senior physician directed attention to the medical team's immediate role — saving Patrick's life. It was a battle that would almost certainly have a different outcome today.Patrick died just 39 hours after his birth, a victim of what was then the most common cause of death among premature infants in the United States, killing an estimated 25,000 babies each year: hyaline membrane disease, now known as respiratory distress syndrome.His story bears retelling because it highlights the enormous advances in neonatal care over the last half century, and provides a rare glimpse into how a president dealt with a major emotional event.The term hyaline refers to a glassy membrane that can form in the air sacs of premature infants, impeding their ability to extract oxygen from inhaled air. At the time, medicine had little to offer babies with the disease, other than warm incubators and good nursing care; if a baby made it through on its own for 48 hours, its chances of survival were good. (Newton, Einstein, Picasso and Churchill are cited as examples of preemies who survived.)Jacqueline Kennedy had a history of troubled pregnancies; she had already had one miscarriage and had delivered a stillborn daughter, in addition to their children, Caroline, then 5, and John Jr., then 2.In Patrick's first hours, his mother's obstetrician, Dr. John W. Walsh, called Boston Children's Hospital, a Harvard affiliate. He spoke with the hospital's chief resident in pediatrics, Dr. James Hughes.Dr. Hughes, who now lives in Vermont, says he suspected the call was a hoax. But he was able to verify it, and he called an attending pediatrician, Dr. James E. Drorbaugh, who promptly asked his patients to reschedule their appointments, left his office and jumped on a helicopter flight to the Otis hospital.Dr. Drorbaugh — now in Hawaii — remembers being greeted by the president, who asked him to examine the baby. Finding Patrick in moderate distress, "with a rapid respiratory rate and grunting, with lots of effort going into each breath," he advised transferring the infant to Boston.The president asked if the Children's Hospital facilities could be brought to the Cape, but Dr. Drorbaugh replied that they could not be.Before leaving Otis, Dr. Drorbaugh said President Kennedy asked him to join him in wheeling the baby into the first lady's room. She reached into the Isolette and held Patrick's hand for about 10 minutes — the last time she would see him alive.The baby was rushed back to Boston. In those days there were no neonatal I.C.U.'s, and ventilators, a standard therapy today, had yet to be used for premature babies. Moreover, it was August, and most of the senior physicians were on vacation, recalled a third doctor, Welton M. Gersony, then training in pediatric cardiology."The junior doctors felt overwhelmed and were desperate to get a senior person," said Dr. Gersony, who later became chief of pediatric cardiology at what is now Morgan Stanley Children's Hospital.So the hospital called Dr. Gersony's mentor, Dr. Alexander S. Nadas, a pioneer in pediatric cardiology, who arrived the next day, Thursday, Aug. 8, from Cape Cod. Patrick's breathing had become even more labored and Dr. Nadas said, "Welton, we go see the president" — his Hungarian accent turning the w's into v's.Dr. Gersony said President Kennedy appeared "tanned, calm, cool and very polite as Dr. Nadas explained some of the things we would do." To his insistence on knowing whether the baby would be retarded, Dr. Nadas responded, "Mr. President, we are trying to save the baby's life." The president dropped the subject.Pierre Salinger, the White House press secretary, conveyed a message from Mrs. Kennedy's sister, Lee Radziwill, who urged the president to send for Dr. Samuel Z. Levine, a prominent Manhattan pediatrician who had cared for her own premature baby. Secret Service agents located him strolling in Central Park and whisked the startled physician to Boston.Dr. Hughes, the chief resident in pediatrics, recalled that Dr. Levine told the president, "I am very impressed with the efficiency of government" — to which Kennedy, a veteran of political battles with the American Medical Association, replied, "It's about time you doctors learned that."
ATLANTA — Health officials say breast-feeding rates continue to inch up: Now more than 3 in 4 mothers try to breast-feed their newborns.Breast-feeding rates remain highest in Idaho and lowest in Mississippi. Experts attribute that to regional differences in culture and workplace policies that support breast-feeding.Wednesday's report from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention shows that 77 percent of moms tried breast-feeding in 2010. A decade earlier it was 71 percent. The percent still breast-feeding a year later rose to 27 percent from 16 percent in 2000.The report comes from a national telephone survey of more than 8,000 parents and caretakers of small children.Experts say breast milk contains antibodies that protect newborns from infections, and breast-fed babies are less likely to become overweight.
WASHINGTON — The federal government on Friday set a standard for gluten-free claims on food labels, a step that health officials said would help the three million Americans with celiac disease and bring uniformity to the $4 billion market for gluten-free products.Gluten is a composite of starch and proteins found in certain grassy grains like wheat, barley and rye. When eaten by people with celiac disease, gluten can trigger the production of antibodies that damage the lining of the small intestine.To protect people with the disease, Congress passed a law in 2004 calling on the Food and Drug Administration to set standards for how much trace gluten could be in foods whose labels said they were gluten free. A standard became even more urgent, observers said, when broader consumer demand for gluten-free foods drove the rapid expansion of the market.The F.D.A.'s publication on Friday of the final rule is the culmination of that process.The agency set a gluten limit of 20 parts per million in products labeled gluten free, said Michael R. Taylor, deputy commissioner for foods and veterinary medicine at the F.D.A. The limit had long been discussed and did not come as a surprise to industry or patient advocate groups. It was similar to the level adopted in recent years by the European Union and Canada, Mr. Taylor said.According to Packaged Facts, a consumer market research company, sales of gluten-free products stood at $4.2 billion in 2012, nearly triple what they were in 2008.In a poll of consumers in August 2012, Packaged Facts found that the top two reasons people gave for buying gluten-free food was that they believed it was healthier and that it would help them manage their weight. Experts say there is no evidence that such foods help with weight loss.Dr. Alessio Fasano, the director of the Center for Celiac Research at Massachusetts General Hospital in Boston, helped develop the science to determine how much gluten was too much for celiac disease patients. He said that when he first started researching the topic in the early 1990s, the definition "was all over the map."He called the rule issued on Friday "a big deal" because it gives people with celiac disease, an autoimmune disorder, confidence that the food they buy will not make them sick. "A gluten-free diet for people with celiac disease is like insulin for diabetics," Dr. Fasano said.The F.D.A. first proposed the 20 parts per million standard in 2007, Mr. Taylor said, and companies have used that limit as a guide for their products even before the new rule was published."We frankly think that the great majority of products have been driven to that level," he said.The agency has tools to keep companies in compliance. It can seize products whose gluten level is above the limit, or require companies to recall products. But Mr. Taylor said he doubted much of that would be necessary. Industry favors the rule, he said, as it sets a level playing field and gives consumers peace of mind."We don't think compliance will be a problem," Mr. Taylor said. "Industry wants this rule. They have huge incentive to comply with it. They want people to be confident."Boulder Brands, a food company based in Boulder, Colo., that makes the Glutino and Udi's brands, applauded the new standard, saying in a statement that it would create "a uniform definition for what gluten free means across all products."
WARSAW, Ind. — Michael Shopenn's artificial hip was made by a company based in this remote town, a global center of joint manufacturing. But he had to fly to Europe to have it installed.Mr. Shopenn, 67, an architectural photographer and avid snowboarder, had been in such pain from arthritis that he could not stand long enough to make coffee, let alone work. He had health insurance, but it would not cover a joint replacement because his degenerative disease was related to an old sports injury, thus considered a pre-existing condition.Desperate to find an affordable solution, he reached out to a sailing buddy with friends at a medical device manufacturer, which arranged to provide his local hospital with an implant at what was described as the "list price" of $13,000, with no markup. But when the hospital's finance office estimated that the hospital charges would run another $65,000, not including the surgeon's fee, he knew he had to think outside the box, and outside the country."That was a third of my savings at the time," Mr. Shopenn said recently from the living room of his condo in Boulder, Colo. "It wasn't happening.""Very leery" of going to a developing country like India or Thailand, which both draw so-called medical tourists, he ultimately chose to have his hip replaced in 2007 at a private hospital outside Brussels for $13,660. That price included not only a hip joint, made by Warsaw-based Zimmer Holdings, but also all doctors' fees, operating room charges, crutches, medicine, a hospital room for five days, a week in rehab and a round-trip ticket from America."We have the most expensive health care in the world, but it doesn't necessarily mean it's the best," Mr. Shopenn said. "I'm kind of the poster child for that."As the United States struggles to rein in its growing $2.7 trillion health care bill, the cost of medical devices like joint implants, pacemakers and artificial urinary valves offers a cautionary tale. Like many medical products or procedures, they cost far more in the United States than in many other developed countries.Makers of artificial implants — the biggest single cost of most joint replacement surgeries — have proved particularly adept at commanding inflated prices, according to health economists. Multiple intermediaries then mark up the charges. While Mr. Shopenn was offered an implant in the United States for $13,000, many privately insured patients are billed two to nearly three times that amount.An artificial hip, however, costs only about $350 to manufacture in the United States, according to Dr. Blair Rhode, an orthopedist and entrepreneur whose company is developing generic implants. In Asia, it costs about $150, though some quality control issues could arise there, he said.So why are implant list prices so high, and rising by more than 5 percent a year? In the United States, nearly all hip and knee implants — sterilized pieces of tooled metal, plastic or ceramics — are made by five companies, which some economists describe as a cartel. Manufacturers tweak old models and patent the changes as new products, with ever-bigger price tags.Generic or foreign-made joint implants have been kept out of the United States by trade policy, patents and an expensive Food and Drug Administration approval process that deters start-ups from entering the market. The "companies defend this turf ferociously," said Dr. Peter M. Cram, a physician at the University of Iowa medical school who studies the costs of health care.Though the five companies make similar models, each cultivates intense brand loyalty through financial ties to surgeons and the use of a different tool kit and operating system for the installation of its products; orthopedists typically stay with the system they learned on. The thousands of hospitals and clinics that purchase implants try to bargain for deep discounts from manufacturers, but they have limited leverage since each buys a relatively small quantity from any one company.In addition, device makers typically require doctors' groups and hospitals to sign nondisclosure agreements about prices, which means institutions do not know what their competitors are paying. This secrecy erodes bargaining power and has allowed a small industry of profit-taking middlemen to flourish: joint implant purchasing consultants, implant billing companies, joint brokers. There are as many as 13 layers of vendors between the physician and the patient for a hip replacement, according to Kate Willhite, a former executive director of the Manitowoc Surgery Center in Wisconsin.Hospitals and orthopedic clinics typically pay $4,500 to $7,500 for an artificial hip, according to MD Buyline and Orthopedic Network News, which track device pricing. But those numbers balloon with the cost of installation equipment and all the intermediaries' fees, including an often hefty hospital markup.That is why the hip implant for Joe Catugno, a patient at the Hospital for Joint Diseases in New York, accounted for nearly $37,000 of his approximately $100,000 hospital bill; Cigna, his insurer, paid close to $70,000 of the charges. At Mills-Peninsula Health Services in San Mateo, Calif., Susan Foley's artificial knee, which costs about the same as a hip joint, was billed at $26,000 in a total hospital tally of $112,317. The components of Sonja Nelson's hip at Sacred Heart Hospital in Pensacola, Fla., accounted for $30,581 of her $50,935 hospital bill. Insurers negotiate discounts on those charges, and patients have limited responsibility for the differences.The basic design of artificial joints has not changed for decades. But increased volume — about one million knee and hip replacements are performed in the United States annually — and competition have not lowered prices, as would typically happen with products like clothes or cars. "There are a bunch of implants that are reasonably similar," said James C. Robinson, a health economist at the University of California, Berkeley. "That should be great for the consumer, but it isn't."The American health care market is plagued by such "sticky pricing," in which prices of products remain high or even increase over time instead of dropping. The list price of a total hip implant increased nearly 300 percent from 1998 to 2011, according to Orthopedic Network News, a newsletter about the industry. That is a result, economists say, of how American medicine generally sets charges: without government regulation or genuine marketplace competition."Manufacturers will tell you it's R&D and liability that makes implants so expensive and that they have the only one like it," said Dr. Rory Wright, an orthopedist at the Orthopedic Hospital of Wisconsin, a top specialty clinic. "They price this way because they can."Zimmer Holdings declined to comment on pricing. But Sheryl Conley, a longtime Zimmer manager who is now the chief executive of OrthoWorx, a local trade group in Warsaw, said that high prices reflected the increasing complexity of the joint implant business, including more advanced materials, new regulatory requirements and the logistics of providing a now huge array of devices. "When I started, there weren't even left and right knee components," she said. "It was one size fits all."Mr. Shopenn's Zimmer hip has transformed his life, as did the replacement joint for Mr. Catugno, a TV director; Ms. Foley, a lawyer; and Ms. Nelson, a software development executive. Mr. Shopenn, an exuberant man who maintains a busy work schedule, recently hosted his son's wedding and spent 26 days last winter teaching snowboarding to disabled people.His joint implant and surgery in Belgium were priced according to a different logic. Like many other countries, Belgium oversees major medical purchases, approving dozens of different types of implants from a selection of manufacturers, and determining the allowed wholesale price for each of them, for example. That price, which is published, currently averages about $3,000, depending on the model, and can be marked up by about $180 per implant. (The Belgian hospital paid about $4,000 for Mr. Shopenn's high-end Zimmer implant at a time when American hospitals were paying an average of over $8,000 for the same model.)"The manufacturers do not have the right to sell an implant at a higher rate," said Philip Boussauw, director of human resources and administration at St. Rembert's, the hospital where Mr. Shopenn had his surgery. Nonetheless, he said, there was "a lot of competition" among American joint manufacturers to work with Belgian hospitals. "I'm sure they are making money," he added.Dr. Cram, the Iowa health cost expert, points out that joint manufacturers are businesses, operating within the constraints of varying laws and markets."Imagine you're the C.E.O. of Zimmer," he said. "Why charge $1,000 for the implant in the U.S. when you can charge $14,000? How would you answer to your shareholders?" Expecting device makers "to do otherwise is like asking, 'Couldn't Apple just charge $50 for an iPhone?' because that's what it costs to make them."But do Americans want medical devices priced like smartphones? "That," Dr. Cram said, "is a different question."When joint replacement surgery first became widely used in the 1970s, it was reserved for older patients with crippling pain from arthritis, to offer relief and restore some mobility. But as technology and techniques improved, its use broadened to include younger, less debilitated patients who wanted to maintain an active lifestyle, including vigorous sports or exercise.In the first few decades, implants were typically cemented into place. But since the 1980s, many surgeons have used implants made of more sophisticated materials that allow the patient's own bone to grow in to hold the device in place. For most patients, implants have proved miraculous in improving quality of life, which is why socialized medical systems tend to cover them. Per capita, more hip replacements are done in Britain, Sweden and the Netherlands, for example, than in the United States.Motivated in part by science and in part by the need to create new markets, joint makers churn out new designs that are patented, priced higher and introduced with free training courses for surgeons. Some use more durable materials so that a patient requiring a hip implant at age 40 or 50 might rely on it longer than the standard 20 years, while other models are streamlined and require smaller incisions.Zimmer got a big sales bump a few years ago when it began promoting its new "female knee," a slightly slimmer version of its standard design, in an advertising campaign directed at patients. Hospitals on average pay about $800 more to buy the gender-specific knee implants, according to MD Buyline.Many doctors say that for most patients, older, standard implants with a successful track record are appropriate. Expensive modifications make no difference for the typical patient, but they drive up prices for all models and have sometimes proved to be deeply flawed, they say.In the last few years, joint manufacturers have faced lawsuits and have settled claims with patients after new, all-metal implants, which were meant to be more durable than the standard version, had unusually high failure rates. As for those "female knees," a study featured at the meeting of the American College of Orthopedic Surgeons this year concluded, "While we certainly use the female components frequently in surgery, we don't detect any objective improvement in clinical outcomes."That is why Dr. Scott S. Kelley, an orthopedist affiliated with Duke University Medical Center, generally tries to dissuade patients who request "new, improved" joints. "I tell them: 'That's taking a big risk for the potential of a few percentage points of improvement. You wouldn't invest your retirement account this way.' "The power and profits of the medical device industry are on display here in Warsaw, which has trademarked itself the Orthopedic Capital of the World. Four of the big five joint manufacturers in the world are based in the United States; the other is in Britain. Three of these giants — Zimmer, Biomet and DePuy, a division of Johnson & Johnson — have their headquarters here, a town of 14,000.An industry that began as a splint-making shop in 1895 has made Warsaw the center of a global multibillion-dollar business. The companies based here produce about 60 percent of the hip and knee devices used in the United States and one-third of the world's orthopedic sales volume, local officials said. Nearly half the jobs in Kosciusko County, where Warsaw is, are tied to the industry. Residents joke that a mixed marriage is when one spouse works for Zimmer and the other for DePuy.The industry's benefits are evident. The county has the lowest unemployment rate in Northern Indiana, and the median family income of $50,000 puts it significantly above the state average. The town boasts lush golf courses and streets lined with spacious homes. The lobby of the elegant City Hall, which is in a restored 1912 bank, features plaques about device manufacturers."We eat, sleep and breathe orthopedics," said Ms. Conley of OrthoWorx, which she said was set up to "plan for the future of the orthopedic industry here." OrthoWorx's board of directors includes executives from Biomet and DePuy.With a high-tech industry as its lifeblood, Ms. Conley said, Warsaw needed to attract engineers and doctors from afar and train local youths for "the business." It has upgraded the public schools and helped create programs at local colleges in orthopedic regulation and advanced machinist techniques.Officials at OrthoWorx say the device makers do not discuss "competitive issues" among themselves, including the prices of implants, even as employees stand together watching their children play baseball. Still, it is in everyone's interest not to undercut the competition. In 2011, all three manufacturers had joint implant sales exceeding $1 billion and spent about only 5 percent of revenues on research and development, compared with 20 percent in the pharmaceutical industry, said Stan Mendenhall, the editor of Orthopedic Network News. They each paid their chief executives over $8 million."It's amazing to think there is $5 billion to $6 billion going through this little place in Northern Indiana," said Mr. Mendenhall, adding that the recession has meant only single-digit annual revenue growth rather than the double-digit growth of the past.Device makers have used some of their profits to lobby Congress and to buy brand loyalty. In 2007, joint makers paid $311 million to settle Justice Department accusations that they were paying kickbacks to surgeons who used their devices; Zimmer paid the biggest fine, $169.5 million. That year, nearly 1,000 orthopedists in the United States received a total of about $200 million in payments from joint manufacturers for consulting, royalties and other activities, according to data released as part of the settlement.Despite that penalty, payments continued, according to a paper published in The Archives of Internal Medicine in 2011. While some of the orthopedists are doing research for the companies, the roles of others is unclear, said Dr. Cram, one of the study's authors.Although only a tiny percentage of orthopedists receive payments directly from manufacturers, the web of connections is nonetheless tangled.Companies "build a personal relationship with the doctor," said Professor Robinson, the Berkeley economist. "The companies hire sales reps who are good at engineering and good at golf. They bring suitcases into the operating room," advising which tools might work best among the hundreds they carry, he said. And some studies have shown that operations attended by a company representative are more likely to use more and costlier medical equipment. While some hospitals have banned manufacturers' representatives from the operating room, or have at least blocked salesmanship there, most have not.There are, of course, a number of factors that explain why Mr. Shopenn's surgery in Belgium would cost many times more in the United States. In America, fees for hospitals, scans, physical therapy and surgeons are generally far higher. And in Belgium, even private hospitals are more spartan.When Mr. Shopenn arrived at the hospital, he was taken aback by the contrast with NewYork-Presbyterian Hospital, where his father had been a patient a year before. The New York facility had "comfortable waiting rooms, an elegant lobby and newsstands," Mr. Shopenn remembered.But in Belgium, he said, "I was immediately scared because at first I thought, this is really old. The chairs in the waiting rooms were metal, the walls were painted a pale green, there was no gift shop. But then I realized everything was new. It was just functional. There wasn't much of a nod to comfort because they were there to provide health care."The pricing system in Belgium does not encourage amenities, though the country has among the lowest surgical infection rates in the world — lower than in the United States — and is known for good doctors. While most Belgian physicians and hospitals are in business for themselves, the government sets pricing and limits profits. Hospitals get a fixed daily rate and surgeons receive a fee for each surgery, which are negotiated each year between national medical groups and the state.While doctors may charge more than the rate, few do so because most patients would refuse to pay it, said Mr. Boussauw, the hospital administrator. Doctors and hospitals must provide estimates. European orthopedists tend to make about half the income of their American counterparts, whose annual income averaged $442,450 in 2011, according to a survey by the Commonwealth Fund, a foundation that studies health policy.Belgium pays for health care through a mandatory national insurance plan, which requires contributions from employers and workers and pays for 80 percent of each treatment. Except for the poor, patients are generally responsible for the remaining 20 percent of charges, and many get private insurance to cover that portion.Mr. Shopenn's surgery, which was uneventful, took place on a Tuesday. On Friday he was transferred for a week to the hospital's rehabilitation unit, where he was taught exercises to perform once he got home.Twelve days after his arrival, he paid the hospital's standard price for hip replacements for foreign patients. Six weeks later he saw an orthopedist in Seattle, where he was living at the time, to remove stitches and take a postoperative X-ray. "He said there was no need for further visits, that the hip looked great, to go out and enjoy myself," Mr. Shopenn said.With baby boomers determined to continue skiing, biking and running into their 60s and beyond, economists predict a surge in joint replacement surgeries, and more procedures for younger patients. The number of hip and knee replacements is expected to roughly double between 2010 and 2020, according to Exponent, a scientific consulting firm, and perhaps quadruple by 2030. If insurers paid $36,000 for each surgery, a fairly typical price in the commercial sector, the total cost would be $144 billion, about a sixth of the nation's military budget last year.So far, attempts to bring down the price of medical devices have been undercut by the industry.When Dr. Daniel S. Elliott of the Mayo Clinic decided to continue using an older, cheaper valve to cure incontinence because studies showed that it was just as good as a newer, more expensive model, the manufacturer raised its price."If there was a generic, I'd be there tomorrow," he said.With artificial joints, cost-trimming efforts have been similarly ineffective. Medicare does not negotiate directly with manufacturers, but offers all-inclusive payments for surgery to hospitals to prompt them to bargain harder for better implant prices. Instead, hospitals complain that acquiring the implant consumes 50 percent to 70 percent of Medicare's reimbursement, which now averages $12,099, up 25 percent from $9,645 in 1993. Meanwhile, surgeons' fees have dropped by nearly half.With the federal government unwilling to intervene directly, some doctors and insurance plans are themselves trying to reduce the costs by mandating preset prices or forcing more competition and transparency.After concluding that hip replacements billed at $100,000 yielded no better results than less expensive ones, the California Public Employees' Retirement System, or Calpers, told members that it would pay hospitals $30,000 for a hip or knee replacement, and dozens of hospitals have met that number.Dr. Wright's orthopedic hospital near Milwaukee has driven down payments for joints by more than 30 percent by resolving to use only two types of hip implants and requiring blind bids directly from the manufacturers; part of the savings is passed on to patients.The Affordable Care Act tries to recoup some of the medical device manufacturers' profits by imposing a 2.3 percent tax on their revenues, effective this year. But Brad Bishop, the executive director of OrthoWorx and a former Zimmer executive, said that the approach would harm an innovative American industry, and that the cost would ultimately be borne by joint replacement patients "whose average age is 67." He argued that the best way to reduce the cost of joint replacement surgery was to rescind the tax and decrease government interference.The medical device industry spent nearly $30 million last year on lobbying, according to the Center for Responsive Politics. The Senate moved to repeal the tax, and the House is expected to take it up this fall. The bill's supporters included both senators from Indiana.Mr. Shopenn's new hip worked so well that a few months after returning from Belgium he needed a hernia operation — a result of too much working out at the gym. He was home by 4 p.m. the day of the outpatient surgery, but the bill came to $16,500. Though his insurance company covered the procedure, he called the hospital's finance department for an explanation.He remembers in particular a "surreal" discussion with a "very nice" administrator about a $750 bill for a surgical drain, which he called "a piece of plastic in a sealed bag.""It was mind-boggling to me that the surgery could possibly cost this much," he said, "after what I'd just done in Belgium."
Cities and towns across the country are pushing municipal unions to accept cheaper health benefits in anticipation of a component of the Affordable Care Act that will tax expensive plans starting in 2018.The so-called Cadillac tax was inserted into the Affordable Care Act at the advice of economists who argued that expensive health insurance with the employee bearing little cost made people insensitive to the cost of care. In public employment, though, where benefits are arrived at through bargaining with powerful unions, switching to cheaper plans will not be easy.Cities including New York and Boston, and school districts from Westchester County, N.Y., to Orange County, Calif., are warning unions that if they cannot figure out how to rein in health care costs now, the price when the tax goes into effect will be steep, threatening raises and even jobs."Every municipality with a generous health care plan is doing the math on this," said J. D. Piro, a health care lawyer at a human resources consultancy, Aon Hewitt.But some prominent liberals express frustration at seeing the tax used against unions in negotiations."I think it was misguided all along," Robert B. Reich, the former labor secretary, said in an e-mail. When the law was being written, he said, he worried that the tax was "a blunt instrument that could too easily become a bargaining chit for cutting back benefits of workers.""Apparently, that's what it's become," Mr. Reich, who is a professor of public policy at the University of California, Berkeley, said.Under the tax, plans that cost above a certain threshold in 2018 — $10,200 annually for individual plans and $27,500 for family plans, with slightly higher cutoffs for retirees and those in high-risk professions like law enforcement — will be taxed at 40 percent of their costs in excess of the limit. (The thresholds will rise with inflation after 2018.)State and local governments across the country tend to offer more expensive health plans than private businesses do, and workers often accept smaller wage increases to retain their benefits. Because of this, state and local government employees are expected to be disproportionately represented among those whose plans will be subject to the tax.New York City expects its two most popular employee health plans to reach taxable Cadillac levels by 2018 or shortly after. This year, the city projects that it will pay a total of $7,128 for individuals and $18,249 for families in its most popular plan, including the costs the city pays into union welfare funds to cover prescription drug benefits. That is above the national average for employer-sponsored health care coverage, which last year was $5,615 for single coverage and $15,745 for family coverage, according to a 2012 Kaiser Family Foundation survey.The total health care cost for the city's nearly 300,000 municipal employees, pre-Medicare-age retirees and their dependents is expected to approach $8 billion by 2018.In a letter in April to the head of a labor coalition, Caswell F. Holloway IV, deputy mayor for operations, said the Cadillac tax would cost New York City $22 million in 2018, increasing to $549 million in 2022. (This year, the total city budget, excluding federal and state aid, is just over $50 billion.)"We know that, on the current trajectory, we're going to be hit with that tax and it would increase very steeply," Mr. Holloway said.So the administration of Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg, in its final months in office, is asking municipal unions to agree to seek new bids for the city's health insurance business, hoping to lower premiums. It has already achieved one small victory, getting the city's current primary insurer to freeze premiums for one year if it keeps the city's business, the mayor said on Friday.But lower-cost plans are likely to involve greater out-of-pocket costs and more limited networks of doctors, and so far, the response from labor has been cool.Ninety-five percent of city employees and 93 percent of retirees are in the two largest plans, which require employees to pay nothing toward their premiums. According to the Kaiser Family Foundation survey, the average contribution by public employees throughout the country is 12 percent for individual plans and 23 percent for family plans.Harry Nespoli, the chairman of the Municipal Labor Committee, the labor coalition that negotiates with the city on health care, said that he was concerned about the tax, but also that the burden of any cuts would fall largely on workers at the bottom of the pay scale.Mr. Nespoli said his staff was looking over the request for proposals that the city had written, but he said he was skeptical that the process of seeking new health insurance could be completed before the next administration."We're not going to turn around and do a $7 billion contract that affects our members for the next 10 years out without looking at it very carefully," he said.
ATLANTA — For many years, doctors have been wringing their hands as more and more U.S. children grew fat. Now, that may be changing, with the first evidence of a national decline in childhood obesity.In 18 states, there were at least slight drops in obesity for low-income preschoolers, health officials said Tuesday.After decades on the rise, childhood obesity rates recently have essentially been flat. A few places — Philadelphia, New York City and Mississippi — reported improvements in the last couple of years. But the report from the Centers for Disease and Control Prevention shows signs of wider-ranging progress."Now, for the first time, we're seeing a significant decrease in childhood obesity" nationally, said Dr. Thomas Frieden, CDC director.But rates are still too high, he added. One in 8 preschoolers is obese in the United States, and it's even more common in black and Hispanic kids."It's not like we're out of the woods," he said during a conference call with reporters Tuesday.Obesity continues to be one of the nation's leading public health problems — health officials call it a longstanding epidemic. A third of U.S. children and teens and more than two-thirds of adults are obese or overweight."I really do think this is a pivotal moment," said Sam Kass, executive director of a White House initiative to reduce childhood obesity.Preschoolers who are overweight or obese are five times more likely than other children to be heavy as adults, which means greater risks of high cholesterol, high blood sugar, asthma and even mental health problems.Tuesday's study used height and weight measurements from nearly 12 million low-income children in 40 states. The data was collected from 2008 through 2011.Most of the children ages 2 to 4 were enrolled in the federal Women, Infants and Children (WIC) program, which provides food vouchers and other services.It's harder to get national data on preschoolers of more affluent families, so it's not clear if the trend applies to all young children. But experts note that low-income kids tend to be heavier."If you're going to look at the problem of obesity early in childhood, the group at highest risk are low-income kids. That's what makes this data so valuable for understanding trends in this major public health problem," said Dr. Matthew Davis, a University of Michigan researcher who tracks health policy and children's health issues.The biggest declines were in Florida, Georgia, Missouri, New Jersey and South Dakota. Each saw their obesity numbers fall at least 1 percentage point.Other states showing improvement: California, Iowa, Idaho, Kansas, Massachusetts, Maryland, Michigan, Minnesota, Mississippi, Montana, New Hampshire, New Mexico and Washington. A substantial decline was also seen in the U.S. Virgin Islands."These signs of progress tell a clear story: we can reverse the childhood obesity epidemic. It isn't some kind of unstoppable force," said Dr. James S. Marks, in a statement. He's senior vice president at the Robert Wood Johnson Foundation, a philanthropy that supports programs to tackle obesity.Despite the improvements, the numbers are still disappointing. Hawaii was the best, with about 9 percent of low-income preschoolers estimated to be obese in 2011. Even with some progress, California was worst, at nearly 17 percent.Ten states were not included; some had changed how they track height and weight. One of the missing states is Texas, which has one of the largest populations of low-income children and is known to have a significant problem with childhood obesity.Of the remaining 40 states, 18 showed at least slight improvement and 19 states and Puerto Rico had no significant change. Three states — Colorado, Pennsylvania and Tennessee — increased.The last CDC study to look at childhood obesity data this way found very different results. From 2003 to 2008, significant declines in preschooler obesity were seen in only nine states and increases were seen in 24 states."We're seeing great progress," said the CDC's Ashleigh May, lead author of the new study.The report didn't answer why some states improved while most others held steady, and Davis said there's a pressing need to do more research and understand how some states were able to scale back.CDC officials said a change in WIC policies probably played a major role. The changes — instituted in 2009 — eliminated juice from infant food packages, provided less saturated fat, and made it easier to buy fruits and vegetables. Breast-feeding rates have been increasing, and kid's raised on mother's milk tend to have lower obesity rates, experts said.Childhood obesity has been a focus of the Obama White House, with first lady Michelle Obama leading a campaign called "Let's Move!" Kass, the program's chief administrator, said thousands of preschools and day care centers across the country have pledged to increase physical playtime and serve healthier foods."While this announcement reflects important progress, we also know that there is tremendous work still to be done to support healthy futures for all our children," Michelle Obama said in a statement.
People who are born during whooping cough epidemics and survive them are more likely to die prematurely later in life, according to a new study analyzing 158 years of Swedish population data.Lung infections in infancy may do subtle, permanent damage that make adult infections more life-threatening, the authors suggested.Wealthy countries nearly eradicated whooping cough, also known as pertussis, with vaccines introduced in the 1950s. But protection has waned — possibly because of safer but weaker new vaccines — and cases are soaring. Last year, the United States had its biggest outbreak in 60 years, according to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.The Swedish study, by Lund University researchers, analyzed birth and death records collected in five rural parishes from 1813 to 1968. Over that time period, average life expectancy rose from 38 to nearly 80.Looking for factors that affected that trend, researchers compared the life expectancies of babies born during epidemics of whooping cough, measles and scarlet fever with those born during periods of very high food prices. (Sweden had three famines in the 19th century.)While measles and scarlet fever killed many children, the survivors had nearly normal life expectancies. But boys born during whooping cough epidemics were 40 percent more likely to die earlier than normal. Girls born during these epidemics were 20 percent more likely to die earlier, and they also were more likely to later have miscarriages and have children who died in infancy.The results suggest that the long-term dangers of whooping cough should be studied and that women who had it in infancy should be monitored in pregnancy, said the lead author, Luciana Quaranta, a doctoral candidate at Lund University.
Higher blood-sugar levels, even those well short of diabetes, seem to raise the risk of developing dementia, a major new study finds. Researchers say it suggests a novel way to try to prevent Alzheimer's disease — by keeping glucose at a healthy level.Alzheimer's is by far the most common form of dementia and it's long been known that diabetes makes it more likely. The new study tracked blood sugar over time in all sorts of people — with and without diabetes — to see how it affects risk for the mind-robbing disease.The results challenge current thinking by showing that it's not just the high glucose levels of diabetes that are a concern, said the study's leader, Dr. Paul Crane of the University of Washington in Seattle."It's a nice, clean pattern" — risk rises as blood sugar does, said Dallas Anderson, a scientist at the National Institute on Aging, the federal agency that paid for the study."This is part of a larger picture" and adds evidence that exercising and controlling blood pressure, blood sugar and cholesterol are a viable way to delay or prevent dementia, he said.Because so many attempts to develop effective drugs have failed, "It looks like, at the moment, sort of our best bet," Anderson said. "We have to do something. If we just do nothing and wait around till there's some kind of cocktail of pills, we could be waiting a long time."About 35 million people worldwide have dementia; in the United States, about 5 million have Alzheimer's disease. What causes it isn't known. Current treatments just temporarily ease symptoms. People who have diabetes don't make enough insulin, or their bodies don't use insulin well, to turn food into energy. That causes sugar in the blood to rise, which can damage the kidneys and other organs — possibly the brain, researchers say.The new study, published in Thursday's New England Journal of Medicine, just tracked people and did not test whether lowering someone's blood sugar would help treat or prevent dementia. That would have to be tested in a new study, and people should not seek blood-sugar tests they wouldn't normally get otherwise, Crane said."We don't know from a study like this whether bringing down the glucose level will prevent or somehow modify dementia," but it's always a good idea to avoid developing diabetes, he said.Eating well, exercising and controlling weight all help to keep blood sugar in line.The study involved 2,067 people 65 and older in the Group Health Cooperative, a Seattle-area health care system. At the start, 232 participants had diabetes; the rest did not. They each had at least five blood-sugar tests within a few years of starting the study and more after it was underway. Researchers averaged these levels over time to even out spikes and dips from testing at various times of day or before or after a meal.Participants were given standard tests for thinking skills every two years and asked about smoking, exercise and other things that affect dementia risk.After nearly seven years of follow-up, 524, or one quarter of them, had developed dementia — mostly Alzheimer's disease. Among participants who started out without diabetes, those with higher glucose levels over the previous five years had an 18 percent greater risk of developing dementia than those with lower glucose levels.Among participants with diabetes at the outset, those with higher blood sugar were 40 percent more likely to develop dementia than diabetics at the lower end of the glucose spectrum.The effect of blood sugar on dementia risk was seen even when researchers took into account whether participants had the apoE4 gene, which raises the risk for Alzheimer's.At least for diabetics, the results suggest that good blood-sugar control is important for cognition, Crane said.For those without diabetes, "it may be that with the brain, every additional bit of blood sugar that you have is associated with higher risk," he said. "It changes how we think about thresholds, how we think about what is normal, what is abnormal."
ATLANTA — First it was bars, restaurants and office buildings. Now the front lines of the "No Smoking" battle have moved outdoors.City parks, public beaches, college campuses and other outdoor venues across the country are putting up signs telling smokers they can't light up. Outdoor smoking bans have nearly doubled in the last five years, with the tally now at nearly 2,600 and more are in the works.But some experts question the main rationale for the bans, saying there's not good medical evidence that cigarette smoke outdoors can harm the health of children and other passers-by.Whether it is a long-term health issue for a lot of people "is still up in the air," said Neil Klepeis, a Stanford University researcher whose work is cited by advocates of outdoor bans.Ronald Bayer, a Columbia University professor, put it in even starker terms."The evidence of a risk to people in open-air settings is flimsy," he said.There are hundreds of studies linking indoor secondhand smoke to health problems like heart disease. That research has bolstered city laws and workplace rules that now impose smoking bans in nearly half of the nation's bars, restaurants and workplaces.In contrast, there's been little study of the potential dangers of whiffing secondhand smoke while in the open air. But that hasn't stopped outdoor bans from taking off in the last five years. The rules can apply to playgrounds, zoos, beaches and ball fields, as well as outdoor dining patios, bus stops and building doorways."Secondhand smoke is harmful. It's particularly harmful to children," said Councilwoman Mary Cheh of the District of Columbia, one of more than 90 U.S. municipalities or counties considering an outdoor smoking law.But is it really dangerous outdoors?Federal health officials say yes. Studies have clearly established that even a brief exposure indoors to cigarette smoke can cause blood to become sticky and more prone to clotting. How long that lasts after just one dose isn't clear, officials say. The best-known studies so far have measured only up to about a day afterward.Repeated exposures are more dangerous, and can worsen your cholesterol, increase the odds of plaque building in arteries, and raise the risk of chest pain, weakness, or heart attack.Health officials say there's no reason to think that can't happen from breathing in smoke outdoors."There's no risk-free level of secondhand smoke," said Brian King, an expert on secondhand smoke with the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.However, it's hard to pin down the health effects of outdoor smoke. There have been some studies — fewer than a dozen — that tried to measure how much secondhand smoke can be found outdoors. Some have found levels that rival what people may breathe indoors, depending on which way the wind is blowing or whether there's an overhang or sheltered area that can trap smoke. One study detected significant fumes as far as 44 feet away from a smoker."If you can smell it, it's obviously there," said James Repace, a Maryland-based scientist-consultant who's done some of the outdoor studies.Two small studies tested about two dozen nonsmokers at a smoky outdoor dining area in Athens, Ga. The saliva tests detected significant jumps in cotinine, a substance produced when the body metabolizes nicotine.That doesn't mean it's causing chronic illness, though. Repace thinks only two kinds of people may face a serious health risk outdoors — those with severe asthma and staff at outdoor cafes where smoking is allowed.Indeed, health advocates in some places have focused on sites like sidewalk cafes, feeling they can't make the case for beaches or open-air parks."We only get involved where there's a real health risk," said Flory Doucas, co-director of Canada's Quebec Coalition for Tobacco Control.Still, cigarette smoke in a place like a park can be a nuisance to some, just like loud music or dog waste.That's how Roger Montiel of Atlanta views it."I don't really like the smell and I don't like it blowing in my face. If I'm enjoying a day at the park, I'd rather it not be part of that experience," he said while walking through a downtown park recently.That's good enough reason for outdoor bans, Repace said. "People don't have to be dropping dead for you to regulate something," he said.Well, not so fast, said Simon Chapman, an Australian researcher. He once won a prestigious American Cancer Society award for his anti-smoking efforts and formerly was editor of a medical journal focused on smoking's dangers. But in recent years he's become a vocal opponent to wide-ranging outdoor smoking bans.He and Bayer worry such bans are really motivated by desires to make smoking seem like an unusual, socially unacceptable behavior. Ban proponents see that as a worthy goal; Chapman thinks it's a bad precedent."Next you might say 'Let's not just stop there. Let's not have people smoke anywhere they might be seen'" he said. "And then is it legitimate to say that any behavior that people don't like should be disapproved of because people might see it."In Atlanta, a city council member decided to act after an encounter with a smoker in a park. A ban on smoking in the city's parks went into effect last summer. Technically, a violation could result in a fine of as much as $1,000. But — as in other cities — Atlanta officials have not arrested anyone."Enforcement generally has been someone says 'put that out,' and they put it out," said George Dusenbury, Atlanta's parks and recreation commissioner.At Woodruff Park, a 6-acre downtown hangout, nearly a dozen smokers could be spotted in the park on a recent, sunny Friday morning. The regulars said they knew about the rules, but found ways to get around them."Smoke rises. I don't see a reason why it should bother other people out here," said Tommy Jackson, 55, lighting up with a friend at the edge of a paved footpath through the park.Park worker Rufus Copeland said he's seen only a small drop in smoking since the green and white "Smoking Prohibited" signs went up last year. He steers smokers to the sidewalk rimming the park. But people still smoke. "It's hard," he said.Brianna Mills, a 26-year-old nursing student from suburban Marietta, sat down for a quiet moment in the park with her Newports, unaware of the ban."It's supposed to be a free country," said Mills, who developed her habit 10 years ago. "It's like: 'Where can you smoke?'"
WASHINGTON — The number of young adults who end up in the emergency room after taking Adderall, Ritalin or other such stimulants has quadrupled in recent years, federal health officials said Thursday, fresh evidence of the unexpected consequences that can result from the wide use of medicines for conditions like attention deficit disorder.The number of emergency room visits related to stimulants among people ages 18 to 34 increased to 23,000 in 2011, from 5,600 in 2005, according to national data from the Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration, a branch of the Department of Health and Human Services. Peter J. Delany, the director of the office that oversees statistics for the administration, said the rise was particularly pronounced among 18- to 25-year-olds. He said it was part of a broader pattern of negative health effects from prescription drug abuse across American society.Scientists have not firmly established the reasons for the rise, but Dr. Delany said one clue was the way that people who misused prescription drugs obtained them: in 2011, more than half got them at no charge from a friend or a relative, and 17 percent bought them from a friend or a relative. That suggests that a large share of the misuse is of medicines not prescribed by the abuser's doctor."We have a huge issue of easy access," said Dr. Elinore F. McCance-Katz, the chief medical officer of the substance abuse administration, adding that it applies to stimulants as well as to opioids, another category of widely abused prescription drugs.The report focused on emergency room visits that were the result of abuse or misuse of the stimulants, like taking larger-than-prescribed doses or taking stimulants in combination with alcohol.Misuse of these drugs has been linked to heart and blood vessel problems, as well as to drug abuse or dependence. When combined with alcohol, the stimulants can hide the effects of being drunk, which increases the risk of alcohol poisoning and alcohol-related injuries. About a third of all emergency room visits related to the stimulants among people ages 18 to 34 involve alcohol, the report said.The stimulants measured in the report include prescription drugs, like those used to treat attention deficit hyperactivity disorder and to prevent sleepiness, as well as over-the-counter products that contain caffeine, like caffeine pills and caffeinated energy drinks. Illegal stimulants like methamphetamine, also the subject of a growing abuse problem, were not included in the report.The use of caffeinated energy drinks did not play a major role in the increase in emergency room visits, the report said.
CHICAGO — The biggest study of its kind suggests autism might be linked with inducing and speeding up labor, preliminary findings that need investigating since labor is induced in increasing numbers of U.S. women, the authors and other autism experts say.It's possible that labor-inducing drugs might increase the risk — or that the problems that lead doctors to start labor explain the results. These include mothers' diabetes and fetal complications, which have previously been linked with autism.Like most research into autism causes, the study doesn't provide conclusive answers, and the authors say the results shouldn't lead doctors to avoid inducing labor or speeding it up since it can be life-saving for mothers and babies.Simon Gregory, lead author and an associate professor of medicine and medical genetics at Duke University, emphasized, "We haven't found a connection for cause and effect. One of the things we need to look at is why they were being induced in the first place."Government data suggest 1 in 5 U.S. women have labor induced — twice as many as in 1990.Smaller studies suggested a possible tie between induced labor and autism, but the new research is the largest to date, involving more than 600,000 births. The government-funded study was published online Monday in JAMA Pediatrics.The researchers examined eight years of North Carolina birth records, and matched 625,042 births with public school data from the late 1990s through 2008. Information on autism diagnoses didn't specify whether cases were mild or severe. Labor was induced or hastened in more than 170,000 births.Overall, 5,648 children developed autism — three times as many boys as girls. Among autistic boys, almost one-third of the mothers had labor started or hastened, versus almost 29 percent of the boys without autism. The differences were less pronounced among girls.Oxytocin and prostaglandins are used to start or speed up labor but the study doesn't identify specific medications.The strongest risks were in boys whose mothers had labor started and hastened. They were 35 percent more likely to have autism.Among girls, autism was not tied to induced labor; it was only more common in those born after labor was accelerated; they were 18 percent more likely to have the developmental disorder than girls whose mothers had neither treatment.Autism affects about 1 in 88 U.S. children. Symptoms may involve communication problems including avoiding eye contact and unusual repetitive behavior including arm-flapping. Causes are uncertain but experts believe it probably results from a combination of genetics and other factors. These may include mothers' illnesses and medication use while pregnant, fathers' age at conception, and problems affecting the fetus during childbirth — all suggested but not proven in previous research.The study's biggest strength is bolstering the growing consensus that risks for autism occur before birth or soon after, said Dr. Byron King, director of Seattle Children's Hospital's autism center. He was not involved in the study.
A new type of malaria vaccine gave 100 percent protection against infection to a small number of volunteers in recent tests — but under conditions that would be nearly impossible to reproduce in the countries where most malaria victims live.The vaccine, made by Sanaria, a Maryland company, protected six volunteers who each got five doses over 20 weeks, according to a study published last week in Science.But the vaccine is expensive to make and difficult to administer, and it is not yet clear how long the protection lasts."This is a scientific advance rather than a practical one," said Dr. William Schaffner, the head of preventive medicine at Vanderbilt University's medical school. "But any vaccine that provides even a glimmer of hope opens a door, so we have to pursue it."Sanaria's vaccine is made by irradiating mosquitoes that have fed on malaria-infected blood and removing their salivary glands by hand. The radiation-weakened parasites in the saliva are then purified.In earlier trials, the vaccine failed when injected into the skin, so this time researchers from the Army, Navy and National Institutes of Health gave it by IV. Six volunteers who got five intravenous doses did not get malaria when bitten by infected mosquitoes. Six of nine volunteers who got four doses were protected.Because the vaccine is made in small batches by hand, it is impractical for poor countries, where malaria sickens more than 200 million people a year and kills about 660,000, most of them infants and pregnant women.Giving multiple IV doses of any vaccine is also impractical because it requires sterile conditions, trained medical personnel and follow-up. IVs are particularly hard to administer to children. "They've been known to squirm," Dr. Schaffner noted.The initial target markets for the vaccine are the military and wealthy travelers.
Autism's Unexpected Link to Cancer Genes: As surprised researchers have discovered, some people with autism have mutated cancer or tumor genes that apparently caused their brain disorder.Researchers studying two seemingly unrelated conditions — autism and cancer — have unexpectedly converged on a surprising discovery. Some people with autism have mutated cancer or tumor genes that apparently caused their brain disorder.Ten percent of children with mutations in a gene called PTEN, which cause cancers of the breast, colon, thyroid and other organs, have autism. So do about half of children with gene mutations that can lead to some kinds of brain and kidney cancer and large tumors in several organs, including the brain. That is many times the rate of autism in the general population."It's eerie," Evan Eichler, a professor of genome science at the University of Washington, said about the convergence.He and others caution that the findings apply to only a small proportion of people with autism; in most cases, the cause remains a mystery. And as with nearly all genetic disorders, not everyone with the mutations develops autism or cancer, or other disorders associated with the genes, like epilepsy, enlarged brains and benign brain tumors.But researchers say the findings are intriguing, given that there are no animals that naturally get autism, no way of analyzing what might cause autism in developing brains and no cure. The newly discovered link has enabled scientists to genetically engineer mice with many symptoms of the human disorder.And it has led to the first clinical trial of a treatment for children with autism, using the drug that treats tumors that share the same genetic basis.Richard Ewing of Nashville, a 10-year-old who has a form of autism caused by a tumor-causing gene, is among those in the new study. His parents, Alexandra and Rick Ewing, know he is at risk for tumors in the brain, heart, kidney, skin and eyes. But that bad news was tempered by his eligibility for the clinical trial, which has only just started."There is a big difference between us and the rest of the autism community," Mr. Ewing said. "We have an honest-to-God genetic diagnosis."Not everyone agrees that the discovery is so promising. Steven McCarroll, a geneticist at Harvard, notes that autistic children with the cancer gene mutation have "a brain that is failing in many ways." Autism in these children could be a manifestation of a general brain malfunction, he said, adding, "The fact that autism is one of the many neurological problems that arise in these patients doesn't necessarily tell us anything penetrating about the social and language deficits that are specific to autism."But other scientists who are not involved in the research that produced these findings say the work is changing their understanding of autism and why it develops. Like cancer, autism can involve unregulated growth of cells, in this case neurons in the brain.Jonathan Sebat, chief of the Center for Molecular Genomics of Neuropsychiatric Diseases at the University of California, San Diego, describes the parallels between cancer and autism as "quite uncanny.""We haven't solved it all; we have only solved a tiny bit," he added. "But the small bit we solved has been very illuminating."It was Dr. Charis Eng, a cancer geneticist at the Cleveland Clinic, who first noticed a surprising incidence of autism in children whose parents had the PTEN mutation (pronounced p-10). Eventually, investigators discovered that the rate of autism was 10 percent, about 10 times what would normally be expected.At the same time, researchers found that another genetic disorder was even more likely to result in autism. That disorder, tuberous sclerosis, increases the risk for kidney cancer and a type of brain cancer; half of tuberous sclerosis patients had autism.Although PTEN and tuberous sclerosis genes are not the same, they are part of the same network of genes that put a brake on cell growth. Disabling PTEN or one of the tuberous sclerosis genes releases that brake. One result can be cancer or tumors. Another can be abnormal wiring of nerve fibers in the brain and autism.Dr. Mustafa Sahin of Boston Children's Hospital decided to test whether drugs used to treat tumors caused by tuberous sclerosis gene mutations might also treat autism in people with the same mutated genes.He started with mice, deleting tuberous sclerosis genes in their cerebellums. Nerve fibers in the animals' brains grew wildly, and the mice had unusual behaviors, reminiscent of autism. They had repetitive movements and groomed themselves constantly, so much that they sometimes rubbed their skin raw. And unlike normal mice, which prefer other mice to an inanimate object, these mice liked a plastic cup just as much.But rapamycin, which targets the tuberous sclerosis gene and blocks a protein involved in cell division, changed the animals. They no longer compulsively groomed themselves, and they no longer liked the plastic cup as much as a live mouse. The animals did better on tests of learning and memory, and the growth of nerve fibers in their brains was controlled. Now Dr. Sahin is giving a similar drug, everolimus, to autistic children with a tuberous sclerosis gene mutation, asking if it can improve their mental abilities. Richard is among the children. Each child takes the drug or a placebo for six months. The study is scheduled to be completed by December 2014.While Dr. Eng started with cancer gene mutations and discovered a link to autism, Dr. Eichler, of the University of Washington, started with autism and found a connection to cancer genes.He focused on what he calls "out of the blue autism," which occurs with no family history, recruiting 209 families with autistic children.
Long-term results from a major federal study ease worries about the safety of a hormone-blocking drug that can lower a man's chances of developing prostate cancer.The drug cut prostate cancer risk by 30 percent without raising the risk of dying of an aggressive form of the disease as earlier results hinted it might.The new work could prompt a fresh look at using the drug for cancer prevention. Experts say it could prevent tens of thousands of cases each year, saving many men from treatments with seriously unpleasant side effects.The drug is sold as Proscar by Merck & Co. and in generic form as finasteride to treat urinary problems from enlarged prostates. It's also sold in a lower dose as Propecia to treat hair loss.A decade ago, the drug was found to cut the risk of prostate cancer. But there was a small rise in aggressive tumors among its users. Some researchers said that by shrinking the prostate, the drug was just making these tumors easier to find in a biopsy sample — not causing them.But the concern led the Food and Drug Administration to turn down the drug for cancer prevention and warnings were added to its label.Now, with 18 years of follow-up from that earlier study, researchers report that men on the drug were no more likely to die than those not taking it.That's reassuring because if the drug were truly spurring lethal tumors, there would have been more deaths among its users as time went on, said Dr. Michael LeFevre, a family physician at the University of Missouri.LeFevre wrote an editorial that appears with the study in Thursday's New England Journal of Medicine. He is one of the leaders of the U.S. Preventive Services Task Force, an independent panel of doctors who advise the federal government. The group has not taken a stance on finasteride for prevention but has advised against screening with PSA blood tests.Screening does more harm than good, the panel has said, because although 240,000 new prostate cancers are diagnosed each year in the United States, only about 30,000 prove fatal. That means many men are treated for cancers that grow too slowly to be life-threatening, and often suffer sexual and urinary problems as a result.The study, led by Dr. Ian Thompson at the Cancer Therapy and Research Center in San Antonio, was done to see whether finasteride could lower the risk of prostate cancer in men who were getting screened with annual PSA blood tests, as many still choose to do.Researchers assigned 18,882 men 55 or older with no sign of prostate cancer on blood tests or a physical exam to take finasteride or dummy pills for seven years. When the study ended, those who had not been diagnosed with prostate cancer were offered biopsies to check for hidden signs of the disease.For the new analysis, researchers tracked the study participants for a longer time — 18 years in all since enrollment began. Only about 10 percent of men on finasteride developed prostate cancer versus 15 percent of those on dummy pills. Aggressive tumors were found in 3.5 percent of men on the drug versus 3 percent of the others. Yet 78 percent of both groups were alive after 15 years.That means the drug cannot be recommended to prolong life, just to ease suffering by preventing disease, LeFevre said."You may be preventing cancers that don't need to be prevented" because so few are life-threatening, but screening is finding these tumors anyway and leading to unnecessary treatments, he said. Reducing that number is a valid reason to use a prevention drug, he said.Finasteride's other impact is financial. Proscar and a similar drug, GlaxoSmithKline PLC's Avodart, cost about $4 a pill. Generic finasteride is available for less. Insurers cover it when prescribed to treat urinary problems but may not pay if it's used solely for cancer prevention.The drug also can cause hot flashes, fatigue, weakness, low sex drive and trouble having sex."A man certainly needs to know what he's getting into if he decides to take this," LeFevre said.
ATLANTA — American couples are not as infertile as it might seem.Despite a boom in the use of fertility treatments, a new government study shows the percentage of married couples having trouble conceiving has actually dropped slightly in recent years.About 6 percent of married women under 45 failed to get pregnant after at least a year of sex without contraception, according to the report. That's down from less than 9 percent some three decades ago.That may seem surprising given how many women seek help to get pregnant; the use of fertility treatments, including in vitro fertilization, has doubled in the last decade. But that increase is driven by larger numbers of women trying to have children in their 30s and 40s, when female fertility declines.So while infertility clinics may be more common and used more — particularly by more affluent women trying to have their first child at older ages — that's driven by a change in the market, not biology, said Anjani Chandra, lead author of the study."This runs counter to what a lot of people think," said Chandra, a researcher at the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.The study released Wednesday focused on married women. It was based on in-person interviews of more than 12,000 women and more than 10,000 men, ages 15 to 44.The researchers did not ask why the couple was infertile — whether there was a problem with the woman's fertility or with the man's sperm. They did not include pregnancies that ended with miscarriage or stillbirth.The results of the interviews conducted in 2006 through 2010 were compared to four similar surveys done since 1982. The trend was relatively flat, but overall, there was a slight decline."Despite years of doing these reports, people still think infertility has increased," Chandra said.The researchers don't know what's behind the dip, but at least part of the reason may be a shift in how many women were trying to get pregnant. Since 1982, the proportion of couples who used contraception grew from less than 53 percent to more than 57 percent.The study did not find any significant infertility difference between white, black and Hispanic women. Nor was there any difference by education or household income.Infertility was more common in women in their late 30s and early 40s, but that hasn't changed over the last 20 to 30 years, Chandra said.What did change is there are more options for women who want to get pregnant and aren't conceiving. In the United States, fertility treatments, including in vitro fertilization, became generally available in the 1980s, and have become very common in the last 10 years."I don't think people wait as long" as they did decades ago to get help if they're having trouble conceiving, said Dr. Jessica Spencer, a fertility specialist with Emory University in Atlanta.Another expert agreed with the CDC study's conclusion.Today, "people are free to try to have babies when they want to, but the biology doesn't change," said Dr. Godfrey Oakley Jr., an Emory epidemiologist who studies birth defects.
The national telephone survey found 13 states with very high rates of obesity last year. Overall, the proportion of U.S. adults deemed obese has been about the same for years now."A plateau is better than rising numbers. But it's discouraging because we're plateauing at a very high number," said Kelly Brownell, a Duke University public policy expert who specializes in obesity.The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention does the survey each year, and recently released 2012 results.At least 30 percent of adults were obese in 13 states: Alabama, Arkansas, Indiana, Iowa, Kentucky, Louisiana, Michigan, Mississippi, Ohio, Oklahoma, South Carolina, Tennessee and West Virginia. In 2011, a dozen states reached that threshold.Louisiana and Mississippi led the list. In both, nearly 35 percent of adults were obese. Colorado was lowest, with less than 21 percent obese.It's not surprising states in the South and Midwest top the charts year after year, experts say. Many states in those regions have higher poverty rates."When you have a limited income, you have to buy foods that are cheap. And foods that are cheap tend to have a lot of sugar and salt and fat," said Dr. George Bray, an obesity expert at Louisiana State University.The CDC defines someone as obese if their weight-to-height ratio — called a "body mass index" — hits 30 or higher. A 5-foot-9 person would be considered obese at 203 pounds or more.The CDC's annual telephone survey asks adults their height and weight. Overall, nearly 28 percent of Americans were obese, the 2012 survey found. That's roughly the same as it's been since 2008.Another CDC survey — which weighs and measures participants — is considered more accurate. Since the middle of the last decade, that survey has found that around 35 percent of U.S. adults are obese.The story may be different with children. A CDC study released last week showed — for the first time — slight drops in obesity for low-income preschoolers in 18 states.Experts called that report encouraging, but note it studied children fed through a federal program which provides food vouchers and other services. The decline in obesity was largely attributed to program changes — instituted in 2009 — that eliminated juice from infant food packages, provided less saturated fat, and made it easier to buy fruits and vegetables.
BALTIMORE — At Everest Greenish Grocery, a brightly lit store on a faded corner of this city, nothing is more popular than a chocolate-flavored little cigar. They are displayed just above the Hershey bars along with their colorful cigarillo cousins — white grape, strawberry, pineapple and Da Bomb Blueberry. And they were completely sold out by 9 one recent evening, snapped up by young people dropping by for a snack or stopping in during a night of bar hopping."Sorry, no more chocolate," the night clerk, Qudrad Bari, apologetically told a young woman holding a fruit drink.In 2009, Congress passed a landmark law intended to eliminate an important gateway to smoking for young people by banning virtually all the flavors in cigarettes that advocates said tempted them. Health experts predicted that the change would lead to deep reductions in youth smoking. But the law was silent on flavors in cigars and a number of other tobacco products, instead giving the Food and Drug Administration broad discretion to decide whether to regulate them.Four years later, the agency has yet to assert that authority. And a rainbow of cheap flavored cigars and cigarillos, including some that look like cigarettes, line the shelves of convenience stores and gas stations, often right next to the candy. F.D.A. officials say they intend to regulate cigars and other tobacco products, but they do not say how or when. Smoking opponents contend that the agency's delay is threatening recent progress in reducing smoking among young people.Cigarette sales are down by a third over the past decade, according to federal data, but critics of the agency say the gains are being offset by the rise of cheaper alternatives like cigars, whose sales have doubled over the same period and whose flavored varieties are smoked overwhelmingly by young people. Loose tobacco and cigars expanded to 10 percent of all tobacco sold in the United States in 2011, up from just 3 percent in 2000, federal data show."The 20th century was the cigarette century, and we worked very hard to address that," said Gregory N. Connolly, the director of the Center for Global Tobacco Control at the Harvard School of Public Health. "Now the 21st century is about multiple tobacco products. They're cheap. They're flavored. And some of them you can use anywhere."The F.D.A. is now wrestling with how to exercise its authority over an array of other tobacco products. In recent weeks, for example, it sent warning letters to several companies that it says are disguising roll-your-own tobacco as pipe tobacco, a practice that industry analysts say has become a common way to avoid federal taxes and F.D.A. regulation."The giant has finally awoken and hopefully will do its job," said Ron Bernstein, the chief executive of Liggett Vector Brands, a cigarette producer that is worried about unfair competition from cigar makers and others.Mitchell Zeller, 55, a public interest lawyer who became the director of the F.D.A.'s Center for Tobacco Products this spring, acknowledged in an interview that the emergence of new tobacco products meant a new look was needed."What we've seen in the past 10 years is this remarkable transformation of the marketplace," Mr. Zeller said. "There are products being sold today — unregulated products — that literally did not exist 10 years ago."But new rules have to be grounded in scientific evidence, he said, and written to withstand legal challenges. The tobacco industry won a recent court fight against graphic images on cigarette labels.As for the criticism that the agency has been slow to act, Mr. Zeller said, "Message received.""We shouldn't need 40 years of study to figure out that chocolate- and grape-flavored cigars are being smoked by young people," said Matthew L. Myers, the president of the Campaign for Tobacco-Free Kids. Traditional handmade cigars were seen as a luxury for older men, but much of the recent growth has been in products sold in convenience stores to low-income customers. Flavored cigars now represent more than half of all convenience store and gas station cigar sales, up nearly 40 percent since 2008, according to Nielsen market data analyzed by Cristine Delnevo, a tobacco researcher at Rutgers University.A three-pack of Good Times flavored cigarillos at Everest costs 99 cents, an alluring price for the store's clientele: young, poor African-Americans.On a recent evening, Mr. Bari, a native of Pakistan, was in a generous mood. He had just broken his Ramadan fast with sweet tea and was helping a customer with the last 30 cents needed for a pack of Newports. But he said flavored cigars were actually more popular in his store than cigarettes. Sometimes people pay for them with spare change.Jay Jackson, a 19-year-old nursing assistant in hospital scrubs, rarely has the $6.50 for a pack of cigarettes, which she also smokes, but can usually come up with a dollar for the kind of cigar she likes. Flavors improve the taste of cigars that are otherwise so harsh they make her light headed, she said, paying Mr. Bari for two — chocolate and cherry.Mr. Bari said he remembered only strawberry, vanilla and chocolate when he first arrived 10 years ago. "Now look at this," he said, motioning toward the cigar shelf disapprovingly. Some companies are producing small filtered cigars that look like cigarettes in brown wrappers, avoiding the federal taxes and F.D.A. regulation required for cigarettes. Mr. Bernstein, the cigarette producer, contended that such cigars made up much of the recent increase in cigar sales. A typical pack of 20 costs about $2, compared with about $6 for a pack of cigarettes.
ATLANTA — Lyme disease is about 10 times more common than previously reported, health officials said Monday.As many as 300,000 Americans are actually diagnosed with Lyme disease each year, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention announced.Usually, only 20,000 to 30,000 illnesses are reported each year. For many years, CDC officials have known that many doctors don't report every case and that the true count was probably much higher.The new figure is the CDC's most comprehensive attempt at a better estimate. The number comes from a survey of seven national laboratories, a national patient survey and a review of insurance information."It's giving us a fuller picture and it's not a pleasing one," said Dr. Paul Mead, who oversees the agency's tracking of Lyme disease.The ailment is named after Lyme, Conn., where the illness was first identified in 1975. It's a bacteria transmitted through the bites of infected deer ticks, which can be about the size of a poppy seed.Symptoms include a fever, headache and fatigue and sometimes a telltale rash that looks like a bull's-eye centered on the tick bite. Most people recover with antibiotics. If left untreated, the infection can cause arthritis and more severe problems.In the U.S., the majority of Lyme disease reports have come from 13 states: Connecticut, Delaware, Maine, Maryland, Massachusetts, Minnesota, New Hampshire, New Jersey, New York, Pennsylvania, Vermont, Virginia and Wisconsin.The new study did not find anything to suggest the disease is more geographically widespread, Mead said.
WASHINGTON — Doctors who have a financial interest in radiation treatment centers are much more likely to prescribe such treatments for patients with prostate cancer, Congressional investigators say in a new report.The investigators, from the Government Accountability Office, said that Medicare beneficiaries were often unaware that their doctors stood to profit from the use of radiation therapy. Alternative treatments may be equally effective and are less expensive for Medicare and for beneficiaries, the report said. In other recent studies, the auditors found a similar pattern when doctors owned laboratories and imaging centers that billed Medicare for CT scans and magnetic resonance imaging.The latest study focused on a common and costly treatment for prostate cancer known as intensity-modulated radiation therapy, which directs highly concentrated beams of radiation at cancerous tumors. In many cases, it said, doctors who recommend the treatment have financial relationships with those who provide it. For example, a group of urologists may own radiation therapy equipment that is used by other doctors in the same medical group to treat patients.James C. Cosgrove, a director of the health care team at the Government Accountability Office, said that "financial incentives" appeared to be contributing to the higher use of this type of radiation therapy for patients with prostate cancer, one of the most common cancers in men.Urologists "referred a substantially higher percentage of their prostate cancer patients" to radiation therapy when the doctors owned the equipment — linear accelerators — or had financial ties to those who provided the treatment, the report said.The report comes as Congress is looking for ways to save money in Medicare and to make fundamental changes in the formula used to calculate payments to doctors treating Medicare patients."When you look at the numbers in this report, you start to wonder where health care stops and profiteering begins," said Senator Max Baucus, a Montana Democrat who is the chairman of the Senate Finance Committee. "We have a law on the books designed to prevent these conflicts of interest, but an increasing number of physicians are skirting the law for personal gain."Representative Sander M. Levin of Michigan, the senior Democrat on the Ways and Means Committee, said that "this analysis confirms that financial incentives, not patients' needs, are driving some referral patterns."The investigators said Medicare had no easy way to know when doctors referred patients to entities in which the doctors had financial interests. Doctors should be required to note such relationships on the claims they file with Medicare, the report said.The Obama administration disagreed with this recommendation. Such a requirement, it said, would be "complex to administer and may have unintended consequences." In his 2014 budget, Mr. Obama did propose new restrictions on doctors' ability to refer patients for radiation therapy and certain other treatments in which the doctors have a financial interest.Some doctors, including urologists, took issue with the study.Dr. Deepak A. Kapoor, the president of the Large Urology Group Practice Association, which represents 2,200 urologists, said, "The G.A.O. greatly overstated the role of financial motives in treatment decisions and understated the importance of patients' wanting to have their treatment in the offices of doctors who specialize in prostate cancer."Moreover, Dr. Kapoor said, "Prostate cancer treatments are shifting from hospitals to physician offices, where they cost less for patients and for the Medicare program."But other doctors applauded the report. Dr. Michael L. Steinberg, the chairman of the American Society for Radiation Oncology, which represents more than 5,000 doctors, said, "We are extremely concerned that many older male patients are receiving possibly unnecessary treatment by urology groups.""Some physician groups are steering patients to the most lucrative treatment they offer, depriving patients of the full range of treatment choices, including potentially no treatment at all," said Dr. Steinberg, who is the chairman of radiation oncology at the U.C.L.A. medical school.
CHICAGO — New research suggests giving patients easier-to-take medicine and no-copay medical visits can help drive down high blood pressure, a major contributor to poor health and untimely deaths nationwide.Those efforts were part of a big health care provider's eight-year program, involving more than 300,000 patients with high blood pressure. At the beginning, less than half had brought their blood pressure under control. That increased to a remarkable 80 percent, well above the national average, the researchers said.The research involved Kaiser Permanente in Northern California, a network of 21 hospitals and 73 doctors' offices, which makes coordinating treatment easier than in independent physicians' offices.The number of heart attacks and strokes among Northern California members fell substantially during roughly the same time as the 2001-09 study. Dr. Marc Jaffe, the lead author and leader of a Kaiser heart disease risk reduction program, said it's impossible to know if the blood pressure program can be credited for those declines, but he thinks it at least contributed.Reductions continued even after the study ended; in 2011, 87 percent of roughly 350,000 Kaiser patients had recommended blood pressure levels.The study was published Tuesday in the Journal of the American Medical Association."What's unique about this is the sheer scale of what they've done," said Dr. Goutham Rao, a family medicine specialist at NorthShore University HealthSystem, a group of four hospitals in Chicago's northern suburbs. Rao is involved in research on reducing obesity and other risks for heart disease."If we were able to keep everyone's blood pressure under control in the United States, the number of new strokes and heart attacks would go down just exponentially," he said.High blood pressure affects 1 in 3 U.S. adults, or 67 million people, and the condition caused or contributed to more than 348,000 deaths in 2009, according to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.Normal blood pressure is considered a reading of less than 120 over 80; high blood pressure is 140 over 90 or higher. High blood pressure typically causes no symptoms, at least initially, and can sometimes be managed with a healthy lifestyle, including physical activity plus avoiding salty foods, heavy drinking and excess weight. But two or more prescription drugs are often needed to bring high blood pressure under control.In 2001, the Kaiser group introduced a system-wide program involving its 1,800 primary care doctors to tackle the problem. It created a registry of adult members with high blood pressure, based on medical records.At the start, about 44 percent of 235,000 registry patients had their blood pressure under control. The registry grew and by 2009, the portion under control reached 80 percent of 353,000 patients. That compares to 64 percent of people with blood pressure problems nationwide.Two features likely played a big role in the program's success: In 2005, the region started using a single generic pill combining two common blood pressure drugs, lisinopril and a diuretic. The pill is less expensive than taking the two medicines separately, and easier to use.And in 2007, the program began offering free follow-up visits with medical assistants, rather than doctors, checking blood pressure readings. Besides charging no insurance copayment, these brief visits were available at more flexible times, increasing chances that patients would stick with the program."Patients really liked it because it was shorter, more convenient and more affordable," Jaffe said. He did not provide information on patients' costs or overall program costs and said that wasn't part of the study.Donna Arnett, president of the American Heart Association, said "it's well documented that compliance to medication increases" when it's simpler to take. She said the results suggest that other large medical systems could adopt similar programs and achieve similar success.
WASHINGTON — Where you live can affect your chances of getting a liver transplant, and your risk of dying while waiting. The nation's transplant network says it's time to make the system fairer — and it may take a cue from how politicians redraw voting maps."Gerrymandering for the public good" is how Johns Hopkins University transplant surgeon Dr. Dorry Segev describes a proposal to change the map that governs how donated livers are distributed around the country.The problem: Some areas have fewer donated organs, and higher demand for them, than others. The sickest patients go to the top of the waiting list. But the geographic variation means that someone in California, among the toughest places to get a new liver, waits longer and is a lot sicker before getting transplanted than someone in Ohio or Florida — if they survive long enough."This should not be happening," Segev said.Segev is advising the United Network for Organ Sharing, which runs the transplant network, as its liver specialists consider the novel idea of "redistricting" how livers are allocated — redrawing the nation's 11 transplant regions based on the distribution and demand for donated organs, much like lawmakers set political districts based on the party voting histories of different areas.The ultimate goal: "That your chance of dying without a liver transplant doesn't depend on your ZIP code," said Dr. John Roberts, transplant chief at the University of California, San Francisco.The geographic disparity adds another hurdle to the already dire shortage of livers. Just 6,256 patients received a liver transplant last year, all but a few hundred from deceased donors. Nearly 16,000 people are awaiting a liver. About 1,500 people die waiting every year.Desperate patients sometimes travel across the country to get on a shorter waiting list, if they can afford it or even know it's possible. The best-known example is the late Apple CEO Steve Jobs, who lived in California but in 2009 had a transplant in Memphis, Tenn., which at the time had one of the shortest waits. That's harder for the less wealthy to do."I could have withered away here," said William Sherbert, 47, who temporarily moved from California to Florida for a faster transplant.When hepatitis B caused liver failure, Sherbert spent a year awaiting a transplant from a Los Angeles hospital. He was getting steadily sicker, but was nowhere near the top of the transplant list when his frantic partner finally unraveled how the system works.Patients who have the highest MELD score — a ranking, based on laboratory tests, that predicts their risk of death — move up the waiting list. But it's not a single national list. The 11 transplant regions are subdivided into local areas that form individual waiting lists, and there are wide variations in organ availability within regions as well as between them. Generally livers first are offered to the sickest patients locally and then regionally. Changes that began this summer will allow some of the sickest patients access to livers from other parts of the country, an initial step to address disparities.United Network for Organ Sharing figures show that in three regions stretching from Michigan and Ohio down to Florida, adults receiving new livers over the past two years had median MELD scores of 22 to 23. But in the region that includes California, recipients were far sicker, with a median score of 33. Nearly as tough were regions that include New York, and the Dakotas and Illinois.An Internet database, the Scientific Registry of Transplant Recipients, compares transplant center wait times and success rates so people can choose where to go. They can get on more than one waiting list if they meet each hospital's qualifications, and if they can get to that center within a few hours of being notified that an organ is available. Often, that means moving."It's really a shame" that people have to consider such a step, Sherbert said. But he's glad he switched to a Florida hospital's list, possible only because his health insurance paid for the transplant plus the couple's airfare and some living expenses during the seven-month wait. Sherbert is feeling well after his May 2012 transplant, and is back home in Garden Grove, Calif.In a study published last month in the American Journal of Transplantation, Segev's team used computer modeling to redistrict the transplant regions, better balancing local areas' supply and demand. Segev said 28 percent of Americans live in an area where they'd have a high risk of death before getting a new liver, and redistricting could drop that proportion to as little as 6 percent.The transplant network's liver committee is considering different map options as it debates how to improve fairness without having to fly organs too far around the country. One big challenge will be turf wars, as transplant centers with shorter waits understandably don't want them to lengthen, said committee chairman Dr. David Mulligan of the Mayo Clinic in Phoenix."Every doctor wants the best for their patients. The issue becomes stepping back and looking at the big picture and thinking about all the patients," said Mulligan, who hopes to have a proposal ready for public comment within two years. "Yes, your patient waits a little longer, but they can wait a little longer."Smaller disparities exist for some other transplants, including kidneys, but the transplant network is focusing first on livers. It wouldn't be a problem if there were more organ donors, Mulligan noted, encouraging people to register: "It's the last chance we have to be a hero in our lives."
CHICAGO — Early signs of a destructive brain disease linked with head blows might include mood changes in younger athletes and mental decline at older ages, a small study of deceased former players suggests.The researchers think the disease could involve two distinct patterns of symptoms, although the study doesn't prove that the behavior reported by families was caused by the brain disease, which was found after the athletes died.The study is the largest report on a series of cases involving autopsy-confirmed chronic traumatic encephalopathy, or CTE, said lead author Robert Stern, a neurology professor at Boston University's medical school. It involved 36 former athletes — mostly professional football players — who'd experienced repeated head blows. Their brains were donated for research by their families.The results were published online Wednesday in the journal Neurology. Results were based on brain imaging after death, medical records and family interviews. Players involved were all men, aged 17 to 98. Six died from suicide.In younger players, mood and behavior changes, including depression and explosive tempers, began appearing at an average age of 35, long before mental decline. But in older players, mental decline, starting around age 59, was the first symptom.Overall, 22 players first developed mood or behavior changes and 11 initially had memory problems or other mental decline. Three players had no symptoms.The results echo research in former boxers with "punch drunk" symptoms, but that evidence didn't include brain imaging, Stern said.He said he hopes the study will help lead to ways of diagnosing CTE before death and treating the disease.The researchers acknowledged the study's limitations, including the small size and lack of a comparison group of former players without the disease. Larger studies might reveal other distinct patterns of symptoms, they said.Little is known about CTE and its causes, but repeated head injuries including concussions are thought to be a risk factor. The disease process is thought to begin long before symptoms appear and involves an increasing buildup of abnormal proteins in the brain.But Stern said, "there's no way to ever make a link directly between symptoms" and brain disease found after death.Dr. Jeffrey Kutcher, director of a University of Michigan sports neurology program, echoed that comment and said the study athletes' symptoms could have been caused by something other than CTE, including depression, medication use, sleep deprivation, or normal aging.Several former NFL stars have been diagnosed with the disease after death in recent years, including Junior Seau, Dave Duerson and Ray Easterling, who all had troubling symptoms and committed suicide.Thousands of former players have sued the NFL, claiming the league withheld information about damaging effects of repeated head blows and concussions."The bottom line is, there's very little direct evidence of chronic effects of head trauma," Kutcher said. "As a neurologist, I know that brains don't like to experience" repeated head blows. "On the other side, I know that the majority of people who experience these forces do not have life-altering clinical outcomes."A recent National Institutes of Health report said big questions remain for CTE research, including how prevalent it is; do genes make some people more vulnerable to it and how can it be diagnosed before death.
ATLANTA — Scientists have found the mysterious MERS virus in a bat in Saudi Arabia.An international research team said the bat virus is an exact match to the first known human case of Middle East respiratory syndrome. The sample was collected from within a few miles of that patient's home.The discovery reported Wednesday is considered an important development in the search for the origin of MERS, a deadly respiratory illness that is worrying health officials around the world.But it's likely that something else — perhaps another animal — is spreading the virus directly to humans, said Dr. Ziad Memish, Saudi Arabia's Deputy Minister of Health and lead author of the report.Since it was identified last September, the respiratory illness has sickened nearly 100 people, most of them in Saudi Arabia and the Middle East. About half of them died.No cases have been reported in the United States.Bats have been a suspected carrier of the virus for some time because they are known to carry viruses similar to MERS. They also harbor other deadly viruses, including rabies and SARS.Still, discovery of a genetic match doesn't mean bats are the direct culprit."There is no evidence of direct exposure to bats in the majority of human cases of MERS," Memish said in a statement.Signs of MERS-like viruses have been reported in other animals, including camels. The researchers are investigating other species, said Dr. W. Ian Lipkin of Columbia University, another study author."This is but the first chapter" in the global team's investigation, Lipkin said in a statement.The researchers collected more than 1,000 samples from seven bat species in Saudi Arabia. The exact match was seen in a fecal sample from an Egyptian Tomb Bat.
CHICAGO — In a story Aug. 20 about a blood pressure program, The Associated Press reported erroneously that Donna Arnett is president of the American Heart Association. As of July 1, Arnett is the group's immediate past president.A corrected version of the story is below:Big blood pressure improvements seen with no copays, easier-to-use pills, researchers reportCHICAGO (AP) — New research suggests giving patients easier-to-take medicine and no-copay medical visits can help drive down high blood pressure, a major contributor to poor health and untimely deaths nationwide.Those efforts were part of a big health care provider's eight-year program, involving more than 300,000 patients with high blood pressure. At the beginning, less than half had brought their blood pressure under control. That increased to a remarkable 80 percent, well above the national average, the researchers said.The research involved Kaiser Permanente in Northern California, a network of 21 hospitals and 73 doctors' offices, which makes coordinating treatment easier than in independent physicians' offices.The number of heart attacks and strokes among Northern California members fell substantially during roughly the same time as the 2001-09 study. Dr. Marc Jaffe, the lead author and leader of a Kaiser heart disease risk reduction program, said it's impossible to know if the blood pressure program can be credited for those declines, but he thinks it at least contributed.Reductions continued even after the study ended; in 2011, 87 percent of roughly 350,000 Kaiser patients had recommended blood pressure levels.The study was published Tuesday in the Journal of the American Medical Association."What's unique about this is the sheer scale of what they've done," said Dr. Goutham Rao, a family medicine specialist at NorthShore University HealthSystem, a group of four hospitals in Chicago's northern suburbs. Rao is involved in research on reducing obesity and other risks for heart disease."If we were able to keep everyone's blood pressure under control in the United States, the number of new strokes and heart attacks would go down just exponentially," he said.High blood pressure affects 1 in 3 U.S. adults, or 67 million people, and the condition caused or contributed to more than 348,000 deaths in 2009, according to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.Normal blood pressure is considered a reading of less than 120 over 80; high blood pressure is 140 over 90 or higher. High blood pressure typically causes no symptoms, at least initially, and can sometimes be managed with a healthy lifestyle, including physical activity plus avoiding salty foods, heavy drinking and excess weight. But two or more prescription drugs are often needed to bring high blood pressure under control.In 2001, the Kaiser group introduced a system-wide program involving its 1,800 primary care doctors to tackle the problem. It created a registry of adult members with high blood pressure, based on medical records.At the start, about 44 percent of 235,000 registry patients had their blood pressure under control. The registry grew and by 2009, the portion under control reached 80 percent of 353,000 patients. That compares to 64 percent of people with blood pressure problems nationwide.Two features likely played a big role in the program's success: In 2005, the region started using a single generic pill combining two common blood pressure drugs, lisinopril and a diuretic. The pill is less expensive than taking the two medicines separately, and easier to use.And in 2007, the program began offering free follow-up visits with medical assistants, rather than doctors, checking blood pressure readings. Besides charging no insurance copayment, these brief visits were available at more flexible times, increasing chances that patients would stick with the program."Patients really liked it because it was shorter, more convenient and more affordable," Jaffe said. He did not provide information on patients' costs or overall program costs and said that wasn't part of the study.Donna Arnett, immediate past president of the American Heart Association, said "it's well documented that compliance to medication increases" when it's simpler to take. She said the results suggest that other large medical systems could adopt similar programs and achieve similar success.
WASHINGTON — Health officials confirmed Wednesday that bats in Saudi Arabia were the source of the mysterious virus that has sickened 96 people in the Middle East, killing 47 of them.The outbreak of Middle East Respiratory Syndrome, or MERS, has been going on for 15 months, with most victims falling ill in Saudi Arabia and others growing sick after having traveled to the Middle East. In a study released Wednesday, an international team of doctors blamed coronavirus in bats for the human outbreak, but said that many questions remained, in part because a perfect match for the virus was found in only a single insect-eating bat out of about 100 Saudi bats tested. And since such bats do not normally bite people, drool on fruit or do other things that might transmit the disease to people, it was still unclear how the virus leapt to humans.The bat is a Taphozous perforatus, or Egyptian tomb bat, which roosts in abandoned buildings, and the virus was found in a fecal sample.So it is possible, said Dr. Jonathan H. Epstein, a veterinarian with the EcoHealth Alliance who helped trap the bats, that victims, like shepherds who might seek shelter in the buildings, picked it up by breathing in dried bat guano — similar to the way that Americans have been infected with hantavirus while sweeping up dried mouse droppings.But it is also possible that an animal picked it up that way and then infected a human. Pigs, for instance, can get Nipah virus from bats and then pass it to humans in slaughterhouses.Further tests on camels, sheep, goats and a cow will be finished soon, said Dr. W. Ian Lipkin, head of Columbia University's Center for Infection and Immunity, which has already done 15,000 polymerase chain reaction tests tracking the virus."It's a huge amount of work," he said.It has been known for several months that bats in Africa and Eastern Europe carried viruses related to MERS, but the relevant virus had not been found in Middle Eastern bats before. Camels in Oman have shown antibodies to a similar virus.Knowing that one bat had an identical virus is a start, but more testing will be needed, said Dr. Ziad A. Memish, the Saudi deputy health minister who was a co-author on the study and gave a presentation on the virus in Washington on Wednesday.The infected bat was in an abandoned house in a date palm orchard in Bisha, a small Saudi Arabian city. Investigators from Columbia and EcoHealth Alliance took samples there because the first known victim of the MERS outbreak was a businessman who had lived in Bisha and had his business, a large paint warehouse, nearby. The warehouse had a large garden with fruit trees and insects that attract many kinds of bats. The victim, a wealthy 60-year-old man, got sick in mid-June and died two weeks later, Dr. Lipkin said.The victim also owned four pet camels that were sampled, but those results are not in yet, Dr. Lipkin added. Samples taken from livestock in countries with endemic foot-and-mouth disease must first be delivered to a government laboratory on Plum Island, N.Y., to be certified negative for foot-and-mouth before they can be released for further testing.Those restrictions can add months to the testing process, Dr. Memish said. That is one reason the bat samples were tested sooner, although other problems emerged: one of two frozen shipments of bat samples – the one the positive bat was in – was opened at Customs on entry into the United States and had thawed out by the time it reached Dr. Lipkin's lab 48 hours later.What was recovered from that sample, however, was a 100 percent match, which is virtually unheard of in virology, the study said.The victim from Bisha had separate houses for his three wives and was building a fourth for a woman he planned to marry, "which suggests he was still vigorous," Dr. Lipkin said.But most of those killed by the new virus were old and had chronic conditions like diabetes or heart disease. Cases are being found of younger, healthier victims who often have milder symptoms, according to Dr. Memish, so it may soon be established that the disease's mortality rate is much lower than 60 percent.In his presentation Wednesday, hosted in Washington by the University of Pittsburgh Medical Center's Center for Health Security, Dr. Memish said he only learned of the existence of the new virus in his own country when he read about it late last September on ProMED, an outbreak-alert service.Dr. Memish said that by then, it was too late to advise travelers not to come to the annual pilgrimage to Mecca, which draws 4.5 million pilgrims. "That put an incredible strain on our system," he said.His department ordered all Saudi hospitals to look for and report unusual cases of pneumonia. The virus does not spread easily from person to person, but there have been case clusters in which family members or nurses and doctors who cared for patients were infected.This year, the kingdom has suggested that older people, very young children and those in ill health or with suppressed immune systems not make the pilgrimage.
Scientists are one step closer to explaining how Typhoid Mary could have infected dozens of New Yorkers over a 12-year career as a cook, killing at least three of them, without having ever been sick herself.A new study by scientists at Stanford University's medical school, published this month in the journal Cell Host & Microbe, sheds more light on how Salmonella typhi, the bacteria that cause typhoid fever, hide in the body.Typhoid outbreaks are now rare in wealthy countries with flush toilets, but in poor ones where raw sewage flows in gutters, there may be up to 20 million annual cases causing 200,000 deaths.Mary Mallon, known as Typhoid Mary, is the disease's most famous asymptomatic carrier. Health officials investigating outbreaks in homes in New York from 1900 to 1907 realized she had worked in many of them. She was arrested and forced to produce stool and urine samples, which showed she was healthy but shedding huge amounts of bacteria. She said she rarely washed her hands. Although her cooked food was probably safe, she was also famous for her peach ice cream.For three years, she was confined to a hospital bungalow on North Brother Island in the East River, but in 1910, she was released after promising to never work as a cook. She took a laundry job but in 1915 was caught cooking in a hospital with an outbreak. She was then confined to North Brother until her death 23 years later.It has long been known that S. typhi can colonize the gall bladder, living on gallstones largely beyond the reach of antibiotics. (Mallon rebuffed suggestions that she have her gallbladder removed.) The bacteria also invade macrophages, the immune system's "attack cells," which normally engulf and digest invading bacteria.The new study, led by Denise M. Monack, a Stanford immunologist, showed in mice that Salmonella persist in macrophages that have cycled from an inflammatory state to a noninflammatory one, and appear to be able to influence the macrophage's metabolism to produce more glucose, which the bacteria feed on.Dr. Monack is also investigating another mystery that emerged during Mallon's imprisonment: On some days her samples were full of salmonella bacteria; on others they had none.
At a laboratory here at the University of Florida's Institute for Plant Innovation, researchers chop tomatoes from nearby greenhouses and plop them into glass tubes to extract flavor compounds — the essence of tomato, so to speak. These flavor compounds are identified and quantified by machine. People taste and rate the hybrid tomatoes grown in the university's fields."I'm 98 percent confident we can make a tomato that tastes substantially better," said Harry J. Klee, a professor of horticultural sciences. He hopes that the fruits of his labor will be available to commercial growers within four or five years and in supermarkets a couple of years after that. He thinks he can make seeds for better tomatoes available to home gardeners even sooner, within a year or two.The insipid-tomato problem is well known both to salad lovers and scientists. For example, a gene mutation that tomato breeders love because it turns the fruit a luscious red also happens to make it blander. Refrigeration, transportation and other factors also take their toll. Over the decades, the average tomato has become not only less tasty but less nutritious.Enter Dr. Klee, who helped found the Institute for Plant Innovation a decade ago and has been in a quest for a more flavorful and nutritious mass-market tomato ever since.It is easy to find a better tasting and more nutritious tomato. Go to a farmer's market or grow one in the backyard. It is also easy to breed a plant that produces something tastier than a supermarket tomato — cross a sweet heirloom with the supermarket variety. In the greenhouse, Dr. Klee pulls one such hybrid tomato off a vine, and it does taste sweeter. But a hybrid also loses some of the qualities highly valued by commercial growers — it is not as fecund, not as resistant to disease, not as easily grown, not as pretty.As growers are paid by the pound, a better-tasting but less productive tomato holds little economic appeal, and thus was the supermarket tomato doomed to blandness.Dr. Klee's goal is to tweak the tomato DNA — through traditional breeding, not genetic engineering — to add desired flavors while not compromising the traits needed for it to thrive commercially. "I figure that with approximately five key genes we could very significantly improve flavor," he said. He said three genes that control the production of key flavor compounds have already been located. The next step is to identify versions of the genes that lead the tomato plant to produce more of them.The chemistry of tomato flavor has three primary components: sugars, acids and what are known as volatile chemicals — the flavor compounds that waft into the air carrying the fruit's aroma. There are more than 400 volatiles in a tomato, and Dr. Klee and his collaborators set out to first determine which ones are the most important in making a tasty tomato.This involved grinding up a lot of tomatoes, looking at what was in them, and asking a lot of people to taste them (unpulverized), gathering comments like "a bland firm watermelon," "soft and sloppy," and "Sweet! Finally a sample with some sweetness."From there, Dr. Klee and his collaborators, who include Linda Bartoshuk, director of human research at the university's Center for Smell and Taste, used statistics to correlate people's preferences with the presence, or absence, of particular flavor compounds, to devise a chemical recipe for the ideal tomato.The supermarket tomato — even when grown with care and picked ripe — did not excel. "The best it will do is middle-of-the-pack," Dr. Klee said.Cherry Roma tomatoes were at the top of the charts, followed by heirloom varieties like Matina, Ailsa Craig and Bloody Butcher. Other heirlooms like Marmande and Oaxacan Pink ranked at the bottom, below the supermarket tomatoes, though perhaps these particular types just do not grow well in Florida.The taste analysis produced several surprises. Some compounds, abundant in many tomato varieties and thus thought to be major contributors to flavor, turned out to be irrelevant, while others, in scant quantities, had major influences. With the new knowledge, "you can't help but get a better tomato," Dr. Bartoshuk said.
It is one of the most common components of emergency medicine: an intravenous bag of sterile saltwater.Luckily for anyone who has ever needed an IV bag to replenish lost fluids or to receive medication, it is also one of the least expensive. The average manufacturer's price, according to government data, has fluctuated in recent years from 44 cents to $1.Yet there is nothing either cheap or simple about its ultimate cost, as I learned when I tried to trace the commercial path of IV bags from the factory to the veins of more than 100 patients struck by a May 2012 outbreak of food poisoning in upstate New York.Some of the patients' bills would later include markups of 100 to 200 times the manufacturer's price, not counting separate charges for "IV administration." And on other bills, a bundled charge for "IV therapy" was almost 1,000 times the official cost of the solution.It is no secret that medical care in the United States is overpriced. But as the tale of the humble IV bag shows all too clearly, it is secrecy that helps keep prices high: hidden in the underbrush of transactions among multiple buyers and sellers, and in the hieroglyphics of hospital bills.At every step from manufacturer to patient, there are confidential deals among the major players, including drug companies, purchasing organizations and distributors, and insurers. These deals so obscure prices and profits that even participants cannot say what the simplest component of care actually costs, let alone what it should cost.And that leaves taxpayers and patients alike with an inflated bottom line and little or no way to challenge it.In the food-poisoning case, some of the stricken were affluent, and others barely made ends meet. Some had private insurance; some were covered by government programs like Medicare and Medicaid; and some were uninsured.In the end, those factors strongly (and sometimes perversely) affected overall charges for treatment, including how much patients were expected to pay out of pocket. But at the beginning, there was the cost of an IV bag of normal saline, one of more than a billion units used in the United States each year."People are shocked when they hear that a bag of saline solution costs far less than their cup of coffee in the morning," said Deborah Spak, a spokeswoman for Baxter International, one of three global pharmaceutical companies that make nearly all the IV solutions used in the United States.It was a rare unguarded comment. Ms. Spak — like a spokesman for Hospira, another giant in the field — later insisted that all information about saline solution prices was private.In fact, manufacturers are required to report such prices annually to the federal government, which bases Medicare payments on the average national price plus 6 percent. The limit for one liter of normal saline (a little more than a quart) went to $1.07 this year from 46 cents in 2010, an increase manufacturers linked to the cost of raw materials, fuel and transportation. That would seem to make it the rare medical item that is cheaper in the United States than in France, where the price at a typical hospital in Paris last year was 3.62 euros, or $4.73.One-liter IV bags normally contain nine grams of salt, less than two teaspoons. Much of it comes from a major Morton Salt operation in Rittman, Ohio, which uses a subterranean salt deposit formed millions of years ago. The water is local to places like Round Lake, Ill., or Rocky Mount, N.C., where Baxter and Hospira, respectively, run their biggest automated production plants under sterility standards set by the Food and Drug Administration.But even before the finished product is sold by the case or the truckload, the real cost of a bag of normal saline, like the true cost of medical supplies from gauze to heart implants, disappears into an opaque realm of byzantine contracts, confidential rebates and fees that would be considered illegal kickbacks in many other industries.IV bags can function like cheap milk and eggs in a high-priced grocery store, or like the one-cent cellphone locked into an expensive service contract. They serve as loss leaders in exclusive contracts with "preferred manufacturers" that bundle together expensive drugs and basics, or throw in "free" medical equipment with costly consequences.Few hospitals negotiate these deals themselves. Instead, they rely on two formidable sets of middlemen: a few giant group-purchasing organizations that negotiate high-volume contracts, and a few giant distributors that buy and store medical supplies and deliver them to hospitals.
ATLANTA — When the HPV vaccine was first recommended for boys, health officials worried it would be an unusually hard sell. But a new report suggests that might not be the case.About 1 in 5 boys got at least one of the recommended three doses last year, relatively good for a new vaccine aimed at adolescents.The shots are largely intended not to protect boys from disease, but to stop them from spreading a sexually transmitted virus to girls that could cause cervical cancer.The vaccine hasn't been very popular among girls. The government report issued Thursday is the first real sense of how many boys are getting the shots."It's a good start," said Shannon Stokley, a vaccination expert with the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.Introduced in 2006, the vaccine protects against human papillomavirus, which is spread during sex. Most infections go away on their own, without people developing symptoms. But the virus can cause cervical cancer in females, genital warts in both sexes, and some other, less common conditions like throat and anal cancer.The vaccine was first recommended for girls ages 11 and 12 because it works best if given before a teen starts to have sex. In 2011, it was also recommended for boys that age to help prevent the virus's spread.The CDC report covers vaccination rates for last year, the first full year since the shots were advised for boys. It's based on telephone calls to families for about 19,000 boys and girls ages 13 to 17.About 21 percent of the boys had gotten at least one of the three doses. Less than 7 percent were fully vaccinated.The rates look relatively good compared to the initial rates for some other vaccines aimed at adolescents. For example, the initial rate for a meningococcal vaccine was just 12 percent.Rates tend to start low when a vaccine is first recommended and build after. So the HPV numbers for boys are reason to be optimistic, said the CDC's Dr. Melinda Wharton, although she added a word of caution."Given how the coverage level has stalled for girls, though, a solid start isn't enough," she said.For girls, the initial rate for at least one HPV shot was 25 percent. Last year, it was about 54 percent and hadn't changed much from the previous two years. Only a third was fully immunized with all three doses last year."We'd really like to do much better with boys and girls," Wharton said.
WASHINGTON — Flu vaccination is no longer merely a choice between a jab in the arm or a squirt in the nose. This fall, some brands promise a little extra protection.For the first time, certain vaccines will guard against four strains of flu rather than the usual three. Called quadrivalent vaccines, these brands may prove more popular for children than their parents. That's because kids tend to catch the newly added strain more often.These four-in-one vaccines are so new that they'll make up only a fraction of the nation's supply of flu vaccine, so if you want a dose, better start looking early.But that's only one of an unprecedented number of flu vaccine options available this year.Allergic to eggs? Egg-free shots are hitting the market, too.Plus there's growing interest in shots brewed just for the 65-and-older crowd, and a brand that targets the needle-phobic with just a skin-deep prick."We're moving away from the one-size-fits-all to choosing the best possible vaccine for an individual's age and condition," said Dr. Gregory Poland, an infectious disease specialist at the Mayo Clinic."The flip side of that," he said, is that "this will be a confusing year" as doctors and consumers alike try to choose.Federal health officials recommend a yearly flu vaccine for nearly everyone, starting at 6 months of age. On average, about 24,000 Americans die each flu season, according to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.Some questions and answers about the different vaccine varieties to choose from:Q: What's the difference between those new four-strain vaccines and the regular kind?A: For more than 30 years, the vaccine has offered protection against three influenza strains — two common Type A strains called H1N1 and H3N2, and one strain of Type B. Flu strains continually evolve, and the recipe for each year's vaccine includes the subtypes of those strains that experts consider most likely to cause illness that winter.Type A flu causes more serious disease and deaths, especially the H3N2 form that made last year such a nasty flu season. But the milder Type B flu does sicken people every year as well, and can kill. Two distinct Type B families circulate the globe, making it difficult to know which to include in each year's vaccine. Adding both solves the guesswork, and a CDC model estimates it could prevent as many as 485 deaths a year depending on how much Type B flu is spreading.Q: How can I tell if I'm getting the four-strain vaccine?A: All of the nasal spray version sold in the U.S. this year will be this new variety, called FluMist Quadrivalent. The catch is that the nasal vaccine is only for healthy people ages 2 to 49 who aren't pregnant.If you prefer a flu shot, ask the doctor or pharmacist if the four-strain kind is available. Younger children, older adults, pregnant women and people with chronic health conditions all can use flu shots. Four-strain versions are sold under the names Fluzone Quadrivalent, Fluarix Quadrivalent and FluLaval Quadrivalent.Manufacturers anticipate producing between 135 million and 139 million doses of flu vaccine this year. Only about 30 million doses will offer the four-strain protection.Q: Who should seek it?A: Type B flu tends to strike children more than the middle-aged, Poland noted. And he said it's not a bad idea for seniors, who are more vulnerable to influenza in general. But the CDC doesn't recommend one vaccine variety over another, and the American Academy of Pediatrics said either kind is fine — just get vaccinated.Q: How are these new vaccines different from the high-dose flu shot for seniors?A: Fluzone High-Dose protects against the traditional three strains of flu, but it quadruples the standard vaccine dose in an effort to rev up age-weakened immune systems don't respond as actively to regular flu shots.The government calls the high-dose shot an option for seniors, not one that's proved better. Last week, Sanofi Pasteur said initial results from a study of 30,000 seniors vaccinated over the past two flu seasons suggest the high-dose shot is about 24 percent more effective. Federal health officials will have to review the full study results to see if they agree.Q: What if I'm allergic to eggs?A: Traditional flu vaccine is made from viruses grown in eggs, and specialists say it's usually not a problem unless someone has a serious egg allergy. But the new FluBlok vaccine eliminates that concern because it is made with cell technology, like many other nonflu vaccines. So far, it's only for use in people ages 18 to 49.Q: What if I'm scared of needles?A: If you don't qualify for the ouchless nasal spray vaccine, there is one shot made with a teeny-tiny needle that pricks the skin instead of muscle. Called Fluzone Intradermal, it's available for 18- to 64-year-olds, and protects against the usual three strains.Q: How soon should I be vaccinated?A: Early fall is ideal, as it's impossible to predict when flu will start spreading and it takes about two weeks for protection to kick in. But later isn't too late; flu season typically peaks in January or February.Q: How much does flu vaccine cost?A: The vaccine is covered by insurance, and Medicare and some plans don't require a copay. Drugstore vaccination programs tend to charge about $30; expect the quadrivalent versions to be slightly more expensive.
WASHINGTON — Flu vaccination is no longer merely a choice between a jab in the arm or a squirt in the nose. This fall, some brands promise a little extra protection.For the first time, certain vaccines will guard against four strains of flu rather than the usual three. Called quadrivalent vaccines, these brands may prove more popular for children than their parents. That's because kids tend to catch the newly added strain more often.These four-in-one vaccines are so new that they'll make up only a fraction of the nation's supply of flu vaccine, so if you want a dose, better start looking early.But that's only one of an unprecedented number of flu vaccine options available this year.Allergic to eggs? Egg-free shots are hitting the market, too.Plus there's growing interest in shots brewed just for the 65-and-older crowd, and a brand that targets the needle-phobic with just a skin-deep prick."We're moving away from the one-size-fits-all to choosing the best possible vaccine for an individual's age and condition," said Dr. Gregory Poland, an infectious disease specialist at the Mayo Clinic."The flip side of that," he said, is that "this will be a confusing year" as doctors and consumers alike try to choose.Federal health officials recommend a yearly flu vaccine for nearly everyone, starting at 6 months of age. On average, about 24,000 Americans die each flu season, according to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.Some questions and answers about the different vaccine varieties to choose from:Q: What's the difference between those new four-strain vaccines and the regular kind?A: For more than 30 years, the vaccine has offered protection against three influenza strains — two common Type A strains called H1N1 and H3N2, and one strain of Type B. Flu strains continually evolve, and the recipe for each year's vaccine includes the subtypes of those strains that experts consider most likely to cause illness that winter.Type A flu causes more serious disease and deaths, especially the H3N2 form that made last year such a nasty flu season. But the milder Type B flu does sicken people every year as well, and can kill. Two distinct Type B families circulate the globe, making it difficult to know which to include in each year's vaccine. Adding both solves the guesswork, and a CDC model estimates it could prevent as many as 485 deaths a year depending on how much Type B flu is spreading.Q: How can I tell if I'm getting the four-strain vaccine?A: All of the nasal spray version sold in the U.S. this year will be this new variety, called FluMist Quadrivalent. The catch is that the nasal vaccine is only for healthy people ages 2 to 49 who aren't pregnant.If you prefer a flu shot, ask the doctor or pharmacist if the four-strain kind is available. Younger children, older adults, pregnant women and people with chronic health conditions all can use flu shots. Four-strain versions are sold under the names Fluzone Quadrivalent, Fluarix Quadrivalent and FluLaval Quadrivalent.Manufacturers anticipate producing between 135 million and 139 million doses of flu vaccine this year. Only about 30 million doses will offer the four-strain protection.Q: Who should seek it?A: Type B flu tends to strike children more than the middle-aged, Poland noted. And he said it's not a bad idea for seniors, who are more vulnerable to influenza in general. But the CDC doesn't recommend one vaccine variety over another, and the American Academy of Pediatrics said either kind is fine — just get vaccinated.Q: How are these new vaccines different from the high-dose flu shot for seniors?A: Fluzone High-Dose protects against the traditional three strains of flu, but it quadruples the standard vaccine dose in an effort to rev up age-weakened immune systems don't respond as actively to regular flu shots.The government calls the high-dose shot an option for seniors, not one that's proved better. Last week, Sanofi Pasteur said initial results from a study of 30,000 seniors vaccinated over the past two flu seasons suggest the high-dose shot is about 24 percent more effective. Federal health officials will have to review the full study results to see if they agree.Q: What if I'm allergic to eggs?A: Traditional flu vaccine is made from viruses grown in eggs, and specialists say it's usually not a problem unless someone has a serious egg allergy. But the new FluBlok vaccine eliminates that concern because it is made with cell technology, like many other nonflu vaccines. So far, it's only for use in people ages 18 to 49.Q: What if I'm scared of needles?A: If you don't qualify for the ouchless nasal spray vaccine, there is one shot made with a teeny-tiny needle that pricks the skin instead of muscle. Called Fluzone Intradermal, it's available for 18- to 64-year-olds, and protects against the usual three strains.Q: How soon should I be vaccinated?A: Early fall is ideal, as it's impossible to predict when flu will start spreading and it takes about two weeks for protection to kick in. But later isn't too late; flu season typically peaks in January or February.Q: How much does flu vaccine cost?A: The vaccine is covered by insurance, and Medicare and some plans don't require a copay. Drugstore vaccination programs tend to charge about $30; expect the quadrivalent versions to be slightly more expensive.
WASHINGTON — The sharp decline in the country's fertility rate during the economic downturn has come to an end, federal data show, as an improving economy encouraged Americans to resume having babies.The number of babies born in the United States in 2012 remained flat, the first time in five years that the number did not significantly decline, according to the National Center for Health Statistics.The leveling off capped a 9 percent decline in the fertility rate from 2007 to 2011, a drop that demographers say began after the recession took hold and Americans started feeling less secure about their economic circumstances.The decline "has come pretty close to grinding to a halt," said Carl Haub, a demographer with the Population Reference Bureau, a nonprofit research group.The fertility rate is the total number of babies born per 1,000 women ages 15 to 44. Last year it stood at 63, down slightly from 2011. At the current rate, women could expect 1.9 babies on average over their lifetimes, down from a high of 3.8 in 1957, said Brady E. Hamilton, a demographer and an author of the report.The United States has a higher fertility rate than many other developed countries, bolstered by Hispanic immigrants, who are more likely than whites to be in their childbearing years. When rates are lower, as they are in countries like Germany and Japan, youth populations shrink, which can lead over time to a reduction in the size of the labor force and diminished tax bases."There's a widespread perception that a moderately growing population is advantageous for economic growth and for a growing society," said Hans-Peter Kohler, a professor of sociology at the University of Pennsylvania.That is why news of the 2012 figures had demographers buzzing."It's exciting," Professor Kohler said. "My prediction would be that we'll see further stabilization and possibly growth in 2013."The birthrate tends to rise and fall with economic cycles. The rate fell by a fifth during the Great Depression in the 1930s, according to Mr. Haub, creating a crater in the population that moved up the age ladder over time.In 2011, the Pew Research Center analyzed the fall in fertility by geography and found a strong link between falling fertility and economic malaise: the only state to show a slight increase in fertility between 2008 and 2009 was North Dakota, which had one of the lowest unemployment rates in the country.The decline had been particularly pronounced for women who were among the hardest hit by the recession: young women and Hispanics. The data released on Friday showed that the fertility rate for both groups was still in decline, though the pace of the drop had slowed considerably.Young Hispanics have experienced the largest decline, with the rate down by a third since 2007 among women ages 20 to 24, said Kenneth Johnson, a demographer at the University of New Hampshire.But slightly older women, in their early 30s, saw an increase in their fertility rate in 2012, up from a flat rate in 2011 and a decline in 2010. Women in their early 40s were the only ones not to experience a decline in fertility during the economic downturn, as they did not have the time to delay childbearing."It seems like change is working its way backwards," said Gretchen Livingston, a demographer at the Pew Research Center. "We are seeing the next youngest group dipping a toe in the water."It is still unclear if the recent decline in births will be made up by a surge in fertility over the next few years, as happened during the baby boom after World War II."A big question is what will happen to the 1.3 million forgone births?" Professor Johnson said. "Will women start to have these babies, or will the births never be made up?"Another bright spot was births to Asian and Pacific Island women, which were up by 7 percent in 2012 from the previous year. The increase may be related to the fact that 2012 was the Year of the Dragon in the Chinese zodiac, an auspicious year to be born for many Asian families, Mr. Hamilton said.The report showed continued declines in the birthrate to teenagers, which dropped by 6 percent last year from 2011, marking another historical low for that group. The preterm birthrate fell for the sixth straight year, and the share of babies born with low birth weight also declined.The share of all births to unmarried women in 2012 was unchanged from 2011 at 40.7 percent.
The trillions of bacteria that live in the gut — helping digest foods, making some vitamins, making amino acids — may help determine if a person is fat or thin.The evidence is from a novel experiment involving mice and humans that is part of a growing fascination with gut bacteria and their role in health and diseases like irritable bowel syndrome and Crohn's disease. In this case, the focus was on obesity. Researchers found pairs of human twins in which one was obese and the other lean. They transferred gut bacteria from these twins into mice and watched what happened. The mice with bacteria from fat twins grew fat; those that got bacteria from lean twins stayed lean.The study, published online Thursday by the journal Science, is "pretty striking," said Dr. Jeffrey S. Flier, an obesity researcher and the dean of the Harvard Medical School, who was not involved with the study. "It's a very powerful set of experiments."Michael Fischbach of the University of California, San Francisco, who also was not involved with the study, called it "the clearest evidence to date that gut bacteria can help cause obesity.""I'm very excited about this," he added, saying the next step will be to try using gut bacteria to treat obesity by transplanting feces from thin people."I have little doubt that that will be the next thing that happens," Dr. Fischbach said.But Dr. Flier said it was far too soon for that."This is not a study that says humans will have a different body weight" if they get a fecal transplant, he said. "This is a scientific advance," he added, but many questions remain.Dr. Jeffrey I. Gordon of Washington University in St. Louis, the senior investigator for the study, also urged caution. He wants to figure out which bacteria are responsible for the effect so that, eventually, people can be given pure mixtures of bacteria instead of feces. Or, even better, learn what the bacteria produce that induces thinness and give that as a treatment.While gut bacteria are a new hot topic in medicine, he added that human biology is complex and that obesity in particular has many contributors, including genetics and diet.In fact, the part of the study that most surprised other experts was an experiment indicating that, with the right diet, it might be possible to change the bacteria in a fat person's gut so that they promote leanness rather than obesity. The investigators discovered that given a chance, and in the presence of a low-fat diet, bacteria from a lean twin will take over the gut of a mouse that already had bacteria from a fat twin. The fat mouse then loses weight. But the opposite does not happen. No matter what the diet, bacteria from a fat mouse do not take over in a mouse that is thin.Although researchers suspected that gut bacteria might play a role in human obesity, it has been difficult to get convincing evidence. While there are often differences in gut bacteria in fat and lean people, they could be a cause or an effect of obesity. And gut bacteria vary from individual to individual, making it very difficult to decide which, if any, affect body weight.Those obstacles led Dr. Gordon and his colleagues to look for those rare sets of twins in which only one twin is fat. That allowed them to cancel out much of the effect of genetics and environment. They gave the twins' fecal bacteria to mice that were born and reared in a sterile environment and had no bacteria of their own as a result. The mice were genetically identical, so genetic factors played no role in their weights.Five weeks after they got human gut bacteria, the mice with bacteria from the fat twins had about 15 to 17 percent more body fat than those that had bacteria from thin twins. They also had some of the metabolic changes associated with obesity.Next came what Dr. Gordon calls the "Battle of the Microbiota," referring to the collection of gut microbes. The researchers put mice with gut bacteria from lean twins in the same cage as mice with gut bacteria from obese twins. Mice housed together eat one another's droppings, so the mice in the cage naturally end up sharing gut bacteria. He also put in germ-free mice to determine which collection of gut bacteria they would get. Or would they get a mixture?
WASHINGTON — The share of middle and high school students who use e-cigarettes doubled in 2012 from the previous year, federal data show. The rise is prompting concerns among health officials that the new devices could be creating as many health problems as they are solving.One in 10 high school students said they had tried an e-cigarette last year, according to a national survey by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, up from one in 20 in 2011. About 3 percent said they had used one in the last 30 days. In total, 1.8 million middle and high school students said they had tried e-cigarettes in 2012."This is really taking off among kids," said Dr. Thomas Frieden, director of the C.D.C.E-cigarettes are battery-powered devices that deliver nicotine that is vaporized to form an aerosol mist. Producers promote them as a healthy alternative to smoking, but researchers say their health effects are not yet clear, though most acknowledge that they are less harmful than traditional cigarettes. The Food and Drug Administration does not yet regulate them, though analysts expect that the agency will start soon.Thomas Briant, executive director of the National Association of Tobacco Outlets, which represents 28,000 stores, said the study "raises too many unanswered questions," for the data to be used for policy making. It was unclear, for example, whether students who tried e-cigarettes were using them regularly or only once. He pointed out that selling them to minors is now illegal in many states.One of the biggest concerns among health officials is the potential for e-cigarettes to become a path to smoking among young people who otherwise would not have experimented. The survey found that most students who had tried e-cigarettes had also smoked traditional cigarettes.But one in five middle school students who said they had tried e-cigarettes reported never having smoked a conventional cigarette, raising fears that e-cigarettes, at least for some, could become a gateway. Among high school students, 7 percent who had tried an e-cigarette said they had never smoked a traditional cigarette.Dr. Frieden said that the adolescent brain is more susceptible to nicotine, and that the trend of rising use could hook young people who might then move into more harmful products like conventional cigarettes.Murray S. Kessler, the chairman, president and chief executive of Lorillard, a North Carolina-based tobacco company that owns Blu eCigs, said that the rise in youth usage was "unacceptable," and added that the company was "looking forward to a regulatory framework that restricts youth access" but does not "stifle what may be the most significant harm reduction opportunity that has ever been made available to smokers."The sharp rise among students mirrored that among adult users and researchers said that it appeared to be driven, at least in part, by aggressive national marketing campaigns, some of which feature famous actors. (Producers say the ads are not aimed at adolescents.) E-cigarettes also come in flavors, which were banned in traditional cigarettes in 2009 and which health officials say appeal to young people."Kids love gadgets and the marketing for these things is in your face," said Gary A. Giovino, a professor of health behavior at the University at Buffalo. He added that the rising use of e-cigarettes risked reversing societal trends in which smoking had fallen out of fashion.About 6 percent of all adults — not just smokers — reported having tried e-cigarettes in 2011, according to a C.D.C. survey, about double the number from 2010. Data for adults in 2012 are not yet available, a spokesman said.
WASHINGTON — The Food and Drug Administration announced Friday that it had found no evidence that current levels of arsenic in rice pose an immediate health risk.The finding comes two months after the agency proposed new limits on arsenic in apple juice. A public outcry had caused the agency to look at the issue more closely.The agency tested more than 1,300 types of rice and rice products, like rice cakes and infant cereals, and found that arsenic levels ranged from 3 to 7 micrograms per serving, amounts that the agency said were not hazardous to human health in the short term.Most rice contains much higher levels of arsenic than apple juice does, said Keeve Nachman, a scientist who studies arsenic in food at the Center for a Livable Future at Johns Hopkins University, but because there is such a wide variety of products made with it, and because it is present at such different levels, the analysis for rice is more complicated.Arsenic is a carcinogen when consumed in large enough quantities. It occurs naturally in the environment, but it can also be an effect of industrial contamination.Arsenic in the food supply was brought to the public's attention in 2011 by the physician and television personality Mehmet Oz, who charged that levels in apple juice were too high.In July, the F.D.A. proposed a new limit for acceptable levels in apple juice, though it said it had conducted a broad study with many samples and had found apple juice to be safe.A microgram is one-millionth of a gram, and a F.D.A. spokeswoman said the levels they found in the rice and rice product samples were too low to cause harm in the short term, citing a toxicological profile for arsenic published by the federal government.Experts applauded the agency's effort, but said it was impossible to tell whether those levels would be dangerous in the long term without knowing patterns of consumption. Do people tend to consume many servings of rice and rice products a year or only a few? How big is a typical serving?"This is an important first step," Dr. Nachman said.The agency said in a statement that it would conduct a risk assessment to consider precisely those questions.It will also examine whether there are variations in health effects for certain demographic groups. For example, children, who are undergoing rapid neurological development, could be hurt more by high levels of arsenic.
WASHINGTON — The U.S. is facing a crisis in how to deliver cancer care, as the baby boomers reach their tumor-prone years and doctors have a hard time keeping up with complex new treatments, government advisers reported Tuesday.The caution comes even as scientists are learning more than ever about better ways to battle cancer, and developing innovative therapies to target tumors.And while doctors try to optimize treatment, the Institute of Medicine found "daunting" barriers to achieving high-quality care for all patients. Overcoming those challenges will require changes to the health care system, and savvier consumers."We do not want to frighten or scare people who are getting care now," said Dr. Patricia Ganz, a cancer specialist at the University of California, Los Angeles, who chaired the panel.But too often, decisions about cancer treatments aren't based on good evidence, and patients may not understand their choices and what to expect, the panel found. For example, some studies suggest that two-thirds or more of cancer patients with poor prognoses incorrectly believe the treatments they receive could cure them.Topping the list of recommendations is finding ways to help patients make more informed decisions, with easy-to-understand information on the pros, cons and costs of different treatments."The patient can't be passive," Ganz said. "It's an important partnership that we need."The risk of cancer increases with age, and older adults account for just over half of the 1.6 million new cases diagnosed each year. By 2030, new diagnoses are expected to reach 2.3 million a year as the population ages. The report warns there may not be enough oncology specialists to care for them.Perhaps a bigger concern is the growing complexity of care. Increasingly, scientists are finding genetic differences inside tumors that help explain why one person's cancer is more aggressive than another's. More importantly, that also means certain cancer drugs will work for, say, lung cancer in one person but not the next."If your doctor doesn't know that, or your hospital doesn't do the test, you don't have that opportunity" for newer, targeted therapies, Ganz said. But, "we are living in an information age where it's impossible to keep up."It's not just a matter of knowing the latest treatments, but deciding if they're worth it for an individual patient. Consider: Of 13 cancer treatments approved by the Food and Drug Administration last year, only one was proven to extend survival by more than a median of six months, the report said. The drugs all cost more than $5,900 for each month of treatment.For older adults, treatment decisions may be even more complicated — because the studies that test different therapies don't include enough people over age 65, who tend to have multiple health problems along with cancer, Ganz explained.Nor are cancer teams doing a good enough job in educating and training patients' loved ones to offer the at-home care that many need for long stretches of time, she said.The Institute of Medicine advises the government about health issues. Among its recommendations are: more research to tease out how to best treat different patients; new strategies to help doctors keep up with that evidence; and development of tools to help communicate the choices to patients so they understand what really may happen to them.In the meantime, the panel had some advice for people who need to know if they're getting quality care now. Take the time to research care options and get a second opinion, Ganz stressed. Among the questions to ask:—How long does the average person with this cancer live?—What is my likelihood of a cure?—If I can't be cured, will I live longer with treatment? How much longer?—Will this care directly treat the cancer, or improve my symptoms, or both?—Am I healthy enough to try this treatment, or will my other health conditions and medications interfere?—How many times have you done this procedure?If your health team doesn't have answers, "you need to find another set of providers," Ganz said.
China has the world's biggest diabetes epidemic, and it continues to get worse, according to the latest study of the disease's devastating effects on the world's most populous country, which has risen from poverty to become an economic superpower in 30 years.Previous studies had found rapidly rising rates of the disease, and the newest, published last week by The Journal of the American Medical Association, shows that China has just passed the United States: 11.6 percent of Chinese adults have the disease, compared with 11.3 percent here; in 1980, prevalence was below 1 percent.The total — 114 million people — means China has about a third of the world's diabetes sufferers, who are at greater risk of heart disease, stroke and kidney failure. That will put enormous strain on the country's public health system, the authors said.Perhaps even more alarming, the study, which involved testing almost 99,000 people, found that half had "prediabetic" blood glucose levels.For unknown reasons, weight gain leads to Type 2 diabetes in Asians at even lower body-mass indexes than it does in whites or blacks.  The average body mass index in the study was 23.7, which is considered normal.But obesity is increasing rapidly in China. Experts have blamed many factors: the introduction of high-calorie Western diets and fast food, more travel by car, sedentary factory jobs replacing farm labor, and families who spoil the one child that most are allowed to have.
The Albert and Mary Lasker Foundation awards, often called the "American Nobels," will go this year to three scientists who helped deaf people to hear, two others who made fundamental discoveries about how the brain works, and two of the world's best-known philanthropists, Bill and Melinda Gates.The prizes — $250,000 in each category — were announced Monday; the winners will be honored at a luncheon in Manhattan on Sept. 20. Since the foundation began making the awards, in 1942, 83 laureates have also won Nobel Prizes. These are the three categories and the winners:CLINICAL MEDICAL RESEARCH Dr. Graeme M. Clark, 78, of the University of Melbourne in Australia; Dr. Ingeborg Hochmair, 60, of Med-El in Innsbruck, Austria; and Blake S. Wilson, 65, of Duke University in North Carolina.The three scientists literally broke a sound barrier, developing the modern cochlear implant, a device that allows profoundly deaf individuals to hear and speak. They overcame enormous skepticism from other researchers and from advocates for the deaf, who said the earliest implants amounted to unethical human experimentation.In 1978, the National Institutes of Health rejected an application for financing of human research on cochlear implants on "moral grounds." It later supported such efforts after limited early successes.Dr. Hochmair and Dr. Clark, working independently, began their multichanneled cochlear implants in the late 1970s, an effort that Professor Wilson soon joined and went on to advance with a new strategy. The combined effort "for the first time, substantially restored a human sense with a medical intervention," the Lasker citation says.Most hearing loss results from damage to the hair cells that help transmit sound waves through the snail-shaped cochlea in the inner ear to nerve cells the brain. The scientists' cochlear devices use electrical stimuli to bypass such cells; they directly stimulate the main auditory nerve that conveys messages to the brain for processing as hearing.Cochlear devices have helped 320,000 recipients around the world; many are children who get the devices at age 1 or 2 and go on to attend regular schools. Most recipients can use cellphones and follow conversations in relatively quiet places.Earlier devices offered limited benefit because many recipients could not understand spoken words without visual hints like lip reading. Dr. Hochmair and Dr. Clark improved on those devices, and in 1991 Professor Wilson reported a new speech-processing strategy that overcame the hurdle for most recipients. All the while, the scientists had to find techniques to minimize the risk of brain infections and other potentially fatal problems."In retrospect, we designers of implant systems had to get out of the way and allow the brain to do its work," Professor Wilson, an engineer who became a hearing scientist, said in an interview. "Once given a relatively clear and unfiltered input, the brain could do the rest."BASIC MEDICAL RESEARCH Richard H. Scheller of Genentech in South San Francisco, Calif., and Thomas C. Südhof of Stanford University, for their study of neurotransmission, the process by which nerve cells communicate with other cells in the brain. When Dr. Scheller, 59, and Dr. Südhof, 57, set out independently 25 years ago to explore the field, much of it was virgin scientific territory. Researchers had not identified a single protein in the neurotransmission process.The two scientists were cited for transforming what had been a rough outline into a number of molecular activities to provide insights into the elaborate mechanisms at the crux of neurological activities, from the simplest to the most sophisticated. They did so by systematically identifying, purifying and analyzing proteins that can rapidly release chemicals that underlie the brain's activities.For example, the ability to taste, move limbs and use imagination depends on a biological relay system in which nerve cells spill chemicals to stimulate nearby neurons. The transmission process can take less than a thousandth of a second.These two Lasker winners' discoveries are beginning to help provide a molecular framework for understanding normal functions like learning and memory as well as some of the most severe mental illnesses, including schizophrenia.PUBLIC SERVICE Bill Gates, 57, and Melinda Gates, 49, were honored for "spurring initiatives and research that tackle some of the planet's toughest health problems." The couple have donated billions of dollars from their foundation and coordinated with a number of public and private agencies involved in health work, enhancing the quality of life of millions of people.In an interview, Mr. Gates said he and his wife were "learning as we go" in raising the visibility of global health issues, collaborating with scientists to reduce the burden of diseases that largely affect the poor. That was an abiding concern of Mary Lasker (1900-94), who set up the foundation with her husband and lobbied for years to increase taxpayer investments in health research. Now, Ms. Gates said in the same interview, their successes are dividends from such research.The Gates foundation's efforts include a heavy investment in buying vaccines for people in poor countries and in efforts to develop immunizations for diseases that have no vaccines yet. Another program seeks to educate African women waiting to give birth about simple nutritional measures to improve their family's health.Still another is trying to develop low-cost toilets that do not require water, for use in Africa. Governments in poor countries do not have the money to conduct such research. Once the toilets are developed, wealthier countries can finance production on a larger scale. "Philanthropy can sometimes take the risk out of the equation" in undertaking the initial steps in the research, Ms. Gates said.Despite the foundation's investments, "we're not even halfway through the kind of impact we can have in global health," Mr. Gates said, adding, "I wish we were."At one time in his career, Mr. Gates was criticized as insufficiently generous in his philanthropy. But in an interview in 1998, when he announced a $100 million gift to speed the delivery of childhood vaccines to developing countries, he said:"You can always look back and say, 'Hey, I could have sold all my Microsoft stock when I was 30 years old,' but that would have been worth a small fraction of what it is now, and that would have been all my philanthropy."
WASHINGTON — The Food and Drug Administration on Tuesday announced changes to the labeling requirements for long-acting painkillers, in a further effort to curb prescription drug abuse, which has been on the rise in recent years.Agency officials said the labeling changes, set to take effect by the end of the year, would "help improve the thoughtful prescribing of these medicines," which include OxyContin, a highly addictive opioid that has figured prominently in the abuse epidemic. Morphine and fentanyl are other examples.The agency is also requiring producers of such drugs to conduct studies on the long-term risks of taking them. Researchers applauded the move, saying that a lack of such data was a major problem in determining safe prescribing practices.At the heart of the changes is a modification of the language on what kind of pain the drugs are supposed to be prescribed for. Current labels say the drugs should be used for moderate to severe pain, an indication that Dr. Douglas Throckmorton, the deputy director for regulatory programs at the F.D.A.'s Center for Drug Evaluation and Research, said was not quite right."What is moderate to me could be severe to you," he said. The new language, he said, will say that the drugs should be reserved for use in patients who do not have other treatment options, and be used for management of pain that is "severe enough" to require round-the-clock treatment.The move was prompted by a petition from Physicians for Responsible Opioid Prescribing, an advocacy group in New York. Dr. Andrew Kolodny, the president of the group, said that he was pleased by the announcement, but that he would have liked the agency to have gone further, for example by defining limits on the duration of use and dosage.A major issue hanging over opioid use is a lack of data about the drugs' long-term risks and effectiveness. Dr. Throckmorton said the agency was trying to address that by telling producers that they had to run studies and clinical trials on drugs currently on the market to better assess the risks. In a letter sent to drug makers, the agency said that companies would also have to perform other studies, including one examining whether patients on opioids develop increased sensitivity to pain.The next step, Dr. Throckmorton said, is "a series of conversations" with manufacturers of such drugs "about what those studies and trials will look like." He expects to start receiving information in 2015.Dr. Erin E. Krebs, a pain researcher at a Department of Veterans Affairs facility in Minneapolis, said that "it would be fabulous" to have such data so that doctors could better understand how or whether they should be prescribing opioids for long periods.Dr. Nathaniel Katz, an assistant professor of anesthesia at Tufts University School of Medicine in Boston, said he was skeptical that the labeling changes would have much of an effect, because they represented current practice. But he said the requirement that companies conduct studies was a major advance."We can't possibly prescribe these drugs knowledgeably unless we know what the incidence is of serious and fatal complications," he said.
TV ads tout testosterone treatments for "low T," but surprising new research shows a different hormone may play a role in less sex drive and more fat as men age. Estrogen — the female hormone — is needed by men, too, and the study gives the first clear evidence that too little of it can cause certain "male menopause" symptoms."A lot of things we think are due to testosterone deficiency are actually related to the estrogen deficiency that accompanies it," said Dr. Joel Finkelstein of Massachusetts General Hospital. He led the U.S.-government funded study, which appears in Thursday's New England Journal of Medicine.Testosterone is the main male sex hormone. Men's bodies convert some of it into estrogen, and levels of both decline with age. Until now, there was no way to tell which hormone was responsible for complaints of diminished libido, strength and energy.Millions of men have been prescribed testosterone gel, patches or shots for these problems, but it's not known how much they need or whether this hormone replacement therapy is good, bad or neutral, Finkelstein said. Doctors don't usually prescribe estrogen to men; the way to remedy low estrogen is to give them testosterone and let the body convert it.The study didn't test hormones as therapy, but explored which ones had which effects. It involved 400 healthy male volunteers, ages 20 to 50, who were given monthly shots of a drug to temporarily reduce their testosterone production to pre-puberty levels. They were then given various doses of testosterone gel or a dummy gel to use. Half also were given another drug to prevent testosterone's conversion into estrogen.Designing the study this way allowed researchers to compare the effects of different levels of each hormone on things like strength and body composition.After 16 weeks, researchers saw that muscle size and strength depended on testosterone, body-fat mass depended on estrogen, and both hormones were needed to maintain normal sex drive and performance.The results mirror animal research — mice altered so they don't make estrogen grow fat and have no sex drive. And in male-to-female transsexuals, "there's actually evidence that when those men are given estrogen, it helps their libido," Finkelstein said.The new study was too short to see long-term benefits or risks, such as the effect of testosterone supplements on the heart, mental sharpness, prostate enlargement or cancer. Also, abruptly and artificially depriving men of testosterone the way the study did may not be the same as when it falls off naturally and gradually over time.Some people call this midlife decline "male menopause" although men don't menstruate and testosterone doesn't fall off as sharply with age as estrogen does in women after menopause."Andropause would be more reasonable," since testosterone is an androgen, a male sex hormone, said John Morley, an expert on hormone therapies and aging at Saint Louis University.He said the study shows a big variability in the amount of testosterone men may need. Doctors tend to try a lower dose and abandon it if it doesn't work, but some men may need more.Further research is needed, but the results may boost the case for giving testosterone to prevent frailty in older men, the authors write. Low testosterone may contribute to less muscle and bone strength and mobility, impaired thinking skills, heart disease and other problems."This is a big public health issue," Finkelstein said. "If the changes with aging are due to these things, then potentially replacing these hormones in men might ameliorate these changes."Dr. Peter J. Snyder of the University of Pennsylvania called the new work an excellent study, but noted it was not intended to determine whether hormone therapy is beneficial. He is leading a study that will — a National Institute on Aging study testing testosterone replacement in 800 older men. He hopes for some early results late next year.
CHICAGO — Almost 1 in 10 U.S. high school seniors have engaged in recent extreme binge drinking — downing at least 10 drinks at a rate that barely budged over six years, according to a government-funded report.Less severe binge drinking, consuming five or more drinks in a row, has mostly declined in recent years among teens. But for high school seniors, the 2011 rate for 10 drinks in a row — 9.6 percent — was down only slightly from 2005.The most extreme level — 15 or more drinks in a row within the past two weeks — didn't change from 2005 to 2011. Almost 6 percent of high school seniors reported recently drinking that amount.The number of seniors engaging in the most extreme drinking "is really concerning because they're most at risk for the really severe consequences," including reckless driving, car accidents and alcohol poisoning, said lead researcher Megan Patrick of the University of Michigan's Institute for Social Research.Extreme binge drinking may be a behavior that's "more entrenched" among some teens, and thus harder to change, Patrick said.The new report is an analysis of survey results that the university does for the National Institute on Drug Abuse. It's based on classroom questionnaires given to more than 16,000 high school seniors; a question on extreme binge drinking was added in 2005.Whites and males were the most likely to engage in all levels of binge drinking, the report found. Students with more educated parents had higher rates of binge drinking than other kids, but lower rates of extreme binge drinking.Extreme binge drinking was most common in rural areas and the Midwest and least common in the West.The report was published online Monday in JAMA Pediatrics.Young adults generally have higher levels of extreme drinking; a 2012 survey by the same group found that more than 1 in 4 people aged 19 to 30 had recently consumed at least 10 drinks in a row and more than 1 in 10 had at least 15 drinks in a row.A journal editorial says the new report may help explain why hospitalizations for alcohol and drug overdoses among teens and young adults have increased in recent years despite ongoing declines in less severe binge drinking.In the early 1980s, before all states made 21 the minimum legal drinking age, more than 40 percent of high school seniors said they had recently downed more than five drinks in a row, according to data cited in the editorial.The 5-plus binge drinking rate steadily declined in more recent years for seniors, to 22 percent in 2011, although it was 24 percent in 2012, according to a previous report from the survey group. The new report has slightly different percentages because it is based on a subgroup of previous surveys. Survey results for 2012 on extreme binge drinking among seniors haven't been published yet.
ATLANTA — For the first time, the government is estimating how many people die from drug-resistant bacteria each year — more than 23,000, or about as many as those killed annually by flu.The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention released the number Monday to spotlight the growing threat of germs that are hard to treat because they've become resistant to drugs.Finally estimating the problem sends "a very powerful message," said Dr. Helen Boucher, a Tufts University expert and spokeswoman for the Infectious Diseases Society of America. "We're facing a catastrophe."Antibiotics like penicillin and streptomycin first became widely available in the 1940s, and today dozens are used to kill or suppress the bacteria behind illnesses ranging from strep throat to the plague. The drugs are considered one of the greatest advances in the history of medicine, and have saved countless lives.But as decades passed, some antibiotics stopped working against the bugs they previously vanquished. Experts say their overuse and misuse have helped make them less effective.In a new report, the CDC tallied the toll of the 17 most worrisome drug-resistant bacteria. The result: Each year, more than 2 million people develop serious infections and at least 23,000 die.Of those, the staph infection MRSA, or methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus, kills about 11,000, and a new superbug kills about 600. That bacteria withstand treatment with antibiotics called carbapenems — considered one of the last lines of defense against hard-to-treat bugs.Germs like those have prompted health officials to warn that if the situation gets much worse, it could make doctors reluctant to do surgery or treat cancer patients if antibiotics won't protect their patients from getting infections."If we're not careful, the medicine chest will be empty" when doctors need infection-fighting drugs, said CDC Director Dr. Tom Frieden.It's not clear that the problem is uniformly growing worse for all bugs. Some research suggests, for example, that MRSA rates may have plateaued and a separate CDC report released Monday in JAMA Internal Medicine found that serious MRSA infections declined 30 percent between 2005 and 2011.MRSA bacteria have been the target of many hospital infection control efforts. These germs often live without symptoms on the skin, but also can cause skin or tissue infections, and become more dangerous when they enter the bloodstream.Serious, invasive MRSA declined in all settings for a total of 80,461 infections in 2011, the journal report found. Most were linked with health care in people who'd recently been hospitalized or received other medical treatment. But for the first time, the more than 16,000 infections picked up in community settings outnumbered the 14,000 infections that began in the hospital.A 2005-2010 study in the same journal suggests that pig manure might be a cause of some mostly less serious MRSA infections in people living near fertilized farm fields.The study is based on patients from Danville, Pa.-based Geisinger Health System. It offers only circumstantial evidence, but the authors said the MRSA link is plausible because antibiotics are widely used on pig farms and other livestock operations to enhance animal growth, and the drugs are found in pig manure.The study involved nearly 3,000 MRSA cases, about half of them not linked with health-care. The authors estimated that living near pig manure-fertilized fields may have accounted for about 11 percent of MRSA not linked with health care.But how the germs might spread from pig manure to people with no close animal contact is uncertain, the study authors said. Close contact with an infected person or sharing personal items used by an infected person is the usual way MRSA spreads.Dr. William Schaffner, a Vanderbilt University infectious disease specialist, called the report "very provocative" but inconclusive.Asked generally about antibiotic use in farm animals, the CDC's Frieden said it's an important problem, but he added, "Right now the most acute problem is in hospitals and the most resistant organisms are in hospitals."Tanner contributed to his report from Chicago.
ATLANTA — A North Carolina woman featured prominently in a graphic government ad campaign to get people to stop smoking died Monday of cancer.Terrie Hall died at a hospital in Winston-Salem, N.C., federal officials said. She was 53."She was a public health hero," said Dr. Tom Frieden, director of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, which conducted the campaign. "She may well have saved more lives than most doctors do."A former smoker whose voice box was removed years ago, Hall took a leading role in the campaign that showed how smoking-related cancer ravages the body. Officials believe the "Tips from Former Smokers" campaign led as many as 100,000 Americans smokers to quit.Hall's first ad showed her putting on a wig, putting in false teeth and covering a hole in her throat with a scarf. It was the campaign's most popular spot by far, receiving more than 2.8 million views on YouTube.It was the federal public health agency's largest and starkest anti-smoking push, and its first national advertising effort.In another ad, the Lexington resident addressed the camera in the buzzing sound of her artificial voice box. She advised smokers to make a video of themselves reading a children's book or singing a lullaby. "I wish I had. The only voice my grandson's ever heard is this one," her electric voice growled.Hall's oral and throat cancer was caused by the cigarette smoking she began in high school, CDC officials said. This summer, the cancer spread to her brain.
Federal health officials reported Monday that at least two million Americans fall ill from antibiotic-resistant bacteria every year and that at least 23,000 die from those infections, putting a hard number on a growing public health threat. It was the first time that federal authorities quantified the effects of organisms that many antibiotics are powerless to fight.The number of deaths is substantially lower than previous estimates, in part because researchers from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention stripped out cases in which a drug-resistant infection was present but not necessarily the cause of death. Infectious disease doctors have long warned that antibiotic resistance — in which bacteria develop defenses against antibiotics used to kill them — threatens to return society to a time when people died from ordinary infections."They have come up with hard numbers where it has been only guesswork," said Dr. Stuart B. Levy, a professor of microbiology at Tufts University and the president of the Alliance for the Prudent Use of Antibiotics. "This sets a baseline we can all believe in."In 2007, the C.D.C. estimated that about 100,000 people died every year of infections they developed while in hospitals. Most of those infections were believed to be resistant to some antibiotics, but not necessarily the most widely used ones. And it was unclear how many of the deaths were caused by the drug-resistant infections. Monday's report quantifies that.Dr. Steven L. Solomon, the director of the C.D.C.'s office of antimicrobial resistance, acknowledged that the report underestimated the numbers, but said that was by design. Researchers were instructed to be conservative and to base their calculations only on deaths that were a direct result of a drug-resistant bacterial infection."This is a floor," Dr. Solomon said. "We wanted the cleanest number, the least subjective number."One point of contention has been the extent to which industrial-scale animal farming contributes to the problem of antibiotic-resistant infections in humans. The government has estimated that more than 70 percent of antibiotics in the United States are given to animals. Companies use them to prevent sickness when animals are packed together in ways that breed infection. They also use them to make animals grow faster, though federal authorities are trying to stop that.The report said that "much of antibiotic use in animals is unnecessary and inappropriate and makes everyone less safe." It also said that about half of antibiotic use in people is inappropriate.The 114-page report counts infections from 17 drug-resistant bacteria and one fungus, pathogens that Dr. Solomon said caused an overwhelming majority of drug-resistant bacterial infections in the country. It drew on data from five disease-tracking systems, including a major count of bacterial infections reported in hospitals in 10 different areas across the country. The count of deaths was based on mathematical models — one for each resistant organism.One particularly lethal type of drug-resistant bacteria, known as CRE, has become resistant to nearly all antibiotics on the market. It is still relatively rare, causing just 600 deaths a year, but researchers have identified it in health care facilities in 44 states."We are getting closer and closer to the cliff," said Dr. Michael Bell, a C.D.C. official who presented the data.Infections from one of the most pervasive types of drug-resistant bacteria tracked in the report, MRSA, have been declining. Invasive MRSA infections in hospitals went down by more than half from 2005 to 2011, according to a paper published Monday in the journal JAMA Internal Medicine. However, the number of invasive MRSA infections picked up outside health care settings has not changed much, and researchers pointed out that the number of those types of infections has for the first time outstripped the number acquired in hospitals."This is a really big switch," said Eli Perencevich, an infectious disease epidemiologist at the University of Iowa.Hospitals have taken steps to prevent drug-resistant infections, but less is known about preventing infections outside hospitals, clinics and nursing homes. There has been little research, for example, on the extent to which antibiotic use on industrial farms contributes to resistant germs in people. The farm animal industry has been reluctant to allow data collection, and very few studies of the link have been done.In a separate study in JAMA Internal Medicine on Monday, researchers from the Johns Hopkins Bloomberg School of Public Health sifted through health records of more than 440,000 people in the Geisinger Health System, which operates a network of clinics and hospitals in Pennsylvania, and found that patients who lived near farms and areas where manure was dumped were 38 percent more likely to develop a MRSA infection, particularly of soft tissue or skin, researchers found.Some researchers not involved in the study said it offered evidence that living near farms increased one's chances of developing a MRSA infection. But the study did not test farm animals or soil for MRSA, nor did it find evidence of the type of MRSA that is typically associated with farm animals, and others said the infections might have been caused by something other than antibiotics on farms.
WASHINGTON — It happens too often: A doctor isn't sure what's causing someone's feverish illness but prescribes antibiotics just in case, drugs that don't work if a virus is the real culprit.Now Duke University researchers are developing a blood test to more easily tell when a respiratory illness is due to a virus and not a bacterial infection, hoping to cut the dangerous overuse of antibiotics and speed the right diagnosis.It works by taking a fingerprint of your immune system — how its genes are revving up to fight the bug. That's very different from how infections are diagnosed today. And if the experimental test pans out, it also promises to help doctors track brand-new threats, like the next flu pandemic or that mysterious MERS virus that has erupted in the Middle East.That viral "signature could be quite powerful, and may be a game-changer," said Dr. Geoffrey Ginsburg, Duke's genomic medicine chief. He leads the team that on Wednesday reported that a study involving 102 people provided early evidence that the test can work.Today, when symptoms alone aren't enough for diagnosis, a doctor's suspicion guides what tests are performed — tests that work by hunting for evidence of a specific pathogen. Fever and cough? If it's flu season, you might be tested for the flu virus. An awful sore throat? Chances are you'll get checked for strep bacteria. A negative test can leave the doctor wondering what germ to check for next, or whether to make a best guess.Moreover, rapid in-the-office tests aren't always accurate and can miss infections. So patients may have blood or other samples sent to labs to try to grow any lurking bacteria and tell if it's to blame, additional testing that can take days."This is something we struggle with every day," said Dr. Octavio Ramilo, infectious disease chief at Nationwide Children's Hospital in Columbus, Ohio, who wasn't involved in the new study. Particularly with children, a respiratory virus and a bacterial infection "in the beginning look completely alike," he added.Hence researchers at a number of universities are trying to harness a fairly recent discovery: As your immune system detects an invading bug, different genes are activated to fend off a viral infection than to fight a bacterial or fungal one. Those subtle molecular changes appear to be occurring even before you feel any symptoms. And they form distinct patterns of RNA and proteins, what's called a genomic fingerprint.The Duke team discovered 30 genes that are switched on in different ways during a viral attack. The test essentially is a freeze-frame to show "what those genes are doing at the moment in time that it's captured," explained Duke lead researcher Dr. Aimee Zaas, an infectious disease specialist.Small studies spotted that viral signature in people who volunteered to be infected with different influenza strains for science.For a more real-world simulation, the researchers then analyzed blood samples stored from feverish people who had come to the emergency room — and who were eventually diagnosed, the old-fashioned way, with either some type of virus or a bacterial infection.The genomic test proved 89 percent accurate in sorting out who had a virus, and did even better at ruling out those who didn't, Zaas reported Wednesday in the journal Science Translational Medicine.It took 12 hours to get results. The researchers hope to speed that up so that it might work as quickly as some in-office tests.Still, "it's a promising tool," said Ramilo, an Ohio State University professor who is doing similar research. He called the Duke study an important step toward creating a commercial test, and predicts one might reach the market within five years.Why would a doctor want to know merely that a virus is present and not which virus? That's enough information to rule out antibiotics, Zaas said. Unnecessary antibiotic use is one factor in the growing problem of drug-resistant germs, which the government blames for more than 23,000 deaths a year.Plus, if a dangerous new virus begins spreading, like MERS, this approach could help avoid quarantining people unnecessarily by telling right away which ones are virus-free, Ginsburg added.In Ohio, Ramilo is exploring a more immediate need: When young infants have high fevers, they're often hospitalized while doctors run a battery of tests to find the fraction who have a serious bacterial infection. He is leading a study involving 22 pediatric emergency rooms to see if a genomic fingerprint approach could separate which babies really need all that testing.But the virus-or-not question is just the beginning, Ramilo said. His research suggests genomic fingerprints also can distinguish a flu strain from other common viruses. And the Duke team is analyzing a huge study of students living in dormitories, to see if the genomic test detected who was incubating the flu before their first sniffle — and thus might be useful in stemming outbreaks.
Obese people are less likely to survive cancer, and one reason may be a surprising inequality: The overweight are undertreated.Doctors often short them on chemotherapy by not basing the dose on size, as they should. They use ideal weight or cap the dose out of fear about how much treatment an obese patient can bear. Yet research shows that bigger people handle chemo better than smaller people do.Even a little less chemo can mean worse odds of survival, and studies suggest that as many as 40 percent of obese cancer patients have been getting less than 85 percent of the right dose for their size.Now, the largest organization of doctors who treat cancer, the American Society of Clinical Oncology, aims to change that. The group has adopted guidelines urging full, weight-based doses for the obese.Don't call it supersizing; it's right-sizing cancer care, said Dr. Gary Lyman, a Duke University oncologist who led the panel that wrote the advice."There's little doubt that some degree of undertreatment is contributing to the higher mortality and recurrence rates in obese patients," he said."By minimizing the dose, or capping the dose, we have been undertreating patients," he said.The dosing issue applies to all types of cancer treated with chemo — breast, colon, lung, ovarian and even blood diseases such as leukemia.It affects a lot of people. Big isn't healthy but it's the new "normal" — 60 percent of Americans are overweight and more than one-third of them are obese.Giving too little chemo "could make it as if they didn't even get treated at all ... so they go through the whole ordeal with no benefit, in the extreme case ," said Dr. Jennifer Griggs, a University of Michigan breast cancer specialist who also worked on the guidelines.So why do doctors limit dose?Sometimes it's for good reason — the patient has diabetes, heart problems or other illnesses that interfere with how much chemo they can stand. Usually, though, it's because doctors are afraid to follow a standard weight-based formula because the dose seems so huge and they're afraid of harming the heart and blood system, Lyman said."You're three times the size of the average person, but it doesn't mean your heart is," Griggs explained.Yet studies show that heavier patients are less likely to develop dangerous, low blood counts from cancer treatment, and that they clear chemo drugs more quickly from the body than thinner people do.A paper Lyman published in the journal Nature in August said that a 20 percent reduction in chemo doses lowered remission and cure rates by half in animal experiments and helped the tumors develop resistance to the drugs. Other research in people found lower survival among those getting less chemo as well.Even if a patient develops a problem from a chemo treatment and doctors have to dial it back, it's important to try a full dose the next time around so the patient gets all the treatment intended, Lyman said.That happened to Tracy Smith, a 46-year-old Durham, N.C., woman treated at Duke in 2011 for breast cancer that had spread to more than a dozen lymph nodes. Doctors gave her full chemo doses based on her weight, which at 285 pounds classified her as obese.Three times, high fevers put her in the hospital, and one treatment was cut short because doctors thought it was causing wheezing and possible lung damage. But she resumed and finished the intended treatment and has been cancer-free since then.After hearing you have cancer, "you're just kind of in a fog" and don't think to ask about doses of the drugs you need, she said. "I trusted my doctor. Doctors should be well aware of what you can tolerate. You should do whatever you can to fight this beast."Smith's tumor was fueled by estrogen — a hormone made in abundance by fat tissue. Robin McRath, a floral designer who helps run a women's shelter in Ludington, Mich., had the same type."It's like a playground, an amusement park, for cancer cells when you're fat," she said. She was only was 41 when her cancer was diagnosed five years ago, and her oncologist, Dr. Carol Peterson, treated her with full doses based on her weight — about 240 pounds, which put her in the obese category."We didn't discuss dosage. That didn't matter to me — I just wanted to get it out of my system," she said of the cancer, and praised the treatments to prevent one of chemo's most feared side effects. "There are fantastic anti-nausea medicines. I was never sick one day."McRath is active in the Obesity Action Coalition, an education and advocacy group. A spokesman said the group was unaware of the dosing issue for obese patients.Not all doctors are aware either. Luckily for McRath, hers was. Peterson said she uses full doses unless a patient has other health issues."If that's their only problem — if they're just overweight or obese — they can do quite well" with full weight-based doses, she said.Duke's Lyman agreed, and offered this advice to patients: "Ask your doctor how they plan to treat you and whether you're going to get the full dosing. The doctor may have a good reason not to, but you should have that discussion."AP National Writer Allen G. Breed in Raleigh, N.C., contributed to this report.
Stopping Alzheimer's Before It Starts: The Times's Pam Belluck reports on a federal clinical trial that could lead to a treatment that prevents Alzheimer's Disease.In the most significant sign yet of a broad shift in the focus of Alzheimer's research from treating to preventing the disease, the federal government announced on Wednesday its largest grant so far to test an Alzheimer's drug on healthy people at greatest risk for the most common form of the disease.The $33.2 million grant, and several other prevention studies awarded federal money in the last year, follow years of unsuccessful trials of treatments on people who already have dementia. Those failures have led to the realization that these drugs appear to be ineffective by the time memory and thinking problems have taken hold. At the same time, scientific advances have allowed researchers to identify people at risk for Alzheimer's long before symptoms emerge.With five million Americans suffering from Alzheimer's and their ranks projected to surge as baby boomers age, federal health officials consider the disease such a priority that Dr. Francis S. Collins, director of the National Institutes of Health, scraped money together when forced budget cuts slashed the Obama administration's promise of $100 million in additional funding for Alzheimer's for 2013. Dr. Collins said he dipped into the budgets of the 27 N.I.H. agencies to supply $40 million awarded Wednesday for several Alzheimer's research projects. Another $5 million was provided by the National Institute on Aging."The worst thing we could do would be to just hunker down and hold off tackling very important problems," Dr. Collins said, adding, "Obviously, this is high-risk research, but goodness, the stakes are so high that we felt we had to go forward even in the face of the most difficult budget environment that anyone can remember in the N.I.H."The idea is to approach Alzheimer's with a strategy similar to that used for heart disease and other conditions, said Laurie Ryan, program director for Alzheimer's disease clinical trials at the National Institute on Aging, part of the N.I.H. "We're going to look at people at risk, just like we do with people who have high cholesterol and are at risk for cardiovascular disease," she said. "If we intervene now, can we prevent or at least delay the disease?"The $33.2 million grant, part of the government's national Alzheimer's plan, will help finance a clinical trial to test a treatment on people 60 to 75 who have no symptoms of the disease, but do have two copies of a gene known to greatly increase the risk of getting it as people age.The project, led by Dr. Eric M. Reiman and Dr. Pierre N. Tariot of the Banner Alzheimer's Institute in Phoenix, will test a drug or placebo on 650 adults in several locations, mostly in the United States. All of the participants will have two copies of the gene, ApoE4, having inherited it from both parents.Studies have found that more than half the people with two ApoE4 genes will develop Alzheimer's, compared with about one-fourth of people with one copy and 10 percent of people with no copies. People with two copies also develop symptoms earlier, around age 68, years before most people with one copy and more than a decade before most people without the gene.People with two ApoE4 genes make up only about 3 percent of the population, but because they develop the conventional late-onset form of Alzheimer's, they are important to study. About 25 percent of people possess one copy of the gene.The Banner project has not yet chosen the drug to be tested, but it will be a treatment that attacks amyloid, a protein that accumulates in plaques in the brains of people with Alzheimer's.Expected to begin in 2015, the project will ultimately cost more than $100 million, most of which is expected to be financed by the pharmaceutical industry, with some money from nonprofit sources, Dr. Reiman said. Researchers will use sophisticated tests to measure whether the drug helps delay memory or cognitive decline over five years, although Dr. Reiman said the tests may be able to record some results in as little as two years. The study will also measure brain and neurological changes over time.Jamie Tyrone, 53, a retired nurse in Ramona, Calif., said she felt traumatized when she learned while participating in a different research effort that she has two copies of ApoE4."For the first time I feel hopeful," she said. While too young to participate in the trial, she recently formed a nonprofit organization called Beating Alzheimer's by Embracing Science (Babes), which will soon have its inaugural fund-raiser, featuring the celebrities Helen Reddy and Marilu Henner.She said the new trial "means so much to me because if this study has a positive outcome, guess what — I can be treated and I don't have to live in fear anymore."The new grant is the latest of several grants for Alzheimer's prevention studies. In 2012, the N.I.H. awarded $16 million to a project led by the same researchers and Dr. Francisco Lopera, a Colombian neurologist. The researchers will test an anti-amyloid drug on members of a Colombian family, the largest extended family in the world with a gene mutation that causes them to develop Alzheimer's early, showing cognitive impairment by around age 45. In that trial, expected to start this year, family members as young as 30 will receive the drug, Crenezumab, manufactured by Genentech, which is financing the largest portion of that $100 million trial.Earlier this year, the N.I.H. gave a significant grant to a study that, like the Banner trial, will focus on people at risk for common late-onset Alzheimer's. Led by Dr. Reisa Sperling, who runs the Alzheimer's program at Brigham and Women's Hospital in Boston, the trial will test the anti-amyloid drug solanezumab on 1,000 people in various locations who do not have symptoms of Alzheimer's but do have amyloid plaques in their brains. The three-year trial will receive about $7 million in federal money its first year, and a possible total of $36 million.On Wednesday, the N.I.H. also awarded $1.5 million to a trial of three anti-amyloid drugs on people with rare gene mutations that lead to early-onset Alzheimer's. The trial, run by the Dominantly Inherited Alzheimer Network led by Dr. Randall Bateman of Washington University in St. Louis, may receive a total of $6 million over four years.Dr. Ronald Petersen, director of the Mayo Clinic's Alzheimer's center, who is not involved in these prevention trials, said the studies complemented each other and had the potential to answer questions about the role of amyloid as a potential cause of Alzheimer's and whether attacking it can prevent dementia."That doesn't mean we abandon people who need treatment," Dr. Petersen said. "But from a public health perspective, if you want to prevent millions of people from getting the disease, this is the way we have to go."
A new study provides the best evidence yet that wearing a back brace will slow the progression of the most common form of scoliosis in adolescents, helping them avoid painful spine surgery.Physicians have recommended bracing for more than 50 years, but until now, studies of its effectiveness had produced mixed results. The United States Preventive Services Task Force recommended against scoliosis screening in schools partly on the grounds that there was insufficient evidence that bracing and other conservative treatments relieved back pain or improved quality of life in these children.The new randomized study, published on Thursday in The New England Journal of Medicine, should end the longstanding debate, several experts said, and may spur the task force to reconsider its position.The trial is "very convincing," said Dr. B. Stephens Richards, a pediatric orthopedic surgeon at Texas Scottish Rite Hospital in Dallas. "It scientifically proves that brace treatment works for adolescents with scoliosis who are at risk of curve worsening to the point of needing surgery."Adolescent girls are more likely than boys to have idiopathic scoliosis, or curvature of the spine from no known cause. Rigid bracing is worn to restore spine alignment by external force.It is a demanding treatment at a vulnerable time of life."When you have a teenager who is anxious about wearing a brace to school or what their friends will think, it gave us a bit of heartache to try to convince them if we weren't certain ourselves," said Dr. Paul D. Sponseller, the director of orthopedic surgery at Johns Hopkins Children's Center, who was not involved in the study. "In light of this new evidence, we can say we really do have a basis for putting them through bracing."In the study, researchers analyzed data on 242 patients at 25 sites across the United States and Canada. The children were all aged 10 to 15 and still growing, and they all had a spinal curvature of 20 to 40 degrees.Of those patients, 116 were randomly assigned to observation or bracing for at least 18 hours daily. Because too few families agreed to randomization, the researchers added a group of 126 adolescents who chose for themselves between bracing and observation.Bracing was deemed a failure if spinal curvature progressed to 50 degrees or more, a point at which surgery is often suggested. It was deemed a success if the child achieved skeletal maturity without this degree of curve progression.The trial was stopped early because of the apparent efficacy of bracing.In the analysis that included both groups, the rate of treatment success was 72 percent among children with bracing, compared with 48 percent among those under observation. The benefit increased the longer bracing was worn. More than 90 percent of the children who were successfully treated wore their braces more than 13 hours a day.Dr. Richards, the immediate past president of the Scoliosis Research Society, said the study's strengths were the inclusion criteria, limited to adolescents most at risk for spinal curve progression, and the use of a high-tech, temperature-sensitive device in the braces to measure compliance objectively."There were a lot of doctors like me who treat scoliosis as the primary focus of their practice who had doubts about whether bracing was effective," said Dr. Stuart L. Weinstein, the lead author of the study and a professor of orthopedic surgery at the University of Iowa. "Now the jury is in."Bracing has been the standard of care since the 1940s. It took so long to perform a rigorous trial of its effectiveness not only because it was "a gargantuan task," said Joe O'Brien, the president of the National Scoliosis Foundation, but also because parents did not want to "just sit there and wait and watch."Such a study raised moral challenges, too. "Ethically, you have to accept that some patients will be randomized to not using a brace, and your presumption is they will end up needing surgery," said Dr. John T. Smith, a professor in the orthopedics department at the University of Utah.When her daughter Maddie was given a scoliosis diagnosis at age 10, Becky Houser, of North Liberty, Iowa, wanted to avoid surgery "at all costs." So Maddie, a participant in Dr. Weinstein's study, chose to wear a brace."We didn't want to not do anything," said Mrs. Houser, who manages rental properties. Thirty years ago, she underwent surgery for scoliosis herself, spending three weeks in a hospital and nine months in an upper-body cast.After three years of wearing baggy tops and yoga pants to school to accommodate the brace, Maddie, now 13, was thrilled to learn that her spinal curvature was holding steady at 28 degrees. With no more major growth spurts left, she no longer needs bracing.A common surgical treatment, spinal fusion, entails putting screws and rods in the spine to straighten it. The procedure has greatly improved, but young patients still face risks like infection, bone healing problems and, rarely, paralysis.Despite the apparent success of bracing, the study did not pinpoint which children are most likely to benefit from it. Indeed, the researchers found that outcomes were successful in 41 percent of the intervention group even though they seldom wore the brace.Conversely, Erica Shumaker, a high school freshman in Tipton, Iowa, wore her brace 22 hours a day while participating in the study. Yet her spinal curvature progressed, and she is likely to need surgery."Her brace isn't helping as much as they thought it would," said her father, Rick Shumaker. "But there's nothing we would do any different."
AMARILLO — The most violent prisons in the Texas state system share a common factor: they house a high proportion of mentally ill inmates.The Texas Tribune analyzed data from violent-incident reports from 99 state prisons filed from 2006 to 2012, and found far more reports of violence at facilities housing high numbers of mentally ill, violent offenders than at other prisons.It is not surprising that prisons with a greater proportion of mentally ill inmates would have more violence than others, said Michele Deitch, a prison conditions expert at the University of Texas at Austin's Lyndon B. Johnson School of Public Affairs. But the volume of violent incident reports raises questions about the staff's ability to manage inmates and keep prisoners and officers safe, Ms. Deitch said."You can't ignore those numbers," she said.Among the five units with the highest number of reports are the state's three psychiatric facilities. In addition, the William P. Clements Unit, which is not a psychiatric facility, but houses 1,800 mentally ill inmates among a population of 3,500, is in that group, according to Texas Department of Criminal Justice data.Advocates of overhauling criminal justice say the numbers show that the state's approach to incarcerating the mentally ill is not working. But criminal justice department officials say the numbers do not tell the whole story. They say state facilities are safe, and programs aimed at helping mentally ill inmates are working."I think we do a very good job taking care of what we do here," said Barry Martin, the senior warden at Clements.From 2006 to 2012, Clements inmates and officers were involved in about 6,600 violent episodes — those in which an assault was alleged, force was used, a weapon was involved or a disturbance was reported — outpacing all other prisons. On average, there were more than 25 reports for every 100 prisoners each year.After dipping significantly from 2006 to 2007, the number of violent episodes at Clements rose to 1,093 in 2011 and more than 900 in 2012 from fewer than 800 in 2007. Ms. Deitch called the numbers "overwhelming." But Clements is not the most violent per capita. Reports of violent episodes are more prevalent at smaller institutions that house only psychiatric patients. At the John Montford Psychiatric Unit in Lubbock, the average of violent incident reports was 43 per 100 inmates from 2006 to 2012. The Beauford H. Jester IV Unit near Richmond, which houses some of the most violent mentally ill inmates in the system, had 41 incident reports per 100 inmates during that time. The average for the 99 Texas prisons analyzed by The Tribune was less than 8 per 100.At Clements, officers were involved in a "major use of force" — reported whenever officers force inmates to do something against their will — more than 3,400 times during the six-year period. The Montford unit, with a population less than one-third that of Clements, had more than 1,500 reports of major use of force during the same period. Jester, with about 500 inmates, reported major use of force 900 times.The state system is facing an increase in prisoners requiring psychiatric care, a trend seen in the criminal justice system nationwide in recent decades.The number of inmates treated for mental illness by the University of Texas Medical Branch, which provides most inmate care in Texas prisons, grew to nearly 17,900 in August 2012 from about 14,500 in August 2008. More than 15 percent of the more than 151,000 inmates have been given a diagnosis of some form of mental illness. (The University of Texas at Austin and the University of Texas Medical Branch are sponsors of The Texas Tribune.)Ms. Deitch and other proponents of prison overhaul said the rate of violence, particularly at facilities with mentally ill inmates, shows a need to reduce the prison population and improve staff training to cope with prisoners with psychiatric needs."Something is happening that's causing inmates to act out in quite serious and dangerous ways, and staff do not have that situation under control," she said.Scott Medlock, director of the prisoners' rights program at the Texas Civil Rights Project, said state officials should consider structural changes, including spreading mentally ill inmates among many units instead of concentrating them at a few."Those people are entitled to accommodations that will help integrate them into the prison system and keep them safe," he said.But leaders at Clements and department administrators say the statistics do not reflect the hundreds of times when officers have prevented violence. And they do not show the success of intensive programs that help mentally ill offenders.Mr. Martin, the warden at Clements, said that the prison not only houses mentally ill inmates but that it also has a wing dedicated to G-5 offenders, those considered the most dangerous. The prison has 448 cells for isolation; last week, 435 of them were occupied.Clements officers are given two and a half weeks of training in dealing with mentally ill inmates, and Mr. Martin said he planned to add more."That's the biggest job," he said, "protecting them from one another and, here, from themselves."At Clements, health care providers from Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center run a Program for Aggressive Mentally Ill Offenders; inmates can participate voluntarily in a cognitive behavioral therapy program, and 175 are enrolled. Those who complete the program by taking medication, attending therapy sessions and modifying their behavior receive a certificate that prison and parole officials consider when making decisions about housing conditions and potential release dates."It makes life easier for them and for us," Mr. Martin said.The prison also has an involuntary program for about 200 chronically mentally ill inmates, which puts them in daily contact with mental health care providers. Marion Williams, the medical director at Clements, said she felt safer treating patients inside the prison than outside. Keeping a large population of mentally ill inmates in one facility, she said, allowed for continuity of care.As men shouted and banged on the steel doors in a solitary confinement wing at Clements, Maj. Michael Gruver, who oversees some of the men in isolation, said dealing with large numbers of inmates with mental health problems was difficult at times."There are challenges," he said, "but they're not insurmountable."
WASHINGTON — Federal officials often say that health insurance will cost consumers less than expected under President Obama's health care law . But they rarely mention one big reason: many insurers are significantly limiting the choices of doctors and hospitals available to consumers.From California to Illinois to New Hampshire, and in many states in between, insurers are driving down premiums by restricting the number of providers who will treat patients in their new health plans.When insurance marketplaces open on Oct. 1, most of those shopping for coverage will be low- and moderate-income people for whom price is paramount. To hold down costs, insurers say, they have created smaller networks of doctors and hospitals than are typically found in commercial insurance. And those health care providers will, in many cases, be paid less than what they have been receiving from commercial insurers.Some consumer advocates and health care providers are increasingly concerned. Decades of experience with Medicaid, the program for low-income people, show that having an insurance card does not guarantee access to specialists or other providers.Consumers should be prepared for "much tighter, narrower networks" of doctors and hospitals, said Adam M. Linker, a health policy analyst at the North Carolina Justice Center, a statewide advocacy group."That can be positive for consumers if it holds down premiums and drives people to higher-quality providers," Mr. Linker said. "But there is also a risk because, under some health plans, consumers can end up with astronomical costs if they go to providers outside the network."Insurers say that with a smaller array of doctors and hospitals, they can offer lower-cost policies and have more control over the quality of health care providers. They also say that having insurance with a limited network of providers is better than having no coverage at all.Cigna illustrates the strategy of many insurers. It intends to participate next year in the insurance marketplaces, or exchanges, in Arizona, Colorado, Florida, Tennessee and Texas."The networks will be narrower than the networks typically offered to large groups of employees in the commercial market," said Joseph Mondy, a spokesman for Cigna.The current concerns echo some of the criticism that sank the Clinton administration's plan for universal coverage in 1993-94. Republicans said the Clinton proposals threatened to limit patients' options, their access to care and their choice of doctors.At the same time, House Republicans are continuing to attack the new health law and are threatening to hold up a spending bill unless money is taken away from the health care program.In a new study, the Health Research Institute of PricewaterhouseCoopers, the consulting company, says that "insurers passed over major medical centers" when selecting providers in California, Illinois, Indiana, Kentucky and Tennessee, among other states."Doing so enables health plans to offer lower premiums," the study said. "But the use of narrow networks may also lead to higher out-of-pocket expenses, especially if a patient has a complex medical problem that's being treated at a hospital that has been excluded from their health plan."In California, the statewide Blue Shield plan has developed a network specifically for consumers shopping in the insurance exchange.Juan Carlos Davila, an executive vice president of Blue Shield of California, said the network for its exchange plans had 30,000 doctors, or 53 percent of the 57,000 doctors in its broadest commercial network, and 235 hospitals, or 78 percent of the 302 hospitals in its broadest network.Mr. Davila said the new network did not include the five medical centers of the University of California or the Cedars-Sinai Medical Center near Beverly Hills."We expect to have the broadest and deepest network of any plan in California," Mr. Davila said. "But not many folks who are uninsured or near the poverty line live in wealthy communities like Beverly Hills."Daniel R. Hawkins Jr., a senior vice president of the National Association of Community Health Centers, which represents 9,000 clinics around the country, said: "We serve the very population that will gain coverage — low-income, working class uninsured people. But insurers have shown little interest in including us in their provider networks."
A sweeping national effort to extend health coverage to millions of Americans will leave out two-thirds of the poor blacks and single mothers and more than half of the low-wage workers who do not have insurance, the very kinds of people that the program was intended to help, according to an analysis of census data by The New York Times.Because they live in states largely controlled by Republicans that have declined to participate in a vast expansion of Medicaid, the medical insurance program for the poor, they are among the eight million Americans who are impoverished, uninsured and ineligible for help. The federal government will pay for the expansion through 2016 and no less than 90 percent of costs in later years.Those excluded will be stranded without insurance, stuck between people with slightly higher incomes who will qualify for federal subsidies on the new health exchanges that went live this week, and those who are poor enough to qualify for Medicaid in its current form, which has income ceilings as low as $11 a day in some states.People shopping for insurance on the health exchanges are already discovering this bitter twist."How can somebody in poverty not be eligible for subsidies?" an unemployed health care worker in Virginia asked through tears. The woman, who identified herself only as Robin L. because she does not want potential employers to know she is down on her luck, thought she had run into a computer problem when she went online Tuesday and learned she would not qualify.At 55, she has high blood pressure, and she had been waiting for the law to take effect so she could get coverage. Before she lost her job and her house and had to move in with her brother in Virginia, she lived in Maryland, a state that is expanding Medicaid. "Would I go back there?" she asked. "It might involve me living in my car. I don't know. I might consider it."The 26 states that have rejected the Medicaid expansion are home to about half of the country's population, but about 68 percent of poor, uninsured blacks and single mothers. About 60 percent of the country's uninsured working poor are in those states. Among those excluded are about 435,000 cashiers, 341,000 cooks and 253,000 nurses' aides."The irony is that these states that are rejecting Medicaid expansion — many of them Southern — are the very places where the concentration of poverty and lack of health insurance are the most acute," said Dr. H. Jack Geiger, a founder of the community health center model. "It is their populations that have the highest burden of illness and costs to the entire health care system."The disproportionate impact on poor blacks introduces the prickly issue of race into the already politically charged atmosphere around the health care law. Race was rarely, if ever, mentioned in the state-level debates about the Medicaid expansion. But the issue courses just below the surface, civil rights leaders say, pointing to the pattern of exclusion.Every state in the Deep South, with the exception of Arkansas, has rejected the expansion. Opponents of the expansion say they are against it on exclusively economic grounds, and that the demographics of the South — with its large share of poor blacks — make it easy to say race is an issue when it is not.In Mississippi, Republican leaders note that a large share of people in the state are on Medicaid already, and that, with an expansion, about a third of the state would have been insured through the program. Even supporters of the health law say that eventually covering 10 percent of that cost would have been onerous for a predominantly rural state with a modest tax base."Any additional cost in Medicaid is going to be too much," said State Senator Chris McDaniel, a Republican, who opposes expansion.The law was written to require all Americans to have health coverage. For lower and middle-income earners, there are subsidies on the new health exchanges to help them afford insurance. An expanded Medicaid program was intended to cover the poorest. In all, about 30 million uninsured Americans were to have become eligible for financial help.
WASHINGTON — The technical problems that have hampered enrollment in the online health insurance exchanges resulted from the failure of a major software component, designed by private contractors, that crashed under the weight of millions of users last week, federal officials said Monday.Todd Park, President Obama's top technology adviser, said the failure occurred in the part of the Web site that lets people create user accounts at the beginning of the insurance sign-up process. The crash prevented many people from viewing any of their insurance options or gaining access to information on what federal subsidies might be available."At lower volumes, it would work fine," Mr. Park said of the Web site, healthcare.gov. "At higher volumes, it has problems.""Right now," he added, "we've got what we think we need. The contractors have sent reinforcements. They are working 24-7. We just wish there was more time in a day."In some cases, the Web site does not recognize users who established accounts before Oct. 1, when the online marketplaces opened for consumers to shop for insurance. Other users are prevented from establishing accounts. Some who successfully established a marketplace account received an e-mail asking them to verify their e-mail addresses, but the link provided did not work.The identification of the software component as the main cause of the Web site's problems was the most detailed explanation that federal officials have given since the online marketplaces opened. The officials also rejected mounting criticism about the Web site's overall design, saying that the rest of the site appears ready to handle the large volume of traffic.But because of the initial failures, other parts of the complex system have yet to be proved under the intense strain of real-world conditions. And outside experts said that White House officials should have spent more time tending to the computer code and technology of the Web site, rather than recruiting Hollywood celebrities to promote it."It's poorly designed," said Luke Chung, the president of a database company in Virginia who has publicly criticized the site in recent days. "People higher up are given the excuse that there are too many users. That's a convenient excuse for the managers to pass up the chain."Those comments echoed similar criticism on sites across the Internet, where Web designers and developers speculated about the reasons for the ongoing problems at the Web site, healthcare.gov. One discussion on the popular Web site reddit.com was titled "How not to optimize a website."White House officials declined to identify the private contractors who had built the account creation function, citing a decision to keep that information private. They said the contractors had moved that part of the new system to beefed-up hardware and were busy rewriting the software code to make it more robust and efficient.In the past week, wait times have dropped by half, officials said.Officials said they had also added staff members at call centers to provide customers an alternative to the online system. The Web site currently says that people "in a hurry" can apply faster at a government call center using a toll-free telephone number, (800) 318-2596. But an operator at the call center said Monday that he could not help because he, too, was "experiencing technical difficulties with the Web site."Aneesh Chopra, who preceded Mr. Park as the federal government's chief technology officer and helped create an earlier version of healthcare.gov, said he was confident that the system would be working effectively in the coming weeks.Mr. Chopra noted that when United Airlines and Continental merged their online reservations systems, it took weeks to iron out problems."This is par for the course for large-scale I.T. projects," Mr. Chopra said. "We wish we could launch bug-free, but in reality that's not that easy to do. The reality is that if you have a product that people want, people will tolerate glitches because they expect them."Administration officials said they had relied heavily on contractors to build and operate the federal exchanges, under supervision of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. In the weeks before the marketplaces opened for business, those contractors expressed high optimism that their computer systems would work.The prime contractor for the federal exchange — CGI Federal, a unit of the CGI Group, based in Montreal — and the company operating a "data services hub" for the government — Quality Software Services Inc., a unit of the UnitedHealth Group — told Congress at a hearing on Sept. 10 that they were ready for a surge of users when enrollment opened on Oct. 1.
WASHINGTON — The technical problems that have hampered enrollment in the online health insurance exchanges resulted from the failure of a major software component, designed by private contractors, that crashed under the weight of millions of users last week, federal officials said Monday.Todd Park, President Obama's top technology adviser, said the failure occurred in the part of the Web site that lets people create user accounts at the beginning of the insurance sign-up process. The crash prevented many people from viewing any of their insurance options or gaining access to information on what federal subsidies might be available."At lower volumes, it would work fine," Mr. Park said of the Web site, healthcare.gov. "At higher volumes, it has problems.""Right now," he added, "we've got what we think we need. The contractors have sent reinforcements. They are working 24-7. We just wish there was more time in a day."In some cases, the Web site does not recognize users who established accounts before Oct. 1, when the online marketplaces opened for consumers to shop for insurance. Other users are prevented from establishing accounts. Some who successfully established a marketplace account received an e-mail asking them to verify their e-mail addresses, but the link provided did not work.The identification of the software component as the main cause of the Web site's problems was the most detailed explanation that federal officials have given since the online marketplaces opened. The officials also rejected mounting criticism about the Web site's overall design, saying that the rest of the site appears ready to handle the large volume of traffic.But because of the initial failures, other parts of the complex system have yet to be proved under the intense strain of real-world conditions. And outside experts said that White House officials should have spent more time tending to the computer code and technology of the Web site, rather than recruiting Hollywood celebrities to promote it."It's poorly designed," said Luke Chung, the president of a database company in Virginia who has publicly criticized the site in recent days. "People higher up are given the excuse that there are too many users. That's a convenient excuse for the managers to pass up the chain."Those comments echoed similar criticism on sites across the Internet, where Web designers and developers speculated about the reasons for the ongoing problems at the Web site, healthcare.gov. One discussion on the popular Web site reddit.com was titled "How not to optimize a website."White House officials declined to identify the private contractors who had built the account creation function, citing a decision to keep that information private. They said the contractors had moved that part of the new system to beefed-up hardware and were busy rewriting the software code to make it more robust and efficient.In the past week, wait times have dropped by half, officials said.Officials said they had also added staff members at call centers to provide customers an alternative to the online system. The Web site currently says that people "in a hurry" can apply faster at a government call center using a toll-free telephone number, (800) 318-2596. But an operator at the call center said Monday that he could not help because he, too, was "experiencing technical difficulties with the Web site."Aneesh Chopra, who preceded Mr. Park as the federal government's chief technology officer and helped create an earlier version of healthcare.gov, said he was confident that the system would be working effectively in the coming weeks.Mr. Chopra noted that when United Airlines and Continental merged their online reservations systems, it took weeks to iron out problems."This is par for the course for large-scale I.T. projects," Mr. Chopra said. "We wish we could launch bug-free, but in reality that's not that easy to do. The reality is that if you have a product that people want, people will tolerate glitches because they expect them."Administration officials said they had relied heavily on contractors to build and operate the federal exchanges, under supervision of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. In the weeks before the marketplaces opened for business, those contractors expressed high optimism that their computer systems would work.The prime contractor for the federal exchange — CGI Federal, a unit of the CGI Group, based in Montreal — and the company operating a "data services hub" for the government — Quality Software Services Inc., a unit of the UnitedHealth Group — told Congress at a hearing on Sept. 10 that they were ready for a surge of users when enrollment opened on Oct. 1.
WASHINGTON — Robyn J. Skrebes of Minneapolis said she was able to sign up for health insurance in about two hours on Monday using the Web site of the state-run insurance exchange in Minnesota, known as MNsure . Ms. Skrebes, who is 32 and uninsured, said she had selected a policy costing $179 a month, before tax credit subsidies, and also had obtained Medicaid coverage for her 2-year-old daughter, Emma."I am thrilled," Ms. Skrebes said, referring to her policy. "It's affordable, good coverage. And the Web site of the Minnesota exchange was pretty simple to use, pretty straightforward. The language was really clear."The experience described by Ms. Skrebes is in stark contrast to reports of widespread technical problems that have hampered enrollment in the online health insurance marketplace run by the federal government since it opened on Oct. 1. While many people have been frustrated in their efforts to obtain coverage through the federal exchange, which is used by more than 30 states, consumers have had more success signing up for health insurance through many of the state-run exchanges, federal and state officials and outside experts say.Alan R. Weil, the executive director of the National Academy for State Health Policy, an independent nonpartisan group, credited the relative early success of some state exchanges to the fact that they could leap on problems more quickly than the sprawling, complex federal marketplace."Individual state operations are more adaptable," Mr. Weil said. "That does not mean that states get everything right. But they can respond more quickly to solve problems as they arise."In addition, some states allow consumers to shop for insurance, comparing costs and benefits of different policies, without first creating an online account — a barrier for many people trying to use the federal exchange.The state-run exchange in New York announced Tuesday that it had signed up more than 40,000 people who applied for insurance and were found eligible."This fast pace of sign-ups shows that New York State's exchange is working smoothly with an overwhelming response from New Yorkers eager to get access to low-cost health insurance," said Donna Frescatore, the executive director of the state exchange.In Washington State, the state-run exchange had a rocky start on Oct. 1, but managed to turn things around quickly by adjusting certain parameters on its Web site to alleviate bottlenecks. By Monday, more than 9,400 people had signed up for coverage. The Washington Health Benefit Exchange does not require users to create an account before browsing plans."The site is up and running smoothly," said Michael Marchand, a spokesman for the Washington exchange. "We're seeing a lot of use, a lot of people coming to the Web site. If anything, I think it's increasing."Other states reporting a steady stream of enrollments in recent days include California, Connecticut, Kentucky and Rhode Island.In Connecticut, a spokesman for the state-run exchange, Access Health CT, said users have generally had a smooth experience with the Web site other than "a couple of bumps and hiccups on the first day."By Monday afternoon, the Connecticut exchange had processed 1,175 applications, said the spokesman, Jason Madrak.Daniel N. Mendelson, the chief executive of Avalere Health, a research and consulting company, said: "On balance, the state exchanges are doing better than the federal exchange. The federal exchange has, for all practical purposes, been impenetrable. Systems problems are preventing any sort of meaningful engagement.""By contrast," said Mr. Mendelson, who was a White House budget official under President Bill Clinton, "in most states, we can get information about what is being offered and the prices, and some states are allowing full enrollment. All the state exchanges that we have visited are doing better than the federal exchange at this point."In California, Peter V. Lee, the executive director of the state-run exchange, said that more than 16,000 applications had been completed in the first five days of open enrollment. Mr. Lee said that while the consumer experience "hasn't been perfect," it has been "pretty darn good."Some state-run exchanges have run into difficulties because they rely on the federal marketplace for parts of the application process, like verifying an applicant's identity. Minnesota, Nevada and Rhode Island are among the states that have reported problems with the "identity-proofing" process, which requires state-run exchanges to communicate with the federal data hub.Brandon Hardy, 31, of Louisville, Ky., was one of the first to sign up for health insurance through Kentucky's state-run exchange, working with an application counselor who guided him through the process last Wednesday. Mr. Hardy, who is uninsured and has epileptic seizures that land him in the hospital every few months, spent about 45 minutes filling out the online application, and learned that he would be eligible for Medicaid under the health care law."It was pretty easy," Mr. Hardy said of the process. "What I really need is a neurologist, and now hopefully that will happen. This is like a huge relief."Attempts to sign up for coverage through the federal marketplace have often proved more frustrating.Bruce A. Charette, 60, of Tulsa, Okla., said he had been trying to log onto the Web site for the federal exchange since last Wednesday, but had not been able to see the available plans or their rates.Mr. Charette said he was asked verification questions that did not appear to match his identity. One question, he said, asked about the name of a pet for which he had purchased health insurance two years ago. "I don't have any pets," he said."It's obvious that the site is overloaded," said Mr. Charette, an electrician who works in the aviation industry and said he did not have health insurance. "I am not going to stare at a computer screen for 45 minutes, waiting for a response. It looks as if the Web site is freezing up."Still, some groups helping people sign up for insurance through the federal marketplace said they were finally able to complete applications on Tuesday, a week into open enrollment."This was the first day that I have been able to get onto the Web site and sign people up," said Laura Line, corporate assistant director for Resources for Human Development in Philadelphia, which has a contract to help people in Southeastern Pennsylvania enroll in health plans through the federal exchange. "We have been setting appointments and answering a ton of phone calls now that we are able to do something."
WASHINGTON — The federal government has continued to enroll critically ill people in clinical trials at the National Institutes of Health since the government shutdown began last week, but the pace has slowed drastically, and many other sick people are having to wait for treatment.As elected officials try to sway public opinion on which party bears responsibility for the shutdown, lawmakers, advocates and news reports have raised the specter of children with cancer being kept from potentially lifesaving treatments because financing has been cut off.While enrollment has slowed significantly, it has not stopped. On Wednesday, more than a week into the shutdown, N.I.H. officials said that the agency had continued to admit critically ill patients to existing clinical trials, of which more than 1,400 run at any given time. About 12 patients were enrolled between Oct. 1, when the government shutdown began, and Oct. 8. Most were cancer patients, said Renate Myles, an N.I.H. spokeswoman.That is substantially fewer than would have been enrolled had there been no shutdown. In a typical week, the agency enrolls roughly 200 new patients. About 30 of those are children, a third of whom have cancer.Officials stressed that only patients in imminent danger of dying were being waved through during the shutdown. Those patients still have to fit the criteria for the trial, and the researchers have to conclude that the treatment — a new drug therapy, for example — would offer hope for an improved outcome.Karen Armenta, a 5-year-old from Wisconsin, is one of the lucky few. She was found to have leukemia when she was 4, said her mother, Tania Santillan, but after intensive treatment, including chemotherapy, she seemed to have beaten it. But last week, a blood test turned up bad news: the cancer had come back. Her doctors immediately contacted researchers at the N.I.H., but they were unsure if Karen would be admitted."They said, 'We don't know if they are going to admit her because of the government shutdown,' and I was like, 'Oh my gosh,' " said Ms. Santillan, whose contact information was provided by the Children's Inn, a private, nonprofit residence on the N.I.H. campus.To Ms. Santillan's relief, the researchers called her daughter's doctors back later that day and said they would admit Karen, as she was critically ill and met the criteria for a study."I'm feeling pretty good about it now," her mother said.The shutdown has drastically reduced the level of staff at the N.I.H. About three-quarters of its employees, more than 13,000 people, are furloughed. So while the agency continues to provide treatment to patients who were already enrolled in trials, they are not enrolling many new patients because they do not have the staff to complete the process. No new studies are being started during the shutdown, and at least seven new trials had been delayed as of Wednesday.Clinical trials are not the only public health worry that has emerged as the shutdown continues. More than two-thirds of employees at the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention are furloughed, leaving no staff members to conduct important monitoring activities. For example, there are no employees to track the flu virus or to conduct genetic testing on it, leaving researchers with no information about how it is spreading or where it is most intense."Last flu season was early and severe," said Barbara Reynolds, a spokeswoman for the C.D.C. "This flu season, we are not going to know."Ms. Reynolds said the agency had been monitoring about 30 food-borne illnesses at the time of the shutdown. Its small team of eight illness sleuths was reduced to one for the first few days, but quickly went back up to seven when officials decided that more workers were needed to perform all of the critical monitoring tasks. Among the illnesses the C.D.C. is tracking is a salmonella outbreak traced to raw chicken from facilities in California.Other types of monitoring are also impaired. The Food and Drug Administration said nearly 1,000 of its approximately 1,600 investigators, who inspect everything from food facilities to drug makers, were furloughed.The N.I.H., with its 27 institutes and centers, is the largest source of financing for medical research in the world. It processes thousands of grant applications every year, but during the shutdown, that work has ground to a halt.The timing — the beginning of the fiscal year — is particularly bad, researchers said. Some experts worry that future research will be at risk if the shutdown drags on for weeks. Financing is also suspended for N.I.H. employees to travel to scientific meetings and for the training of graduate students and postdoctoral fellows at N.I.H. facilities.
For more than a century, researchers were puzzled by the uncanny ability of cancer cells to evade the immune system. They knew cancer cells were grotesquely abnormal and should be killed by white blood cells. In the laboratory, in Petri dishes, white blood cells could go on the attack against cancer cells. Why, then, could cancers survive in the body?The answer, when it finally came in recent years, arrived with a bonus: a way to thwart a cancer's strategy. Researchers discovered that cancers wrap themselves in an invisible protective shield. And they learned that they could break into that shield with the right drugs.When the immune system is free to attack, cancers can shrink and stop growing or even disappear in lucky patients with the best responses. It may not matter which type of cancer a person has. What matters is letting the immune system do its job.So far, the drugs have been tested and found to help patients with melanoma, kidney and lung cancer. In preliminary studies, they also appear to be effective in breast cancer, ovarian cancer and cancers of the colon, stomach, head and neck, but not the prostate.It is still early, of course, and questions remain. Why do only some patients respond to the new immunotherapies? Can these responses be predicted? Once beaten back by the immune system, how long do cancers remain at bay?Still, researchers think they are seeing the start of a new era in cancer medicine."Amazing," said Dr. Drew Pardoll, the immunotherapy research director at Johns Hopkins School of Medicine. This period will be viewed as an inflection point, he said, a moment in medical history when everything changed."A watershed moment," said his colleague, Dr. Michel Sadelain. (Both say they have no financial interests in the new drugs; Dr. Pardoll says he holds patents involving some immunotherapy drugs, but not the ones mentioned in this article.)Researchers and companies say they are only beginning to explore the new immunotherapies and develop others to attack cancers, like prostate, that seem to use different molecules to evade immune attacks. They are at the earliest stages of combining immunotherapies with other treatments in a bid to improve results."I want to be very careful that we do not overhype and raise patients' expectations so high that we can never meet them," said Dr. Alise Reicin, a vice president at Merck for research and development.But the companies have an incentive to speed development of the drugs. They are expected to be expensive, and the demand huge. Delays of even a few months means a huge loss of potential income.Nils Lonberg, a senior vice president at Bristol-Myers Squibb, notes that immunotherapy carries a huge advantage over drugs that attack mutated genes. The latter approach all but invites the cancer to escape, in the same way bacteria develop resistance to antibiotics.By contrast, immunotherapy drugs are simply encouraging the immune system to do what it is meant to do; it is not going to adapt to evade the drugs."We are hoping to set up a fair fight between the immune system and the cancer," Dr. Lonberg said.The story of the new cancer treatments started with the discovery of how cancers evade attacks. It turned out that they use the body's own brakes, which normally shut down the immune system after it has done its job killing virus-infected cells.One braking system, for example, uses a molecule, PD-1, on the surface of T-cells of the immune system. If a target cell has molecules known as PD-L1 or PD-L2 on its surface, the T-cell cannot attack it.So some cancer cells drape themselves in those molecules. The effect, when T-cells are near, is like turning off a light switch. The T-cells just shut down.Cancers that do not use PD-L1 or PD-L2 are thought to use other similar systems, just starting to be explored. Body systems have a lot of redundancy to tamp down immune attacks. But for now, the PD system showed researchers how cancer cells can evade destruction."That is what has been realized in the past few years," said Ira Mellman, vice president of research oncology at Genentech. "Tumor cells are making use of this brake."The discovery led to an idea: Perhaps a drug that covered up any of those PD molecules, on the cancer cells or on white blood cells, would allow the immune system to do its job.
William Howard Taft, the only massively obese man ever to be president of the United States, struggled mightily to control his weight a century ago, worrying about his health and image, and endured humiliation from cartoonists who delighted in his corpulent figure. But new research has found that his weight-loss program was startlingly contemporary, and his difficulties keeping the pounds off would be familiar to many Americans today.On the advice of his doctor, a famed weight-loss guru and author of popular diet books, he went on a low-fat, low-calorie diet. He avoided snacks. He kept a careful diary of what he ate and weighed himself daily. He hired a personal trainer and rode a horse for exercise. And he wrote his doctor, Nathaniel E. Yorke-Davies, with updates on his progress, often twice a week.In a way, he was ahead of his time. Obesity became a medical issue by the middle of the 20th century, around the time the term "obesity" rather than "corpulence" came into vogue, said Abigail C. Saguy, a sociologist at the University of California, Los Angeles, who specializes in the study of obesity. Taft's story shows that "at least in some cases, corpulence was already treated as a medical problem early in the century," she added.Like many dieters today, Taft, 6 feet 2 inches tall, lost weight and regained it, fluctuating from more than 350 to 255 pounds. He was 48 when he first contacted Dr. Yorke-Davies, and spent the remaining 25 years of his life corresponding with the doctor and consulting other physicians in a quest to control his weight.Taft's struggles are recounted by Deborah Levine, a medical historian at Providence College in Rhode Island. She analyzed the extensive correspondence between Taft and the diet doctor, including Taft's diet program, his food diary, and a log of his weight. Her findings were published Monday in The Annals of Internal Medicine.His story, Dr. Levine said, "sheds a lot of light on what we are going through now."Obesity — often said to be a product of our sedentary lifestyle and fast foods — has been a concern for over a century.Obesity experts said Taft's experience highlights how very difficult it is for many fat people to lose substantial amounts of weight and keep it off, and how little progress has been made in finding a combination of foods that lead to permanent weight loss."Maybe we are looking for something that doesn't exist," said David B. Allison, the director of the Nutrition Obesity Research Center at the University of Alabama at Birmingham.Doctors today would most likely offer Taft weight-loss surgery — which could have a big effect on weight — or drugs, which have a small effect at best. But the diet he was advised to follow would be largely unchanged, Dr. Allison said.Dr. Levine became interested in Taft's story when she read old newspaper articles that mentioned he was working with Dr. Yorke-Davies to lose weight. She found their letters in the Library of Congress.Dr. Yorke-Davies was known for creating strict personal diet plans for his patients. In a relationship sustained entirely by mail, he advised Taft to lose at least 60 to 80 pounds.Meals were to be eaten at certain times and meats were to be weighed. Taft was to eat a small portion of lean meat or fish at every meal, cooked vegetables at lunch and dinner (no butter), a plain salad, and stewed or baked fruit (unsweetened). He got a single glass of "unsweetened" wine at lunch. The doctor also allowed his own diet product, gluten biscuits, that were produced to his specifications in London. Taft bought them and had them shipped to the United States.Taft tried to adhere to the program and also employed a personal trainer, known at the time as "a physical culture man."By April 1905, six months after he first wrote to the doctor, Taft had lost 60 pounds. But even though people told him he looked good, he was "continuously hungry," he wrote the doctor.Taft began to gain back the weight and stopped writing to the doctor, who asked Taft's friends and family what was going on. After learning Taft had regained 19 pounds, he told Taft he needed to return to his diet program or "in another three or four years you will be almost back to your original weight."By the time Taft was inaugurated as president in 1909, he had indeed regained all he had lost, and more, weighing 354 pounds. He became the butt of jokes, with many relishing a story that he had gotten stuck in a White House bathtub.But Taft never gave up. When he died in 1930, he weighed 280 pounds.The tale is strikingly modern, obesity experts said. The self-monitoring — weighing himself daily, keeping a food diary — are "the fundamental tenets of changing behavior," said Dr. Kimberly Gudzune, an obesity researcher at Johns Hopkins. "Keep yourself accountable."In some ways Taft got the sort of medical care doctors today wish they could provide. He was in constant touch with his doctor over a period of many years."That is really a model we try to strive for today," Dr. Gudzune said. She sees her patients once a month, a frequency that, for most primary care doctors, "is almost unheard-of."She and others were also struck by Taft's persistent hunger pangs.Dr. Jules Hirsch, an obesity researcher at Rockefeller University, said losing a substantial amount of weight and keeping it off amounts to telling the body it is starving. He saw this in his own pioneering studies decades ago. Fat people agreed to live in a hospital ward while they dieted to a normal weight. But they were ravenous and almost every one of them eventually succumbed to intense hunger and regained the weight that was so painfully lost."One of the most important drives we have is to prevent starvation," Dr. Hirsch said.
A medical researcher from Columbia University, Dr. Perry Hudson, made the skid row alcoholics in Lower Manhattan an offer: If they agreed to surgical biopsies of their prostates, they would get a clean bed and three square meals for a few days, plus free medical care and treatment if they had prostate cancer.It was the 1950s, and Dr. Hudson was trying to prove that prostate cancer could be caught early and cured. But he did not warn the men he was recruiting that the biopsies to search for cancer could cause impotence and rectal tears. Or that the treatment should cancer be found — surgery to remove their prostates and, often, their testicles — had not been proven to prolong life. But he said in a recent telephone interview that he believed the treatments did prolong life. "I told them the cure rate is extremely high," he said.As more than 1,200 men living in flophouses on the Bowery signed up for Dr. Hudson's study in the 1950s and '60s, neither his academic peers nor the federal officials overseeing his grants criticized his ethics, but times have changed. Two papers published on Thursday in the American Journal of Public Health and the Bulletin of the History of Medicine prompted medical historians to denounce this largely forgotten chapter in the history of government-financed medical research on vulnerable populations.They said the Bowery study was unethical, because of both the powerlessness of the people who participated in it and the things done to them."The invasiveness of this particular research was really horrendous," said Alan Brandt, a Harvard medical historian who has written about the Tuskegee experiment, in which hundreds of poor black men with syphilis were left untreated to observe the natural course of the disease, a study that began in 1932 and was not halted by the United States Public Health Service until 1972.Dr. Robert Aronowitz, an internist and medical historian at the University of Pennsylvania who wrote the new papers, stumbled upon the Bowery study — which was led by Dr. Hudson, a urologist trained at Johns Hopkins, and paid for by the National Institutes of Health, among others — and was so troubled by it that he became consumed with documenting what had happened."Hudson used Bowery men because only desperate, poor, and unknowing men would participate," Dr. Aronowitz wrote. "It was unimaginable that the average American man would volunteer."Dr. Hudson's colleagues did not question his use of down-and-out men with alcoholism, some of them mentally ill, or his failure to carefully inform them of the potential risks of his research, said Dr. William Parry, a urologist at the University of Rochester at the time.In the 1950s, prostate cancer was usually discovered late after it had spread and was almost always fatal."It was an entirely different era," said Dr. Parry, now 89 and an emeritus professor at the University of Oklahoma.In fact, as Dr. Hudson pursued his research, his work was widely cited in urological journals and textbooks and admiringly featured in a 1958 photography spread in Life magazine.Dr. Aronowitz cites a popular history, "The Bowery Man," published in 1961, in which the author, Elmer Bendiner, reported that staff members at a city-run lodging house where study participants stayed helped Dr. Hudson ensure their participation."Once a man chosen for the study was persuaded to volunteer, the authorities lifted his meal ticket and returned it only when he had kept his appointment," Mr. Bendiner wrote.Dr. Hudson himself makes no apologies for recruiting impoverished alcoholics. Now 96 and living in South Pasadena, Fla., he said in recent interviews that the men volunteered, they were not paid and they got "the best care in New York."Doctors in private practice would never have allowed their patients to get biopsies since they assumed the disease was fatal, he said.Dr. Hudson was 33 and had just taken a position as head of urology at the Francis Delafield Hospital, a public cancer hospital in New York, when he and his colleagues began recruiting homeless men in 1951. He got the idea of going to the Bowery when he was caring for a man who had been a Princeton history professor but ended up a homeless alcoholic living there.At first, Dr. Hudson said, the Bowery men resisted his offers. He recalled speaking at one of the flophouses just before bedtime. "I had a lot of old vegetables thrown at me," he said. "I was talking about making a small incision in a very interesting part of their anatomy." But many eventually agreed to participate.
People with fatal diseases may be willing to try risky treatments that have a chance of saving their lives. But when is the risk too high?That question was at the heart of a decision announced Thursday by the Food and Drug Administration to suspend sales of a leukemia drug, Iclusig, that was keeping patients alive but also significantly raising their odds of heart attacks, strokes, blindness, death and amputations.Despite the potential consequences, several doctors who treat people with the disease, chronic myeloid leukemia, said there were patients for whom nothing else works, and whose lives depend on the drug."My concern is that I have patients right now who are benefiting from this medication with very few side effects, and if they're on the end of a one-month prescription, what's going to happen when their medication runs out?" said Dr. Brian Druker, the director of the Knight Cancer Institute at Oregon Health and Science University. "Without this medication, they won't have long to live. My patients are panicked."The drug agency has said that patients who need the drug will still be able to obtain it, but that doctors will have to file applications for each patient, a process that some say is cumbersome and might leave patients tangled up in red tape, with no pills.Dr. Michael Mauro, a leukemia specialist at Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center in New York, said that 23 leukemia specialists and three patient advocacy groups had sent the drug agency a letter saying they were concerned that the sudden withdrawal of the drug would interrupt treatment for patients with no other good options.Iclusig, also called ponatinib, was approved in December 2012 to treat patients who had chronic myeloid leukemia that did not respond to other drugs. The disease is a relatively uncommon form of leukemia, with about 5,000 cases a year and 600 deaths in the United States. The wholesale price of the drug was $115,000 a year.Iclusig was given accelerated approval by the drug agency under a program that allows some important drugs to reach the market quickly, without the full evidence of safety and efficacy that the agency usually requires but subject to further studies to confirm the drug's benefit.Critics might say Iclusig's approval is a sign that accelerated approval can allow dangerous drugs on the market. But supporters of the program say the fact that marketing of Iclusig is being suspended is a sign that the system is working as intended.Iclusig is part of a new generation of "targeted" drugs that act against specific biochemical defects that fuel the explosive growth of certain types of cancer. The first of these drugs for chronic myeloid leukemia was Gleevec. (Dr. Druker was one of its developers.) It revolutionized the treatment of the illness and transformed it from a death sentence into a chronic disease that people could live with for many years.Iclusig is one of several drugs developed for patients who did not respond to Gleevec, or who became resistant to it.But even though these powerful new drugs are specifically designed to fight cancer cells, they also find their way to other targets, including the cardiovascular system.In a bulletin on Thursday, the drug agency said that 24 percent of patients taking Iclusig who were studied for a median of 1.3 years, and 48 percent studied for a median of 2.7 years, had suffered "serious adverse vascular events." Those figures are unusually high, and higher than what was reported from the initial studies done before the drug was approved.The events included blockages in blood vessels that led to heart attacks, strokes, blindness and lack of blood flow to the extremities. Some of the patients were young, in their 20s, and some had no risk factors for heart or artery disease.A spokeswoman for the drug agency, Stephanie Yao, said that in studies of the drug to date, which involved 530 patients, at least 14 had died from cardiovascular problems.Dr. Frank Haluska, the chief medical officer of Ariad Pharmaceuticals, the Cambridge, Mass., company that makes the drug, said the company was working with the drug agency to analyze the problems and hoped to return the drug to the market. Over all, he said, about 2,000 people have taken the drug.
Determined to get rid of the hepatitis C infection that was slowly destroying his liver, Arthur Rubens tried one experimental treatment after another. None worked, and most brought side effects, like fever , insomnia , depression, anemia and a rash that "felt like your skin was on fire."But this year, Dr. Rubens, a professor of management at Florida Gulf Coast University, entered a clinical trial testing a new pill against hepatitis C. Taking it was "a piece of cake." And after three months of treatment, the virus was cleared from his body at last."I had a birthday in September," Dr. Rubens, 63, said. "I told my wife I don't want anything. It would take away from the magnitude of this gift."Medicine may be on the brink of an enormous public health achievement: turning the tide against hepatitis C, a silent plague that kills more Americans annually than AIDS and is the leading cause of liver transplants. If the effort succeeds, it will be an unusual conquest of a viral epidemic without using a vaccine."There is no doubt we are on the verge of wiping out hepatitis C," said Dr. Mitchell L. Shiffman, the director of the Bon Secours Liver Institute of Virginia and a consultant to many drug companies.Over the next three years, starting within the next few weeks, new drugs are expected to come to market that will cure most patients with the virus, in some cases with a once-a-day pill taken for as little as eight weeks, and with only minimal side effects.That would be a vast improvement over current therapies, which cure about 70 percent of newly treated patients but require six to 12 months of injections that can bring horrible side effects.The latest data on the experimental drugs is being presented at The Liver Meeting in Washington, which ends Tuesday.But the new drugs are expected to cost from $60,000 to more than $100,000 for a course of treatment. Access could be a problem, particularly for the uninsured and in developing countries. Even if discounts or generic drugs are offered to poor countries, there are no international agencies or charities that buy hepatitis C medications, as there are for H.I.V. and malaria drugs.And some critics worry that the bill will be run up when huge numbers of people who would have done fine without them turn to the drugs. That is because many people infected with hepatitis C never suffer serious liver problems."The vast majority of patients who are infected with this virus never have any trouble," said Dr. Ronald Koretz, emeritus professor of clinical medicine at the University of California, Los Angeles.It is impossible to tell in advance whether an infected individual will go on to suffer serious consequences. For patients who can afford them, the temptation to take the new drugs before trouble arises will be powerful.An estimated three to four million Americans are infected with hepatitis C, and about 150 million worldwide — three to five times the number who have H.I.V. Most people who are infected do not know it, because it can take decades for the virus to damage the liver sufficiently to cause symptoms.In the United States, the number of new infections has fallen to about 17,000 a year, from more than 200,000 per year in the 1980s, according to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. There has been a recent rise in cases among young people who inject pain medicines or heroin.About 16,600 Americans had hepatitis C listed as a cause of death on death certificates in 2010, though that might vastly understate the mortality linked to the disease, according to the C.D.C.  Although there are fewer new infections, the number of deaths is expected to keep rising as the infections incurred years ago increasingly take their toll.Hepatitis C is spread mainly by the sharing of needles, though it can also be acquired during sex. The virus was transmitted through blood transfusions before testing of donated blood began in 1992. Dr. Rubens, the recently cured patient, believes he was infected when he worked as a paramedic long ago.The main treatment has been interferon alfa, given in weekly injections for 24 or 48 weeks, combined with daily tablets of ribavirin. Neither drug was developed specifically to treat hepatitis C. The combination cures about half the patients, but the side effects — flulike symptoms, anemia and depression — can be brutal.The new drugs, by contrast, are specifically designed to inhibit the enzymes the hepatitis C virus uses to replicate, the same approach used to control H.I.V. As with H.I.V., two or more hepatitis C drugs will be used together to prevent the virus from developing resistance.One big difference is that H.I.V. forms a latent reservoir in the body, so H.I.V. drugs must be taken for life to prevent the virus from springing back. Hepatitis C does not form such a reservoir, so it can be eliminated permanently.If no virus is detectable in the blood 12 weeks after treatment ends — a measure known as a sustained virologic response — there is almost no chance the virus will come back and the patient is considered essentially cured. The damaged liver can then heal itself somewhat, doctors say.Yet even if the virus is cleared, people who were once infected may still have an increased risk of liver cancer, especially if cirrhosis, a scarring of the liver, has set in.The new drugs now moving to market can achieve sustained viral responses in 80 to 100 percent of patients with treatment durations of 12 to 24 weeks, possibly shorter.For Tom Espinosa, a building inspector in Oakland, Calif., the new treatments cannot arrive fast enough. Mr. Espinosa, 59, has advanced cirrhosis and some spots on his liver that might be cancer. He is so fatigued that he spends all weekend in bed. He has tried all available treatments and nothing worked, making him envious of other patients who were cured."I became resentful for a little while, but I got over it," he said. With time possibly running out, he plans to try the first new drug to hit the market.
The Food and Drug Administration proposed measures on Thursday that would all but eliminate artery-clogging, artificial trans fats from the food supply, the culmination of three decades of effort by public health advocates to get the government to take action against them.Artificial trans fats — a major contributor to heart disease in the United States — have already been substantially reduced in foods. But they still lurk in many popular products, like frostings, microwave popcorn, packaged pies, frozen pizzas, margarines and coffee creamers. Banning them completely could prevent 20,000 heart attacks and 7,000 deaths from heart disease each year, the F.D.A. said."This is the final slam dunk on the trans fat issue," said Barry Popkin, a nutrition epidemiologist at the University of North Carolina, Chapel Hill.The proposal is a rare political victory in an era when many regulations to protect public health have stalled. A landmark food safety bill took years to carry out, in part because it collided with the 2012 election season. And rules to regulate the tobacco industry are still stuck, four years after the law calling for them was passed. But just last month, the F.D.A. toughened restrictions on narcotic painkillers over industry objections. Thursday's announcement got the attention of food experts."The F.D.A. is back," said Marion Nestle, a professor in the department of nutrition, food studies and public health at New York University.The agency has proposed that partially hydrogenated oils, the source of trans fats, no longer be "generally recognized as safe."That means companies would have to prove that such oils are safe to eat, a high hurdle given that scientific literature overwhelmingly shows the contrary. The Institute of Medicine has concluded that there is no safe level for consumption of them, a conclusion that the F.D.A. cited in its reasoning.The agency emphasized that the ruling, which is open to public comment for 60 days, was preliminary. But food producers seemed to take it in stride, in part because many had already made adjustments, and Dr. Margaret A. Hamburg, the agency's commissioner, signaled that the draft rule might be made final."Life has many uncertainties, but we are on a clear track," she said Thursday on a conference call with reporters. Michael Taylor, deputy commissioner for foods at the F.D.A., said, "We have solid evidence showing the need for today's action on trans fat."Partially hydrogenated oils are cheaper than saturated animal fats like butter, and for years were thought to be healthier. They are formed when liquid oil is treated with hydrogen gas and made solid. They became popular in fried and baked goods and in margarine. Crisco, originally marketed in the beginning of the 20th century, was the archetype, although it now contains no trans fat.But over the years, scientific evidence has shown they are dangerous because they raise the levels of so-called bad cholesterol and can lower the levels of good cholesterol. In 2003, the F.D.A. required that artificial trans fats be listed on food labels, a shift that prompted many large producers to eliminate them. Two years later, New York City under Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg told restaurants to stop using artificial trans fats in cooking; other places, including California, Cleveland and Philadelphia, followed suit. Many major chains, like McDonald's, found substitutes and sharply reduced the use of trans fats.Those actions led to a stunning reduction in consumption: Americans ate about one gram a day last year, down from 4.6 grams in 2006. A report from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention found that blood levels of trans fatty acids among white adults in the United States declined by 58 percent from 2000 to 2009.But the fats were not banned. They are required to be listed on food labels only if there is more than half a gram per serving, a trace amount that can add up. Even as little as two or three grams of trans fat a day can increase the health risk, scientists say. (Some trans fats occur naturally. The F.D.A. proposal applies only to those that are added to foods.)"The artery is still half clogged," said Dr. Thomas R. Frieden, the director of the disease centers, who led the charge against the fats in New York when he was health commissioner there.Scientists emphasized that saturated fats are still an enormous problem in the American diet, and that Thursday's ruling should not give consumers false security.
SAVANNAH, Ga. — The uninsured pour into Memorial Health hospital here: the waitress with cancer in her voice box who for two years assumed she just had a sore throat. The unemployed diabetic with a wound stretching the length of her shin. The construction worker who could no longer breathe on his own after weeks of untreated asthma attacks and had to be put on a respirator.Many of these patients were expected to gain health coverage under the Affordable Care Act through a major expansion of Medicaid, the medical insurance program for the poor. But after the Supreme Court in 2012 gave states the right to opt out, Georgia, like about half the states, almost all of them Republican-led, refused to broaden the program.Now, in a perverse twist, many of the poor people who rely on safety-net hospitals like Memorial will be doubly unlucky. A government subsidy, little known outside health policy circles but critical to the hospitals' survival, is being sharply reduced under the new health law.The subsidy, which for years has helped defray the cost of uncompensated and undercompensated care, was cut substantially on the assumption that the hospitals would replace much of the lost income with payments for patients newly covered by Medicaid or private insurance. But now the hospitals in states like Georgia will get neither the new Medicaid patients nor most of the old subsidies, which many say are crucial to the mission of care for the poor."We were so thrilled when the law passed, but it has backfired," said Lindsay Caulfield, senior vice president for planning and marketing at Grady Health in Atlanta, the largest safety-net hospital in Georgia.It is now facing the loss of nearly half of its roughly $100 million in annual subsidies known as disproportionate share hospital payments.Memorial is also facing steep reductions in the subsidies. Cancer care may be among the services reduced, administrators here said. Memorial is now one of only a few hospitals in the state with a tumor clinic that accepts poor patients without insurance. Many show up coughing blood or having trouble breathing because their cancers have gone untreated for so long.On a recent afternoon, Dr. Wade Fletcher, who practices at the hospital, thumbed through a stack of patient intake forms. The sections on payment contained the same refrain: No insurance. No money.Even so, many of the patients work, often in Savannah's huge hotel and restaurant industry. Late last month, Donna Atkins, a waitress at a barbecue restaurant, learned from Dr. Guy Petruzzelli, a surgeon here, that she has throat cancer. She does not have insurance and had a sore throat for a year before going to a doctor. She was advised to get a specialized image of her neck, but it would have cost $2,300, more than she makes in a month."I didn't have the money even to walk in the door of that office," said Ms. Atkins, speaking in a low, throaty whisper.Dr. Petruzzelli has a phrase for her situation: "She failed the wallet biopsy."Ms. Atkins had surgery last Friday, two years after her first symptoms. It is unclear whether Ms. Atkins, whose income is right around the poverty line, will be left without Medicaid, or if she earns enough to qualify for subsidies to buy private insurance on the federal exchange. She appreciates the intent of the health law, but does not like the outcome: Her hours are being cut so her employer can count her as part-time to avoid having to offer insurance.As she juggled takeout orders at the restaurant, Ms. Atkins said she would have to try to find a second job. "I'm 53," she said. "Not too many people want to hire someone my age."Patients with chronic conditions like hers often go in and out of emergency rooms for years without treatment because doctors are only required to treat immediately life-threatening conditions. Dr. Christopher Senkowski, a surgeon at Memorial, recalled examining a farmer with pancreatic cancer that had spread throughout his body after months of referrals to specialists that he could not afford.
Steven L. Zweibel has been taking a statin drug to lower his cholesterol for seven years. It has worked, and he has suffered no problems or side effects.But, like many patients taking these drugs, he is perplexed by new guidelines on preventing heart disease and stroke — despite the fact that he is the director of cardiac electrophysiology at Hartford Hospital."I am very happy to be on Zocor," said Dr. Zweibel, 47, referring to the statin he takes. "But now the real question in my head is whether I need to be on it."The new guidelines, released on Tuesday by the American College of Cardiology and the American Heart Association, represent a remarkable and sudden departure from decades of advice on preventing cardiovascular disease.According to the new advice, doctors should not put most people on cholesterol-lowering medications like statins based on cholesterol levels alone. And, despite decades of being urged to do so, patients need not monitor their cholesterol once they start taking medication. The guidelines do not even set target levels for LDL, the so-called bad cholesterol.Doctors are also being told to stop adding other cholesterol-lowering drugs to statins, because those drugs have not been proved to reduce the risk of heart attacks and strokes.For patients and doctors alike, all of this amounts to a surprising, and at times baffling, change in perspective.The guidelines tell doctors and patients to use a new online risk calculator to determine whether they need treatment. Some patients, like Nancy Hayward, 60, of Sacramento, who started taking a statin in 2007 because her LDL was mildly elevated, do not qualify because they have no other risk factors for heart trouble.Dr. Zweibel would like to use the calculator to assess his own risk of heart attack or stroke. But it requires a person's baseline cholesterol measurement, and Dr. Zweibel has no idea what his is without the statin.He could, and says he probably will, stop taking the drug for a couple of months and then have his cholesterol measured. But what then? Should he stop taking the drug if the calculator says his 10-year risk of a heart attack or stroke is less than 7.5 percent, the new cutoff point for treatment?He worries about letting his cholesterol drift up. There is dementia in his family, and cardiovascular risk factors are also risk factors for dementia."I wonder if Zocor could help" prevent dementia, he said. "It's a very tough decision."By taking a statin diligently, Roland Paul, a 76-year-old corporate lawyer in Greenwich, Conn., managed to reduce his LDL level to an almost unheard-of 55 milligrams per deciliter, a feat of which he is proud. "My doctor thought it was gangbusters," Mr. Paul said.But the guidelines committee now says there is no evidence that he is better off with that number than with a higher one. Mr. Paul said he was no longer as concerned about keeping his cholesterol so low.The new approach poses challenges to clinicians, too. Doctors often use LDL levels as motivators to keep patients on statins. Many expect that the task will be more difficult without regular monitoring.Dr. Barron H. Lerner, an internist and professor of medicine at New York University, gives patients a printout with their LDL levels circled before and after they start taking statins."It is really helpful to have some kind of results to show people," Dr. Lerner said. "I will predict 100 percent that I will have some patients who say, 'If you are not going to check the LDL level and you cannot tell me the statin is working, then I am not going to take it.' "Monitoring LDL levels has been an ingrained part of preventing heart attacks for decades."The terminology that keeps coming to mind is 'leap of faith,' " Dr. Lerner said. "You have to trust your doctor and the people who did the studies that they are correct that you don't have to check LDL levels."
The idea came to Jorge Odón as he slept. Somehow, he said, his unconscious made the leap from a YouTube video he had just seen on extracting a lost cork from a wine bottle to the realization that the same parlor trick could save a baby stuck in the birth canal.Mr. Odón, 59, an Argentine car mechanic, built his first prototype in his kitchen, using a glass jar for a womb, his daughter's doll for the trapped baby, and a fabric bag and sleeve sewn by his wife as his lifesaving device.Unlikely as it seems, the idea that took shape on his counter has won the enthusiastic endorsement of the World Health Organization and major donors, and an American medical technology company has just licensed it for production.With the Odón Device, an attendant slips a plastic bag inside a lubricated plastic sleeve around the head, inflates it to grip the head and pulls the bag until the baby emerges.Doctors say it has enormous potential to save babies in poor countries, and perhaps to reduce cesarean section births in rich ones."This is very exciting," said Dr. Mario Merialdi, the W.H.O.'s chief coordinator for improving maternal and perinatal health and an early champion of the Odón Device. "This critical moment of life is one in which there's been very little advancement for years."About 10 percent of the 137 million births worldwide each year have potentially serious complications, Dr. Merialdi said. About 5.6 million babies are stillborn or die quickly, and about 260,000 women die in childbirth. Obstructed labor, which can occur when a baby's head is too large or an exhausted mother's contractions stop, is a major factor.In wealthy countries, fetal distress results in a rush to the operating room. In poor, rural clinics, Dr. Merialdi said, "if the baby doesn't come out, the woman is on her own."The current options in those cases are forceps — large, rounded pliers — or suction cups attached to the baby's scalp. In untrained hands, either can cause hemorrhages, crush the baby's head or twist its spine.Although more testing is planned on the Odón Device, doctors said it appeared to be safe for midwives with minimal training to use.Along the way, it has won research grants from the United States Agency for International Development and from Grand Challenges Canada. "We've given out $32 million for 61 different innovations, and this one is the farthest along," said Dr. Peter A. Singer, the chief executive of Grand Challenges Canada.The device will be manufactured by Becton, Dickinson and Company, or BD, of Franklin Lakes, N.J., which is better known for making syringes."My first reaction, as soon as I saw it, was positive," said Gary M. Cohen, the company's executive vice president for global health. It was at the World Economic Forum in Davos, Switzerland, that Dr. Merialdi asked him to consider taking it on."Many inventions get to the prototype stage, but that's maybe 15 percent of what needs to be done," Mr. Cohen said. "There's finalizing the design for manufacture, quality control, the regulatory work and clinical studies. Absent that, they don't see the light of day."So far, the device has been safety-tested only on 30 Argentine women, all of whom were in hospitals, had given birth before and were in normal labor."I was glad they asked me, because it was for a good cause," said Luciana Valle, a kindergarten teacher who was 31 two years ago when her son, Matteo, was one of the first babies extracted with the device. Because Matteo weighed almost nine pounds, "it really helped," she said in a telephone interview. "His head came out on my second push."The W.H.O. will now oversee tests on 100 more women in normal labor in China, India and South Africa, and then on 170 women in obstructed labor.In a telephone interview from Argentina, Mr. Odón described the origins of his idea.He tinkers at his garage, but his previous inventions were car parts. Seven years ago, he said, employees were imitating a video showing that a cork pushed into an empty bottle can be retrieved by inserting a plastic grocery bag, blowing until it surrounds the cork, and drawing it out.That night, he won a dinner bet on it.At 4 a.m., he woke his wife and told her the idea that had just come to him. (His own children were born without problems, he said, but he has an aunt who suffered nerve damage from birth.)His wife, he recalled, "said I was crazy and went back to sleep."The next morning, a somewhat skeptical friend introduced him to an obstetrician. "You can imagine these two guys in suits in a waiting room full of pregnant ladies," he said.The doctor was encouraging, so he kept working. Polyethylene replaced the bag his wife had sewn, and the jar was replaced by a plastic uterus.With the help of a cousin, Mr. Odón met the chief of obstetrics at a major hospital in Buenos Aires. The chief had a friend at the W.H.O., who knew Dr. Merialdi, who, at a 2008 medical conference in Argentina, granted Mr. Odón 10 minutes during a coffee break.The meeting instead lasted two hours. At the end, Dr. Merialdi declared the idea "fantastic" and arranged for testing at the Des Moines University simulation lab, which has mannequins more true-to-life than a doll and a jar.Since then, Mr. Odón has continued to refine the device, patenting each change so he will eventually earn royalties on it."My daughter said, 'And now I can have my doll back,' " he said.It is too early to know what BD will charge, Mr. Cohen said, but each device should cost less than $50 to make. While the company expects to profit on all sales, it will charge poor countries less.Dr. Merialdi said he endorsed a modest profit motive because he had seen other lifesaving ideas languish for lack of it. He cited magnesium sulfate injections, which can prevent fatal eclampsia, and corticosteroids, which speed lung development in premature infants."But first, this problem needed someone like Jorge," he said. "An obstetrician would have tried to improve the forceps or the vacuum extractor, but obstructed labor needed a mechanic. And 10 years ago, this would not have been possible. Without YouTube, he never would have seen the video."
For Shawn Schneider, a carpenter and rock musician, the descent into addiction began one Wisconsin winter with a fall from a rooftop construction site onto the frozen ground below. As the potent pain pills prescribed for his injuries became his obsessive focus, he lost everything: his band, his job, his wife, his will to live.Mr. Schneider was staying in his parents' basement when he washed down 40 sleeping pills with NyQuil and beer. His father heard him gasping and intervened, a reprieve that led Mr. Schneider into rehab, not his first program, but the one where he discovered buprenorphine, a substitute opioid used to treat opioid addiction.In the two years since, by taking his "bupe" twice daily and meeting periodically with the prescribing psychiatrist, Mr. Schneider, 38, has rebounded. He is sober, remarried, employed building houses, half of a new acoustic duo and one of the many addicts who credit buprenorphine, sold mostly in a compound called Suboxone, with saving their lives.Suboxone did not save Miles Malone, 20; it killed him. In 2010, a friend texted Mr. Malone an invitation to use the drug recreationally — "we can do the suboxins as soon as I give them to u, iight, dude?" — and he died that night in South Berwick, Me., of buprenorphine poisoning. The friend, Shawn Verrill, was sentenced this summer to 71 months in prison."I didn't know you could overdose on Suboxone," Mr. Verrill said in an interview at a federal prison in Otisville, N.Y. "We were just a bunch of friends getting high and hanging out, doing what 20-year-olds do. Then we went to sleep, and Miles never woke up."Suboxone is the blockbuster drug most people have never heard of. Surpassing well-known medications like Viagra and Adderall, it generated $1.55 billion in United States sales last year, its success fueled by an exploding opioid abuse epidemic and the embrace of federal officials who helped finance its development and promoted it as a safer, less stigmatized alternative to methadone.But more than a decade after Suboxone went on the market, and with the Affordable Care Act poised to bring many more addicts into treatment, the high hopes have been tempered by a messy reality. Buprenorphine has become both medication and dope: a treatment with considerable successes and also failures, as well as a street and prison drug bedeviling local authorities. It has attracted unscrupulous doctors and caused more health complications and deaths than its advocates acknowledge.It has also become a lucrative commodity, creating moneymaking opportunities — for manufacturers, doctors, drug dealers and even patients — that have undermined a public health innovation meant for social good. And the drug's problems have emboldened some insurers to limit coverage of the medication, which cost state Medicaid agencies at least $857 million over a three-year period through 2012, a New York Times survey found.Intended as a long-term treatment for people addicted to opioids — heroin as well as painkillers — buprenorphine, like methadone, is an opioid itself that can produce euphoria and cause dependency. Its effects are milder, however, and they plateau, making overdoses less likely and less deadly. And unlike methadone, buprenorphine (pronounced byoo-pruh-NOR-feen) is available to addicts by prescription, though only from federally authorized doctors with restricted patient loads.Partly because of these restrictions, a volatile subculture has arisen, with cash-only buprenorphine clinics feeding a thriving underground market that caters to addicts who buy it to stave off withdrawal or treat themselves because they cannot find or afford a doctor; to recreational users who report a potent, durable buzz; and to inmates who see it as "prison heroin" and, especially in a new dissolvable filmstrip form, as ideal contraband."It's such a thin strip they'll put it in the Holy Bible, let it melt and eat a page right out of the good book," said Ken Mobley, a jailer in Whitley County, Ky., who randomly screened 50 inmates recently and found 21 positive for Suboxone.Many buprenorphine doctors are addiction experts capable, they say, of treating far more than the federal limit of 100 patients. But because of that limit, an unmet demand for treatment has created a commercial opportunity for prescribers, attracting some with histories of overprescribing the very pain pills that made their patients into addicts.A relatively high proportion of buprenorphine doctors have troubled records, a Times examination of the federal "buprenorphine physician locator" found. In West Virginia, one hub of the opioid epidemic, the doctors listed are five times as likely to have been disciplined as doctors in general; in Maine, another center, they are 14 times as likely.Nationally, at least 1,350 of 12,780 buprenorphine doctors have been sanctioned for offenses that include excessive narcotics prescribing, insurance fraud, sexual misconduct and practicing medicine while impaired. Some have been suspended or arrested, leaving patients in the lurch.Statistics released in the last year show sharp increases in buprenorphine seizures by law enforcement, in reports to poison centers, in emergency room visits for the nonmedical use of the drug and in pediatric hospitalizations for accidental ingestions as small as a lick.Buprenorphine's staunchest proponents see these indicators as a byproduct of the drug's rising circulation and emphasize its safety relative to other opioids."The benefits are high, the risk is low and it is worth it on a population-wide basis," said Dr. Stuart Gitlow, the president of the American Society of Addiction Medicine.But Dr. Robert Newman, a leading advocate of methadone treatment, said, "The safety factor should not be oversold.""It is diverted and sold on the black market," he said. "It is misused, and it does lead to medically adverse consequences, including death. It is associated with a large number of deaths."The addiction drug was a "primary suspect" in 420 deaths in the United States reported to the Food and Drug Administration since it reached the market in 2003, according to a Times analysis of federal data.But buprenorphine is not being monitored systematically enough to gauge the full scope of its misuse, some experts say. The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention does not track buprenorphine deaths, most medical examiners do not routinely test for it, and neither do most emergency rooms, prisons, jails and drug courts."I've been studying the emergence of potential drug problems in this country for over 30 years," said Eric Wish, the director of the Center for Substance Abuse Research at the University of Maryland. "This is the first drug that nobody seems to want to know about as a potential problem."The government has a vested interest in its success.The treatment is the fruit of an extraordinary public-private partnership between a British company and the American government, which financed clinical trials and awarded protection from competition after the drug's patent expired.The company, now a consumer goods giant called Reckitt Benckiser, hired several federal officials who had shepherded the drug, and it has financially supported many of the scientists and doctors who are studying it and advocating its use. But over the last few years, the company's aggressive campaign to protect its lucrative franchise has alienated some of its customers and allies.In an 11th-hour bid to thwart generic competition and dominate the market with its patent-protected Suboxone filmstrip, the company sought to convince regulators that the tablet form, which earned it billions of dollars, now presented a deadly risk to children as packaged in pill bottles.The F.D.A. did not agree. Early this year, it approved generic tablets and asked the Federal Trade Commission to investigate potentially anticompetitive business practices by the company.Reckitt Benckiser defended its advocacy for the Suboxone filmstrip — now its only pharmaceutical product — saying its research showed that the film was safer than the tablets, kept addicts in treatment longer and had less of a street presence. It added that it was overseeing an F.D.A.-required "risk evaluation and mitigation strategy to promote the appropriate use of buprenorphine with the goal to minimize the misuse, abuse and multidose unintentional exposure of these products."Dr. John Mendelson of San Francisco, a consultant for the company, said it could be proud of its management of a difficult product. "Their biggest success so far," he said, "is that the whole system has not imploded, that enough doctors have prescribed the drug appropriately that there has been no move to withdraw it from the market."Ronni Katz, a health official in Portland, Me., is less impressed."I remember the early days when we met with the pharma rep in the area — I don't think he was trying to mislead us — he truly believed it was a miracle drug," she said. "But they way underestimated the potential for abuse, which means to me they really don't understand addiction."Nearly a half-century ago, buprenorphine was born in the laboratory of an English company specializing in mustard and shoe polish, where chemists were competing to invent a less addictive painkiller."We were trying to beat morphine, not methadone," said John W. Lewis, 81, who oversaw the drug's development.Though far more potent than morphine, buprenorphine appeared in animal tests to be unusually safe even in very high doses. In 1971, Dr. Lewis and colleagues traveled to an infirmary in Glasgow to conduct the first human tests — on themselves.Buprenorphine made Dr. Lewis violently ill. "It quite took the edge off our stay in a splendid hotel on the banks of Loch Lomond," he said in a speech, and it exposed the painkiller's "Achilles' heel" — "the rather high incidence of nausea and vomiting."In the mid-1970s, Dr. Lewis began shipping the drug to the United States Narcotic Farm in Lexington, Ky., to test its abuse potential on detoxified addicts. A prison that doubled as a treatment hospital, the farm was home to the government's Addiction Research Center (and at times to jazz greats like Chet Baker, Elvin Jones and Sonny Rollins).With opposition to human research mounting, buprenorphine would be the last drug tested there; government scientists justified the research by arguing that the painkiller also had the potential to treat addiction."Here's the thing: The Lexingtonians were against methadone," said Nancy Campbell, a historian of drug policy. "They felt like addicts liked it too much, and it had overdose potential. They never thought abstinence and 'Just Say No' would work with this population. So they were eager to find an alternative."The idea of using opioid substitutes to treat opioid dependence is based on the premise that long-term drug use profoundly alters the brain, that the craving, seeking and taking of opioids is a "bio-behavioral" compulsion. While addiction is considered a chronic, relapsing disease, experts believe that replacing illegal drugs with legal ones, needles with pills or liquids and more dangerous opioids with safer ones reduces the harm to addicts and to society.Like heroin, buprenorphine attaches to the brain's opioid receptors, but it does not plug in as completely. It is slower acting and longer lasting, attenuating the rush of sensation and eliminating the plummets afterward. Addicts develop a tolerance to its euphoric effects and describe themselves as normalized by it, their cravings satisfied. It also diminishes the effects of other opioids but, studies have shown, does not entirely block them, even at the highest recommended doses.A devoted cadre of government scientists saw buprenorphine as a "holy grail" and over the next few decades "floated in between the public and private sector for most of their careers," Dr. Campbell said. The farm's pharmacist would become an executive vice president of Reckitt Benckiser Pharmaceuticals, for example, and the company would contract with the former National Institute on Drug Abuse director who originally promoted the public-private partnership.It was a collaboration that the company, whose brand names include Lysol, resisted for a long time, said Charles O'Keeffe, a former White House drug policy official who incorporated Reckitt in the United States."They were grocers," he said. "Finally, I went to the board and said, 'It's for the social good.' Ultimately, they relented but said, 'Just don't spend a lot of money.' "He did not have to. The federal drug abuse institute financed the two big clinical trials necessary to win F.D.A. approval for $28 million and later spent an additional $52.4 million for studies at its clinical research sites. At least $19 million more in studies are underway.Further, the F.D.A. granted the company a seven-year monopoly based on its claim that it would never recoup its development costs. (Reckitt now has a market value of $56.7 billion; 21 percent of its operating profits last year came from Suboxone.)Still, hurdles had to be cleared.First, Mr. O'Keeffe said, "We had to change the law because it would have been illegal."The Harrison Narcotics Act of 1914, as interpreted, prohibited doctors from prescribing narcotics to narcotics addicts "to maintain their addictions." In the 1970s, methadone treatment was authorized but limited to clinics where the drug was dispensed, usually daily.The original advocates of buprenorphine, though, wanted to make addiction treatment mainstream rather than segregate addicts in clinics that became lightning rods for community opposition. They wanted doctors in offices to prescribe it, just like any other take-home medication.So Mr. O'Keeffe found "influential members of Congress interested in doing this": Senators Carl Levin, Democrat of Michigan, and Orrin G. Hatch, Republican of Utah, with support from Senator Joseph R. Biden Jr., Democrat of Delaware. In the end, because of law enforcement concerns, the Drug Addiction Treatment Act of 2000 included unique prescribing restrictions: that doctors seek federal permission, get eight hours of training, accept a 30-patient limit and attest to their ability to make counseling referrals.The concerns grew from other countries' experiences with buprenorphine treatment over the previous decade; successes had been accompanied by abuses. So F.D.A. officials insisted on the addition of an "abuse deterrent" — naloxone. If addicts crushed and injected the tablets, the naloxone would precipitate excruciating withdrawal symptoms.The Drug Enforcement Administration was skeptical, saying studies showed that naloxone did not provoke "any evidence of withdrawal" in "a substantial percentage" of opiate abusers, and that the amount in the proposed compound would produce only a half-hour of "unpleasantness" in those susceptible.Skeptical, too, were buprenorphine's original champions at Reckitt, who would have preferred a different additive or more naloxone. "It was not a perfect solution," Dr. Lewis said.Even so, Suboxone — four parts buprenorphine, one part naloxone — was created. And in late 2002, along with Subutex (plain buprenorphine), it was approved by the F.D.A. just as its target audience was about to expand unexpectedly.An estimated 2.5 million Americans were dependent on or abused opioids last year, mostly painkillers, although heroin dependence has skyrocketed, with the number of addicts doubling over a decade to 467,000, government data indicate. In 2010, the last year studied, 19,154 people died of opioid overdoses."Had buprenorphine never been released and all we had was methadone, that number would be much higher," said Dr. Andrew Kolodny, the president of Physicians for Responsible Opioid Prescribing.In the early days of Suboxone, with Reckitt Benckiser barely marketing its own drug, Dr. Kolodny, then a New York City health official, crisscrossed the city with colleagues to spread the word about the new medication, entice public hospitals to try it with $10,000 rewards and urge doctors to get certified."We had New York City staff out there acting like drug reps," Dr. Kolodny said.He himself became a prescriber. "All of a sudden, I started getting calls from white kids on Long Island who were all addicted to pain pills," he said. "It was 2003 or 2004, and my first experience of the painkiller epidemic."A psychiatrist accustomed to the slow, subtle effects of antidepressants and mood stabilizers, Dr. Kolodny was stunned by patients who arrived "a total mess" and in days seemed "back to normal.""I'm thinking, this cures all addictions," he said.Dr. Jeffrey T. Junig of Wisconsin experienced a similar revelation. He was concerned that buprenorphine would create "all these dry drunks, people who were no longer using but who hadn't addressed their defects." Instead, he witnessed something different: "The process of craving opioids itself causes people to be so one-dimensional that it is a defect itself. Freed from the obsession to use, people change."Buprenorphine worked so well on his first patients, middle-aged painkiller addicts, that "they would have tears rolling down their faces talking about how grateful they were," he said.Among them was Shawn Schneider, who had found his way to Dr. Junig after swallowing 400 milligrams of Ambien, thinking, "If I wake up, I wake up; if I die, I die."Like Mr. Schneider, dozens of addicts interviewed portrayed themselves as exhausted and frightened before they started on Suboxone. They acknowledged having "loved" their chosen opiate but not what turned into a miserable existence dominated by drug-seeking to avoid "dope sickness."Travis Norton, 33, gravitated to heroin in adolescence as a result of a misguided infatuation with artist addicts like William S. Burroughs and Kurt Cobain, he said. For years, he cycled through costly abstinence-based programs, always returning to the needle."I was a chronic relapse," said Mr. Norton, who is now an addiction counselor in a Minneapolis suburb. "I was a wreck until I started maintenance therapy in 2003. And I've been great since."Mr. Norton switched for a time to methadone when his Suboxone doctor retired. At that point, Suboxone, around $16 for an average daily dose, was considered "the rich man's methadone." Mr. Norton, not rich but a college-educated professional, found the methadone clinic "a ball and a chain.""I had to travel for my job, and there was zero flexibility," he said. "They had thousands of clients, and I was a number."Dr. Edwin A. Salsitz of Beth Israel Medical Center in New York, who has been treating addiction for decades, said that in the pre-Suboxone universe, he encountered all too many middle-class addicts who refused to set foot in a clinic."And then sometimes, a couple of years later, they'd be H.I.V. positive, or something more catastrophic would have occurred," he said. "There's no way to explain what this meant to the addiction field to have another option besides the clinics."Reckitt Benckiser gradually built a stable of doctors paid to advocate use of the treatment, Dr. Salsitz among them.The recruiting was tough. Those outside the addiction field were reluctant to deal with the hassles of certification, potential visits by the D.E.A. and the addicts themselves. Within the field, buprenorphine faced stiff opposition from the methadone industry as well as traditional rehabilitation programs and the Alcoholics Anonymous movement, which promotes abstinence."With Suboxone, there is a lot of misinformation out there, and the most common is you've replaced one drug with another," said Melissa Iverson, a 48-year-old social worker who lives in Florida and is now on disability because of fibromyalgia.Ms. Iverson first requested anonymity, like most other professionals interviewed, some of whom have never acknowledged their problem to their families, primary care physicians or even insurers. Eventually she decided to "come out of the closet," saying, "The stigma needs to be tackled by real people with real names, or else it will haunt us forever."Relying on ever-escalating doses of painkillers to cope with her chronic pain, she had gone "crazy out of control." Her life revolved around pills; she would pass out smoking in bed and wake up with burns on her hands or get into car accidents and nod out in the tow truck. Four years ago, she had "a psychotic break," ended up hospitalized and "came out on Suboxone."In contrast to her painkiller use, she has taken Suboxone at increasingly lower doses, finding that it alleviates her pain without "those self-destructive behaviors.""As an addict, I was high all the time," she said. "With Suboxone, I developed a tolerance within a week. There's zero euphoria."Successes like hers multiplied until demand outstripped supply because of the limited number of doctors and the patient cap. This brought some unintended consequences.First, some prescribers pushed patients off the medication prematurely to replace them with new patients because the early treatment phase was more lucrative. Second, patients began sharing the drug, trading it and selling it. Buprenorphine trickled out onto the street.Health officials, concerned about restricted access, lobbied alongside Reckitt Benckiser for the patient cap to be raised. "Why should we bind a healer's hands from helping as many as he or she could?" Senator Hatch said, getting an amendment passed in 2006 that allowed doctors, on request, to go from 30 to 100 patients after a year.The stage was set for more patients, prescriptions and problems. "It's when the limit was raised from 30 that doctors started to get commercial about it," said Dr. Art Van Zee, whose buprenorphine program at a federally funded community health center in rural Virginia is surrounded by for-profit clinics where doctors charge $100 for weekly visits, pulling in, he estimated, about $500,000 a year."They are not savvy about addiction medicine, don't follow patients very closely, don't do urine testing and overprescribe," he said. "That's how buprenorphine became a street drug in our area."In Fond du Lac, Wis., on the shores of Lake Winnebago, addicts come and go from a bland building housing a medical office, a cheese business and a title company. They bring their tumultuous lives into a tranquil space with hunter green walls, heathered carpet and easy-listening music, presided over by Dr. Junig's wife, Nancy, candy jar by her side.Fond du Lac Psychiatry is the kind of setting the original idealists envisioned. They did not foresee the buprenorphine mega-clinics that resemble and frequently double as painkiller pill mills, sometimes with armed guards to protect their cash.They did not foresee a buprenorphine empire like the one Dr. Thomas E. Radecki, 67, built in northwestern Pennsylvania.According to the evidence presented to a grand jury this summer, Dr. Radecki operated four clinics under the business name Doctors and Lawyers for a Drug-Free Youth, serving 1,000 people, many of whom did not need or use buprenorphine and resold it in their neighborhoods. To override the patient limit, he employed other doctors part time. He sold the drug directly to patients, which is legal, and was the country's largest individual buyer of buprenorphine in the first half of last year, according to investigators. The previous year, he netted $280,000 in profits from the tablets alone, they said.In August, the Pennsylvania attorney general announced Dr. Radecki's arrest on charges of improper prescribing and trading addiction drugs for sex. His lawyer, John Froese, said Dr. Radecki "denies that he ever prescribed any medicine that was not helpful to his patients" or had sexual relationships with his buprenorphine patients.Dr. Radecki lost his Illinois license for just such a relationship, and his Pennsylvania license was made probationary in 2007. Nonetheless, the federal government subsequently authorized him to prescribe buprenorphine and then expand his patient load."Very few if any" doctors are denied permission unless they are "under investigation or something pops up," said Rusty Payne, a D.E.A. spokesman.The Times analyzed the disciplinary records of the doctors on the federal government's online listing of buprenorphine providers, which is not comprehensive because doctors can opt out, and calculated state-by-state disciplinary rates.In 30 of the 31 states that provided their overall disciplinary rates for comparison, buprenorphine doctors are far more likely to have been sanctioned than doctors over all. In Florida and Kentucky, they are four times as likely to have been sanctioned. In New York, they are six times as likely; in Arizona, seven times; in Minnesota, nine times; and in Louisiana, 10 times.Rates are even higher for the subset certified to treat the maximum patient load, The Times found in analyzing records from a sampling of states.In Ohio, nearly 17 percent have disciplinary records, compared with 1.6 percent of all doctors. They include individuals sanctioned for: amphetamine addiction coupled with a Medicaid-fraud conviction; conducting an "excessive number of invasive procedures"; smuggling steroids from Mexico; engaging in conversations regarding a "murder for hire" and neglecting to report the rape of a pediatric patient; "digitally penetrating" patients and having sexual intercourse with them in the office.Some were reprimanded or placed on probation before becoming Suboxone doctors; others, stripped of their licenses recently, had their offices shuttered.This adds to the volatility of the treatment culture.A 30-year-old Michigan woman said she was invited into treatment by a doctor who frequented the strip club where she was a bartender and who paid for her medication for several months. When he was placed on probation for "violation of duty/negligence" unrelated to her, she switched to a second doctor, who also got in trouble. After that, the woman bought her buprenorphine on the street for a year — saving $5,500 in medical and counseling fees, she noted — until she found an addiction specialist with an opening.In some areas, like New York City, there is almost a glut of buprenorphine prescribers. In others, specialists routinely turn away addicts begging for help.Reckitt Benckiser recruited "any doctor willing," said one former company drug representative who asked not to be identified to protect her career. Those in her territory ranged from "extremely passionate" to intensely commercial, she said: "One charged a $50 co-pay, and another $500 for an initial visit. I had a few physicians using the medication themselves. One guy was so enthusiastic I signed him up as a treatment advocate, but then it turned out he relapsed and lost his license."Just because doctors have disciplinary histories does not mean that they are unscrupulous. Some of the most knowledgeable, compassionate addiction doctors are former addicts themselves, with medical board actions on their records that sometimes limit their career options.Dr. Junig, 53, is an anesthesiologist with a doctorate in neurochemistry who retrained as a psychiatrist after his own recovery from addiction. He did not intend to become a buprenorphine doctor."To be honest, I was just trying to build a practice," he said.Nor did he intend to become a buprenorphine blogger or the host of an online conversation about the drug through his website Suboxone Forum, which gets 30,000 visits weekly, and a LinkedIn group with nearly 800 professional members. It grew from his initial passion for the treatment — a passion that got him hired briefly as a "treatment facilitator" for Reckitt Benckiser and also got him in trouble.In 2011, the Wisconsin medical board reprimanded him for using "tele-psychiatry" to treat five out-of-state addicts he had seen only over Skype.Over time, Dr. Junig said, he moved "from skeptic to true believer to skeptic." Others similarly modulated their enthusiasm as they gained a nuanced appreciation of the difficulties of managing a complex patient population and a medication that had become a rampant street drug.Some patients stopped and started their medication so they could still use other opiates or mixed it dangerously with drugs like Xanax. Appointments were missed, prescriptions "lost." Patients cheated, dropped out and relapsed, sometimes fatally.Joseph McMahon IV, a gregarious, troubled New Yorker, was prescribed a couple of thousand Suboxone pills over nearly three years. Still, he overdosed on other drugs at least five times and at 25 died of one final overdose in December 2011, turning his father, a retired New York City fire lieutenant, into a bereft chronicler of Suboxone abuse."My son swore Suboxone was working for him," Joseph McMahon III said. "But if I'm an alcoholic and you switch my Budweiser for a Bud Lite, sure, I'm doing great. They call Suboxone 'heroin in a pill.' It makes tons of money for the pharmaceutical industry, which has us totally bamboozled, and for these doctors."For Dr. Junig, early positive experiences with older patients have been offset by rocky ones with a new generation of heroin and "poly-drug" abusers.Last spring, he prepared to confront a 26-year-old patient who had landed in an emergency room with an arm infected from injecting cocaine. The man had tried to hide his cocaine use by presenting a specimen of "old urine" to Dr. Junig, who said, "I'm an inch from kicking him out, but I think he'll die if I do."The patient, a mechanic with a young daughter, said he had "slipped up" during a period of homelessness. "It was just cocaine," he said. "I don't even really like cocaine. I wanted to tell you so bad, man. But if I lose the Suboxone, I'll go back to the heroin and the pills, and then I'll be in real trouble."Dr. Junig told the mechanic he would be summoned for surprise testing."What worries me most are the needles," the doctor said. "But people die from cocaine, you know. What you were doing — there's a genuine risk. If you get busted for cocaine, you could end up in a situation where social services are involved. People lose their kids."In late 2009, a discovery made in a Walgreens in Michigan lit up the forums where recovering addicts chat: "Generic bupe!"The F.D.A. had just approved generic Subutex, buprenorphine without the abuse deterrent, despite Reckitt Benckiser's effort to prevent it. It was, according to that post, about one-third the cost of brand-name Suboxone.For the previous six years, Reckitt Benckiser, with the government's support, had successfully discouraged Subutex except in special circumstances. Doctors and insurers, told that Suboxone was safer, had favored it.But then Suboxone itself ended up being diverted, misused and abused by injection, indicating that the safeguard was not foolproof, although Reckitt says it stands by it. So when uninsured patients clamored for the cheaper generic, some doctors, including Dr. Kolodny, started accommodating them."At first, I did believe the marketing that there was a booby trap in there," he said. "But my impression is that it doesn't work as well as promised as an abuse deterrent."The most recent data signal an escalating problem with buprenorphine.Last year, forensic laboratories identified 10,804 drug seizures as buprenorphine, up eightfold from 2006.In 2011, emergency room visits for the nonmedical use of buprenorphine were estimated at 21,483, nearly five times what they were in 2006. Also in 2011, poison centers recorded 3,625 cases of toxic buprenorphine exposure, nearly five times as high as the previous year.More young children were hospitalized because of accidental ingestion of buprenorphine than for any other medication in 2010 and 2011, a federal study found. Another study, financed by Reckitt, of 2,380 buprenorphine overdoses in young children found that 587 had to be hospitalized in intensive care units and that four died.John Burke, the president of the National Association of Drug Diversion Investigators, said buprenorphine remains "down on the totem pole" of worrisome prescription drugs."I wouldn't say buprenorphine is not a serious problem; it's a product for addicts, so the propensity for diversion is probably much higher than with the other prescription drugs," he said. "But oxycodone, hydrocodone, Xanax — those make up the bulk of the problem."Even so, many local authorities say buprenorphine is their nemesis."What we're seeing here in Delta County is really troubling," said Steven C. Parks, a prosecuting attorney in Michigan. "Arrest after arrest of people who are possessing or abusing Suboxone, who don't have a prescription for it, who are shooting it up and who are snorting it.""It's what has followed the oxycodone and the hydrocodone trends here," he added. "We don't have heroin yet."Mr. Parks said a big local pharmacy had stopped stocking the medication because its employees felt "very threatened."Pharmacy robberies for Suboxone alone are rare, but they do happen.In June, Michelle Wilcox, 27, wearing a hooded sweatshirt and surgical gloves, handed a Maine pharmacy technician a note: "Give me all the 8 mg Subs you have. I have a weapon and I will use it." She walked out with 84 doses of Suboxone — worth about $640 — and drove off in a pickup truck, only to be arrested within hours, according to documents and interviews."She was just desperate," said Sheriff Scott Nichols of Franklin County, Me. "She said her own medication had been stolen."Ms. Wilcox awaits sentencing after pleading guilty to felony robbery charges in federal court.In Maine, Ms. Katz, the Portland health official, described a seemingly unstoppable flow of Suboxone onto the streets in recent years, with addicts injecting it. Shawn Verrill, serving time for Miles Malone's death from buprenorphine, said he used to sell the drug in York Beach to supplement his income as a lobster deliveryman."Every kid on the beach was looking for it," he said. "The high lasts all day."Mr. Verrill said he bought cases of "stop signs" from a pharmacist and charged $10 to $12 for each orange hexagonal Suboxone tablet, earning $4,500 in a good month.Most buprenorphine advocates interviewed said they believed that deaths were extremely rare. But Suboxone and Subutex were considered the "primary suspect" in 690 deaths — 420 in the United States — reported to the F.D.A. from spring 2003 through September.This pales in comparison with the 2,826 deaths from methadone reported to the F.D.A. over roughly the same period, as calculated by AdverseEvents, a company that analyzes data on drug side effects. C.D.C. data, drawn from death certificates, makes it clear that number is a serious undercount. The C.D.C. does not track buprenorphine deaths, which may also be undercounted.The F.D.A. information, which is spare, does show that more than half the American buprenorphine deaths involved other substances and that only two of 224 cases specifying "route of administration" indicated injection — the primary concern of regulators.Fifty deaths are listed as suicides, and 69 involve unintentional overdoses, drug abuse or drug misuse. Thirty were fetal or infant deaths after exposure in the womb.Outside the United States, 118 of the 270 deaths reported were in Sweden. Last year, Sweden's National Board of Forensic Medicine published an analysis of 100 autopsies where buprenorphine had been detected. In two-thirds, it was the direct cause of death, mostly in combination with other drugs. Swedish researchers attributed the "fatal intoxication" to low tolerance because of first-time use or a period of abstinence.The F.D.A. cautions against assuming that a "primary suspect" drug was indeed a cause of death.But Brian M. Overstreet, the president of AdverseEvents, said, "The reality is that hundreds of thousands of cases are reported every year by front-line health care providers who purposefully identify a drug as being the primary suspect cause of a specific adverse event."We believe that the link between drug and event," he continued, "is quite real."In July, his mother told a federal judge: "I try very hard to forget the last time that I saw him at his wake. He wasn't smiling at me. He didn't hug me. I touched his hand, and he didn't touch me back."Mr. Verrill pleaded guilty to the distribution of buprenorphine resulting in death. "I feel guilty," he said in the recent interview, wearing prison khaki, his arms inked with the saying, "What goes around comes around."They were friends who had met on the beach.On the evening of Oct. 12, 2010, Mr. Malone dropped by Mr. Verrill's garage apartment with a mutual friend. He appeared "high but not wasted," Mr. Verrill said, although a convenience store clerk had called the police saying Mr. Malone had seemed worryingly intoxicated.All three young men did drugs. Mr. Verrill and the friend snorted Suboxone and swallowed some tranquilizers. Mr. Malone took only Suboxone, two tablets under his tongue, Mr. Verrill said. Then they smoked marijuana, listened to country music and played video games.Mr. Verrill said he covered Mr. Malone with a blanket when he himself went to bed, thinking he was just sleeping.Maine's medical examiner said Mr. Malone died of buprenorphine toxicity. Traces of marijuana, but no alcohol or other drugs, were found in his system; the level of buprenorphine, though, was high for just two pills.Before being taken into federal custody, Mr. Verrill served time at a county jail on other charges. Suboxone was everywhere, he said, with detainees paying $20 for a quarter-strip that, transformed with water into a crushable pill for snorting, was enough to "rock" two people whose systems were clean of drugs."People were beating each other up and taking their commissary food to sell it and buy Suboxone," he said.Referring to the federal prison, he added: "That doesn't happen here. I'm clean now. If I hadn't been arrested for Miles's death, I'd probably be dead myself."Over the years, Reckitt Benckiser started acting more like a pharmaceutical company. It built its Suboxone sales force to about 200; flew members to Italy, Mexico and Spain for motivational meetings; and paid 400 to 500 doctors as advocates, former employees said. It lobbied for influence, the only "corporate round table" member to pay at least $100,000 in dues to the American Society of Addiction Medicine.After losing its exclusive right to sell buprenorphine in 2009, the company used the drug's problems to its advantage. Moving aggressively to protect its franchise, it fought the increased prescribing of generic buprenorphine, or Subutex, by telling doctors they would be responsible for worsening diversion and abuse."We had lists of the Subutex writers, and we were actively targeting them," a former employee said.Even so, over all, Subutex prescribing increased more than tenfold the first year the generic version was sold. Since it was only a matter of time before generic Suboxone would be developed, too, the company began to argue that the black market and the pediatric poisonings demanded a new formulation.That formulation was the filmstrip, individually wrapped with a traceable bar code, which the company believed would be patent protected until 2023.Its release was delayed by F.D.A. concerns that challenged the company's rationale for creating it. First, officials predicted "significant abuse and diversion," noting that 6,000 Suboxone filmstrips went missing during clinical trials.Second, they worried that the film might be more dangerous to children because it could not be easily spit out. The individual wrappers would not help if, once opened, each dose was divided, as is common, the F.D.A. said. It demanded better labeling and a patient-counseling plan.Once the film was approved in 2010, Reckitt Benckiser directed its sales force to discourage the use of the tablet by arguing that its packaging made it hazardous to children — "fear-based messaging," one former employee called it; "selling against our own medication," another said.From that point, the company's representatives earned bonuses only for Suboxone film. If they did not reach a target "film market-share penetration" in their territory, they risked being dismissed, as personnel records in an employment-related lawsuit show.The company lured patients directly by offering discounts for the film while raising the price of its tablets. It used rebates to persuade public insurers to give preference to the film. At least 15 state Medicaid agencies do; West Virginia even passed a law banning the pills and requiring the film.In September 2012, Reckitt Benckiser, calling it "a moral obligation," announced that it would withdraw its Suboxone tablets from the market — in six months — because of "increasing concerns with pediatric exposure." It effectively asked the F.D.A. to block generic tablets for the same reason, citing a company-financed study that indicated the film was far safer.The F.D.A. disagreed and approved generic Suboxone tablets early this year.Since then, Reckitt's Suboxone journey has become bumpier. It is battling antitrust lawsuits by a dozen drug wholesalers and insurers who say the company "schemed" to extend its monopoly, overcharging them and, more broadly, the health care system.In July, Reckitt Benckiser's stock suffered its biggest one-day loss in two years after CVS Caremark announced that it would drop the film from its preferred drug list in favor of tablets. And there is a new brand on the shelves, too: Zubsolv, which its manufacturer, Orexo, says has "higher bioavailability, faster dissolve time and smaller tablet size with a new menthol taste." Orexo's United States medical director is Dr. Gitlow, the addiction medical society president.In the third quarter of this year, Reckitt Benckiser's net revenues from Suboxone declined 14 percent from the same period last year, which the company attributes to its discontinuation of the tablets. The company recently announced that it was "reviewing all options" for its pharmaceutical unit, which includes the possibility that it will sell, bringing its profitable foray into the drug business to a close.Dr. Robert L. DuPont, the first director of the national drug abuse institute, said he marveled at the cutthroat business competition when "you couldn't get pharma companies to even think about addiction treatment before this $1.5 billion drug got their attention."At a recent meeting of the addiction medicine society, "the buprenorphine sessions were all packed with doctors who wanted to get in on the gold rush," he said. "It seems to me like they are repeating the experience of pain doctors in terms of reckless disregard of the nonmedical use of the drug."The system could well be at a turning point, with more drug options, lower prices and expanded insurance coverage under the new health care law and an "addiction equity" mandate. In addition, with a recent regulation change, for-profit addiction companies that run methadone clinics are expanding their buprenorphine programs, which have no patient limits, and some state governments are pressing federally funded health centers to increase nonprofit buprenorphine treatment.For now, though, patients whose lives have been transformed by the medication say they feel stressed by the struggle to get and pay for treatment, the long waiting lists, the doctors who overcharge and the ones whose offices are shut down. The misuse and abuse of the drug make even their own relatives suspicious of them — not to mention the public and private insurers that restrict the dosage and length of treatment, despite studies showing that higher doses improve treatment retention rates and that quitting buprenorphine often leads to relapse.Betty Jo Cumberledge, a home health aide in West Virginia, said her insurer paid "forever" for the potent narcotics she took for back pain. But it cut her off this fall after two years of Suboxone treatment for her resulting addiction. "That's just not humanly respectful in my opinion," she said.She handwrote an impassioned letter, complaining that she was being "discriminated against for seeking treatment" and "saying it would be on them when I ended up relapsing and dead." She won a six-month reprieve."The whole situation is a big old mess," she said.
Last week, the nation's leading heart organizations released a sweeping new set of guidelines for lowering cholesterol , along with an online calculator meant to help doctors assess risks and treatment options. But, in a major embarrassment to the health groups, the calculator appears to greatly overestimate risk, so much so that it could mistakenly suggest that millions more people are candidates for statin drugs.The apparent problem prompted one leading cardiologist, a past president of the American College of Cardiology, to call on Sunday for a halt to the implementation of the new guidelines."It's stunning," said the cardiologist, Dr. Steven Nissen, chief of cardiovascular medicine at the Cleveland Clinic. "We need a pause to further evaluate this approach before it is implemented on a widespread basis."The controversy set off turmoil at the annual meeting of the American Heart Association, which started this weekend in Dallas. After an emergency session on Saturday night, the two organizations that published the guidelines — the American Heart Association and the American College of Cardiology — said that while the calculator was not perfect, it was a major step forward, and that the guidelines already say patients and doctors should discuss treatment options rather than blindly follow a calculator.Dr. Sidney Smith, the executive chairman of the guideline committee, said the associations would examine the flaws found in the calculator and determine if changes were needed. "We need to see if the concerns raised are substantive," he said in a telephone interview on Sunday. "Do there need to be changes?"The problems were identified by two Harvard Medical School professors whose findings will be published Tuesday in a commentary in The Lancet, a major medical journal. The professors, Dr. Paul M. Ridker and Dr. Nancy Cook, had pointed out the problems a year earlier when the National Institutes of Health's National Heart, Lung, and Blood Institute, which originally was developing the guidelines, sent a draft to each professor independently to review. Both reported back that the calculator was not working among the populations it was tested on by the guideline makers.That was unfortunate because the committee thought the researchers had been given the professors' responses, said Dr. Donald Lloyd-Jones, co-chairman of the guidelines task force and chairman of the department of preventive medicine at Northwestern University.Drs. Ridker and Cook saw the final guidelines and risk calculator on Tuesday at 4 p.m., when a news embargo was lifted, and saw that the problems remained.On Saturday night, members of the association and the college of cardiology held a hastily called closed-door meeting with Dr. Ridker, who directs the Center for Cardiovascular Disease Prevention at Brigham and Women's Hospital in Boston. He showed them his data and pointed out the problem. On Sunday, officials from the organizations struggled with how to respond.Other experts said there has not been a real appreciation of the difficulties with this and other risk calculators. "I don't think people have a good idea of what needs to be done," said Dr. Michael Blaha, director of clinical research at the Ciccarone Center for the Prevention of Heart Disease at Johns Hopkins University, who was not associated with forming the new guidelines.Dr. Blaha said the problem might have stemmed from the fact that the calculator uses as reference points data collected more than a decade ago, when more people smoked and had strokes and heart attacks earlier in life. For example, the guideline makers used data from studies in the 1990s to determine how various risk factors like cholesterol levels and blood pressure led to actual heart attacks and strokes over a decade of observation.But people have changed in the past few decades, Dr. Blaha said. Among other things, there is no longer such a big gap between women's risks and those of men at a given age. And people get heart attacks and strokes at older ages."The cohorts were from a different era," Dr. Blaha said.This week, after they saw the guidelines and the calculator, Dr. Ridker and Dr. Cook evaluated it using three large studies that involved thousands of people and continued for at least a decade. They knew the subjects' characteristics at the start — their ages, whether they smoked, their cholesterol levels, their blood pressures. Then they asked how many had heart attacks or strokes in the next 10 years and how many would the risk calculator predict.The answer was that the calculator overpredicted risk by 75 to 150 percent, depending on the population. A man whose risk was 4 percent, for example, might show up as having an 8 percent risk. With a 4 percent risk, he would not warrant treatment — the guidelines that say treatment is advised for those with at least a 7.5 percent risk and that treatment can be considered for those whose risk is 5 percent.
PITTSBURGH — The patient is an addict. His doctor is an addict, too. Over the last decade, both men hit their own versions of rock bottom. For the patient, it was the concrete floor of a jail where he writhed in withdrawal. For the doctor, it was the food stamp office where, his career as a child psychiatrist in tatters, he ashamedly sought help.Then they both found buprenorphine, the patient as a user, the doctor as a prescriber. And because of that drug, an opioid used to treat opioid addiction, they both rebounded, even thrived.The patient, Todd Smith, 27, who had developed a painkiller addiction because of a kidney disorder and — "I ain't gonna lie" — moved on to mainlining heroin, built a life with solidity: a car, a townhouse, a job as a mine safety inspector, a live-in fiancée and "knees worn out from praying."The doctor, Allan W. Clark, 52, despite losing his Ohio medical license and being on probation in Pennsylvania for eight years, built a buprenorphine business so bustling that five doctors now work under him. His South Hills Recovery Project, tucked behind a 7-Eleven and beneath a hair salon, vibrates with the hubbub of the 600 addicts treated there.Over the last couple of years, their fates have entwined, with Mr. Smith dependent on "Doc" for the treatment that keeps him stable at an out-of-pocket cost of $7,200 a year and Dr. Clark on "Smitty" and all the other cash-paying patients whose recovery he champions with an us-against-the-world fervor. They have shared, too, a keen awareness that their stability could be precarious."In recovery, you're constantly facing down your demons and dealing with the echoes of your past," Dr. Clark said. "But in the crazy world of buprenorphine, where this medicine that saves lives is harder to get and afford than the drugs that ruin lives, you're battling outside forces, too."It is indeed a crazy world, or at least a vibrant, volatile subculture of people who see "bupe" as a lifeline, often difficult to reach, in an era when drug deaths outnumber those from car crashes. They scramble to find legitimate, affordable treatment even as buprenorphine is increasingly available on the street, with rising indicators of misuse and abuse tainting its reputation.Buprenorphine was developed as a safer alternative to methadone for treating heroin and painkiller addiction, a take-home medication that could be prescribed by doctors in offices rather than dispensed daily in clinics. But in some areas a de facto clinic scene, unregulated, has developed, and it has a split personality — nonprofit treatment programs versus moneymaking enterprises built by individual doctors, some with troubled records.The clinics serve as a crossroads where the tumultuous lives of recovering addicts converge and collide with a turbulent treatment environment.Since March, The New York Times has visited and tracked the patients of two of the largest buprenorphine programs in this region, where addiction rates are high, for-profit clinics have proliferated, doctors go in and out of business and the black market is thriving.Dr. Clark's hectic, cluttered office in suburban Pittsburgh is an entrepreneurial venture with heart where the rumpled doctor dresses in sweatsuits, the boundary between patients and employees is razor thin, the requirements are minimal and the tolerance for missteps is maximal."I know on the surface it might look like a pill mill," he said. "We're seeing a fair number of patients, and they're primarily receiving a prescription. But if you look deeper, you'll see that we don't use the medication in a vacuum. We encourage, we support, we don't judge. There's a kind of love."Sixty miles away, the more formal, structured treatment center at West Virginia University in Morgantown sits atop a hill, ensconced in a hospital complex and presided over by Dr. Carl R. Sullivan III, a career addictionologist who wears a white lab coat and stands professorially at the front of a classroom when he meets his patients in groups: "Are you clean? How many meetings have you been to?" he asks them.Dr. Sullivan, 61, primarily treated alcoholism until "a spectacular explosion of prescription opioid drugs" starting around 2000. He considered opioid addiction "a hopeless disease," with patients leaving rehab and then relapsing and sometimes dying, until he started prescribing Suboxone, the brand-name drug whose main ingredient is buprenorphine, as a maintenance therapy in 2004.He became a paid treatment advocate for the manufacturer, Reckitt Benckiser, delivering, he estimated, 75 talks at $500 each. But, he said, "If the company didn't pay me a nickel, I'd still promote Suboxone because in 2013, it's the best thing that's happened for the opioid addict."Dr. Sullivan is skeptical of the buprenorphine "empires" in Pittsburgh — though not of Dr. Clark specifically, whom he does not know — believing that they feed the black market and tar the medication's reputation. Dr. Clark, in turn, is skeptical of "ivory tower" addiction programs with rigid rules and of doctors who, in his view, collude with the pharmaceutical industry."Big Pharma is in it for the super profits; we should be in it for the patients," said Dr. Clark, who nonetheless became a buprenorphine doctor partly because he needed to dig himself out of a financial hole.Tall and lumbering, his balding head covered by a plaid cap, Mr. Smith strode into Dr. Clark's office last spring with the familiarity of a clinic V.I.P., somebody whose urine is so consistently clean that he does not need to have his "pee tests" observed."Hey, Smitty, good to see you, my friend," Dr. Clark said, propping his sneakered feet on his desk and swigging from his habitual can of Red Bull. By his side, a harness whip, a gift from a patient, sat beneath the framed diplomas hanging crookedly on the wall."Hey, Doc," Mr. Smith said, settling his 270-pound frame into an armchair. He had hurried back from a job building windmills in Alaska just in time to get his next month's prescription: four 8-milligram tablets a day, the highest dose recommended, that stave off withdrawal, eliminate his cravings for heroin, keep his mood balanced and alleviate his chronic pain.Growing up in the hilltop town of Meyersdale — "Pennsylvania's High Point" — Mr. Smith had aspired to follow his grandfather into the family business. "All I wanted to do was towing, in my Pap's footsteps," he said.A rare kidney condition, treated with surgery and potent painkillers, knocked him off course. After several years, he told his doctor that he wanted to wean himself off the pills.He said: "The doctor stopped dead like I had my pants on backward, and said, 'You're admitting you're addicted?' I said, 'Well, it ain't no news flash.' " The doctor ripped up his prescription and threw it in the air.Mr. Smith spent the next week "dope sick," shivering, sweating and vomiting. A friend proposed a solution: heroin, cheap and easy to find. "Things started going south," Mr. Smith said. Then his grandfather died, and he learned that the towing business would be sold."I went clean off my rocker," he said. To finance his habit, he burned through $12,000 in savings and finally drove off to sell the contents of his gun safe, including weapons of disputed ownership. A police officer was waiting when he returned to arrest him for theft. Agonizing on that jailhouse floor, he promised himself he would never use again.A week later, essentially under house arrest in the custody of his father, a corrections officer, he called Dr. Clark's office, crying.That was two years ago. In his session last spring, Mr. Smith told his unlikely savior: "I'm sort of pissed at you. I hear you've been shooting Airsoft without me." (The game involves fake guns and pellets.)"Yeah, sorry, buddy," the doctor said. "I know you'd be into that. What we all do in getting better is to switch to different ways of getting our ya-yas out, right?"They talked motorcycles. The doctor drives a Harley-Davidson Fat Boy. Mr. Smith fantasizes about "barreling down the highway on a Big Dog" but is in too much debt to buy one. "You know how it is," he said.Dr. Clark nodded. "I thought losing my credit was the worst thing in the world, but it was the best thing in the world because now I'm living on a cash basis," he said. "Credit is a big scam, man. It uses our addictive nature against us: 'I want it now. I want it now.' "Mr. Smith loves it when Dr. Clark talks to him addict to addict. "I've heard patients say he ain't no better than we are or he's just in it for the money," he said. "But I think being an addict makes him a better doctor. He's been in our shoes."With tattoos commemorating his recovery, Dr. Clark runs the office with his girlfriend, Natalie Tombs, also a recovering addict. Emotive and animated, Ms. Tombs has festooned the walls with inspirational messages on butterflies and hearts and signs warning against sharing, trading or selling medication: "ANY PATIENT CAN BE SUBJECTED TO RANDOM PILL COUNTS."The couple portray themselves as the defenders of a disparaged segment of society with which they commiserate. Their patients see them that way, too."As you know, my pharmacist thinks you're pretty much a joke, and he's not filling your prescriptions," one patient, James Markeley, said recently. "I brought one in, handed it to him and said, 'How long will it be?' He said, 'It won't be.' "Dr. Clark giggled. "What'd he say again?" he said. "I'm an old hippie? I like that one."It was not always so.A graduate of the University of Cincinnati College of Medicine, Dr. Clark did a fellowship in child psychiatry at Yale, served as an Air Force doctor in Germany and then took a job at a Pennsylvania hospital.In the late 1990s, unhappy and overwhelmed by his patient load, he prescribed himself Adderall, a stimulant. His mood improved, and he focused better. But he kept taking more to get the same effect. After two years, he was a wreck.Dr. Clark checked himself into a rehabilitation program in 1999."I had to cold-turkey it," he said. "Withdrawal from amphetamines is different. It's much more tolerable than from opioids. After detox, though, the obsession and craving for the drug are similar. The relapse rates are similar. The triggers are similar. I had to learn to manage stress better, to rest better, to improve my self-esteem."Dr. Clark also had to meet the demands of Pennsylvania's physician recovery program: therapy as well as five 12-step meetings and two random urine screens a week.After a few sober years, he relapsed when his marriage was breaking up. He wrote himself a prescription for painkillers in his son's name. His wife notified his program advocate."Just how much pain is your son in?" the advocate asked.In 2002, a second residential program gave him a diagnosis of depression and narcissistic personality disorder — he disagreed — and discharged him early with a poor prognosis. He agreed to take a reprieve from practicing medicine in Pennsylvania; Ohio suspended his license.Deeply in debt, Dr. Clark was reduced to collecting food stamps until Pennsylvania let him return to medicine as a prison doctor in 2003.That same year, after a positive drug test, Dr. Clark entered his third treatment program and promised himself it would be his last. He has been sober since, he said.His troubles did not end with sobriety, though.Pennsylvania suspended him for a month in 2010 because he failed to submit to three unannounced drug tests while on vacation. Ohio revoked his license in 2011 because he forged signatures verifying his attendance at 12-step meetings.In 2008, a Reckitt Benckiser representative approached Dr. Clark at a children's hospital, saying: "There's this great medicine, Suboxone. Why not get certified? It doesn't take much, and it's a nice thing to add to your practice," he said.Dr. Clark devised a treatment program based on federal guidelines, except he tailored it to what his working-class patients could afford. He mostly prescribed generic buprenorphine rather than the higher-priced Suboxone, which has an additive meant to deter abuse and is favored, though not mandated, by the guidelines.And he established monthly, rather than more frequent, office visits unless patients violated the rules. He decided to "cut out the middleman" by declining to accept insurance and set his fee at $150 a visit, with a couples' price of $100 a person."I made sure my price was the lowest of any of the clinics, and that's why people liked us in the beginning," he said. "Many of my competitors were gouging them."With his caseload limited to 100 by law, Dr. Clark quickly found himself turning away patients and searching for doctors who wanted to supplement their income by working part-time for him.He hired the walk-in clinic doctor who monitored his urine drug screens, and an alternative medicine specialist who sees patients by Skype from Virginia. He also hired a 53-year-old internist shortly after a 25-year-old woman died of "acute combined drug toxicity" at the internist's home following an evening together at the Wicked Googly bar in Ligonier, Pa."He told me he was feeling some heat in his area and needed to get out of town for a while," Dr. Clark said.After filing for bankruptcy protection with $1.5 million in debt early this year, the internist quit in May to run his own buprenorphine practice, saying he needed to make money fast, Dr. Clark said.Dr. Clark scrambled to replace him so his patients would not be abandoned. They often are in this volatile field. Many of Dr. Clark's patients showed up on his doorstep after the authorities had put their previous doctors out of business.That happened with both Angela Scotchel, 25, and Amanda Rogers, 32. They are like before and after pictures. Ms. Scotchel, a former basketball star, is relatively fragile in her recovery, while Ms. Rogers appears firmly entrenched in hers despite a tempestuous personal life.In certain lights, Ms. Rogers, with her long blond hair and cornflower blue eyes, looks like the cheerleader she was, before the people closest to her started dying from drugs and she developed a yearslong habit."I never shot up; I always snorted," she said in March at her home in Toronto, Ohio. "I called myself a classy user. I always made sure the kids were taken care of and the bills were paid first."In Steubenville, where Ms. Rogers grew up, drugs were everywhere, and almost everybody in her life was an addict: her mother and stepfather, who suffered fatal overdoses; her younger sisters; her best friend; and her boyfriend."That town is like poison," she said. "I've probably lost close to 25 friends in the past 10 years."She was 21 and devastated by her mother's death when she started seeking solace in the "nerve pills" her mother left behind. She became so dysfunctional that she lost custody of her first child to relatives, she said, then quit the pills, had a second child and sought help for back pain and fibromyalgia from a local doctor."I didn't know he was a pill pusher at the time," she said of the doctor, who was forced into retirement by the medical authorities in 2010. "He'd get people hooked and then kick them out to hunt for drugs on the street. And once you're on the street, heroin is cheaper than pills and lasts longer. I loved it."Fearful she would end up killing herself, she found a Suboxone doctor she could afford and placed her first tablet under her tongue on Sept. 21, 2009. She has been clean since, she said proudly, despite traumas that tested her resolve.In June 2012, her younger sister Tiffany was released from a court-mandated, abstinence-based rehabilitation program. She glowed, Ms. Rogers said. But returning to Steubenville, with temptation all around, proved too much for her. Ms. Rogers said, "She was crying and crying, bawling, saying, 'Mandy, I'm craving.' "Within a week, Tiffany was dead at 26 of "acute cardiac and respiratory distress due to opioid abuse and dependency," her death certificate said."When I got that news, it was like with my mom," Ms. Rogers said. "I just wanted to get in bed and stop trying."This time, though, she ran a household filled with the grief and need of her sister's traumatized children and of her own. So she coped. Then her Suboxone doctor lost his license for excessive narcotics prescribing, and she had to forage for medication on the street until Dr. Clark's office called in April with an unexpected opening.Before Ms. Rogers's first appointment with him, her 2-year-old played boisterously as she described feeling achy and nauseous. Her buprenorphine supply had run out and withdrawal had begun."If it wasn't for my pain, I might tough it out," she said. "But if I went off the Subs, I'd have to go back on painkillers, and I'm not going back down that road."A few hours later, clasping a heart pendant containing a vial of her sister's ashes, she told Dr. Clark with tearful defiance that she would not let her children or her sister's children follow in their parents' and grandparents' footsteps."I want to break that cycle," she said.Angela Scotchel was a first-generation user, but her family clung to her as she self-destructed. For her mother, Connie, that included lying by her side on the nights she overdosed to make sure she did not stop breathing. "You couldn't call an ambulance every single time," Connie Scotchel said.Once a week, Mrs. Scotchel, a small-business owner with her husband, drives her daughter to Dr. Clark's office outside Pittsburgh from Morgantown to ensure she gets there and uses their hard-earned cash to pay the doctor and buy the medication. At home, Mrs. Scotchel keeps the buprenorphine in a locked safe and dispenses it dose by dose.In her daily uniform of basketball shorts, Angela looks more like the point guard who used to squat 300 pounds than the scrawny addict who worked for an escort service to pay for her substantial heroin habit."I would never do anything like that sober in a million years," Angela said. "It was always men in their 40s, 50s and 60s, doctors and lawyers. Me being gay, it was especially disgusting. But I didn't care as long as I got high."During her senior year of high school, playing a rival team in a packed gym, Angela stole a ball right before halftime, tore down the court, leapt for a layup and was smacked down by an opposing player. A hush blanketed the crowd. She had torn an anterior cruciate ligament. And though she recovered to start on a college team, she soon tore another ligament. After two surgeries, she felt she had lost her game. She also developed a taste for painkillers."A lot of people said I could go pro, play overseas," she said. "But I gave it all up for drugs. Every time I used, I hated myself. I felt like I had let everybody down. I wanted to die."Over lasagna at their home, her parents talked about how bad things got: the times she disappeared, stole money from them, crashed cars, dangerously mixed heroin and Xanax. "I can't count the number of times the police and the municipality walked up these steps," Mrs. Scotchel said. "They assisted us with her overdoses time and time again. I'd have to follow her to the hospital. They'd shackle her. I'd be there all night waiting."Putting down her fork, Angela Scotchel cried. "I went from a superstar to this lowdown dirty addict," she said.She first tried Suboxone in Dr. Sullivan's clinic, which is 10 minutes from her home. But it made her ill. She thought she might be allergic to the additive in Suboxone and asked for plain buprenorphine. The clinic said no. She dropped out."They lived by the white coat there," her mother said, "while Dr. Clark is like one of the addicts."Angela's heroin dealer stocked plain buprenorphine, so she tried it. It made her feel great, not sick, she said, so she found a doctor willing to prescribe it last year. After six months, she and her mother arrived at his office to find federal agents in windbreakers."We watched the D.E.A. go in and out, and I said, 'Angela, he's busted,' " Mrs. Scotchel said. "Poor Angela was crying, thinking she was going to get sick again."They drove to Dr. Clark's office, even though they knew his waiting list was long. Seeing how distraught Angela was, the doctor took her on. Early this year, Angela confessed to Dr. Clark that she was injecting her buprenorphine and mixing it with Xanax. He threatened to discharge her unless she stopped immediately. She did.Mrs. Scotchel insisted that Dr. Clark see her daughter weekly, even though they are uninsured and it adds $3,000 to the yearly cost. The doctor gives her a $20 discount for each Narcotics Anonymous meeting she writes up in her journal.During her daughter's appointments, Mrs. Scotchel prefers to wait outside in her Subaru Forester, reading her Bible. "When I go in there, I gawk," she said. "It should be a reality show."On a typical day last spring, Dr. Clark's waiting room was a tangle of mothers and babies, interlocked girlfriends and boyfriends, bikers in leather and miners with their names on their shirts. As conversation snippets made clear, they were wrestling with eviction notices and restraining orders, insurance headaches and custody problems, parole officers and abusive spouses."If he comes back and says, 'I've got a gun,' I'll load up my 12-gauge and it will be war! " said a patient with purple-streaked hair, mascara dripping down her cheeks.Another woman, juggling two small children, car keys and a lit cigarette, told the office manager she was broke."I just gave you guys my last money, and I'm out of diapers and don't got gas," she said. The manager returned $25 to her and told her to get home safely.Employees wandered about in shorts and flip-flops, shouting, "Can I have a pee cup, please?" Many are recovering addicts themselves, like Thomas Walleck, who staffs the drug testing station, in front of the Wall of Lost Souls — a collage of celebrities who died of overdoses.Mr. Walleck, gentle and raspy-voiced, said he led patients to believe that his tests were all powerful so they would be forthright."I'll also tell them Doc has kicked out 180 people for dishonesty; I exaggerate," he said. "But we got to know if they're dirty for their own good. And if they admit it, it's good for the bottom line, too. Because then they have to come back in two weeks, and that's another $100."Monitoring patients is a delicate task. Dr. Clark summons them for surprise pill counts; a sign in his office offers "CASH and FREE VISIT rewards for information leading to the prosecution of those who are engaging in illegal activity regarding their Suboxone/Subutex prescriptions."Yet this policing clashes with the doctor's fierce instinct to take his patients' side and to confide in them about, say, his own reliance on antidepressants or his girlfriend's routine of reading recovery books while eating licorice in bed.Ms. Tombs, the girlfriend, gets frustrated with his penchant for giving his patients second, third and fourth chances. After he wrote a 30-day buprenorphine prescription for a young man who had admitted to dealing cocaine, Ms. Tombs angrily drew 1,000 stick figures to illustrate those on their waiting list."I had to sleep in the office for three days," Dr. Clark said.Usually the two are united against outside forces: the police who keep a too-watchful eye on their parking lot, the child protection workers who do not consider buprenorphine users drug free, the pharmacists who hassle their patients.Dr. Clark has frequently felt under siege. He said a Reckitt Benckiser representative cautioned him that he was courting trouble with the authorities by prescribing generic buprenorphine and not Suboxone. Last year, Dr. Clark wrote the Drug Enforcement Administration to ask whether he was indeed tempting fate.A senior D.E.A. official responded that "what drug to prescribe, what formulation, what quantity" was a doctor's prerogative."It is unfortunate to learn that physicians in Western Pennsylvania have received incorrect information," the official wrote, "and that such misinformation may potentially be inhibiting legitimate treatment."Feeling vindicated, Dr. Clark circulated the letter to pharmacists. But they were concerned, too, about the amounts he was prescribing. While within federal guidelines, his doses were on average twice those of Dr. Sullivan's.Many of his patients, having flooded their bodies with potent opioids for years, need high doses, Dr. Clark said. Indeed, he noted, studies have shown higher treatment retention rates for people getting higher doses.Dr. Sullivan, though, spoke with frustration about "prescribing wars" in Pittsburgh between "entrepreneurial doctors" who were "naively or maliciously overprescribing.""Which is terrible," he said. "Patients will take what they need and sell the rest. And once the medicine is on the street, for the D.E.A., it looks just like heroin: part of the problem. It blows back on all of us."Early this year, Dr. Sullivan invited the United States attorney for the Northern District of West Virginia to visit his clinic, which with its mushroom-colored walls and white-coated professionals inspires a kind of institutional hush.The federal prosecutor, William J. Ihlenfeld II, said he was eager to be "enlightened" given that West Virginia has the country's second highest rate of overdose deaths and that a fifth of its babies have been exposed to drugs or alcohol in the womb."We've taken the approach in our office that we can't just arrest our way out of the problems we're facing with prescription drugs and heroin," Mr. Ihlenfeld said. Before his visit, he felt "somewhat close-minded about how effective something like this can be" given that he had "heard a lot of people in law enforcement complain" about buprenorphine.What he saw inspired him, though, he said: "People benefiting, from a coal miner to a restaurant owner to somebody who had had ankle surgery and got sucked into addiction."Dr. Sullivan's program, a showcase for buprenorphine treatment, is as regimented as Dr. Clark's is free form. New patients must attend one 90-minute session at the hospital plus four 12-step recovery meetings a week until they achieve 90 continuous days of sobriety, which usually takes half a year."There's no data to support it, but people who go to meetings get better," Dr. Sullivan said. "You can't just give addicts a pill, pat them on the head and expect them to turn things around for themselves. These people live very complicated and messy lives."The new patients often inquire how long they will have to take buprenorphine. Once stable, though, they stop asking, realizing the answer is "maybe forever," Dr. Sullivan said."Forever seems like a nice alternative to dead," his patient Joellen Trippett, 48, said dryly.At a staff meeting one day last spring, a case manager asked Dr. Sullivan how he wanted to handle a younger woman who was vigorously denying her pharmacy's report that she had sought to fill a prescription for Oxycodone."I guess we'll do an observed on her," Dr. Sullivan said, referring to a monitored urine test."An observed?" the case manager said. "How about a discharge?"Relapses are plentiful — 12 of 50 patients that day — but patients are expelled only if they lie. Confronting the woman in her therapy group, Dr. Sullivan said that "surreptitious use of opioids is not permitted" and dismissed her with a prescription for one week of Suboxone.Unlike Dr. Clark, Dr. Sullivan does not meet with patients individually. It would not be cost-effective; more than half of the clinic's patients are covered by Medicaid. Instead, he relies on therapists like Katie Chiasson, whose "advanced" group — those clean of drugs for at least a year and therefore required to come only monthly — was full of angst one day last spring.Betty Jo Cumberledge, 47, announced in a trembling voice that she had just gotten a text from a fellow patient seeking to buy some of her Suboxone."Tell them that if they don't stop, you will expose them in group," Ms. Trippett said.Ms. Chiasson asked how they could set boundaries."We all need to protect our medicine," Ms. Trippett said. "It gets stolen out of our cars and homes." She added that while selling Suboxone would be profitable, she did not want to return to the life she used to lead: "I don't want to be a cheat. I don't want to be a thief. I don't want to be a liar."Chelsea Kennedy, 21, skinny and pregnant with her second child, reported that seven Suboxone dealers had been arrested in her town the previous week, and talked about her friend who gets a Suboxone prescription in Pittsburgh without even seeing the doctor — "and she's selling, shooting, buying, running the streets."Ms. Cumberledge threw up her hands: "It's these kind of people who are hurting us."In late spring, Dr. Clark, still on probation, got an anxiety-provoking visit from a state medical investigator. Some pharmacists had complained about his prescribing practices, which led to the discovery that Dr. Clark had violated his 2010 suspension by continuing to write prescriptions for three buprenorphine patients he had not been able to place with other doctors.When the investigator arrived, Mr. Smith was there. It made him nervous. He was already rattled, dealing with a job change and a custody battle, and did not want to contemplate losing Dr. Clark. "I'd be tossed right back out onto the street to buy drugs," he said.Addiction is a tenacious disease with tentacles — family problems, legal problems, financial problems — that do not disappear with sobriety. Recovery has its zigs and zags, which many of the patients interviewed experienced this summer and fall.Angela Scotchel, overwhelmed by anxiety about her future, constantly craved and sometimes gave in to her desire for Xanax. She also heard the siren call of opiates even as she set out to engage in life-affirming pursuits like lifting weights, working for her parents, dating."This one dealer called me today and said he got some fire in," she wrote in an email, referring to high-potency heroin. "I can't get it out of my head. I'm not gonna act on it, though. Just threw me off. I needed to tell someone about it."Ms. Rogers rode a roller coaster of life changes. She broke up with her partner of 21 years and got involved with another man. She found a job as a cashier and lost it because of unreliable babysitters. She placed her late sister's children in a therapeutic foster home. She reluctantly moved back to Steubenville for lower-priced housing. She became pregnant with her fourth child.Dr. Clark, meanwhile, prepared himself for the possibility that he could lose his license. He aggressively recruited other doctors, figuring he could manage the clinic. He watched the movie "Lincoln" twice; it helped him "deal with 'the negativity.' ""I figure if Lincoln could fight for the rights of slaves during a time when many people thought this was practically criminal," he wrote in an email, "the least I can do is continue to fight for the rights of a few people suffering from the disease and stigma of addiction in my little part of the world."At summer's end, though, his probation was lifted. He hired two New Jersey doctors, one a recovering addict, to see patients by Skype. His business grew fatter while he grew leaner, shedding 20 pounds and his sense of dread."I feel like I got de-stigmatized," Dr. Clark said. "Like now I got nothing to hide, nothing to fear, and there's hope for me and hope for all my patients. But we'll see."
This week, cardiologists learned that a new online calculator meant to help them determine a patient's suitability for cholesterol treatment was flawed, doubling the estimated risk of heart attack or stroke for the average patient. But fixing it would not be easy, because it is based on older data, and heart attack and stroke rates today are much lower than in decades past, meaning that people are at less risk than might be expected from historical extrapolations.Yet the outdated risk figures are the only ones available for researchers to use as assessment tools, cardiologists say, and that raises real problems for the new risk calculator, which the American Heart Association and the American College of Cardiology posted online last week as part of a radical new set of guidelines for treating high cholesterol. The guidelines, which are supposed to shape the way doctors prescribe cholesterol-lowering statins, recommend looking beyond a patient's cholesterol readings."The disease of atherosclerosis is changing before our eyes," said Dr. Peter Libby, the chief of cardiovascular medicine at Brigham and Women's Hospital in Boston. The reasons for the changes, he said, are only partly understood.The problem of using longitudinal health studies from previous decades to assess health risks today arose unexpectedly last weekend at the annual meeting of the American Heart Association. Two Harvard researchers, Dr. Paul M. Ridker and Dr. Nancy Cook, revealed that the new calculator released with fanfare last week exaggerated the true risk of a heart attack or stroke by an average of 100 percent. Moreover, they said, the committee that developed the calculator knew that the online tool was inaccurate yet told doctors to use it in deciding whom to treat.The data that was used to build the calculator was 20 years old, the researchers said, and a lot has happened since then. Many fewer people have heart attacks and strokes. Those who have them do so at older ages. Women are now nearly as susceptible as men.But there also is another issue, said Dr. H. Gilbert Welch, a medical professor at Dartmouth. The calculator, like many others used in medicine, is based on a mathematical model that assumes that risk rises in a straight line. As levels of blood pressure rise, for example, the chances of a heart attack or stroke rise in concert, the calculator assumes. In reality, Dr. Welch said, that line is far from straight."The model suggests that lowering systolic blood pressure from 130 to 100 is nearly as important as from 180 to 150," he said. "I doubt there is a cardiologist in the country that believes that."When the guidelines were being developed, several outside reviewers, including the two Harvard researchers and Dr. Roger Blumenthal from Johns Hopkins University, pointed out that the tool seemed to exaggerate risk. The calculator, Dr. Blumenthal said, "was clearly not satisfactory."In response, he said, the guidelines committee added a tiebreaker for doctors to use with patients whose risk score was equivocal. Those patients could have other tests, such as a heart scan for coronary calcium, which can determine if they have plaque in their arteries, and a blood test for a protein, C.R.P., that is associated with increased risk.But the heart groups do not plan to change or eliminate the calculator, in part because there is no good alternative. Prescribing statins is often a judgment call, doctors say, except for patients whose chance of a heart attack or stroke is extremely high, like those who have already had a heart attack or who have diabetes.Previous treatment guidelines, which were released in 2004, also included a risk calculator, but researchers recently discovered that it, too, overestimates risk.In fact, said Dr. Michael Blaha of Johns Hopkins, the old calculator overestimated risk much greater than the new one, mainly because it was based on data from the 1980s and from the largely white male population of Framingham, Mass."The new risk calculator is actually better," Dr. Blaha said. "People did not appreciate the problems with the Framingham calculator."Dr. Blaha and his colleagues discovered the flaws of the calculator based on the Framingham Heart Study a couple of years ago but did not publish their results because they were waiting for the new calculator to appear. They thought any issues with the old calculator would soon be moot."It's a touchy subject," Dr. Blaha said of the old calculator's problems.Many doctors never used the Framingham calculator anyway, said Dr. Benjamin Ansell of the University of California, Los Angeles. Instead, they mostly offered statins to people with very high cholesterol levels, ignoring the fact that those who have lower cholesterol levels but other risk factors, like smoking or high blood pressure, often benefited.But others used the Framingham calculator to help patients make informed decisions. Dr. Lisa Schwartz and Dr. Steven Woloshin at Dartmouth, for example, said they would show patients their risk percentage and then recalculate what it would be if they were under treatment.Dr. Ansell said he feared that the problems with the new calculator would make doctors and patients skeptical of the new guidelines in general, even though most of the advice on how to prevent heart attacks and stroke — such as through weight control, diet, exercise and smoking cessation — has nothing to do with the calculator."It will be that much more challenging to implement this or subsequent guidelines," Dr. Ansell said. "It's a definite setback."Dr. Michael Pignone of the University of North Carolina said it was time to take another look at the new calculator. The guideline committee members are experts, he said, but "getting it right is really hard.""It should be fixed," he said. "And before we launch it on the public, we should launch it on the skeptical doctors. This matters to millions of people."
Curing insomnia in people with depression could double their chance of a full recovery, scientists are reporting. The findings, based on an insomnia treatment that uses talk therapy rather than drugs, are the first to emerge from a series of closely watched studies of sleep and depression to be released in the coming year.The new report affirms the results of a smaller pilot study, giving scientists confidence that the effects of the insomnia treatment are real. If the figures continue to hold up, the advance will be the most significant in the treatment of depression since the introduction of Prozac in 1987.Depression is the most common mental disorder, affecting some 18 million Americans in any given year, according to government figures, and more than half of them also have insomnia.Experts familiar with the new report said that the results were plausible and that if supported by other studies, they should lead to major changes in treatment."It would be an absolute boon to the field," said Dr. Nada L. Stotland, professor of psychiatry at Rush Medical College in Chicago, who was not connected with the latest research."It makes good common sense clinically," she continued. "If you have a depression, you're often awake all night, it's extremely lonely, it's dark, you're aware every moment that the world around you is sleeping, every concern you have is magnified."The study is the first of four on sleep and depression nearing completion, all financed by the National Institute of Mental Health. They are evaluating a type of talk therapy for insomnia that is cheap, relatively brief and usually effective, but not currently a part of standard treatment.The new report, from a team at Ryerson University in Toronto, found that 87 percent of patients who resolved their insomnia in four biweekly talk therapy sessions also saw their depression symptoms dissolve after eight weeks of treatment, either with an antidepressant drug or a placebo pill — almost twice the rate of those who could not shake their insomnia. Those numbers are in line with a previous pilot study of insomnia treatment at Stanford.In an interview, the report's lead author, Colleen E. Carney, said, "The way this story is unfolding, I think we need to start augmenting standard depression treatment with therapy focused on insomnia."Dr. Carney acknowledged that the study was small — just 66 patients — and said a clearer picture should emerge as the other teams of scientists released their results. Those studies are being done at Stanford, Duke and the University of Pittsburgh and include about 70 subjects each. Dr. Carney will present her data on Saturday at a convention of the Association for Behavioral and Cognitive Therapies, in Nashville.Doctors have known for years that sleep problems are intertwined with mood disorders. But only recently have they begun to investigate the effects of treating both at the same time. Antidepressant drugs like Prozac help many people, as does talk therapy, but in rigorous studies the treatments, administered individually, only slightly outperform placebo pills. Used together the treatments produce a cure rate — full recovery — for about 40 percent of patients.Adding insomnia therapy, however, to an antidepressant would sharply lift the cure rate, Dr. Carney's data suggests, as do the findings from the Stanford pilot study, which included 30 people.Doctors have long considered poor sleep to be a symptom of depression that would clear up with treatments, said Rachel Manber, a professor in the psychiatry and behavioral sciences department at Stanford, whose 2008 pilot trial of insomnia therapy provided the rationale for larger studies. "But we now know that's not the case," she said. "The relationship is bidirectional — that insomnia can precede the depression."Full-blown insomnia is more serious than the sleep problems most people occasionally have. To qualify for a diagnosis, people must have endured at least a month of chronic sleep loss that has caused problems at work, at home or in important relationships. Several studies now suggest that developing insomnia doubles a person's risk of later becoming depressed — the sleep problem preceding the mood disorder, rather than the other way around.
The condom of the future might be made of cow tendon or fish skin. It might have "shape memory" to instantly mold to a specific man. Or it might come with pull tabs so a man could slip it on with little fuss.Those ideas are among the winners announced Wednesday by the Bill & Melinda Gates Foundation of a contest to create a condom that men would actually use. The contest, the foundation said, aimed to decrease unintended pregnancies and sexually transmitted diseases with "a next-generation condom that significantly preserves or enhances pleasure."The foundation received 812 applications, chose 11 and awarded the winners $100,000 each. They could receive up to $1 million after they develop the ideas. Steven Buchsbaum, a Gates Foundation official, said winners ranged from a longtime condom manufacturer in India to American chemical engineers to British design consultants whose previous work included vacuum cleaners.Many ideas involved materials besides latex, aiming for thinner, stronger, less constricting condoms with better sensation, "reducing the loving distance between partners, so they will be more close," said Dr. Papa Salif Sow, a Gates senior program officer. Other ideas focused on "how to improve the donning," he said, because "in sub-Saharan Africa, sex is basically done with low light and it might be very difficult to see the direction of the condom."Winners include the "ultrasensitive reconstituted collagen condom" proposed by Apex Medical Technologies in San Diego. Apex's president, Mark McGlothlin, said his product would feel like skin and be made from collagen fibers from cows' Achilles tendons or possibly fish skin."They're unbelievably strong," said Mr. McGlothlin, who currently gets beef tendon from a Vietnamese grocery. "I could yank all day and not break this thing."A "wrapping condom" proposal by the California Family Health Council in Los Angeles will build on a version manufactured in Colombia, made of polyethylene plastic that "clings like Saran Wrap rather than squeezes," according to Ron Frezieres, the council's vice president for research. It would come in three-packs the size of a credit card and almost as thin, he said, and, like another grant winner called the Rapidom, would have pull tabs to "keep you from being confused about which way to put it on," Mr. Frezieres added.At least two winners will work with polyurethane, including Richard Chartoff, a University of Oregon chemical engineer, who foresees a "one-size-fits-all" design having shape memory to "fit like an extra layer of skin, conforming to the shape." He is also considering adding nanoparticles containing antiviral or antibacterial drugs, and, more prosaically, offering different colors.Stephen Ward, a Gates Foundation program officer, said that among the problems tackled were "improving lubrication, internal friction, external friction, heat transfer."Two or more grantees might be teamed to make one design, he added. "There's not one magic bullet," he said. "The idea is making them easier for people to use in the moment, in the dark, whatever situation they're in."
About two months ago, Dr. Elizabeth Stier was shocked to learn that she would lose a vital credential, board certification as a gynecologist, unless she gave up an important part of her medical practice and her research: taking care of men at high risk for anal cancer.The disease is rare, but it can be fatal and its incidence is increasing, especially among men and women infected with H.I.V. Like cervical cancer, anal cancer is usually caused by the human papillomavirus, or HPV, which is sexually transmitted.Though most of her patients are women, Dr. Stier, who works at Boston Medical Center, also treated about 110 men last year, using techniques adapted from those developed to screen women for cervical cancer.But in September, the American Board of Obstetrics and Gynecology insisted that its members treat only women, with few exceptions, and identified the procedure in which Dr. Stier has expertise as one that gynecologists are not allowed to perform on men. Doctors cannot ignore such directives from a specialty board, because most need certification to keep their jobs.Now Dr. Stier's studies are in limbo, her research colleagues are irate, and her male patients are distraught. Other gynecologists who had translated their skills to help male patients are in similar straits.And researchers about to start a major clinical trial that is aimed at preventing anal cancer, with $5.6 million from the federal government, say the board's decision will keep some of the best qualified, most highly skilled doctors in the United States from treating male patients in the study. The director of the planned study and Dr. Stier have asked the gynecology board to reconsider its position.But the board, based in Dallas, has not budged."We haven't heard of any compelling reason to change anything," said Dr. Kenneth L. Noller, the board's director of evaluation. He said there were plenty of other doctors available to provide the HPV-related procedures that some gynecologists had been performing on men.Dr. Larry C. Gilstrap, the group's executive director, said the specialty of obstetrics and gynecology was specifically designed to treat problems of the female reproductive tract and was "restricted to taking care of women." Of the 24 medical specialties recognized in the United States, he said, it is the only one that is gender-specific, and it has been that way since 1935.Dr. Stier said that she, like many other doctors, had not understood the definition of their field to be quite so absolute.The board had always regarded the treatment of women as its mission, Dr. Gilstrap said, but felt a particular need to emphasize it now because the specialty's image was being tarnished by members who had strayed into moneymaking sidelines, like testosterone therapy for men, and liposuction and other cosmetic procedures for both women and men.Dr. Mark H. Einstein, a gynecologic oncologist at Montefiore Medical Center in the Bronx, said, "The board's approach is to be rather dogmatic and to draw a line in the sand."On Sept. 12, the board posted on its website a stringent and newly explicit definition of obstetrician-gynecologists, limiting the proportion of time they could spend on nongynecologic procedures and noting that, with few exceptions, members must not treat men. The notice specifically prohibited gynecologists from performing an examination called anoscopy on men.Anoscopy involves using a tube and a light to examine the anal canal, which is about 1.5 inches long. The procedure is the same in men and women. A "high-resolution" version adds a magnifier to look for abnormal growths that may be cancers or precancers. Cancers usually require surgery, but doctors can burn off precancers in hopes of preventing cancer.A similar approach led to a tremendous decline in cervical cancer in the United States, and doctors hope to accomplish the same for anal cancer. About 7,000 new cases of anal cancer, and 880 deaths, are expected in 2013 in the United States; the incidence has been increasing by 2.2 percent a year for the last 10 years.
An insomnia therapy that scientists just reported could double the effectiveness of depression treatment is not widely available nor particularly well understood by psychiatrists or the public. The American Board of Sleep Medicine has certified just 400 practitioners in the United States to administer it, and they are sparse, even in big cities.That may change soon, however. Four rigorous studies of the treatment are nearing completion and due to be reported in coming months. In the past year, the American Psychological Association recognized sleep psychology as a specialty, and the Department of Veterans Affairs began a program to train about 600 sleep specialists. So-called insomnia disorder is defined as at least three months of poor sleep that causes problems at work, at home or in relationships.The need is great: Depression is the most common mood disorder, affecting some 18 million Americans in any given year, and most have insomnia."I think it's increasingly likely that this kind of sleep therapy will be used as a possible complement to standard care," said Dr. John M. Oldham, chief of staff at the Menninger Clinic in Houston. "We are the court of last resort for the most difficult-to-treat patients, and I think sleep problems have been extremely underrecognized as a critical factor."The treatment, known as cognitive behavioral therapy for insomnia, or CBT-I, is not widely available. Most insurers cover it, and the rates for private practitioners are roughly the same as for any psychotherapy, ranging from $100 to $250 an hour, depending on the therapist."There aren't many of us doing this therapy," said Shelby Harris, the director of the behavioral sleep medicine program at Montefiore Medical Center in the Bronx, who also has a private practice in Tarrytown, N.Y. "I feel like we all know each other."According to preliminary results, one of the four studies has found that when CBT-I cures insomnia — it does so 40 percent to 50 percent of the time, previous work suggests — it powerfully complements the effect of antidepressant drugs."There's been a huge recognition that insomnia cuts across a wide variety of medical disorders, and there's a need to address it," said Michael T. Smith, a professor at the Johns Hopkins School of Medicine and president of the Society of Behavioral Sleep Medicine.The therapy is easy to teach, said Colleen Carney, director of the sleep and depression lab at Ryerson University in Toronto, whose presentation at a conference of the Association for Behavioral and Cognitive Therapies in Nashville on Saturday raised hopes for depression treatment. "In the study we did, I trained students to administer the therapy," she said in an interview, "and the patients in the study got just four sessions."CBT-I is not a single technique but a collection of complementary ideas. Some date to the 1970s, others are more recent. One is called stimulus control, which involves breaking the association between being in bed and activities like watching television or eating. Another is sleep restriction: setting a regular "sleep window" and working to stick to it. The therapist typically has patients track their efforts on a standardized form called a sleep diary. Patients record bedtimes and when they wake up each day, as well as their perceptions about quality of sleep and number of awakenings. To this the therapist might add common-sense advice like reducing caffeine and alcohol intake, and making sure the bedroom is dark and quiet.Those three elements — stimulus control, restriction and common sense — can do the trick for many patients. For those who need more, the therapist applies cognitive therapy — a means of challenging self-defeating assumptions. Patients fill out a standard questionnaire that asks how strongly they agree with statements like: "Without an adequate night's sleep, I can hardly function the next day"; "I believe insomnia is the result of a chemical imbalance"; and "Medication is probably the only solution to sleeplessness." In sessions, people learn to challenge those beliefs, using evidence from their own experiences."If someone has the belief that if they don't sleep, they'll somehow fail the next day, I'll ask, 'What does failure mean? You'll be slower at work, not get everything done, not make dinner?' " Dr. Harris said. "Then we'll look at the 300 nights they didn't sleep well over the past few years and find out they managed; it might not have been as pleasant as they liked, but they did not fail. That's how we challenge those kinds of thoughts."Dr. Aaron T. Beck, an emeritus professor of psychiatry at the University of Pennsylvania who is recognized as the father of cognitive therapy for mental disorders, said the techniques were just as applicable to sleep problems. "In fact, I have used it myself when I occasionally have insomnia," he said by email.In short-term studies of a month or two, CBT-I has been about as effective as prescription sleeping pills. But it appears to have more staying power. "There's no data to show that if you take a sleeping pill — and then stop taking it — that you'll still be good six months later," said Jack Edinger, a professor at National Jewish Health in Denver and an author, with Dr. Carney, of "Overcoming Insomnia: A Cognitive-Behavioral Therapy Approach.""It might happen, but those certainly aren't the people who come through my door," he said.Dr. Edinger and others say that those who respond well to CBT-I usually do so quickly — in an average of four sessions, and rarely more than eight. "You're not going to break the bank doing this stuff; it's not a marriage," he said. "You do it for a fixed amount of time, and then you're done. Once you've got the skills, they don't go away."
It was supposed to be a moment of triumph. An august committee had for the first time relied only on the most rigorous scientific evidence to formulate guidelines to prevent heart attacks and strokes, which kill one out of every three Americans. The group had worked for five years, unpaid, to develop them. Then, at the annual meeting of the American Heart Association, it all went horribly awry.Many leading cardiologists now say the credibility of the guidelines, released Nov. 14, is shattered. And the troubled effort to devise them has raised broader questions about what kind of evidence should be used to direct medical practice, how changes should be introduced and even which guidelines to believe."This was a catastrophic misunderstanding of how you go about this sort of huge change in public policy," said Dr. Steven Nissen, a Cleveland Clinic cardiologist who is a past president of the American College of Cardiology. "There will be a large backlash."What went wrong? Some critics say the drafting committee mistakenly relied only on randomized controlled clinical trials, the gold standard of medical evidence, but ignored other strong data that would have led to different conclusions. The group's efforts were severely underfunded. And it announced fundamental changes in medical practices without allowing a public debate before its guidelines were completed."A lot of people expect they can come up with guidelines as a pure scientific discourse and present them to the public," said Dr. J. Sanford Schwartz. a committee member and a professor at the University of Pennsylvania. "That's what we did here, but the world has changed."When the new guidelines were released, many doctors were shocked that they were suddenly being told to stop their decades-long practice of monitoring levels of LDL cholesterol, the kind that increases the risk of heart attacks and strokes, after patients begin taking statin medicines.Others were stunned when a pair of Harvard medical professors offered evidence within days of the guidelines' release that its new online risk calculator greatly overestimated a person's chance of having a heart attack or stroke.The committee writing the guidelines made a critical, early decision to consider only evidence from clinical trials, a marked departure from how previous guidelines were made. Some independent experts provided with an advance draft of the guidelines, including Dr. Roger S. Blumenthal of Johns Hopkins and Dr. Antonio M. Gotto Jr., a former president of the heart association, objected. They said a wealth of genetic and populations data indicated that lower cholesterol levels are better, especially for high-risk patients. The same critique would loom large after the guidelines were released.Committee members also said they struggled with inadequate financial support. They originally formulated 18 important questions they would seek to answer. But it was soon apparent that they had overreached and did not have nearly enough money from the National Institutes of Health for such an ambitious effort."It definitely was a funding issue," said Dr. Daniel J. Rader, a lipid specialist at the University of Pennsylvania who was a committee member for much of the time.And the money dwindled over time after the National Institutes of Health underwent budget cuts. Every time the agency got hit, so did support for the committee drafting the guidelines, said Dr. Elizabeth G. Nabel, who was director of the heart institute for much of the time. "This is one of the untold consequences of budget reductions," she said.Eventually, the committee whittled the 18 questions to just three: Should doctors and patients aim for specific numerical target levels of LDL cholesterol? Should doctors use drugs other than statins to drive LDL levels down? And should there be target levels for LDL plus other forms of harmful cholesterol linked to cardiovascular risk?They concluded that there was no evidence for targets or for using drugs in addition to statins to lower cholesterol.The National Heart, Lung, and Blood Institute contracted with two companies to exhaustively review the scientific literature — thousands of papers submitted by committee members on those three questions. Meanwhile, the committee met by teleconference most Wednesdays.
A professional group that certifies obstetrician-gynecologists reversed an earlier directive and said on Tuesday that its members were permitted to treat male patients for sexually transmitted infections and to screen men for anal cancer.The statement from the American Board of Obstetrics and Gynecology eased restrictions announced in September, which said that gynecologists could lose their board certification if they treated men. Exceptions were made to allow certain procedures, but screening men who were at high risk for anal cancer was not permitted, so the September decision left some gynecologists struggling to find colleagues in other specialties to treat their male patients and to track those who were enrolled in studies.Like cervical cancer, anal cancer is usually caused by the human papillomavirus, or HPV, which is sexually transmitted. This type of cancer is rare, but its incidence is increasing, especially among men and women infected with H.I.V.Experts in anal cancer asked the board to reconsider its position, and some started letter-writing campaigns. Patient advocacy groups expressed worry that the prohibition would interfere with research and make it harder for male patients to find screening and treatment.The board had said it wanted to protect the profession as a female specialty and limit the nongynecological work performed by its members. But Dr. Kenneth L. Noller, the board's director of evaluation, said board members had reconsidered and realized that gynecologists had a long tradition of treating sexually transmitted infections in both men and women, and that HPV and problems related to the virus fell into that category.In addition, he said, the board recognized the importance of an coming study on anal cancer, funded by the federal government, and did not want to interfere with it. Finally, board members said that they did not want to "disturb the doctor-patient relationship." Dr. Elizabeth Stier, a gynecologist at Boston Medical Center who had been forced to drop male patients who had been in her care for years, said she was happy and relieved to hear that the board had changed its mind."Having canceled all the men out of my clinic, I now have to un-cancel them," Dr. Stier said. "They'll be very happy."Dr. Mark H. Einstein, a gynecologic oncologist at Montefiore Medical Center in the Bronx, who had also been compelled to stop treating male patients, said: "Cool heads have prevailed. This is the best decision for our patients."Though most of Dr. Stier's patients are women, she also took care of about 110 men last year who were at high risk for anal cancer. Screening tests for anal cancer involve techniques adapted from those used to screen women for cervical cancer. Dr. Stier had undergone extensive training to detect cancers and precancerous lesions in the anus, and she will be involved in the federally funded study of men and women, aimed at finding out whether screening and treating precancerous growths can prevent the cancer. The statement issued in September would have barred her from screening or treating men in that study.
SAN FRANCISCO — With blood oozing from deep lacerations, the two patients arrived at California Pacific Medical Center's tidy emergency room. Deepika Singh, 26, had gashed her knee at a backyard barbecue. Orla Roche, a rambunctious toddler on vacation with her family, had tumbled from a couch, splitting open her forehead on a table.On a quiet Saturday in May, nurses in blue scrubs quickly ushered the two patients into treatment rooms. The wounds were cleaned, numbed and mended in under an hour. "It was great — they had good DVDs, the staff couldn't have been nicer," said Emer Duffy, Orla's mother.Then the bills arrived. Ms. Singh's three stitches cost $2,229.11. Orla's forehead was sealed with a dab of skin glue for $1,696. "When I first saw the charge, I said, 'What could possibly have cost that much?' " recalled Ms. Singh. "They billed for everything, every pill."In a medical system notorious for opaque finances and inflated bills, nothing is more convoluted than hospital pricing, economists say. Hospital charges represent about a third of the $2.7 trillion annual United States health care bill, the biggest single segment, according to government statistics, and are the largest driver of medical inflation, a new study in The Journal of the American Medical Association found.A day spent as an inpatient at an American hospital costs on average more than $4,000, five times the charge in many other developed countries, according to the International Federation of Health Plans, a global network of health insurance industries. The most expensive hospitals charge more than $12,500 a day. And at many of them, including California Pacific Medical Center, emergency rooms are profit centers. That is why one of the simplest and oldest medical procedures — closing a wound with a needle and thread — typically leads to bills of at least $1,500 and often much more.At Lenox Hill Hospital in New York City, Daniel Diaz, 29, a public relations executive, was billed $3,355.96 for five stitches on his finger after cutting himself while peeling an avocado. At a hospital in Jacksonville, Fla., Arch Roberts Jr., 56, a former government employee, was charged more than $2,000 for three stitches after being bitten by a dog. At Mercy Hospital in Port Huron, Mich., Chelsea Manning, 22, a student, received bills for close to $3,000 for six stitches after she tripped running up a path. Insurers and patients negotiated lower prices, but those charges were a starting point.The main reason for high hospital costs in the United States, economists say, is fiscal, not medical: Hospitals are the most powerful players in a health care system that has little or no price regulation in the private market.Rising costs of drugs, medical equipment and other services, and fees from layers of middlemen, play a significant role in escalating hospital bills, of course. But just as important is that mergers and consolidation have resulted in a couple of hospital chains — like Partners in Boston, or Banner in Phoenix — dominating many parts of the country, allowing them to command high prices from insurers and employers.Sutter Health, California Pacific Medical Center's parent company, operates more than two dozen community hospitals in Northern California, almost all in middle-class or high-income neighborhoods. Its clout has helped California Pacific Medical Center, the state's largest private nonprofit hospital, also earn the highest net income in California. Prices for many of the procedures at the San Francisco hospital are among the top 20 percent in the country, according to a New York Times analysis of data released by the federal government."Sutter is a leader — a pioneer — in figuring out how to amass market power to raise prices and decrease competition," said Glenn Melnick, a professor of health economics at the University of Southern California. "How do hospitals set prices? They set prices to maximize revenue, and they raise prices as much as they can — all the research supports that."In other countries, the price of a day in the hospital often includes many basic services. Not here. The "chargemaster," the price list created by each hospital, typically has more than ten thousand entries, and almost nothing — even an aspirin, a bag of IV fluid, or a visit from a physical therapist to help a patient get out of bed — is free. Those lists are usually secret, but California requires them to be filed with health regulators and disclosed.California Pacific Medical Center's 400-page chargemaster for this year contains some eye-popping figures: from $32,901 for an X-ray study of the heart's arteries to $25,646.88 for gall bladder removal (doctor's fees not included) to $5,510 for a simple vaginal delivery (not including $731 for each hour of labor, or $137 for each bag of IV fluid). Even basic supplies or services carry huge markups: $20 for a codeine pill (50 cents at Rite-Aid or Walgreens), $543 for a breast-pump kit ($25 online), $4,495 for a CT scan of the abdomen (about $400 at an outpatient facility nearby). Plenty of other hospitals set similar prices.Dr. Warren Browner, the chief executive officer of California Pacific Medical Center, said that there were good reasons that hospitals charged what they did: They must have highly trained professionals available 24 hours a day, seven days a week. They must constantly upgrade to the latest equipment and building standards to meet patients' expectations and state mandates. They charge paying or well-insured patients more to compensate for others they treat at a loss."Hospital care is extremely expensive to produce and to have available for everyone in the community," he said, noting that hospitals needed to have a neurosurgeon on call in case a patient turned up with a blood clot on the brain. "We take every penny of the revenue we earn and use it to build new and better facilities for everyone in the city."Some health economists say that even though most hospitals are nonprofit, they nonetheless are often flush with revenue and guilty of unnecessary spending."Hospitals are self-fueling, ever-expanding machines," said James Robinson, an economist and professor of health policy at the University of California, Berkeley. "There is an infinite amount of stuff to buy — amenities, machines, new wings, higher salaries, more nurses.""But," he asked, "to deliver good health care, what do you need?"There is little science to how hospitals determine the prices they print on hospital bills."Chargemaster prices are basically arbitrary, not connected to underlying costs or market prices," said Professor Melnick, the economist. Hospitals "can set them at any level they want. There are no market constraints."Prices for any item or service are set by each hospital and move up and down yearly, and show extraordinary variability, health economists say. The codeine that costs $20 and the bag of IV fluid that costs $137 at California Pacific are charged at $1 and $16 at the University of California San Francisco Medical Center, across town. But U.C.S.F. Medical Center charges $1,600 for an amniocentesis, which costs $687 at California Pacific.After each hospital stay or visit, computer programs and human coders and billers use the chargemaster price list to translate the services rendered into a price. Sutter employs more than 1,300 people at a special center in Roseville, Calif., to perform this and other administrative tasks for its hospitals. Emergency room visits typically include separate charges for doctor's services and for supplies, as well as a "facility fee" — the charge for walking in the door.Orla Roche's bill, for example, included $529 for "supplies and devices," though her mother is perplexed about what those are: Orla left the emergency room with gauze wrapped round her head (under $1 at Internet supply stores), festooned with a pink cartoon sticker. According to the chargemaster price list for California Pacific, a vial of skin glue is billed at $181, a tube of antibiotic cream at $125.84 and a vial of local anesthetic at $79.73. These items can be purchased for $15.99, $36.99 and $5 on the Internet, though hospitals — which buy wholesale and in bulk — pay far less.The bill also included $1,167 for the facility fee, which was classified at Level 3 — the middle of the scale, though Orla's treatment was one of the most simple emergency room interventions. At Lenox Hill in New York, Daniel Diaz's unusually detailed bill for his stitches included $1,828 for emergency room services, $628 for repairing the wound, $571.83 for "application of a finger splint," $97.10 for a tetanus shot, and $311 for someone to give the injection. At Sparrow Hospital in Lansing, Mich., 2-year-old Ben Bellar's bill for six stitches, more than $2,000, included $145.20 for "pharmacy" — a spoonful of ibuprofen and local anesthetic, his mother said.Economists note that hospitals can bill for emergency room care with relative impunity, since injured patients generally rush to the nearest treatment facility. But worried about high prices, even the sick sometimes shop around. When Jamie Burke, 33, a graduate student in North Carolina, came to after she was knocked out during a soccer game in April, she started searching on her smartphone for an in-network hospital as a friend drove."It was crazy," she said, "but luckily I wasn't unconscious, so I could figure it out."She is glad she did: Though the hospital billed $5,039, her insurer's in-network contracted rate was about $2,700. With copays and coinsurance, she owed $600 for the visit.The uninsured are particularly vulnerable to high prices since they have no one to argue on their behalf. When Arch Roberts Jr. got his bill of more than $2,000 for stitches, he explained that he was uninsured and his business had failed during the housing crisis, so he could not afford the fee. The hospital offered him a "charity care discount" — a price that was still out of range. "I don't have $800 to pay them any more than I have $2,000" for three stitches, he said, noting that the hospital has been "relentless" in its collection efforts.Once perennial money pits, emergency rooms have become big moneymakers for most hospitals in the last decade, experts say, as they raised their fees and "managed" their patient mix. California Pacific Medical Center has nearly doubled its emergency room fees since 2005, its chargemaster price lists show.California Pacific's emergency room is not a trauma center; poor or uninsured trauma patients who require lengthy inpatient stays can strain a hospital budget. And insurers allow emergency rooms to bill more than urgent-care centers for simple procedures like stitches or X-raying a sprained ankle, making such procedures profitable. Indeed, the financial prospects are so appealing that doctors' groups in Texas are opening free-standing "emergency rooms" that are not connected to hospitals."Hospitals see where they're making money and try to do more of that," said Dr. David Gifford, a former health commissioner of Rhode Island, who has studied how labs price their tests. He said that laboratory tests and X-rays are priced high and are profitable, though there is no difference in quality from national commercial labs that charge far less. A blood count and blood electrolyte test — ordered every day for most inpatients and often in the emergency room — are priced at $259.06 and $293.25 on California Pacific Medical Center's chargemaster price list. Insurers often pay outside labs less than $10 for the services.And, like any business, many hospitals try to do fewer services that are not well paid. In 2012, over loud patient protests, California Pacific Medical Center outsourced its kidney dialysis unit to DaVita Health Care Partners, a commercial company, citing decreasing reimbursement. More than five years ago, after Sutter acquired St. Luke's, a decrepit hospital in a poor neighborhood, it tried to shut the facility and convert it to an outpatient clinic, which often generate scans and other expensive tests. (The City of San Francisco rejected the plan.) It did close the hospital's acute psychiatric unit, a division that almost always loses money."You need a Ph.D. in health economics" to understand medical pricing, said Dr. Browner, who has acknowledged that California Pacific's chargemaster prices might appear high. But he added, "We have to recoup what it costs to keep open, what it costs to take care of the un- and underinsured and to rebuild."He said that MediCal, California's Medicaid program, pays California Pacific Medical Center only 10 to 20 percent of its actual costs for care. Medicare pays about 70 percent, he said, generally with a predetermined flat fee for each admission based on the patient's diagnosis. In contrast, many private insurers still pay separately for services rendered, based on discounts from the chargemaster prices.Dr. Browner also pointed to what health care executives call the "Saudi sheikh problem" at some hospitals."You don't really want to change your charges if you have a Saudi sheikh come in with a suitcase full of cash who's going to pay full charges," he said.But how much actual charity care does a hospital like California Pacific Medical Center perform? And are insurers and patients paying hospitals for better quality? Or also for amenities like valet parking, useless medical gadgetry and inflated salaries?Though hospitals' nonprofit status allows them to reap tens or hundreds of millions of dollars in tax benefits, California Pacific Medical Center's main campuses spent 1.27 percent of their more than $1.1 billion in net patient revenues in 2011 on free care for indigent or uninsured patients, lower than the state average of 2.07 percent, according to statistics compiled by the San Francisco Department of Public Health. The far smaller St. Luke's branch spent 5.32 percent that year.Sutter, based in Sacramento, employs 28 officials who make more than $1 million a year, and four of them are among the top-paid hospital executives in the state. Sutter's chief executive officer makes more than $5 million. In 2011, Dr. Browner, 62, a distinguished physician who spent much of his career in academics, made more than $1.2 million, according to tax documents.California Pacific, Sutter's main campus, is in upscale Pacific Heights. It has just broken ground on a $2.7 billion renovation, which includes a new flagship hospital. Though the project was initiated to meet new state earthquake standards, the facility is designed as a sleek glass and marble structure with all private rooms, underground parking and roof gardens with flowers and bees "to enhance the quality of the healing environment," according to California Pacific Medical Center's website. Its Facebook page has called it "the coolest hospital in San Francisco, possibly the country and even the world."Consumers may appreciate — or demand — features that contribute to bigger hospital bills. But studies have found no correlation between prices and patient outcomes. A California state rating of hospital services by the California Health Care Foundation gave California Pacific Medical Center average scores in most categories, though its surgical-care measures were rated "superior."Its crosstown neighbor, University of California San Francisco, a nationally ranked academic institution, charges far less per day than California Pacific, when the greater severity of illnesses of its patients is factored in, Professor Melnick said. In fact, a recent study in the publication Annals of Surgery, a monthly review of surgical science, found that hospitals with the highest complication rates tended to have higher prices.From such variations, economists conclude that "costs" are highly discretionary, noting that hospitals in other developed countries often provide high-quality care, with better outcomes in comparatively no-frills environments. Said Dr. Robinson, the Berkeley health economist: "If you pay hospitals more, they spend it. If you pay them less, they adjust. The only way to pay less for health care — is to pay less for health care."Hospital officials like to say that their list prices do not reflect what most patients actually pay, because private and government insurers negotiate discounts. Simone Singh, a professor of health management and policy at the University of Michigan, estimated that insurers generally paid 40 to 50 percent of charges. But with powerful chains like Sutter, prices are high and the discounts often are not so generous. Patients are left paying more.For her three stitches at California Pacific Medical Center, Deepika Singh ended up paying $768.56 — a lot of money for a 26-year-old retail supply chain manager — of the $1,813 rate her insurer negotiated for the approximately $2,200 bill. Ms. Duffy owed $1,366 after her insurer's discount on 2-year-old Orla's $1,700 bill, since the family had not met its annual deductible. "How much is that per minute?" she asked.Across California, Sutter hospitals have proved expert at the business of medicine. "Our members are very exercised about Sutter — it has increased prices disproportionately," said David Lansky, chief executive officer of the Pacific Business Group on Health, which represents 60 of California's biggest private employers in its health care negotiations. "Sutter has been successful at leveraging their huge size in dictating not just price but contract terms."Its major competitor is Kaiser, a health maintenance organization that runs a closed network of hospitals and doctors. California Pacific Medical Center delivers more than half the babies in San Francisco and is the city's largest employer after Wells Fargo. Sutter contracts also include "gag clauses" that prevent employers from knowing what rates have been negotiated by their insurers on their behalf, Mr. Lansky said.Chuck Idelson, a spokesman for the Institute for Health and Socio-Economic Policy, the research arm of the California Nurses Association, said Sutter prices were 40 to 70 percent above its rivals' for similar services. When Sutter bought Summit Hospital in Oakland in 1999, rates there went up 29 percent to 72 percent, researchers found. Because of pricing issues, proposed insurance plans under the Affordable Care Act did not initially include Sutter hospitals.Terry Miller, 62, a businessman in the Bay Area, got a bill for $117,000 for a two-night stay at California Pacific Medical Center to place a stent to open one of his heart's clogged arteries — a charge that did not include fees for the cardiologist and radiologist. According to the Medicare database, California Pacific Medical Center charged $43,679 for hospitalization to treat a simple pneumonia and $96,642 to treat a stroke; the Medicare payments for those illnesses were $8,046 and $9,583.The high prices have had a ripple effect across Northern California, allowing smaller hospitals to charge more as well. "Sutter is the tallest Sequoia and everyone goes up just underneath them a bit," said Professor Melnick. He noted that hospital prices in California had more than doubled in the past decade, after adjustment for inflation.And payouts in the Pacific region for simple emergency room treatments — stitches, a sprained ankle and an upper respiratory infection — were by far the highest in the country, about 50 percent higher than in the Northeast, according to an analysis performed for The Times. by the health care consulting firm Truven Health Analytics.In theory, health care consolidation can lead to economies of scale, but not if it produces complex supersize systems. Excess administrative costs accounted for about $190 billion of the $2.5 trillion medical bill of the United States in 2009, the Institute of Medicine estimated this year — money that could be used for other purposes."There is a big flurry of consolidation and the effects depend on what the objective of the health care system is," said Orry Jacobs of the health care consulting firm BDC Advisors. "If the intent is to improve care and bend cost curves, then networks can do so. If the objective is to corner the market and demand higher rates, then that will happen." Indeed, research shows that today's hospital mergers tend to drive up prices.And employers have limited ability to fight back. Sutter operates the only hospital in some California cities. And employers have limited ability to fight back. Sutter operates the only hospital in some California cities. Because of pricing issues, fewer health plans offered by the University of California, Berkeley, will include Sutter hospitals in 2014 compared to this year.As is often the case in American medicine, patients will decide if they are willing to pay the high price of care. Back home in New York City, Orla Duffy's head wound has healed nicely without further treatment. Deepika Singh had her stitches taken out at an urgent care clinic, costing $25 with her copay, during a business trip to Washington.Daniel Diaz, who had been treated at Lenox Hill, Mr. Roberts and Amy Bernstein had no choice but to visit an emergency room this year for stitches. But they all refused to see a doctor for the follow-up."The amount was outrageous for the time it took to put them in," said Ms. Bernstein, 54, a real estate lawyer from Long Island, who cut herself cleaning knives while fixing a kitchen damaged by Hurricane Sandy. "I was so disgusted, I took them out myself."This article has been revised to reflect the following correction: An article on Dec. 3 about the high cost of hospital care in California omitted one hospital owned by Sutter Health that is accessible through the health plans offered to employees of the University of California, Berkeley, and referred imprecisely to the accessibility of another. Alta-Bates Summit Medical Center is indeed included in some of these plans' networks, but California Pacific Medical Center is only available to patients in a few plans with high coinsurance payments.
Scientists have been eager to see if oxytocin, which plays a role in emotional bonding, trust and many biological processes, can improve social behavior in people with autism. Some parents of children with autism have asked doctors to prescribe it, although it is not an approved treatment for autism, or have purchased lower-dose versions of the drug over the counter.Scientifically, the jury is out, and experts say parents should wait until more is known. Some studies suggest that oxytocin, sometimes called the "love hormone," improves the ability to empathize and connect socially, and may decrease repetitive behaviors. Others find little or no impact, and some research suggests that it can promote clannish and competitive feelings, or exacerbate symptoms in people already oversensitive to social cues. Importantly, nobody knows if oxytocin is safe or desirable to use regularly or long term.Now, the first study of how oxytocin affects the brains of children with autism finds hints of promise — and also suggestions of what its limitations might be.On the promising side, the small study, published Monday in The Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences, found that the hormone, given as an inhalant, generated increased activity in parts of the brain involved in social connection. This suggests not only that oxytocin can stimulate social brain areas, but also that in children with autism these brain regions are not irrevocably damaged but are plastic enough to be influenced.The limitations could include a finding that oxytocin prompted greater brain activity in children with the least severe autism. Some experts said that this could imply that oxytocin may work primarily in less-impaired people, but others said it might simply suggest that different doses are needed."Here we have a really clear demonstration that oxytocin is affecting brain activity in people with autism," said Dr. Linmarie Sikich, director of the Adolescent and School-Age Psychiatric Intervention Research Program at the University of North Carolina, who was not involved in the study. "What this shows is that the brains of people with autism aren't incapable of responding in a more typical social way."Nonetheless, said Dr. Sikich, who will be leading a large federally funded trial of 300 children to evaluate behavioral effects of daily oxytocin for six or 12 months, "there's still a big gap in knowing how much it will really change overall functioning and how to best use it."In the new study, conducted by the Yale Child Study Center, 17 children, ages 8 to 16, all with mild autism, got a spray of oxytocin or a placebo (researchers did not know which, and in another session each child received the other substance). The children were placed in a functional magnetic resonance imaging machine, an f.M.R.I., and given a well-established test of social-emotional perception: matching emotions to photographs of people's eyes. They took a similar test involving objects, choosing if photos of fragments of vehicles corresponded to cars, trucks, and so on.During the "eyes" test, brain areas involved in social functions like empathy and reward — less active in children with autism — showed more activity after taking oxytocin than after placebo. Also, during the "vehicles" tests, oxytocin decreased activity in those brain areas more than the placebo, a result that especially excited some experts."If you can decrease their attention to a shape or object so you can get them to pay attention to a social stimulus, that's a big thing," said Deborah A. Fein, a psychology professor at the University of Connecticut.With oxytocin, the children did not do better on the social-emotional test, unlike in some other studies. But experts said that was not surprising, given the difficulty of answering challenging questions while staying still in an f.M.R.I."What I would look for is more evidence of looking in the eyes of parents, more attention to what parents are saying, less tendency to lecture parents on their National Geographic collection," Dr. Fein said.The Yale researchers did study oxytocin's effect on such social interactions and are analyzing those results for later publication, said Ilanit Gordon, a co-author of the study.The Yale team suggests that oxytocin may be most useful not as a continuous treatment to enhance general social skills, but as a tool to help children benefit more from behavioral therapy or specific social experiences.
Kira Milas has no idea who called 911, summoning an ambulance filled with emergency medical technicians. Ms. Milas, 23, was working as a swim instructor for the summer and had swum into the side of the pool, breaking three teeth.Shaken, she accepted the ambulance ride to Scripps Memorial Hospital in La Jolla, Calif. The paramedics applied a neck brace as a precaution.A week later she received a bill for the 15-minute trip: $1,772.42. Though her employer's workers' compensation will cover the bill, she still was stunned at the charge. "We only drove nine miles and it was a non-life-threatening injury," she said in a phone interview. "I needed absolutely no emergency treatment."Thirty years ago ambulance rides were generally provided free of charge, underwritten by taxpayers as a municipal service or provided by volunteers. Today, like the rest of the health care system in the United States, most ambulance services operate as businesses and contribute to America's escalating medical bills. Often, they are a high-cost prequel to expensive emergency room visits.Although ambulances are often requested by a bystander or summoned by 911 dispatchers, they are almost always billed to the patient involved. And the charges, as well as insurance coverage, range widely, from zero to tens of thousands of dollars."There are a significant numbers of patients who have no coverage for this, and the number of self-pay patients has climbed" since the recession, said Jay Fitch, president of Fitch and Associates, the largest emergency medical services consulting firm in the United States.What is more, since ambulances companies typically collect only 30 to 40 percent of the amount they bill, they often try to charge more for patients with insurance and those who can pay, Mr. Fitch said.Part of the inconsistency in pricing stems from the fact that ambulance services are variously run by fire departments, hospitals, private companies and volunteer groups. Some services are included in insurance networks, others not."There's a saying that if you've seen one emergency medical system, you've seen one emergency medical system — no two are alike," said Dr. Robert E. O'Connor, a vice president of the American College of Emergency Medicine and chairman of the department at the University of Virginia. Charges and payments, he said, "are all over the place." Fire departments, which don't charge for driving to fire alarms, do charge for ambulance runs.In such a fragmented system, it is hard to know how much high-priced ambulance transport contributes nationally to America's $2.7 trillion health care bill. And total out-of-pocket expenditures by individuals are hard to tally.But Medicare, the insurance program for the elderly, does tabulate its numbers and has become alarmed at its fast-rising expenditures for ambulance rides: nearly $6 billion a year, up from just $2 billion in 2002.That is true even though Medicare's fixed payments for ambulance rides — ranging from $289 to $481 in 2011 — are far lower than commercial rates. Ambulance companies complain that Medicare rates do not meet the costs of running what are essentially mobile emergency rooms staffed by highly trained professionals.In a recent study, the federal Health and Human Services Department's Office of the Inspector General noted that the Medicare ambulance services were "vulnerable to abuse and fraud," in part because there were lax standards on when an ambulance was needed and how the trip should be billed. The number of transports paid for by Medicare increased 69 percent between 2002 and 2011, while the number of Medicare patients increased only 7 percent during that period. In the last year, two ambulance companies have pleaded guilty or settled claims for overbilling Medicare.The Affordable Care Act requires policies to include some coverage for emergency care as an essential benefit, including ambulance transport. But the ambulance ride and the care are billed separately. Many Silver plans — a lower-tier plan — require patients to pay an initial copay of $250 for the emergency room and $250 more for the transport, for example.Every insurance plan evaluates ambulance rides differently for coverage, with many seeking to determine if the service was really needed — a true "emergency."That determination can be highly subjective. Some will grant coverage if the destination was an emergency room, regardless of the patient's status, but others may require admittance to the hospital as evidence that the condition was serious. "Insurers will generally cover if you had good reason to believe there was a serious threat to your life or health," said Susan Pisano, a spokeswoman for America's Health Insurance Plans, an industry group.But when an ambulance arrives, sick patients or injured people like Ms. Milas, often feel they have little choice but to get in, unaware of the potential price tag.If an emergency call comes to 911, dispatchers decide which ambulance to send, depending on proximity. Most ambulance companies bill according to the level of skill of the team on board, rather than the medical needs of the patients they collect. A team capable of administering Advanced Cardiac Life Support costs more than one with only basic first aid training.Distance rarely counts for much, although a small mileage charge is added to the fee. Some companies even charge hundreds of dollars extra if a friend or relative rides along with an injured patients.This fall, Joanne Freedman went to an urgent care center near her home in New York City with a bad headache and a fever. The doctor recommended she go to a hospital for further evaluation and offered to call an ambulance."I could have walked, but I'm feeling crummy so I think, ' OK, why not?' " she recalled.The two-block ride was billed at $900, and she has not yet learned what her insurer may ask her to pay."It was crazy," she said. "All they did was put a paper mask on me so I wouldn't infect anyone else." Ms. Freedman had a spinal tap at the hospital and was admitted for a few days. Nonetheless, she said, for $900, the next time, no matter how ill she will walk up the hill or take a cab.
ATLANTA — There's more evidence that U.S. births may be leveling off after years of decline.The number of babies born last year only slipped a little, and preliminary government figures released Friday indicate that trend continued through the first six months of this year.U.S. births rose after the late 1990s and hit an all-time high of more than 4.3 million in 2007. But then they started dropping each year, and in 2011 the number was as low as it had been in the 1990s.The decline was widely attributed to the nation's economy. Experts believed that many women or couples who were out of work or had other money problems felt they couldn't afford to start or add to their family.Last year, the number of babies born — a little shy of 4 million — was only a few hundred less than in 2011, which some saw as a signal that the decline may be bottoming out.The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention's latest figures show the number of births from July 2012 through last June were essentially the same as the previous 12 months, suggesting the trend is continuing."Perhaps it's because the economy — knock wood — has bottomed out" and improved, said Gretchen Livingston of the Pew Research Center in Washington, D.C. Livingston researches birth trends.Earlier this week, another CDC report showed a decline not only in women giving birth but in getting pregnant. In 2009, the pregnancy rate dropped to its lowest level in 12 years. Of the nearly 6.4 million estimated pregnancies, about 4.1 million resulted in births, more than 1.1 million ended in abortions and about 1 million were miscarriages. Abortions accounted for 18 percent of pregnancies, down from 24 percent in 2009, said that report's lead author, CDC statistician Sally Curtin.The highest pregnancy rates have shifted from women in their early 20s to those in their late 20s. That parallels a shift in the average age that women first get married.
Two patients in Boston whom doctors hoped they had cured of both H.I.V. and cancer through bone-marrow transplants have seen their H.I.V. return, researchers said Friday.Although there was never an expectation that risky bone-marrow transplants would soon be a routine treatment for H.I.V., the news was frustrating to AIDS experts. Many had hoped that the "graft versus host" battle that virtually all such transplants set off could become a potent weapon, at least in a few high-risk cases.In July, when the two cases were first discussed at an international AIDS conference, it was suggested that they might echo the case of Timothy Ray Brown, the famous "Berlin patient," who has been free of H.I.V. since a 2008 bone-marrow transplant from a donor with a rare mutation that confers resistance to the virus. Some experts regard him as the first patient cured of H.I.V.The resurgence of the virus in the two patients is "disappointing but scientifically significant," Dr. Timothy J. Henrich, who oversees their care at Brigham and Women's Hospital in Boston, said in a statement.Both men are back on antiretroviral drugs and "in good health," Dr. Henrich added.Dr. Steven G. Deeks, an AIDS researcher at the University of California, San Francisco, called the results "disappointing but not unexpected." The cases demonstrate that the virus can hide so deeply in the body that it cannot be detected by the most sophisticated lab work."It just takes one virus in one cell," he said.Dr. Anthony S. Fauci, the director of the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases, said the failure "doesn't put an end to this avenue of research, but it certainly does put a damper on it."The two Boston men already had H.I.V. when they developed lymphoma, a blood cancer. Both kept taking antiretroviral drugs for H.I.V. while their bone marrow was weakened to prepare for the transplants. They stayed on the drugs for years afterward.Mr. Brown, in Berlin, received marrow from a donor with a rare mutation, known as delta 32, that makes blood cells virtually impervious to H.I.V. The Boston men's donors did not have the mutation; they were simply good matches.Dr. Henrich hoped that the new blood cells from the new marrow would find and kill all the old ones, which were both cancerous and infected with H.I.V., and that the antiretroviral drugs would protect the new blood cells against H.I.V.When no virus could be found in the men for months, they stopped taking the drugs.In July, Dr. Henrich announced that one man had been off the drugs for seven weeks and the other for 15, and that no virus had been found. (It normally returns within a month or so.)At that time, he and other researchers referred to the men as being in remission, not cured. But Dr. Henrich warned that the virus "could come back in a week, or in six months."On Friday, he said it had returned in one man in August and in the other man last month.Apparently, Dr. Fauci said, either some old infected cells survived or they infected some new ones before succumbing.While there may still be a way to make bone-marrow transplants work with H.I.V. patients, Dr. Fauci said, "it tells you for sure that it's not going to be easy."
CHICAGO — Harmless lung cancer? A provocative study found that nearly 1 in 5 lung tumors detected on CT scans are probably so slow-growing that they would never cause problems.The analysis suggests the world's No. 1 cause of cancer deaths isn't as lethal as doctors once thought.In the study, these were not false-positives — suspicious results that turn out upon further testing not to be cancer. These were indeed cancerous tumors, but ones that caused no symptoms and were unlikely ever to become deadly, the researchers said.Still, the results are not likely to change how doctors treat lung cancer.For one thing, the disease is usually diagnosed after symptoms develop, when tumors show up on an ordinary chest X-ray and are potentially life-threatening.Also, doctors don't know yet how to determine which symptomless tumors found on CT scans might become dangerous, so they automatically treat the cancer aggressively.The findings underscore the need to identify biological markers that would help doctors determine which tumors are harmless and which ones require treatment, said Dr. Edward Patz, Jr., lead author and a radiologist at Duke University Medical Center. He is among researchers working to do just that.Patz said patients who seek lung cancer screening should be told about the study results."People have to understand that we're going to find some cancers which if we'd never looked, we never would have had to treat," he said. Among patients and even many doctors, "it's not something that is commonly known with lung cancer.""Putting the word 'harmless' next to cancer is such a foreign concept to people," said Dr. Michael LeFevre, co-chairman of the U.S. Preventive Services Task Force.The panel recently issued a draft proposal recommending annual CT scans for high-risk current and former heavy smokers — echoing advice from the American Cancer Society. A final recommendation is pending, but LeFevre said the panel had already assumed that screening might lead to overdiagnosis."The more we bring public awareness of this, then the more informed decisions might be when people decide to screen or not," LeFevre said. He called the study "a very important contribution," but said doctors will face a challenge in trying to explain the results to patients.In testimonials, patients often say lung cancer screening via CT scans cured them, but the study suggests that in many cases, "we cured them of a disease we didn't need to find in the first place," LeFevre said.The study was published Monday in the journal JAMA Internal Medicine.More than 200,000 Americans are diagnosed with lung cancer each year, and more than half of them die. Worldwide, there are about 1.5 million lung cancer deaths annually.The new study is an analysis of data from the National Lung Cancer Screening Trial — National Cancer Institute research involving 53,452 people at high risk for lung cancer who were followed for about six years.Half of them got three annual low-dose CT scans — a type of X-ray that is much more sensitive than the ordinary variety — and half got three annual conventional chest X-rays. During six years of follow-up, 1,089 lung cancers were diagnosed in CT scan patients, versus 969 in those who got chest X-rays.That would suggest CT scans are finding many early cases of lung cancer that may never advance to the point where they could be spotted on an ordinary chest X-ray.An earlier report on the study found that 320 patients would need to get CT screening to prevent one lung cancer death.The new analysis suggests that for every 10 lives saved by CT lung cancer screening, almost 14 people will have been diagnosed with a lung cancer that would never have caused any harm, said Dr. Len Lichtenfeld, the cancer society's deputy chief medical officer.He said that is a higher rate of overdiagnosis than he would have predicted, but that the study shows how much understanding of cancer has evolved. Decades ago, "every cancer was a bad cancer," he said.Now it's known that certain cancers, including many prostate cancers, grow so slowly that they never need treatment.The American College of Radiology said in statement Monday that the earlier study showed lung cancer screening significantly reduces lung cancer deaths in high-risk patients and that the benefit "significantly outweighs the comparatively modest rate of overdiagnosis" found in the new analysis.Low-dose CT scans are the only test shown to reduce lung cancer deaths in high-risk smokers, the radiology group said, adding, "Overdiagnosis is an expected part of any screening program and does not alter these facts."
Middle-income countries in Asia and Latin America have been doing better at saving premature infants, experts report, but blindness and cerebral palsy are on the rise among the babies saved.Similar trends occurred in the United States and Europe in the 1940s and '50s, and "there is a risk of recreating that epidemic," said Dr. Joy E. Lawn, a neonatologist at the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine and the leader of a team doing new research on premature births.Six of the team's papers were published on The Reproductive Health Journal's website last month as part of World Prematurity Day.Many hospitals in middle-income countries can now save babies who would once have died, Dr. Lawn said, but lack the ability to monitor them.For example, premature babies given too much oxygen may have abnormal growth of blood vessels in the eye, which can leave them blind.Dr. Lawn said she had been in wards where several babies were receiving oxygen, yet the hospital had no pulse oximeters to monitor their blood-oxygen levels.Jaundiced babies whose bilirubin levels rise too high can develop cerebral palsy.In poor countries, the risk of death for premature babies is 10 times as high as in rich countries. In middle-income countries, the risk of death is only slightly higher than in the West, Dr. Lawn said, "but the risk of severe disability is twice as high."About 15 million babies around the world are born prematurely each year. About two million die soon after birth, and more than 900,000 survivors have some impairment.
Michael French, whose long struggle with the brain disease frontotemporal dementia was the subject of a 2012 New York Times article and video , died Nov. 30 at a nursing home in Manhattan. He was 73.Mr. French's illness, also called frontotemporal degeneration or Pick's disease, gradually destroys parts of the frontal and temporal lobes, essential for decision-making, emotion, judgment and language. Unlike Alzheimer's, it does not attack memory at first, but begins with silence, apathy or odd behavior.It is thought to afflict 50,000 to 60,000 people in the United States; about five million have Alzheimer's.As often occurs, the disease crept up insidiously on Mr. French, causing personality changes and uncharacteristic behavior that people close to him did not initially recognize as symptoms of illness.He had been trained in engineering and had a successful career in consulting, and a long and happy marriage. But in 2006, he began doing markedly strange things — making poor financial decisions, driving recklessly. He was fired from his job. And he turned so remote and silent that his wife, Ruth, thought he no longer cared for her.It became clear that Mr. French was silent not because he did not want to speak but because he could not. When the disease was diagnosed in 2007, Mrs. French said, she told her husband: "Whatever happens, we will go through this together. I will be there."By 2009 Mr. French was in a wheelchair. His wife cared for him at home as long as she could, and then visited him often at the nursing home.Although he could not speak, he always knew her, Mrs. French said, and retained an awareness of his surroundings. In the week before his death, she said, he was still laughing at her jokes, and he wept over a television program about the assassination of President John F. Kennedy.Mr. French died a few days after their 34th anniversary.
SAN ANTONIO — Tens of thousands of women each year might be able to skip at least some of the grueling treatments for breast cancer — which can include surgery, heavy chemo and radiation — without greatly harming their odds of survival, new research suggests.The research is aimed at curbing overtreatment, a big problem in cancer care. Treatments help many women beat the disease, but giving too many or ones that aren't really needed causes unnecessary expense, trauma and lifelong side effects, such as arm swelling and heart troubles. Radiation can even raise the risk of new cancers.Several studies presented Wednesday at the San Antonio Breast Cancer Symposium, an international conference on the disease, identify groups of patients who might be able to safely forgo certain treatments.One found that many older women can skip radiation after surgery for early-stage tumors. Two others suggest that surgery may not help patients whose cancer has already spread widely. A fourth study tested a "light chemo" combination that could become a new standard of care.The trend is "less and less therapy" for certain cancer types, said one conference leader, Dr. C. Kent Osborne of Baylor College of Medicine.Breast cancer is already widely spread in 5 to 20 percent of newly diagnosed patients, and at that point is usually incurable. The main treatment is chemotherapy or hormone treatments that attack cancer throughout the body. Sometimes doctors also remove the breast tumor in hope of prolonging survival, but this has not been put to a hard test.Dr. Rajendra Badwe, director of the Tata Memorial Hospital in Mumbai, India, led a study of 350 women with widely spread cancers that had shrunk after initial chemotherapy. Half were given surgery to remove the breast or the lump plus any cancerous lymph nodes. The rest did not have surgery.After about two years, 40 percent of both groups were alive, suggesting that medicines are enough and that these women can be spared the ordeal of having all or part of a breast removed.A second study by Dr. Atilla Soran of the University of Pittsburgh Medical Center of nearly 300 women in Turkey also suggests surgery is not helping, though there were hints that some groups did better or worse. Surgery seemed to help if cancer had spread just to bone, and it appeared to do harm if it had spread to the liver or lungs."These are incredibly important, big-deal studies," said Dr. Claudine Isaacs, a breast specialist at Georgetown University's Lombardi Comprehensive Cancer Center. Many doctors jumped on earlier, less rigorous studies and advised women to have surgery, and this should be a warning against that, she said.The results also may spur interest in a U.S. study on the topic. Dr. Seema Khan of Northwestern University in Chicago has had so much trouble recruiting participants that she lowered her goal and may not be able to answer the question."There's a huge amount of bias" among doctors and patients about what is best, she said.Most breast cancers are found at an early stage, and many women are treated with surgery followed by hormones or chemotherapy, plus radiation. But cancer medicines have gotten so good at lowering the risk of a recurrence that doctors wonder whether the radiation is still needed. It can cause heart and other problems, especially in older women, and three or four weeks of daily treatments can be a burden.Dr. Ian Kunkler of the University of Edinburgh in Scotland led a study of 1,326 patients 65 or older with early-stage cancers whose growth was driven by hormones. This is the most common form of the disease and the age group that accounts for most cases. Half were given radiation and half skipped it.After five years, roughly 96 percent of both groups were alive, and most deaths were not from breast cancer. About 1 percent of those given radiation had cancer recur in the treated breast versus 4 percent of those who skipped radiation.For every 100 women given radiation, "one will have a recurrence anyway, four will have a recurrence prevented, but 95 will have had unnecessary treatment," Kunkler said. Since radiation did not affect survival or the risk of cancer spreading, skipping it "is a reasonable option."Doctors are unsure how to treat women with small tumors involving the gene that the drug Herceptin targets. Those tumors are low risk because they're still confined to the breast, but high risk because the gene is thought to make them more aggressive. Some women get heavy-duty chemo, including drugs that can damage the heart.Dr. Eric Winer of the Dana-Farber Cancer Institute in Boston led a study of 406 women given "light chemo" — paclitaxel plus Herceptin for 12 weeks, followed by nine months of Herceptin alone. More than three years later, only four had cancer recur in the same breast, and two had recurrences in other places."This is likely to become a new standard," Winer said.The cancer conference is sponsored by the American Association for Cancer Research, Baylor and the UT Health Science Center.
After visiting dozens of doctors and suffering for nearly five years from pelvic pain so severe that he could not work, Daniel Davidson, 57, a dentist in Dalton Gardens, Idaho, finally found a specialist in Phoenix who had an outstanding reputation for treating men like him.Dr. Davidson, whose pain followed an injury, waited five months for an appointment and even rented an apartment in Phoenix, assuming he would need surgery and time to recover.Six days before the appointment, it was canceled. The doctor, Michael Hibner, an obstetrician-gynecologist at St. Joseph's Hospital and Medical Center, had learned that members of his specialty were not allowed to treat men and that if he did so, he could lose his board certification — something that doctors need in order to work.The rule had come from the American Board of Obstetrics and Gynecology. On Sept. 12, it posted on its website a newly stringent and explicit statement of what its members could and could not do. Except for a few conditions, gynecologists were prohibited from treating men. Pelvic pain was not among the exceptions.Dr. Davidson went home, close to despair. His condition has left him largely bedridden. The pain makes it unbearable for him to sit, and he can stand for only limited periods before he needs to lie down."These characters at the board jerked the rug out from underneath me," he said.In an email, Dr. Hibner confirmed that he had stopped treating men, who he said had made up about 10 percent to 15 percent of his practice. He said his staff was trying to find other physicians for about 100 male patients.Other men are in a similar situation, unsure of where to turn for help. A number of nerve and muscle problems can cause debilitating pelvic pain syndromes in both men and women, but the problems are more common in women, and gynecologists often have the most skill in treating this type of pain, experts in the field say.The gynecology board differs, saying that many other types of doctors can treat these ailments in men, according to a spokesman, David Margulies, who heads a public relations firm in Dallas. Board members declined to be interviewed.The same board reversed itself for another group of male patients last month, however, and said gynecologists would be permitted to screen and treat men who are at high risk for anal cancer.The board has also informed one patient, who appealed to it directly, that he can continue being treated for pelvic pain by Dr. Hibner — the same doctor in Phoenix whom Dr. Davidson had hoped to see. In an email, which the patient shared with The New York Times, a board official said the intent of its policy was "not to have doctors abandon their current patients like you."But Mr. Margulies said the permission for that patient's treatment did not mean that the overall policy had changed. He said, "A one-time exception was made for one individual."A specialty group, the International Pelvic Pain Society, wrote to the gynecology board, requesting that gynecologists be permitted to continue treating men for pelvic pain. The board declined.The pain society has 300 to 400 members; about half are physical therapists, and 40 percent are obstetrician-gynecologists, said Dr. Richard Marvel, a former president and an obstetrician-gynecologist in Annapolis, Md., who has treated men for pelvic pain.In an email, the pain society said, "Gynecologists with the appropriate skills, experience and knowledge who choose to participate in the care of men with chronic pelvic pain should not be at risk of losing their board certification, solely because they participate in the care of patients who have a real need, suffer tremendously and have limited options for treatment."Stephanie Prendergast, president of the pain society and a physical therapist at the Pelvic Health and Rehabilitation Center in San Francisco, said in an email, "I can assure you these gynecologists are better equipped to treat male patients with pelvic pain than most urologists, neurologists, orthopedists, etc."Pelvic pain is poorly understood and in men is frequently misdiagnosed as prostate trouble. Major nerves and muscles involved are the same in men and women, so some gynecologists began accepting male patients.Patients say the pain can be excruciating, and constant.In an interview, one man, 34, who had pain for years before finding treatment that helped, said, "I never would have been an end-my-life kind of person, but if I got run over by a car I wouldn't have been that disappointed."Treatment may involve physical therapy, daily medication, nerve-block injections, counseling, lifestyle changes and, as a last resort, surgery. It can take months, or longer.Dr. Marvel said that he had treated 66 men in the last three and half years, and that many had already consulted other doctors. Sometimes the trouble starts with biking; a few patients have been bull riders.Often he finds that patients have not even been examined properly. Pelvic pain often arises from injured or irritated nerves, and diagnosing it may require sensory testing with pinpricks and cotton swabs in the genital area — a type of exam that many doctors are not comfortable performing, Dr. Marvel said.Regarding the board's ruling, he said: "I'm a little stressed out about it. Obviously I don't want to lose my board certification." Asked if he would continue treating men, he hesitated, then said: "Well, I mean for now, I plan to still see men if I have men who need the care. But I'm not sure."He added: "We don't really want to fight with the board. But we do want them to see our position, that we're just trying to help these patients who can't get help any other way."
WASHINGTON — It's a growing side effect of modern medicine: A test for one condition turns up something completely unrelated. It might be a real danger, or an anxiety-provoking false alarm.Doctors dub this the dreaded "incidentaloma" — so-called incidental findings that tell people more than they bargained for, things they might not need or want to know.A presidential advisory council said Thursday it's time to be more up-front about that risk with patients before their next X-ray or gene test turns up a disturbing surprise."Incidental findings can be life-saving, but they also can lead to uncertainty and distress," cautioned Amy Gutmann of the University of Pennsylvania, who chairs the Presidential Commission for the Study of Bioethical Issues.It's an issue that "will likely touch all of us who seek medical care, participate in research, or send a cheek swab to a company for a peek at our own genetic makeup," she said.It may seem obvious that if your family doctor orders X-rays for a broken rib that also spot signs of cancer, you'll be told. But Thursday's report notes that not every medical condition that can be found should be — and there's conflicting advice about how to disclose and manage incidental findings.Consider: Ten percent of brain scans spot something unrelated that may require more testing, said bioethics panel member Dr. Stephen Hauser, neurology chairman at the University of California, San Francisco.Anywhere from 30 percent to 43 percent of abdominal CT scans turn up incidental findings, according to studies cited by the commission. In fact, the bioethics report said that at trauma centers, these high-powered scans that aim to find subtle injuries instead are more likely to make an incidental finding.And say a doctor maps your child's genes to help diagnose some puzzling muscle symptoms — but also discovers genes that may trigger breast cancer after she's grown. That incidental finding has implications for other relatives, too.Sometimes, surprise findings can be life-saving, for example in the case of an athlete whose brain is scanned after a concussion, and radiologists spot a tumor, Hauser said.Other times, nothing can be done. That same brain scan might show early signs of an incurable condition, Hauser said, and "this young person now needs to live with the knowledge that she may someday develop this neurologic disease."Follow-up testing may do harm. The panel's worst-case example: Doctors see a suspicious spot on a lung while testing an elderly patient's risk of a stroke. A biopsy determines the spot is nothing, a benign scar — but that biopsy makes the lung collapse, triggering cardiac arrest.Nor do patients necessarily want to know everything the doctor learns. A cancer survivor may agree to be X-rayed for broken bones after a fall. But if she doesn't want to know about any signs of returning tumors, it's ethical for the doctor to respect that decision, Gutmann said.The bioethics panel is urging better anticipation of and communication about how they handle these surprises. Among the recommendations:—Doctors, researchers and direct-to-consumer companies alike should inform potential patients about the possibility of incidental findings before they undergo a medical test. They should clearly explain what will and won't be disclosed, so patients can make an informed decision about whether and how to proceed.—Professional groups should develop guidelines about incidental findings common to different tests, and how to handle them.—The government should fund more research into the costs, benefits and harms of identifying, disclosing and managing different incidental findings.—Health workers should explore the pros and cons of test results with patients ahead of time, in what's called shared decision-making, to learn what they don't want to be told.The opt-out provision differs from guidelines issued earlier this year by the American College of Medical Genetics. That group says laboratories should automatically notify doctors if genetic tests turn up any of about 50 genes linked to two dozen diseases that might be treatable or preventable if discovered early."When people go into these kinds of tests, you never think it's you, that you're the one that's going to have something found," explained ACMG executive director Michael Watson. "We didn't think they should opt out of hearing about those results prior to the test."People should be educated about incidental findings in time to consider how they'd want to handle one, said Dr. Sarah Hilgenberg of Stanford University, who told the bioethics panel about her own experience. As a medical student, Hilgenberg enrolled in a study of memory that scanned her brain. Researchers weren't obligated to reveal the suspicious spot they found but did — letting her get treatment for an abnormality that otherwise might have triggered dangerous bleeding."I would imagine it doesn't ordinarily cross people's minds," said Hilgenberg, who praised Thursday's recommendations.
ATLANTA — Health officials say the flu season seems to be getting off to more normal start this year.Reports of the flu have been increasing, particularly in the South. But it's nothing like last year, when flu hit early and very hard in early December.The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention on Thursday said last year's flu season landed about 381,000 people in the hospital — the most since at least 2005. A contributing factor: The flu vaccine was only 51 percent effective overallCDC officials said it's too early to know how bad this season will be or when it will peak. Flu is usually the worst in January or February.
WASHINGTON — The Food and Drug Administration on Wednesday put in place a major new policy to phase out the indiscriminate use of antibiotics in cows, pigs and chickens raised for meat, a practice that experts say has endangered human health by fueling the growing epidemic of antibiotic resistance.This is the agency's first serious attempt in decades to curb what experts have long regarded as the systematic overuse of antibiotics in healthy farm animals, with the drugs typically added directly into their feed and water. The waning effectiveness of antibiotics — wonder drugs of the 20th century — has become a looming threat to public health. At least two million Americans fall sick every year and about 23,000 die from antibiotic-resistant infections."This is the first significant step in dealing with this important public health concern in 20 years," said David Kessler, a former F.D.A. commissioner who has been critical of the agency's track record on antibiotics. "No one should underestimate how big a lift this has been in changing widespread and long entrenched industry practices."The change, which is to take effect over the next three years, will effectively make it illegal for farmers and ranchers to use antibiotics to make animals grow bigger. The producers had found that feeding low doses of antibiotics to animals throughout their lives led them to grow plumper and larger. Scientists still debate why. Food producers will also have to get a prescription from a veterinarian to use the drugs to prevent disease in their animals.Federal officials said the new policy would improve health in the United States by tightening the use of classes of antibiotics that save human lives, including penicillin, azithromycin and tetracycline. Food producers said they would abide by the new rules, but some public health advocates voiced concerns that loopholes could render the new policy toothless.Health officials have warned since the 1970s that overuse of antibiotics in animals was leading to the development of infections resistant to treatment in humans. For years, modest efforts by federal officials to reduce the use of antibiotics in animals were thwarted by the powerful food industry and its substantial lobbying power in Congress. Pressure for federal action has mounted as the effectiveness of drugs important for human health has declined, and deaths from bugs resistant to antibiotics have soared.Under the new policy, the agency is asking drug makers to change the labels that detail how a drug can be used so they would bar farmers from using the medicines to promote growth.The changes, originally proposed in 2012, are voluntary for drug companies. But F.D.A. officials said they believed that the companies would comply, based on discussions during the public comment period. The two drug makers that represent a majority of such antibiotic products — Zoetis and Elanco — have already stated their intent to participate, F.D.A. officials said. Companies will have three months to tell the agency whether they will change the labels, and three years to carry out the new rules.Additionally, the agency is requiring that licensed veterinarians supervise the use of antibiotics, effectively requiring farmers and ranchers to obtain prescriptions to use the drugs for their animals."It's a big shift from the current situation, in which animal producers can go to a local feed store and buy these medicines over the counter and there is no oversight at all," said Michael Taylor, the F.D.A.'s deputy commissioner for foods and veterinary medicine.Some consumer health advocates were skeptical that the new rules would reduce the amount of antibiotics consumed by animals. They say that a loophole will allow animal producers to keep using the same low doses of antibiotics by contending they are needed to keep animals from getting sick, and evading the new ban on use for growth promotion.
SAN ANTONIO — A novel way to speed the testing of cancer drugs and quickly separate winners from duds has yielded its first big result: an experimental medicine that shows promise against a hard-to-treat form of breast cancer.The method involves studying drugs in small groups of people and using advanced statistical techniques to analyze the results as they come in, instead of waiting for all the data to arrive.Whether the drug, veliparib, ever makes it to market remains to be seen, but it has shown enough potential to advance to final-phase testing aimed at Food and Drug Administration approval.Bringing a new cancer drug to market usually takes more than a decade and tests in thousands of patients, and costs more than $1 billion. Companies can't afford many studies like that, and patients can't wait years for potentially life-saving new medicines, said Don Berry, a biostatistician at the University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center.He helped design the novel analytical method discussed Friday at the San Antonio Breast Cancer Symposium, an international conference.Researchers testing a drug usually don't see results until they're all in, to prevent biasing the study. But several years ago, an unusual partnership decided to try a new way. It involves the National Cancer Institute, the FDA, drug companies, dozens of cancer research centers and charitable foundations.The study, called I-SPY 2, puts small groups of women on experimental drugs or combinations, then gives them surgery to see what effect the medicines had. The best result is a complete response, where no signs of cancer remain.Each patient's results are analyzed as they come in, and advanced statistical methods are used to calculate probabilities that the drug would help in various situations, depending on which women had a complete response."This allows us to learn and adapt from each patient as the study goes on," and results on early participants guide treatment that later ones get, said Dr. Hope Rugo of the University of California, San Francisco. When enough evidence indicates a high probability of success, the drug "graduates" to final-phase testing.On Friday, Rugo gave results on veliparib, the first of seven drugs being tested. It is made by AbbVie Inc., a North Chicago, Ill., company recently spun off from Abbott Laboratories. It is in a new class of experimental medicines called PARP inhibitors, which target an enzyme cancer relies on to grow.The I-SPY 2 testing suggests that adding the chemotherapy drug carboplatin and veliparib to usual chemo before surgery improved outcomes for women with "triple negative" breast cancer — tumors that are not fueled by estrogen, progesterone or the gene that the medicine Herceptin targets.Up to 20 percent of breast cancers are this type, and they are more common in young women, blacks and Hispanics, and women with certain breast cancer gene mutations.Researchers were able to determine the drug's potential after tests in only 71 women and just six months of treatment. They calculated that tests of only 300 women with triple negative tumors are needed to give a definitive answer, and that the drug has at least a 90 percent probability of success in such patients. If more types of cancer are included, the probability of success drops to 55 percent.The results show that "we can get early reads on something that is worth pursuing" and bail quickly on treatments that don't help, said Dr. Carlos Arteaga of the Vanderbilt-Ingram Comprehensive Cancer Center.Veliparib has now graduated and is eligible for testing in a definitive study. It's not known how long that would take, but it surely would be shorter than the several years that traditional testing requires.FDA officials have said that in certain cases, complete responses can be considered a basis for conditional approval of a drug, as long as follow-up tests are done after the product is on the market to prove that it indeed is improving survival.Last week, another company participating in the I-SPY 2 study, Puma Biotechnology Inc., said its experimental drug neratinib had also graduated and would enter a definitive study. Results of the early testing will be presented at a cancer conference next year.The San Antonio meeting is sponsored by the American Association for Cancer Research, Baylor College of Medicine and the UT Health Science Center.
WASHINGTON — There's more disappointing news about multivitamins: Two major studies found popping the pills didn't protect aging men's brains or help heart attack survivors.Millions of Americans spend billions of dollars on vitamin combinations, presumably to boost their health and fill gaps in their diets. But while people who don't eat enough of certain nutrients may be urged to get them in pill form, the government doesn't recommend routine vitamin supplementation as a way to prevent chronic diseases.The studies released Monday are the latest to test if multivitamins might go that extra step and concluded they don't."Evidence is sufficient to advise against routine supplementation," said a sharply worded editorial that accompanied Monday's findings in the journal Annals of Internal Medicine.After all, most people who buy multivitamins and other supplements are generally healthy, said journal deputy editor Dr. Cynthia Mulrow. Even junk foods often are fortified with vitamins, while the main nutrition problem in the U.S. is too much fat and calories, she added.But other researchers say the jury's still out, especially for the country's most commonly used dietary supplement — multivitamins that are taken by about a third of U.S. adults, and even more by people over the age of 50.Indeed, the U.S. Preventive Services Task Force is deliberating whether vitamin supplements make any difference in the average person's risk of heart disease or cancer. In a draft proposal last month, the government advisory group said for standard multivitamins and certain other nutrients, there's not enough evidence to tell. (It did caution that two single supplements, beta-carotene and vitamin E, didn't work). A final decision is expected next year."For better or for worse, supplementation's not going to go away," said Dr. Howard Sesso of Brigham and Women's Hospital in Boston. He helps leads a large multivitamin study that has had mixed results — suggesting small benefits for some health conditions but not others — and says more research is needed, especially among the less healthy.Still, "there's no substitute for preaching a healthy diet and good behaviors" such as exercise, Sesso cautioned.As scientists debate, here are some questions and answers to consider in the vitamin aisle:Q: Why the new focus on multivitamins?A: Multivitamins have grown more popular in recent years as research showed that taking high doses of single supplements could be risky, such as beta-carotene.Multivitamins typically contain no more than 100 percent of the daily recommended amount of various nutrients. They're marketed as sort of a safety net for nutrition gaps; the industry's Council for Responsible Nutrition says they're taken largely for general wellness.Q: What are the latest findings?A: With Alzheimer's on the rise as the population ages, Harvard researchers wondered if long-term multivitamin use might help keep older brains agile. They examined a subset of nearly 6,000 male doctors, age 65 or older, who were part of a larger study. The men were given either multivitamins or dummy pills, without knowing which they were taking.After a decade of pill use, the vitamin-takers fared no better on memory or other cognitive tests, Sesso's team reported Monday in the journal Annals of Internal Medicine.Q: Did that Harvard study find any other benefit from multivitamins?A: The results of the Physicians Health Study II have been mixed. Overall it enrolled about 15,000 health male doctors age 50 and older, and the vitamin-takers had a slightly lower risk of cancer — 8 percent. Diet and exercise are more protective. They also had a similarly lower risk of developing cataracts, common to aging eyes. But the vitamins had no effect the risk for heart disease or another eye condition, Sesso said.Q: Might vitamins have a different effect on people who already have heart disease?A: As part of a broader treatment study, a separate research team asked that question. They examined 1,700 heart attack survivors, mostly men, who were given either a special multivitamin containing higher-than-usual doses of 28 ingredients or dummy pills. But the vitamins didn't reduce the chances of another heart attack, other cardiovascular problems, or death.A: Research involving postmenopausal women a few years ago also concluded multivitamins didn't prevent cancer or heart disease. But it wasn't nearly as rigorous a study as Monday's research, relying on women to recall what vitamins they used.A: The preventive services task force cited no safety issues with standard multivitamins. But specialists say to always tell your doctor what over-the-counter supplements you use. Some vitamins interact with some medications, and Sesso said anyone worried about nutrition should be discussing their diet with their doctor anyway.
A long-awaited study has confirmed the fears of Somali residents in Minneapolis that their children suffer from higher rates of a disabling form of autism compared with other children there.The study — by the University of Minnesota, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, and the research and advocacy group Autism Speaks — found high rates of autism in two populations: About one Somali child in 32 and one white child in 36 in Minneapolis were on the autism spectrum.The national average is one child in 88, according to Coleen A. Boyle, who directs the C.D.C.'s Center on Birth Defects and Developmental Disabilities.But the Somali children were less likely than the whites to be "high-functioning" and more likely to have I.Q.s below 70. (The average I.Q. score is 100.)The study offered no explanation of the statistics."We do not know why more Somali and white children were identified," said Amy S. Hewitt, the project's primary investigator and director of the University of Minnesota's Research and Training Center on Community Living. "This project was not designed to answer these questions."The results echoed those of a Swedish study published last year finding that children from immigrant families in Stockholm — many of them Somali — were more likely to have autism with intellectual disabilities.The Minneapolis study also found that Somali children with autism received their diagnoses late. Age 5 was the average, while autism and learning disabilities can be diagnosed as early as age 2, and children get the most benefit from behavioral treatment when it is started early.Black American-born children and Hispanic children in Minneapolis had much lower autism rates: one in 62 for the former and one in 80 for the latter.The study had limitations. The authors did not examine children directly, but reviewed the 2010 clinical and educational records of about 5,000 children ages 7 to 9 and made estimates.All the autistic Somali children in the study had I.Q. deficits, Dr. Hewitt said.Even though the city has Asian and Native American communities, records for so few of those children were studied that they were not included in the analysis, she added, "but it's reasonable to extrapolate that autism rates among them are lower."Autism rates vary widely across the 14 communities the C.D.C. follows, Dr. Boyle says. Alabama has low rates, while Utah's and New Jersey's are high.Generally, says Michael Rosanoff, a director of public health research for Autism Speaks, white children are the most likely to have an autism diagnosis, but that may be because they are more often sent to diagnostic specialists.Somali parents in Minneapolis have complained for years that many of their children had autism symptoms — failure to speak, reluctance to look others in the face, screaming and repetitive behaviors.At onetime, 25 percent of the children in local special education classes were Somali, while Somalis represented only 6 percent of the student body. While some children back home had the same problems children everywhere do, parents said, autism was so unfamiliar that there was no Somali word for it until "otismo" was coined in Minnesota."I feel good, actually," Idil Abdull, a Somali mother of an autistic child who was one of the first to demand an official investigation, said when she heard the results. "I was afraid they were going to say, 'We don't see anything.' And we know that our kids can't talk."Autism is silencing the kids of a nation of poets," continued Ms. Abdull, who has spoken about the issue at the United Nations. "Whether it's something in our genes and you add it to Minnesota snow or what, I don't know, but something's triggering autism. My dad taught me to recite poetry at age 4, and my kid is 11 and he can't say two sentences. It's heartbreaking."Dr. Hewitt and Mr. Rosanoff say they want to see more research comparing Somali children with autism to those without, including intelligence testing and genetic workups.
After years of mounting concerns that the antibacterial chemicals that go into everyday items like soap and toothpaste are doing more harm than good, the Food and Drug Administration said on Monday that it was requiring soap manufacturers to demonstrate that the substances were safe or to take them out of the products altogether.The proposal was applauded by public health experts, who for years have urged the agency to regulate antimicrobial chemicals, warning that they risk scrambling hormones in children and promoting drug-resistant infections, among other things. Producers argue that the substances have long been proved to be safe."It's a big deal that they are taking this on," said Rolf Halden, the director of the Center for Environmental Security at Arizona State University, who has been tracking the issue for years. "These antimicrobials have taken on a life all of their own," Dr. Halden said. "Their use has really proliferated."Studies in animals have shown that the chemicals, triclosan in liquid soaps and triclocarban in bar soaps, can disrupt the normal development of the reproductive system and metabolism, and health experts warn that their effects could be the same in humans. The chemicals were originally used by surgeons to wash their hands before operations, and their use exploded in recent years as manufacturers added them to a variety of products, including mouthwash, laundry detergent, fabrics and baby pacifiers. The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention found the chemicals in the urine of three-quarters of Americans.The F.D.A. said that accumulated scientific information has prompted it to re-evaluate whether these chemicals are safe when used over long periods of time. The agency also said there was no evidence that the substances were any more effective in preventing infection than plain soap and water.The proposed rule does not require producers of the soaps to take them off the market immediately. The F.D.A. has given companies a year to produce data showing that the chemicals are both safe and effective. If they cannot prove, the chemicals will need to be removed from the products, the agency said. The rule is open for public comment for 180 days. It does not apply to hand sanitizers, which will be considered separately.The move seemed to rattle the industry, which said in a statement that it was "perplexed that the agency would suggest there is no evidence that antibacterial soaps are beneficial," because it has long provided data to the agency showing the soaps' safety and efficacy, including at a public meeting in 2008.Changing the products could have a major financial impact. An estimate by the market research firm Kline & Company found that antimicrobial and antibacterial hand soaps represented about half of the $900 million market for liquid hand soaps in the United States in 2012. However, the use of triclosan in the $2.2 billion toothpaste market has been decreasing because of growing public concern over the ingredient, said Carrie Mellage, a vice president of consumer products at Kline.Federal regulators started to look more closely at the chemicals in the 1970s, with the F.D.A. first creating regulations to control them in 1978. But very little has been done since, public health advocates complain, partly because of agency slowness, but also because of industry lobbying. The Natural Resources Defense Council, frustrated by the inaction, filed a lawsuit in 2010 to force the agency to issue a final rule. Mae Wu, a lawyer with the council, said that under a settlement signed with the F.D.A. last month, the agency committed to taking final action by 2016.The F.D.A.'s move followed one last week that would phase out the use of antibiotics in animals raised for meat, and another in November that all but banned the use of trans fats in prepared foods. Taken together, the moves seemed to indicate that the F.D.A. is back in action after a long silence during months of bitter political battles that dragged on for months, even after the 2012 election, public health advocates said."I think they're ready to take on hard issues that they did not before," said Dr. Stuart Levy, a professor of medicine and microbiology at Tufts University and the president of the Alliance for the Prudent Use of Antibiotics.Dr. Halden compared triclosan and triclocarban with static on a telephone call, interfering in the final message that is delivered to the body. He said awareness of the risks rarely made it beyond a narrow circle of public health experts, but he hoped that the F.D.A.'s move on Monday would change that."These chemicals interfere with the regulation of the human body," he said, citing studies in animals. The chemicals accumulate in ground water and soil, and one study of human breast milk found the chemicals in the milk of 97 percent of the women tested, he said. "The fascinating thing is the public has not taken note of this issue."The gathering science that helped prompt the F.D.A.'s move includes studies on laboratory rats that showed decreases in thyroid hormone levels, said Dr. Colleen Rogers, a microbiologist at the F.D.A. Another agency official cited studies showing changes in animal cells' ability to respond to estrogen and testosterone.Senator Edward J. Markey, Democrat of Massachusetts, who has pressed federal regulators to more closely control antimicrobials, welcomed the move, saying the chemicals had long "existed in a regulatory black hole, despite serious concerns about its impact on public health." He said studies have linked triclosan to the disruption of other hormone functions important for fertility and puberty. He added that proper thyroid function is important for brain development, particularly in children.The industry argued that the active ingredients in antimicrobial soaps are over-the-counter drugs that go through rigorous reviews by the F.D.A., including of data. Two trade groups, the American Cleaning Institute and the Personal Care Products Council, cited a review of two dozen studies they said showed washing hands with antimicrobial soaps produces "statistically greater reductions in bacteria on the skin" than with plain soap."In some instances, these products have been found to be critical in the reduction of infection and disease," the groups said. They said they intended to file comments to the F.D.A. "reaffirming" that the use of antibacterial wash products does not contribute to antibiotic resistance.The Henkel Corporation, which makes Dial soaps, some of which include the antimicrobials, said it "takes the proposal seriously," and that it always makes sure "every ingredient in our products meets all applicable legal and regulatory requirements."
CHICAGO — Many older adults with high blood pressure can be treated less aggressively, which could mean taking fewer pills to get it under control, according to new treatment guidelines from an expert panel. But not all experts are on board with the advice — including the federal agency that appointed the group.Panel members stressed that they are not changing the definition of high blood pressure: 140 over 90. For adults aged 60 and older, they are recommending a higher treatment threshold, prescribing medicine only when blood pressure levels reach 150 over 90 or higher.Too aggressive blood pressure treatment can cause fainting and falls in older patients, or bad interactions with drugs they're already taking for other illnesses, panel members said.The panel does endorse the lower target of 140 over 90 for younger adults — and for all adults who also have diabetes or kidney disease.The guidelines released Wednesday are based on a review of the most rigorous kind of medical research — studies in which patients are randomly prescribed drugs or dummy pills — published since the last update in 2003. The research suggests older patients can avoid major health problems like heart attacks, strokes and kidney disease even when their blood pressure is above the current recommended level, the panel said.For many patients, two or three drugs — or more — are needed to bring their blood pressure down. Many older adults could probably reduce their doses, or take fewer drugs, to reach the new, less strict target, said Dr. Paul James, a panel member and family medicine specialist-researcher at the University of Iowa.While the guidelines were updated by a government-appointed panel, they don't have the government's endorsement like previous versions. The panel completed its work earlier this year, around the same time that the National Heart, Lung and Blood Institute announced that it was getting out of the guidelines business and turning the job over to the American Heart Association and American College of Cardiology. Updated guidelines from those medical groups are expected in late 2014.In the meantime, the heart association is raising concerns about the new recommendations, saying that many studies they are based on didn't last long enough to reveal dangers of undertreated high blood pressure in older patients. The panel also overlooked other evidence suggesting the 2003 government-backed recommendations are sound, said Dr. Elliott Antman, the heart association's president-elect. He noted that his group last month published a treatment formula that echoes the 2003 advice.Dr. Gary Gibbons, the federal agency's director, issued a statement Wednesday emphasizing that his agency has not sanctioned the panel's report, nor has the broader National Institutes of Health. While noting that the panel decided not to collaborate with the heart groups' efforts, Gibbons said his agency would work with those groups "to transition" the panel's evidence review into their update. His statement did not address whether the agency opposes all the panel's recommendations.James said panel members chose to release their guidelines independently to get the recommendations out sooner and into the hands of primary care doctors, who treat large numbers of patients with high blood pressure. The guidelines were published online Wednesday in the Journal of the American Medical Association.Dr. Curtis Rimmerman, a Cleveland Clinic cardiologist, called the guidelines "exceedingly important" given the prevalence of high blood pressure, which affects about 1 in 3 U.S. adults, or 68 million.Whether many doctors immediately adopt the advice "remains to be seen," he said. Rimmerman predicted that some will continue to push to get older patients' blood pressure lower than the new recommendation, especially those with previous strokes or heart problems.The panel said their guidelines are simply recommendations, and that doctors should make treatment decisions based on patients' individual circumstances. The experts emphasized that everyone with high blood pressure can benefit from a healthy diet, regular exercise and weight control, which all can help lower blood pressure.
NEW YORK — Can an experimental drug developed to treat epilepsy block the AIDS virus? A preliminary lab study suggests it's possible, and researchers are eager to try it in people.Scientists experimented with the drug after uncovering details of how they believe HIV cripples the immune system to bring on AIDS.When tested in human tissues in the laboratory, the drug "works beautifully" to prevent HIV from destroying key cells of the immune system, said Dr. Warner Greene of the Gladstone Institutes in San Francisco. Those results appear in a paper by Greene and others published online Thursday by the journal Nature.In that work, and a companion study published in Science, Greene and colleagues focus on how HIV kills vital CD4 cells of the disease-fighting immune system.Researchers have long known it infects some CD4 cells and turns them into virus-producing factories, killing them in the process. But far more cells die without undergoing that transformation. What is going on in these "bystander"CD4 cells?The new work provides evidence that HIV enters these cells but fails to produce a full-blown infection, and in response the cells trigger a lethal attack on themselves by the immune system.It's "more of a suicide than a murder," Greene said. "I believe this is the major mechanism through which CD4 cells are depleted, which is the hallmark of AIDS."The epilepsy drug, which is not on the market, blocks an enzyme that the research identified as playing a key role in that immune system attack.Prior studies of the drug in people show it is safe, Greene said. So the researchers are talking to the drug company about testing it in people infected with HIV. No timeline for such studies has been set, he said.Greene said if such studies are successful, the drug might be used in people whose HIV resists standard drugs. It might also be useful as a temporary treatment to keep HIV at bay for people who can't immediately get standard drugs, he said. It's even possible, he speculated, that the enzyme-blocking drug might help scientists eradicate the virus from the body.It's not clear yet whether the enzyme-blocking approach will produce a practical therapy for HIV-infected people, said Dr. Anthony Fauci, director of the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases, who was not involved in the work.But the new research behind that strategy is "an important advance" toward understanding how HIV kills immune system cells, he said.
New guidelines suggest that people over 60 can have a higher blood pressure than previously recommended before starting treatment to lower it. The advice, criticized by some physicians, changes treatment goals that have been in place for more than 30 years.Until now, people were told to strive for blood pressures below 140/90, with some taking multiple drugs to achieve that goal. But the guidelines committee, which spent five years reviewing evidence, concluded that the goal for people over 60 should be a systolic pressure of less than 150. And the diastolic goal should remain less than 90.Systolic blood pressure, the top number, indicates the pressure on blood vessels when the heart contracts. Diastolic, the bottom number, refers to pressure on blood vessels when the heart relaxes between beats.Essentially, the committee determined that there was not strong evidence for the blood pressure targets that had been guiding treatment, and that there were risks associated with the medications used to bring pressures down.The committee, composed of 17 academics, was tasked with updating guidelines last re-examined a decade ago. Their report was published online on Wednesday in The Journal of the American Medical Association.Hypertension experts said they did not have a precise figure on how many Americans would be affected by the new guidelines. But Dr. William B. White, the president of the American Society of Hypertension, said it was "a huge number for sure." He estimated that millions of people over 60 had blood pressures between 140 and 150. Dr. Paul A. James, the chairman of the department of family medicine at the University of Iowa and co-chairman of the guidelines committee, said, "If you get patients' blood pressure below 150, I believe you are doing as well as can be done based on scientific evidence."The group added that people over 60 who are taking drugs and have lowered their blood pressure to below 150 can continue taking the medications if they are not experiencing side effects.But, it cautioned, although efforts to lower blood pressure have had a remarkable effect, reducing the incidence of strokes and heart disease, there is a difference between lowering blood pressure with drugs and having lower pressure naturally.Medications that lower blood pressure can have effects that counteract some of the benefits, said Dr. Suzanne Oparil, a co-chairwoman of the committee and director of the vascular biology and hypertension program at the University of Alabama at Birmingham School of Medicine. For that reason, maximum benefits may occur with less intense treatment and higher blood pressure."The mantra of blood pressure experts in the past has been that lower is better," Dr. Oparil said. "Recent studies don't seem to support that."For example, two Japanese studies in older people found that those who reduced their systolic pressure to less than 140 fared no better than those who reduced it to between 140 and 160, or between 140 and 149."We have this notion that if we can get blood pressure to normal, we will have the most health benefits," Dr. James said. "That's not necessarily true."For people younger than 60, the goal remains blood pressure under 140/90. The panel decided to keep that target because it could not find rigorous studies that established systolic blood pressure goals for younger people.When blood pressure guidelines were first formulated in 1977, the committee only looked at diastolic pressure. "People thought systolic should be 100 plus your age," Dr. Oparil said. "That was old folk medicine."Observational studies then found that systolic pressure was a better predictor of consequences like strokes. Researchers began to test the effects of lowering systolic blood pressure, but their studies excluded younger people because they were looking for outcomes, like strokes or heart failure, that are more common in older people. As a result, there are no good studies showing that younger people benefit from taking drugs to achieve a particular systolic pressure.
CHICAGO — The detached dad, turning up his nose at diapering and too busy to bathe, dress and play with his kids, is mostly a myth, a big government survey suggests. Most American fathers say they are heavily involved in hands-on parenting, the researchers found.The nationally representative survey shows fathers' involvement has increased slightly since the government first asked in 2002, coinciding with research since then that bolsters the benefits of hands-on fathering.The results are encouraging and important "because others have found the more involved dads are, the better the outcomes for their children," said researcher Jo Jones of the National Center for Health Statistics, part of the Centers for Disease Control Prevention. She co-authored the report released Friday.More academic success, fewer behavior problems and healthier eating habits are just some of the ways fathers' involvement has been linked with children's well-being."Times have changed," said Robert Loftus, 34, of Yonkers, N.Y. He quit a six-figure sales job a year ago to care for his two young children while his wife works full time. "We're trying to rethink our priorities and family seems to be the No. 1 priority whereas in the past maybe people were more focused on career."The results build on volumes of research showing changes in the American family since the baby boom years and before, when women were mostly stay-at-home moms and dads were the major breadwinners. As those roles shifted, so did the view that moms are the only nurturers.University of Chicago sociologist Jennifer Bellamy, who also studies fathering, said some old stereotypes persist, "that dads are sort of the co-pilots in their families," absent or less involved than moms.But she said the survey confirms that fathers "are quite involved in a variety of different and important ways."The study involved nearly 4,000 fathers aged 15 to 44 who were interviewed in person between 2006 and 2010. One caveat: They self-reported their involvement, without input from their partners or others. Most men were married or living with a partner.Key findings among fathers living with children younger than 5:—9 in 10 bathed, diapered, helped them use the toilet or get dressed at least several times weekly.—Even higher numbers played with them and ate meals with them that often.—Almost 2 out of 3 read to them at least several times weekly.—More than 9 out of 10 ate meals with them at least several times weekly and talked with them about what happened during the kids' day that often.—Almost 2 out of 3 helped with homework several times weekly.—About half took their kids to or from activities that often.Overall, almost 90 percent of dads said they thought they were doing at least a good job of fathering.The researchers noted that during the study years, 45 percent of U.S. men — 28 million — aged 15 to 44 had a biological child. About the same number had a biological, adopted or non-related child living with them or an adopted or biological child living elsewhere.Survey questions were based on whether dads were living with their biological or unrelated kids, or apart.Most lived with their kids. Not surprisingly, men who didn't were less involved with parenting activities. Even so, several times weekly, at least 1 in 5 still managed to help bathe, diaper, dress, eat or play with their kids. Fathers of older children were generally less involved than those with kids younger than 5 but that's at least partly due to the changing nature of parenting as children mature.The survey suggests black fathers may be more involved than whites or Hispanics with some activities, including homework, but Jones downplayed racial differences and said some were not statistically significant.Men with at least some college education were generally more involved with their kids than less educated fathers.The CDC did a similar survey in 2002 that showed slightly less father involvement. Previous CDC surveys relied only on mothers' responses about family life so aren't comparable.A national parenting survey by University of Maryland researchers found that in 2000, married U.S. fathers spent about two hours weekly interacting with their kids aged 18 and younger, more than double the time spent in 1965.Dr. David Hill, a Wilmington, N.C., pediatrician and author of "Dad to Dad: Parenting Like a Pro," said the survey echoes what he's seen among his patients' fathers. Increasingly, fathers rather than mothers take their kids to the doctor, he said. Some "are anxious about changing a diaper," he said, but the study offers reassuring evidence "that everybody's doing this."Men weren't asked about employment, or whether they were stay-at-home dads, who still are rare though their ranks have increased. Census numbers show almost 190,000 nationwide last year versus 93,000 in 2000. Those numbers only include men whose wives have been employed for at least one yearLoftus, the New York stay-at-home dad, said he feels lucky to be able to be such a hands-on father."I'm doing the most important job in the world," he said.
MEMPHIS — After her doctor told her two months ago that she had breast cancer, Debrah Reid, a 58-year-old dance teacher, drove straight to a funeral home. She began planning a burial with the funeral director and his wife, even requesting a pink coffin.Sensing something was amiss, the funeral director, Edmund Ford, paused. "Who is this for?" he asked. Ms. Reid replied quietly, "It's for me."Aghast, Mr. Ford's wife, Myrna, quickly put a stop to the purchase. "Get on out of here," she said, urging Ms. Reid to return to her doctor and seek treatment. Despondent, Ms. Reid instead headed to her church to talk to her pastor."I was just going to sit down and die," she says.Like many other African-American women in Memphis and around the country, Ms. Reid learned about her breast cancer after it had already reached an advanced stage, making it difficult to treat and reducing her odds of survival. Her story reflects one of the most troubling disparities in American health care. Despite 20 years of pink ribbon awareness campaigns and numerous advances in medical treatment that have sharply improved survival rates for women with breast cancer in the United States, the vast majority of those gains have largely bypassed black women.The cancer divide between black women and white women in the United States is as entrenched as it is startling. In the 1980s, breast cancer survival rates for the two were nearly identical. But since 1991, as improvements in screening and treatment came into use, the gap has widened, with no signs of abating. Although breast cancer is diagnosed in far more white women, black women are far more likely to die of the disease.And Memphis is the deadliest major American city for African-American women with breast cancer. Black women with the disease here are more than twice as likely to die of it than white women."The big change in the 1990s was advances in care that were widely available in early detection and treatment," said Steven Whitman, director of the Sinai Urban Health Institute in Chicago. "White women gained access to those advances, and black women didn't."Over all, black women with a breast cancer diagnosis will die three years sooner than their white counterparts. While nearly 70 percent of white women live at least five years after diagnosis, only 56 percent of black women do. And some research suggests that institutions providing mammograms mainly to black patients miss as many as half of breast cancers compared with the expected detection rates at academic hospitals.The gap in cancer survival cannot be explained away by biological differences in cancer between blacks and whites, researchers say. While African-American women are at greater risk of a more aggressive form of cancer known as triple negative, those cancers account for only about 10 percent of diagnoses.Researchers from the Sinai Institute last year analyzed breast cancer cases in the country's 25 largest cities and found that African-American women with breast cancer were, on average, 40 percent more likely to die of their disease than white women. In the United States, the disparity in breast cancer survival translates to about 1,700 additional deaths each year — or about five more black women dying every day.News that Memphis has the widest survival gap between black and white hit the medical community here hard. When the breast cancer disparity study was published in the journal Cancer Epidemiology last year, Edward Rafalski was one of the first here to read it. He is senior vice president for strategic planning at Methodist Le Bonheur Healthcare, which operates eight hospitals in the Memphis area.As it happened, Dr. Rafalski had previously worked at Mount Sinai Hospital in Chicago and knew the study's lead author, Dr. Whitman of the Sinai Institute. As local headlines declared the city's troubling record, Dr. Rafalski invited Dr. Whitman to the city. Memphis, population 655,000, is more than two-thirds black, and more than a quarter of its residents are poor."When you look at any epidemiological study, Memphis is often the epicenter of virtually any disease, be it diabetes, heart failure — there are a lot of health issues here," Dr. Rafalski said. "But for breast cancer to be as bad as it is — that's why everyone came to the table and said, 'We have to do something.' "Dr. Whitman flew to Memphis for a strategy session. The study's co-author, Marc Hurlbert of the Avon Breast Cancer Crusade, which funded the research, joined the conference by phone.The solution, everyone agreed, would not be simple. Doctors and health care researchers say the reasons behind the black-white cancer divide are complex. Economic disparities that disproportionately affect African-Americans explain some of it. Years of racial discrimination and distrust of the medical establishment dating back to the Tuskegee, Ala., syphilis experiments on black men in the 1930s continue to influence health decisions made by African-American families in the South.Lack of health insurance among low-income and self-employed women was also cited as an obstacle to timely care, a problem that may be eased if some of them gain insurance through the Affordable Care Act.Black women often arrive at the hospital with cancers so advanced, they rival the late-stage disease that doctors see among women in developing nations. A study based on Medicare records published in July in JAMA, the Journal of the American Medical Association, found that 20 percent of African-American women with breast cancer did not learn of their disease until it had advanced to Stage 3 or 4. By comparison, only 11 percent of white women learn at late stages.Doctors in Memphis and in cities around the country tell horrific stories of poor and uneducated patients, black and white, who arrive at the clinics with festering tumors or a breast that has been all but consumed by a growing cancer.With a grant from the Avon Breast Cancer Foundation, researchers at the Methodist system analyzed their records of breast cancer patients and discovered that even in what is widely viewed as the top hospital system in the region, black patients took on average about a month longer to begin treatment after diagnosis compared with white patients."A large percentage of our African-American population is also poor, and poor people don't have the luxury of being sick," said Dr. Kurt Tauer, an oncologist with the West Cancer Clinic, which is affiliated with the Methodist system. "They have to take off work, find someone to give them a ride."But the larger issue, hospital officials say, is that many black women in Memphis do not seek health care at all. They do not undergo mammograms for screening or see a doctor when the earliest signs of breast cancer develop. Even among women with Medicare coverage, black women were significantly less likely than white women to have seen a primary care doctor in the six to 18 months before diagnosis, and also had far lower rates of breast cancer screening — 23.5 percent in that period, compared with 35.7 percent of white women, the JAMA study found.The challenge is to get women screened and treated in good time. But how, the Methodist officials asked, do you reach African-American women who have felt excluded from the health care system for most of their lives?It is often said that there is a church on every street corner in Memphis. In a half-mile stretch of Elvis Presley Boulevard, there are six: the Faith Temple Holiness Church, the Holmes Road Church of Christ, the CME Temple Christian Methodist Church, the Lily of the Valley Church of God in Christ, Our Savior Lutheran Church and the Holy Spring Baptist Church. Methodist hospital system officials estimate there are 3,000 to 4,000 churches in the area they serve."Our patients are in churches on Sunday," said the Rev. Bobby Baker, director of faith and community partnerships at Methodist. "If we want to be in their lives when they're not in our hospital, the church is where to find them."In 2005, the hospital system formed the Congregational Health Network. It began with 12 area churches and has grown to more than 500 congregations. Through the network, the hospitals have registered 18,000 people and given them messages promoting prevention, screening and health education. An analysis of hospital records shows that patients in the network fare better, staying out of the hospital four months longer than non-network patients with a similar diagnosis.Dr. Rafalski and his Methodist colleagues realized that this network would be the best way to reach out to black women on breast cancer issues. With a grant from the Susan G. Komen Foundation, they hired Carole Dickens to work with pastors and congregants. During Sunday services, she spreads the word about early screening, gives women her cellphone number and follows up with those who share their contact information. She helps them gain access to public health programs and offers taxi vouchers so they can get to medical appointments.Many of the women admit to never getting a mammogram and avoiding doctors. Sometimes, it is because they do not have health insurance, so Ms. Dickens refers them to free mammography programs in the area. Others admit they are stopped by fear."They have all kinds of reasons for not doing it," Ms. Dickens said.She said the women have told her: "I don't want anybody cutting on me.""My mama died, and my aunt died and they suffered so much. I didn't want to go through that.""If I've got it, I've got it. I'm going to die from something."Mary Singleton, 57, a Memphis print shop owner, noticed a lump in her breast in July. Because she did not have health insurance, she did not get the lump checked, telling herself that she did not need to worry because she did not have a family history of breast cancer.One afternoon this fall, the Boulevard Church of Christ hosted a health fair, giving away pink bags that included pink pens, a key chain and a brochure from the American Cancer Society. It prompted Ms. Singleton to seek a free mammogram through the local health department. She learned she had Stage 4 cancer in October."It takes a while for the brain to process," she said. "There's a difference between what you heard about cancer, and now somebody is telling you that it's your story."After years without health insurance, she was told that her cancer treatment would be covered by Tenncare, the state's Medicaid program."I had to get cancer to get health insurance," Ms. Singleton said, a tear rolling down her cheek. "I've been one of those people waiting for Obamacare, waiting for health insurance. And this is how I finally get it."After her diagnosis, her son George moved home from Iowa to help her run her printing business, which she had just opened about a month before learning of her illness. The business, named STBS, for Sisters Together Building Success, is in an office she leased from her church, just off Elvis Presley Boulevard.On a recent day, she stepped out of her shop to watch a holiday parade move slowly past. She had printed some of the signs being carried in the parade, and she wanted to see them go by. A dance group called the Sassie Seniors strutted by in red Santa jackets. The leader, in a shiny red leotard and boots with faux leopard fur, was none other than Ms. Reid, the dance instructor who began planning her funeral after learning she had breast cancer.After the funeral home refused her business, Ms. Reid sought counseling from the Rev. Robert J. Matthews of the New Hope Baptist Church of Memphis. He is a 12-year survivor of colon cancer, and their talk was transformative for her."I'm not a weak person," she said. "I decided to be a messenger."Ms. Reid, a former member of the Grizzlies Grannies, a dance team for the Memphis Grizzlies, the city's professional basketball team, said she had avoided a mammogram for eight years because she found them so unpleasant. Last month, she called a meeting of the Sassie Seniors in the dressing room before a performance."I revealed my breast so they could see it," she said. "It was swollen. I made them touch it. It shocked them. Out of 21 people with me that night, 15 have already had mammograms, and others have them scheduled."While Ms. Reid, who has Stage 3 cancer, hopes her story will help other women, she knows that education is not enough. "A lot of us don't have insurance," she said. "And without insurance, a lot of stuff goes undetected."Ms. Reid, like Ms. Singleton, is undergoing treatment at the West Cancer Clinic.Doctors say it will be months or even years before they know if their efforts to reach out to African-American women will lead to more early diagnoses and begin to narrow the black-and-white divide for breast cancer."It's such a daunting task," said Dr. Rafalski of Methodist. "It's almost easier to throw up your hands, but we can't. We have to fix it, one little step at a time."This article has been revised to reflect the following correction: A chart on Friday with an article about racial disparities in deaths from breast cancer misstated the mortality rate gap between black women and white women in Tennessee. For every 100,000 women in 2010, the mortality rate for black women was 36, and the mortality rate for white women was 22, which is about 1.64 black women for every white woman. It is not the case that nearly 14 black women in Tennessee die from breast cancer for every white woman who does.
With two-thirds of Americans over 60 experiencing high blood pressure, new treatment guidelines released on Wednesday might mean fewer medications, lower doses or even none at all for millions of people.But the committee that released the guidelines did not have data to answer one fundamental question: How many people are affected by the change?On Thursday, Paul Muntner, a professor of epidemiology at the University of Alabama at Birmingham, came up with an answer: 7.4 million Americans out of the 51 million over 60 are in the newly defined safe range, which is blood pressure of between 140/90 and 149/90.The old guidelines urge treatment if the systolic blood pressure — the top number — is 140 or higher. The new guidelines state that the goal for people over 60 is a systolic pressure of less than 150. In both cases the recommended diastolic pressure — the bottom number — should be lower than 90.Dr. Muntner's figure was derived in response to an inquiry on Wednesday from a reporter. It was based on his analysis of data from the National Health and Nutrition Survey, a federal study that combines interviews and health exams to gather information on the health of Americans.More than half of those 7.4 million people — 4.2 million — are currently taking medications to lower their blood pressure, yet still remain over 140/90. Under the old guidelines, that often led to more treatment, with doctors urging additional medications or higher doses to bring systolic pressure down. Under the new guidelines, that is no longer recommended.The other 3.2 million can continue without treatment, though in the past they were often warned that no treatment would put them at risk of a stroke or heart attack. The committee said that anyone over 60 with pressure below 140/90 after treatment can stay on the medications, as long as there are no side effects.Many doctors take issue with the new targets, saying a systolic pressure goal of 150 is too high. They say that the committee, composed of 17 academics, was too narrowly focused on data from randomized trials and that it should have considered other forms of evidence.But the committee said it was convinced by rigorous studies that failed to find an advantage for people over 60 having pressure lower than 150.A lower pressure, without medications, is certainly healthier, the group said. But achieving a lower pressure by using medications is not the same as having it naturally, it said, as medications can have side effects."When you are taking an asymptomatic person and putting them on medication, you want to be sure you are doing good," said Dr. Paul A. James, the chairman of the department of family medicine at the University of Iowa and co-chairman of the guidelines committee.
When Christopher Herrera, 17, walked into the emergency room at Texas Children's Hospital one morning last year, his chest, face and eyes were bright yellow — "almost highlighter yellow," recalled Dr. Shreena S. Patel, the pediatric resident who treated him.Christopher, a high school student from Katy, Tex., suffered severe liver damage after using a concentrated green tea extract he bought at a nutrition store as a "fat burning" supplement. The damage was so extensive that he was put on the waiting list for a liver transplant."It was terrifying," he said in an interview. "They kept telling me they had the best surgeons, and they were trying to comfort me. But they were saying that I needed a new liver and that my body could reject it."New data suggests that his is not an isolated case. Dietary supplements account for nearly 20 percent of drug-related liver injuries that turn up in hospitals, up from 7 percent a decade ago, according to an analysis by a national network of liver specialists. The research included only the most severe cases of liver damage referred to a representative group of hospitals around the country, and the investigators said they were undercounting the actual number of cases.While many patients recover once they stop taking the supplements and receive treatment, a few require liver transplants or die because of liver failure. Naïve teenagers are not the only consumers at risk, the researchers said. Many are middle-aged women who turn to dietary supplements that promise to burn fat or speed up weight loss."It's really the Wild West," said Dr. Herbert L. Bonkovsky, the director of the liver, digestive and metabolic disorders laboratory at Carolinas HealthCare System in Charlotte, N.C. "When people buy these dietary supplements, it's anybody's guess as to what they're getting."Though doctors were able to save his liver, Christopher can no longer play sports, spend much time outdoors or exert himself, lest he strain the organ. He must make monthly visits to a doctor to assess his liver function.Americans spend an estimated $32 billion on dietary supplements every year, attracted by unproven claims that various pills and powders will help them lose weight, build muscle and fight off everything from colds to chronic illnesses. About half of Americans use dietary supplements, and most of them take more than one product at a time.Dr. Victor Navarro, the chairman of the hepatology division at Einstein Healthcare Network in Philadelphia, said that while liver injuries linked to supplements were alarming, he believed that a majority of supplements were generally safe. Most of the liver injuries tracked by a network of medical officials are caused by prescription drugs used to treat things like cancer, diabetes and heart disease, he said.But the supplement business is largely unregulated. In recent years, critics of the industry have called for measures that would force companies to prove that their products are safe, genuine and made in accordance with strict manufacturing standards before they reach the market.But a federal law enacted in 1994, the Dietary Supplement Health and Education Act, prevents the Food and Drug Administration from approving or evaluating most supplements before they are sold. Usually the agency must wait until consumers are harmed before officials can remove products from stores. Because the supplement industry operates on the honor system, studies show, the market has been flooded with products that are adulterated, mislabeled or packaged in dosages that have not been studied for safety.The new research found that many of the products implicated in liver injuries were bodybuilding supplements spiked with unlisted steroids, and herbal pills and powders promising to increase energy and help consumers lose weight."There unfortunately are criminals that feel it's a business opportunity to spike some products and sell them as dietary supplements," said Duffy MacKay, a spokesman for the Council for Responsible Nutrition, a supplement industry trade group. "It's the fringe of the industry, but as you can see, it is affecting some consumers." More popular supplements like vitamins, minerals, probiotics and fish oil had not been linked to "patterns of adverse effects," he said.The F.D.A. estimates that 70 percent of dietary supplement companies are not following basic quality control standards that would help prevent adulteration of their products. Of about 55,000 supplements that are sold in the United States, only 170 — about 0.3 percent — have been studied closely enough to determine their common side effects, said Dr. Paul A. Offit, the chief of infectious diseases at the Children's Hospital of Philadelphia and an expert on dietary supplements."When a product is regulated, you know the benefits and the risks and you can make an informed decision about whether or not to take it," he said. "With supplements, you don't have efficacy data and you don't have safety data, so it's just a black box."Since 2008, the F.D.A. has been taking action against companies whose supplements are found to contain prescription drugs and controlled substances, said Daniel Fabricant, the director of the division of dietary supplement programs in the agency's Center for Food Safety and Applied Nutrition. For example, the agency recently took steps to remove one "fat burning" product from shelves, OxyElite Pro, that was linked to one death and dozens of cases of hepatitis and liver injury in Hawaii and other states.The new research, presented last month at a conference in Washington, was produced by the Drug-Induced Liver Injury Network, which was established by the National Institutes of Health to track patients who suffer liver damage from certain drugs and alternative medicines. It includes doctors at eight major hospitals throughout the country.The investigators looked at 845 patients with severe, drug-induced liver damage who were treated at hospitals in the network from 2004 to 2012. It focused only on cases where the investigators ruled out other causes and blamed a drug or a supplement with a high degree of certainty.When the network began tracking liver injuries in 2004, supplements accounted for 7 percent of the 115 severe cases. But the percentage has steadily risen, reaching 20 percent of the 313 cases recorded from 2010 to 2012.Those patients included dozens of young men who were sickened by bodybuilding supplements. The patients all fit a similar profile, said Dr. Navarro, an investigator with the network."They become very jaundiced for long periods of time," he said. "They itch really badly, to the point where they can't sleep. They lose weight. They lose work. I had one patient who was jaundiced for six months."Tests showed that a third of the implicated products contained steroids not listed on their labels.A second trend emerged when Dr. Navarro and his colleagues studied 85 patients with liver injuries linked to herbal pills and powders. Two-thirds were middle-aged women, on average 48 years old, who often used the supplements to lose weight or increase energy. Nearly a dozen of those patients required liver transplants, and three died.It was not always clear what the underlying causes of injury were in those cases, in part because patients frequently combined multiple supplements and used products with up to 30 ingredients, said Dr. Bonkovsky, an investigator with the network.But one product that patients used frequently was green tea extract, which contains catechins, a group of potent antioxidants that reputedly increase metabolism. The extracts are often marketed as fat burners, and catechins are often added to weight-loss products and energy boosters. Most green tea pills are highly concentrated, containing many times the amount of catechins found in a single cup of green tea, Dr. Bonkovsky said. In high doses, catechins can be toxic to the liver, he said, and a small percentage of people appear to be particularly susceptible.But liver injuries attributed to herbal supplements are more likely to be severe and to result in liver transplants, Dr. Navarro said. And unlike prescription drugs, which are tightly regulated, dietary supplements typically carry no information about side effects. Consumers assume they have been studied and tested, Dr. Bonkovsky said. But that is rarely the case. "There is this belief that if something is natural, then it must be safe and it must be good," he said.
CHICAGO — It almost sounds sadistic — making rape victims as young as 13 relive their harrowing assault over and over again. But a new study shows it works surprisingly well at eliminating their psychological distress.The results are the first evidence that the same kind of "exposure" therapy that helps combat veterans haunted by flashbacks and nightmares also works for traumatized sexually abused teens with similar symptoms, the study authors and other experts said.After exposure therapy, 83 percent no longer had a diagnosis of post-traumatic stress disorder. They fared much better than girls who got only supportive counseling — 54 percent in that group no longer had PTSD after treatment.Girls who got exposure therapy also had much better scores on measures of depression and daily functioning than girls who got conventional counseling.It's common to think that offering just comforting words and encouraging traumatized youngsters to forget their ordeals is protecting them, but that's "not doing them any favors," said University of Pennsylvania psychologist Edna Foa, the lead author. She said that approach can be harmful because it lets symptoms fester.Foa developed a two-part treatment known as prolonged exposure therapy and has studied its use in treating post-traumatic stress disorder. It involves having patients repeatedly tell their awful stories, and then visit safe places that remind them of the trauma, or take part in safe activities they'd avoided because of painful reminders."Many are actually relieved that somebody wants to hear their story," Foa said.The Veterans Affairs health system uses the treatment for vets with PTSD.Foa's previous research has shown this approach works for adult rape victims, and it is used in some rape crisis centers.Her new study was published Tuesday in the Journal of the American Medical Association.Sixty-one girls aged 13-18 were recruited at a rape crisis center in Philadelphia. They had been raped or sexually abused, sometimes repeatedly, often by a relative. All had been diagnosed with PTSD. The researchers provided four days of prolonged exposure training for counselors at the center and two days of supportive counseling training.The teens were randomly assigned to 14 weeks of counseling or prolonged exposure therapy from the counselors. Sessions lasted an hour or 90 minutes.At first, most were very upset talking about what had happened. But by telling and re-telling their trauma, "they get a new perspective of what happened," Foa said. "They get used to thinking and talking about the memory and realizing that it was in the past, that it's not in the present anymore."Eventually, "the story becomes remote and they get closure," she said.Benefits of the prolonged exposure therapy lasted throughout a one-year follow-up.A JAMA editorial said many therapists are reluctant to try the treatment with kids because of concerns that it might worsen symptoms, but that the study should raise awareness of the benefits.The study "should allay therapist concerns about any potential harmful effects of exposure," said editorial author Sean Perrin, a psychologist at Lund University in Sweden and a specialist in PTSD treatment in kids. The distress that comes with reliving the trauma usually dissipates within a few sessions, and is essential to recovery, he said.
Scientists studying microbes that live in volcanic hot springs have invented a way to preserve viruses that could someday change how vaccines are delivered in poor countries.Much work remains to be done, but an intriguing study in The Journal of Virology describes how Portland State University scientists prevented several viruses from drying out by coating them with silica, the basic ingredient of glass, just as they are coated in hot springs. Once the silica coats were rinsed off, some of the viruses were able to infect cells again.Most vaccines are made of weakened virus or viral bits, and many need refrigeration. Keeping them cold is a major challenge when it comes to protecting children living in villages without electricity."It's hard to put a fridge on the back of a donkey," said Kenneth M. Stedman, a biologist at Portland State and the lead author of the study.By recreating the chemical-laden hot-spring environment, Dr. Stedman's team coated four types of virus with silica, stored them, then washed off the silica and tried to infect cells. One heavily studied virus, phage T4, which infects the cells of E. coli bacteria, retained 90 percent of its infectivity for almost a month. The virus used in smallpox vaccines also did well, but it is naturally able to be stored dry.The team is now testing the technique on harder targets: flu virus and rotavirus, which can cause fatal childhood diarrhea. "And we're definitely interested in polio," he added.Coating other viruses and testing them in animals instead of cells will require more work and more grants. Dr. Stedman's seed money came from NASA, which is interested in how viruses spewed by volcanoes survive in the upper atmosphere.His team did one animal experiment: It injected the smallpox vaccine virus into mice still in the silica coating. Even then, it touched off their immune systems, suggesting that the body itself may be able to wash off the coating. DONALD G. McNEIL Jr.
Should gynecologists be allowed to treat men? A medical specialty board stirred up a hornet's nest in September when it said no and warned gynecologists that if they accepted male patients, they could lose their certification — something doctors need in order to work.Protests erupted from patients and doctors who said the policy, set by the American Board of Obstetrics and Gynecology, interfered with medical care and research.Since then, the board, based in Dallas, has backed off twice. In November, it reversed itself and gave gynecologists permission to screen and treat men at high risk for anal cancer. Then, on Wednesday, the board said that gynecologists who had been treating men with chronic pelvic pain could continue to see their current patients.But with few other exceptions, the policy stands: No male patients.The to-and-fro has sent doctors scrambling to cut ties with patients, then to reinstate them. And the board's pronouncements have puzzled many, including some physicians, who wonder what harm there is in gynecologists' treating men and whether a specialty board has the authority to impose such a rule.The board said the ban was part of a larger effort to preserve the integrity of the gynecology specialty and to protect patients from doctors who had begun to practice types of medicine for which they had not been trained or certified. But in casting a wide net to curb abuses, the board may have snared more doctors and patients than it had intended.The gynecology board is one of 24 boards that certify medical specialists in the United States, based on training, exams and other requirements. Certification is voluntary and not required by law, but in practice it is essential, because most hospitals and insurers require it and patients are increasingly encouraged to choose only specialists who are certified.The gynecology episode began in September, when the board posted on its website a newly explicit definition of the specialty, with a requirement that members devote at least 75 percent of their practice to gynecology. In addition, treating male patients was prohibited, with exceptions for, among other things, circumcising babies, testing couples for infertility and treating transgender people.In telephone interviews in November, two board members — the executive director, Dr. Larry C. Gilstrap, and the director of evaluation, Dr. Kenneth L. Noller — explained the reasoning behind the policy. They said too many gynecologists had been straying into areas like testosterone therapy for men, liposuction, plastic surgery and other cosmetic procedures for both women and men. The board members said some of these doctors were behaving unethically and unprofessionally by presenting themselves as "board certified" without revealing that their certification was in obstetrics and gynecology, potentially misleading patients into thinking the certification was in plastic surgery or some other specialty.As for treating men, Dr. Gilstrap said: "If you voluntarily want to be known as a specialist in obstetrics and gynecology, it's restricted to taking care of women. We really need the specialty. There are plenty of physicians out there to take care of men."He noted that treating women has been the official mission of the specialty since 1935, and that the notice in September was really just a restatement and a reminder to gynecologists."I have three daughters and six granddaughters," he said, "and I can tell you that women have been getting shortchanged in research and studies for as long as I've been a doctor."But apparently, before the notice came out, not all gynecologists thought that specializing in women meant never treating men. The ban affected gynecologists who had developed extensive skill and experience treating male patients, and they said that it would be difficult or impossible for many of those patients to find care elsewhere.Some gynecologists were screening men at high risk for anal cancer, while others were treating men with chronic pelvic pain, often resulting from injuries to or irritation of the pudendal nerve. In both conditions, the affected body parts and treatments are the same in men and women, but gynecologists have more treatment experience than most doctors.Both groups of doctors, and some of their patients, asked the board to make an exception. Initially, it declined, insisting that male patients could be referred to other doctors. But members changed their minds in November with regard to anal cancer screening. The disease is usually caused by a sexually transmitted virus, and Dr. Noller said the board recognized that gynecologists had a tradition of treating both men and women for such infections, so the screening was not out of line.He also said the board did not want to come between doctors and patients or to interfere with research trials already in the works.
WASHINGTON — Sure your liver or kidney could save someone's life. But would you donate your hands, or your face? Signing up to become an organ donor may get more complicated than just checking a box on your driver's license.The government is preparing to regulate the new field of hand and face transplants like it does standard organ transplants, giving more Americans who are disabled or disfigured by injury, illness or combat a chance at this radical kind of reconstruction.Among the first challenges is deciding how people should consent to donate these very visible body parts that could improve someone's quality of life — without deterring them from traditional donation of hearts, lungs and other internal organs needed to save lives."Joe Blow is not going to know that now an organ is defined as also including a hand or a face," said Dr. Suzanne McDiarmid, who chairs the committee of the United Network for Organ Sharing, or UNOS, that will develop the new policies over the next few months.Making that clear to potential donors and their families is critical — "otherwise we could undermine public trust," said McDiarmid, a transplant specialist at the University of California, Los Angeles."The consent process for the life-saving organs should not, must not, be derailed by a consent process for a different kind of organ, that the public might think of as being very different from donating a kidney or a heart or a liver," she added.These so-called "reconstructive transplants" are experimental, and rare. The best estimates are that 27 hand transplants have been performed in the U.S. since 1999, and about seven partial or full face transplants since 2008, said Dr. Vijay Gorantla, medical director of the University of Pittsburgh reconstructive transplant program.But they're gradually increasing as more U.S. hospitals offer the complex surgeries, the Defense Department funds research into the approach for wounded veterans — and as transplant recipients go public to say how the surgeries have improved their lives."These hands are blessed hands to me," said Lindsay Aronson Ess, 30, of Richmond, Va., who received a double hand transplant in 2011. She had lost her hands and feet to a life-threatening infection in 2007.Until now, deciding who qualifies for a hand or face transplant, and how to find a match and approach a potential donor's family all have been done on an informal, case-by-case basis.There has been no way to tell which hospitals' techniques work best and how patients ultimately fare. There have been reports of two deaths related to face transplants in other countries, and some transplanted hands have had to be amputated. Patients must take lifelong anti-rejection medications that put them at risk of infections, cancer and other side effects.In July, government regulations go into effect making hand and face transplants subject to the same strict oversight by UNOS, which manages the U.S. transplant program, as heart or kidney transplants. They're part of a new definition of "organ" that also includes other body parts that doctors one day might transplant — from feet to voice boxes, maybe even the uterus. Unlike corneas, heart valves and other simpler tissues that are regulated by the Food and Drug Administration, these are all complex mixes of blood vessels, nerves, muscles and other tissues.The rules mean potential recipients will be added to the UNOS network, for matching of donated hands and face tissue that are the right tissue type and compatible for skin color, size, gender and age. Transplants and their outcomes will be tracked.Before then, the UNOS committee will have to decide such things as who's first on the waiting list, and what special expertise a transplant center needs.Then there's the consent challenge. Some specialists say people should receive a list of body parts when they first sign an organ donor card — to specify exactly what they do and don't want donated at death."Ethically it is the right thing to do so the potential donor has a choice," said Pittsburgh's Gorantla, who is closely watching how UNOS will tackle this issue.But UNOS committee bioethicist Robert Veatch of Georgetown University said until now, next-of-kin have decided on donating a loved one's face or hands, because previously registered organ donors probably had no idea that was an option. That's even though some state laws preclude family from overriding a relative's pre-death decision to donate organs or tissues."Some people who would be willing to consent to a kidney might get a little squeamish about a face," he said.The government projected fewer than two dozen people might be placed on a waiting list for hand and face transplants each year. But Susan Stewart of Association of Organ Procurement Organizations said ultimately, it will increase these transplants because finding a match will be easier.Hand recipient Ess — the patient voice on the UNOS committee — also wants to ensure potential recipients are fully informed of the rigors and risks."It's not just, 'Attach some arms and let me go my merry way,'" said Ess, who still requires physical therapy and will always have to watch for signs of rejection. "It takes a lot of patience, it takes a lot of diligence and resilience."
RALEIGH, N.C. — As darkness fell on a Friday evening over downtown Raleigh, N.C., Michael Lyons, a paramedic supervisor for Wake County Emergency Medical Services, slowly approached the tall, lanky man who was swaying back and forth in a gentle rhythm.In answer to Mr. Lyons's questions, the man, wearing a red shirt that dwarfed his thin frame, said he was bipolar, schizophrenic and homeless. He was looking for help because he did not think his prescribed medication was working.In the past, paramedics would have taken the man to the closest hospital emergency room — most likely the nearby WakeMed Health and Hospitals, one of the largest centers in the region. But instead, under a pilot program, paramedics ushered him through the doors of Holly Hill Hospital, a commercial psychiatric facility."He doesn't have a medical complaint, he's just a mental health patient living on the street who is looking for some help," said Mr. Lyons, pulling his van back into traffic. "The good news is that he's not going to an E.R. That's saving the hospital money and getting the patient to the most appropriate place for him," he added.The experiment in Raleigh is being closely watched by other cities desperate to find a way to help mentally ill patients without admitting them to emergency rooms, where the cost of treatment is high — and unnecessary.While there is evidence that other types of health care costs might be declining slightly, the cost of emergency room care for the mentally ill shows no sign of ebbing.Nationally, more than 6.4 million visits to emergency rooms in 2010, or about 5 percent of total visits, involved patients whose primary diagnosis was a mental health condition or substance abuse. That is up 28 percent from just four years earlier, according to the latest figures available from the Agency for Healthcare Research and Quality in Rockville, Md.By one federal estimate, spending by general hospitals to care for these patients is expected to nearly double to $38.5 billion in 2014, from $20.3 billion in 2003.The problem has been building for decades as mental health systems have been largely decentralized, pushing oversight and responsibility for psychiatric care into overwhelmed communities and, often, to hospitals, like WakeMed.In North Carolina, the problem is becoming particularly acute. A recent study said that the number of mental patients entering emergency rooms in the state was double the nation's average in 2010.More than 10 years after overhauling its own state mental health system, North Carolina is grappling with the consequences of a lost number of beds and a reduction in funding amid a growing outcry that the state's mentally ill need more help.In Raleigh, where the Dorothea Dix Hospital — a state psychiatric institution that served the area for more than 150 years — was closed in 2012, mentally ill patients began trickling into hospital emergency rooms.Hospitals, which cannot legally turn away any patient seeking care, say the influx of psychiatric patients is straining already busy E.R.'s and creating dangerous conditions.This spring, University Medical Center of Southern Nevada in Las Vegas declared an "internal disaster," shutting its doors to arriving ambulances for 12 hours, after mental patients filled up more than half of its emergency room beds. A suicidal patient took out a gun and shot herself in the head while in a hospital emergency room in New Mexico in January.With a crisis facing states, communities and hospitals across the country, experts say no clear solution has emerged. St. Joseph's Hospital Health Center in Syracuse created a separate psychiatric emergency department. Interim LSU Hospital in New Orleans opened a 10-bed mental health emergency room extension six years ago that is typically full.But in Raleigh, the goal is slightly different: keep the psychiatric patients out of the hospital emergency room altogether.The problem facing North Carolina and other states is a legacy of the 1960s, when warehousing of the mentally ill in large psychiatric hospitals was seen as inhumane.
WASHINGTON — Sure your liver or kidney could save someone's life. But would you donate your hands, or your face? Signing up to become an organ donor may get more complicated than just checking a box on your driver's license.The government is preparing to regulate the new field of hand and face transplants like it does standard organ transplants, giving more Americans who are disabled or disfigured by injury, illness or combat a chance at this radical kind of reconstruction.Among the first challenges is deciding how people should consent to donate these very visible body parts that could improve someone's quality of life — without deterring them from traditional donation of hearts, lungs and other internal organs needed to save lives."Joe Blow is not going to know that now an organ is defined as also including a hand or a face," said Dr. Suzanne McDiarmid, who chairs the committee of the United Network for Organ Sharing, or UNOS, that will develop the new policies over the next few months.Making that clear to potential donors and their families is critical — "otherwise we could undermine public trust," said McDiarmid, a transplant specialist at the University of California, Los Angeles."The consent process for the life-saving organs should not, must not, be derailed by a consent process for a different kind of organ, that the public might think of as being very different from donating a kidney or a heart or a liver," she added.These so-called "reconstructive transplants" are experimental, and rare. The best estimates are that 27 hand transplants have been performed in the U.S. since 1999, and about seven partial or full face transplants since 2008, said Dr. Vijay Gorantla, medical director of the University of Pittsburgh reconstructive transplant program.But they're gradually increasing as more U.S. hospitals offer the complex surgeries, the Defense Department funds research into the approach for wounded veterans — and as transplant recipients go public to say how the surgeries have improved their lives."These hands are blessed hands to me," said Lindsay Aronson Ess, 30, of Richmond, Va., who received a double hand transplant in 2011. She had lost her hands and feet to a life-threatening infection in 2007.Until now, deciding who qualifies for a hand or face transplant, and how to find a match and approach a potential donor's family all have been done on an informal, case-by-case basis.There has been no way to tell which hospitals' techniques work best and how patients ultimately fare. There have been reports of two deaths related to face transplants in other countries, and some transplanted hands have had to be amputated. Patients must take lifelong anti-rejection medications that put them at risk of infections, cancer and other side effects.In July, government regulations go into effect making hand and face transplants subject to the same strict oversight by UNOS, which manages the U.S. transplant program, as heart or kidney transplants. They're part of a new definition of "organ" that also includes other body parts that doctors one day might transplant — from feet to voice boxes, maybe even the uterus. Unlike corneas, heart valves and other simpler tissues that are regulated by the Food and Drug Administration, these are all complex mixes of blood vessels, nerves, muscles and other tissues.The rules mean potential recipients will be added to the UNOS network, for matching of donated hands and face tissue that are the right tissue type and compatible for skin color, size, gender and age. Transplants and their outcomes will be tracked.Before then, the UNOS committee will have to decide such things as who's first on the waiting list, and what special expertise a transplant center needs.Then there's the consent challenge. Some specialists say people should receive a list of body parts when they first sign an organ donor card — to specify exactly what they do and don't want donated at death."Ethically it is the right thing to do so the potential donor has a choice," said Pittsburgh's Gorantla, who is closely watching how UNOS will tackle this issue.But UNOS committee bioethicist Robert Veatch of Georgetown University said until now, next-of-kin have decided on donating a loved one's face or hands, because previously registered organ donors probably had no idea that was an option. That's even though some state laws preclude family from overriding a relative's pre-death decision to donate organs or tissues."Some people who would be willing to consent to a kidney might get a little squeamish about a face," he said.The government projected fewer than two dozen people might be placed on a waiting list for hand and face transplants each year. But Susan Stewart of the Association of Organ Procurement Organizations said ultimately, it will increase these transplants because finding a match will be easier.Hand recipient Ess — the patient voice on the UNOS committee — also wants to ensure potential recipients are fully informed of the rigors and risks."It's not just, 'Attach some arms and let me go my merry way,'" said Ess, who still requires physical therapy and will always have to watch for signs of rejection. "It takes a lot of patience, it takes a lot of diligence and resilience."
WASHINGTON — "Just one more story, please?" ''I need a glass of water." ''Mom, I can't sleep!"When youngsters continually struggle to fall asleep at night, new research suggests maybe their body clock doesn't match their bedtime.That doesn't mean tots should be up at all hours."Just like nutrition and exercise, sleep is critical for good health," said sleep scientist Monique LeBourgeois of the University of Colorado, Boulder, who is leading the research.The ultimate goal is to help reset a delayed sleep clock so that young children can settle down more easily, she said. Hint: It seems to have a lot to do with light.We all have what's called a circadian rhythm, a master biological clock, that regulates when we become sleepy, and when we're more alert. Those patterns vary with age: It's the reason teenagers are notorious for late nights and difficult-to-wake mornings.But how does that clock work in preschoolers, who need more sleep than older kids or adults? A first-of-its-kind study tracked 14 healthy youngsters for six days to begin finding out.The children, ages 2½ to 3, wore activity monitors on their wrists to detect when they slept. Parents kept diaries about bedtime routines.Then on the last afternoon, researchers visited each home, dimming lights and covering windows. Then every 30 minutes for six hours leading up to the child's appointed bedtime, they also coaxed each tot to chew on some dental cotton to provide a sample of saliva.The reason: To test for levels of a hormone named melatonin that is key to the sleep cycle and also sensitive to light. At some point every evening, people's melatonin levels surge and a while later, they begin to feel sleepy. Among adults who sleep well, that melatonin rise tends to happen about two hours before whatever is their chosen bedtime.For preschoolers, the new study found that on average, the melatonin surge occurred around 7:40 p.m. The children tended to be tucked in around 8:10 p.m., and most were asleep 30 minutes later, LeBourgeois reported in the journal Mind, Brain and Education.When melatonin rose earlier in the evening, tots who hit the sack around 8 fell asleep a bit faster. But when the melatonin surge was closer to bedtime, the youngsters were more likely to fuss or make curtain calls after lights-out.Two children in the study actually were tucked in before their rise in melatonin ever occurred, and it took them up to an hour past bedtime to fall asleep, she said."We don't know what that sweet spot is yet," LeBourgeois said, but the data suggest bedtime is easiest if the melatonin surge occurred at least 30 minutes earlier.The study reinforces what doctors have long suspected is one bedtime barrier, said Dr. Jyoti Krishna, a pediatric sleep expert at the Cleveland Clinic. Other factors can disrupt a child's sleep, too, such as noise, stress or anxiety, or disrupted home routines, he cautioned."But this paper reminds us that, hey, there is a time that the body is more ready to sleep than at other times," Krishna said.The National Institutes of Health says preschoolers need 11 to 12 hours of sleep each day; some typically comes from an afternoon nap.Parents don't have melatonin tests as a guide, so Krishna advises looking for cues when setting a bedtime — yawning, rubbing eyes — and then to adjust that bedtime as the child gets older."The melatonin onset and our body rhythms change," Krishna said. "You can't stick to what worked two years ago with this child, because this child is now a different child."About 25 percent of young children experience some type of sleep difficulty, including trouble settling down at bedtime, LeBourgeois said. Harried parents aside, there's concern that early-in-life bedtime frustration might lead to more persistent sleep trouble."Listen to your child's physiology," she advised. Some steps that might help:—Research shows that in adults, too much light in the evening delays the melatonin surge and subsequent sleepiness. While there's no data in young children yet, LeBourgeois says dimming the lights about an hour before bedtime makes sense.—Avoid electronics near bedtime, because they generate a specific type of light that triggers wakefulness. LeBourgeois was horrified to hear one parent offer a sleepless youngster an iPad to play with as long as the child stayed in the bedroom.—And make sure blackout shades aren't keeping your children from getting enough morning sunlight, she said. Light in the morning also is key to keeping the biological sleep clock on schedule.Stay tuned: With funding from the National Institute of Mental Health, LeBourgeois has begun a larger study that will track sleep patterns of 40 2-year-olds until they're 5. She'll also measure their light exposure, and periodically record their brain waves during sleep, in a bid to better understand the influence of sleep patterns on children's development.
WASHINGTON — Certain current or former heavy smokers should start getting yearly scans for lung cancer to cut their risk of death from the nation's top cancer killer, government advisers said Monday — even as they stressed that the tests aren't for everyone.The long-anticipated decision by the influential U.S. Preventive Services Task Force says these CT scans of the lungs should be offered only to people at especially high risk: Those who smoked a pack of cigarettes a day for 30 years or an equivalent amount, such as two packs a day for 15 years — and who are between the ages of 55 and 80.That's roughly 10 million people, but not all of them qualify for screening, said task force vice chairman Dr. Michael LeFevre, a University of Missouri family physician. Even those high-risk people shouldn't be scanned if they're not healthy enough to withstand cancer treatment, or if they kicked the habit more than 15 years ago.Lung cancer kills nearly 160,000 Americans each year. Smoking is the biggest risk factor, and the more and longer people smoke, the higher their risk. Usually, lung cancer is diagnosed too late for treatment to succeed, but until now there hasn't been a good means of early detection.The newly recommended screening could prevent as many as 20,000 deaths a year, LeFevre said — if it's used correctly.That estimate assumes good candidates seek the scans. There's no way to know if people at the highest risk will, or if instead the overly anxious will flood testing centers.Screen the wrong people, "and we could see more harm than good," LeFevre cautioned. "There's a lot of room for what I would call people exploiting the recommendation. I can imagine a street-corner imaging center advertising to invite people in."Why not screen younger or lighter smokers? There's no data to tell if they'd be helped. Lung cancer is rare before age 50, and the major study that showed screening could save lives enrolled only heavy smokers starting at age 55.But screening isn't harm-free. A suspicious scan is far more likely to be a false alarm than a tumor, LeFevre noted. Yet patients may undergo invasive testing to find out, which in turn can cause complications.Moreover, radiation accumulated from even low-dose CT scans can raise the risk of cancer. And occasionally, screening detects tumors so small and slow-growing that they never would have threatened the person's life.While screening clearly can benefit some people, "the best way to avoid lung cancer death is to stop smoking," LeFevre added.The task force proposed the screenings last summer but published its final recommendation Monday in the journal Annals of Internal Medicine. That clears the way for insurers to begin paying for the scans, which cost between $300 and $500, according to the American Lung Association.Under the Obama administration's health care law, cancer screenings that are backed by the task force are supposed to be covered with no copays, although plans have a year to adopt new recommendations.
Researchers say vitamin E might slow the progression of mild-to-moderate Alzheimer's disease — the first time any treatment has been shown to alter the course of dementia at that stage.In a study of more than 600 older veterans, high doses of the vitamin delayed the decline in daily living skills, such as making meals, getting dressed and holding a conversation, by about six months over a two-year period.The benefit was equivalent to keeping one major skill that otherwise would have been lost, such as being able to bathe without help. For some people, that could mean living independently rather than needing a nursing home.Vitamin E did not preserve thinking abilities, though, and it did no good for patients who took it with another Alzheimer's medication. But those taking vitamin E alone required less help from caregivers — about two fewer hours each day than some others in the study."It's not a miracle or, obviously, a cure," said study leader Dr. Maurice Dysken of the Minneapolis VA Health Care System. "The best we can do at this point is slow down the rate of progression."The U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs sponsored the study, published Tuesday by the Journal of the American Medical Association.No one should rush out and buy vitamin E, several doctors warned. It failed to prevent healthy people from developing dementia or to help those with mild impairment ("pre-Alzheimer's") in other studies, and one suggested it might even be harmful.Still, many experts cheered the new results after so many recent flops of once-promising drugs."This is truly a breakthrough paper and constitutes what we have been working toward for nearly three decades: the first truly disease-modifying intervention for Alzheimer's," said Dr. Sam Gandy of Mount Sinai School of Medicine in New York. "I am very enthusiastic about the results."About 35 million people worldwide have dementia, and Alzheimer's is the most common type. In the U.S., about 5 million have Alzheimer's. There is no cure and current medicines just temporarily ease symptoms.Researchers don't know how vitamin E might help, but it is an antioxidant, like those found in red wine, grapes and some teas. Antioxidants help protect cells from damage that can contribute to other diseases, says the federal Office on Dietary Supplements. Many foods contain vitamin E, such as nuts, seeds, grains, leafy greens and vegetable oils. There are many forms, and the study tested a synthetic version of one — alpha-tocopherol — at a pharmaceutical grade and strength, 2,000 international units a day.Years ago, another study found that the same form and dose helped people with more advanced Alzheimer's, and many were prescribed it. But vitamin E fell out of favor after a 2005 analysis of many studies found that those taking more than 400 units a day were more likely to die of any cause.The new study involved 613 veterans, nearly all male, 79 years old on average, with mild to moderate Alzheimer's, at 14 VA centers. All were already taking Aricept, Razadyne or Exelon — widely used, similar dementia medicines.Participants were placed in four groups and given either vitamin E, another dementia medicine called memantine (its brand name is Namenda), both pills or dummy pills.After a little more than two years of follow-up, those on vitamin E alone had a 19 percent lower annual rate of decline in daily living skills compared to the placebo group. Memantine made no difference, and vitamin E did not affect several tests of thinking skills."It's a subtle effect but it's probably real," Dr. Ron Petersen, the Mayo Clinic's Alzheimer's research chief, said of the benefit on daily living from vitamin E. "That has to be weighed against the potential risks" seen in earlier studies, he said.Heather Snyder, director of medical and scientific operations for the Alzheimer's Association, said the group's position is that "no one should take vitamin E for Alzheimer's disease or other memory issues except under the supervision of a physician," because it can interfere with blood thinners, cholesterol drugs and other medicines.The new results also need to be verified in a fresh study that includes more women and minorities, she said.
WASHINGTON — Certain current or former heavy smokers should start getting yearly scans for lung cancer to cut their risk of death from the nation's top cancer killer, government advisers said Monday — even as they stressed that the tests aren't for everyone.The long-anticipated decision by the influential U.S. Preventive Services Task Force says these CT scans of the lungs should be offered only to people at especially high risk: those who smoked a pack of cigarettes a day for 30 years or an equivalent amount, such as two packs a day for 15 years — and who are between the ages of 55 and 80.That's roughly 10 million people, but not all of them qualify for screening, said task force vice chairman Dr. Michael LeFevre, a University of Missouri family physician. Even those high-risk people shouldn't be scanned if they're not healthy enough to withstand cancer treatment, or if they kicked the habit more than 15 years ago.Lung cancer kills nearly 160,000 Americans each year. Smoking is the biggest risk factor, and the more and longer people smoke, the higher their risk. Usually, lung cancer is diagnosed too late for treatment to succeed, but until now there hasn't been a good means of early detection.The newly recommended screening could prevent as many as 20,000 deaths a year, LeFevre said — if it's used correctly.That estimate assumes good candidates seek the scans. There's no way to know if people at the highest risk will, or if instead the overly anxious will flood testing centers.Screen the wrong people, "and we could see more harm than good," LeFevre cautioned. "There's a lot of room for what I would call people exploiting the recommendation. I can imagine a street-corner imaging center advertising to invite people in."Why not screen younger or lighter smokers? There's no data to tell whether they'd be helped. Lung cancer is rare before age 50, and the major study that showed screening could save lives enrolled only heavy smokers starting at age 55.But screening isn't harm-free. A suspicious scan is far more likely to be a false alarm than a tumor, LeFevre noted. Yet patients may undergo invasive testing to find out, which in turn can cause complications.Moreover, radiation accumulated from even low-dose CT scans can raise the risk of cancer. And occasionally, screening detects tumors so small and slow-growing that they never would have threatened the person's life.While screening clearly can benefit some people, "the best way to avoid lung cancer death is to stop smoking," LeFevre added.The task force proposed the screenings last summer but published its final recommendation Monday in the journal Annals of Internal Medicine. That clears the way for insurers to begin paying for the scans, which cost between $300 and $500, according to the American Lung Association.Under the Obama administration's health care law, cancer screenings that are backed by the task force are supposed to be covered with no copays, although plans have a year to adopt new recommendations.
WASHINGTON — "Just one more story, please?" ''I need a glass of water." ''Mom, I can't sleep!"When youngsters continually struggle to fall asleep at night, new research suggests maybe their body clock doesn't match their bedtime.That doesn't mean tots should be up at all hours."Just like nutrition and exercise, sleep is critical for good health," said sleep scientist Monique LeBourgeois of the University of Colorado, Boulder, who is leading the research.The ultimate goal is to help reset a delayed sleep clock so that young children can settle down more easily, she said. Hint: It seems to have a lot to do with light.We all have what's called a circadian rhythm, a master biological clock, that regulates when we become sleepy, and when we're more alert. Those patterns vary with age: It's the reason teenagers are notorious for late nights and difficult-to-wake mornings.But how does that clock work in preschoolers, who need more sleep than older kids or adults? A first-of-its-kind study tracked 14 healthy youngsters for six days to begin finding out.The children, ages 2½ to 3, wore activity monitors on their wrists to detect when they slept. Parents kept diaries about bedtime routines.Then on the last afternoon, researchers visited each home, dimming lights and covering windows. Then, every 30 minutes for six hours leading up to the child's appointed bedtime, they also coaxed each tot to chew on some dental cotton to provide a sample of saliva.The reason: To test for levels of a hormone named melatonin that is key to the sleep cycle and also sensitive to light. At some point every evening, people's melatonin levels surge and a while later, they begin to feel sleepy. Among adults who sleep well, that melatonin rise tends to happen about two hours before whatever is their chosen bedtime.For preschoolers, the new study found that on average, the melatonin surge occurred around 7:40 p.m. The children tended to be tucked in around 8:10 p.m., and most were asleep 30 minutes later, LeBourgeois reported in the journal Mind, Brain and Education.When melatonin rose earlier in the evening, tots who hit the sack around 8 fell asleep a bit faster. But when the melatonin surge was closer to bedtime, the youngsters were more likely to fuss or make curtain calls after lights-out.Two children in the study actually were tucked in before their rise in melatonin ever occurred, and it took them up to an hour past bedtime to fall asleep, she said."We don't know what that sweet spot is yet," LeBourgeois said, but the data suggest bedtime is easiest if the melatonin surge occurred at least 30 minutes earlier.The study reinforces what doctors have long suspected is one bedtime barrier, said Dr. Jyoti Krishna, a pediatric sleep expert at the Cleveland Clinic. Other factors can disrupt a child's sleep, too, such as noise, stress or anxiety, or disrupted home routines, he cautioned."But this paper reminds us that, hey, there is a time that the body is more ready to sleep than at other times," Krishna said.The National Institutes of Health says preschoolers need 11 to 12 hours of sleep each day; some typically comes from an afternoon nap.Parents don't have melatonin tests as a guide, so Krishna advises looking for cues when setting a bedtime — yawning, rubbing eyes — and then to adjust that bedtime as the child gets older."The melatonin onset and our body rhythms change," Krishna said. "You can't stick to what worked two years ago with this child, because this child is now a different child."About 25 percent of young children experience some type of sleep difficulty, including trouble settling down at bedtime, LeBourgeois said. Harried parents aside, there's concern that early-in-life bedtime frustration might lead to more persistent sleep trouble."Listen to your child's physiology," she advised. Some steps that might help:—Research shows that in adults, too much light in the evening delays the melatonin surge and subsequent sleepiness. While there's no data in young children yet, LeBourgeois says dimming the lights about an hour before bedtime makes sense.—Avoid electronics near bedtime, because they generate a specific type of light that triggers wakefulness. LeBourgeois was horrified to hear one parent offer a sleepless youngster an iPad to play with as long as the child stayed in the bedroom.—And make sure blackout shades aren't keeping your children from getting enough morning sunlight, she said. Light in the morning also is key to keeping the biological sleep clock on schedule.Stay tuned: With funding from the National Institute of Mental Health, LeBourgeois has begun a larger study that will track sleep patterns of 40 2-year-olds until they're 5. She'll also measure their light exposure, and periodically record their brain waves during sleep, in a bid to better understand the influence of sleep patterns on children's development.
STANFORD, Calif. — An unorthodox device for treating pelvic pain was recently approved by the Food and Drug Administration, and its inventors say it could help legions of men in misery from what are misdiagnosed as prostate problems.The therapeutic wand resembling a longshoreman's cargo hook, but made of plastic, is used to gently press on "trigger points" in pelvic muscles that are in spasm. What makes it unorthodox is that men must insert it rectally; a small number of women use it vaginally.The treatment, known as the Stanford pelvic pain protocol or the Wise-Anderson protocol, includes extensive relaxation therapy and sessions of mapping the internal points to be stretched."People who see us have failed all other treatments," said David Wise, a psychologist, who devised the protocol with Dr. Rodney U. Anderson, an emeritus professor of urology at Stanford's medical school, and Tim Sawyer, a physical therapist."They've been on antibiotics, anti-inflammatories, Flomax," Dr. Wise continued. "Some have had wicked surgeries. Some have lived with pain for 20 years. Quite a few are mad at their doctors."Since 1995, the three men have taught the protocol to 2,500 patients; after clinical trials, the wand won F.D.A. approval late last year.As a treatment for pelvic pain, the technique has been accepted by the American Urological Association, said Dr. J. Stuart Wolf Jr., chairman of the association's guidelines committee.The wand costs $800, but is available only as part of a set of training sessions. Its inventors hold six-day workshops for $4,300, but doctors and therapists in other cities and overseas set their own fees. Health insurers usually pay for the physical therapy but not the relaxation techniques or the wand itself, Dr. Wise said.Urologists frequently misdiagnose pelvic pain as a prostate problem, Dr. Anderson said. Cancer must be ruled out, of course, but the pain typically starts in a person's 20s or 30s, when prostate cancer is uncommon.Wendy W. Isett, an association spokeswoman for the urology association, declined to comment on Dr. Anderson's assertion, saying, "We do not have any reliable data on the diagnostic patterns."Like tension headaches or nocturnal tooth grinding, the pain appears to be a response to stress. "In some men, stress makes them clench exactly the way a frightened dog does when it pulls its tail between its legs," Dr. Wise said. "They get a charley horse in the pelvis, but one that can't be stretched out."Mr. Sawyer, the physical therapist, said that patients tended to be driven men, many of them athletic and in good health. The pain often begins after a personal failure like a divorce or a job loss.The first twinge is sometimes described as a golf ball in the rectum or stab in the groin. It starts in the web of muscles that move the pelvis, push food through the intestines and control the bladder, sphincter and ejaculation, but can radiate to the back, the testicles or the penis. Sex, urination or bowel movements can set it off, and sitting, driving or even wearing underwear can become excruciating.Telephone interviews with nine male patients, who spoke on the condition that they be identified only by first name, echoed those descriptions.Most were professionals — physicians, lawyers or business executives. All had endured years of intermittent agony and had seen several doctors before hearing of the protocol, usually through a web search that turned up the book "A Headache in the Pelvis," by Dr. Wise and Dr. Anderson, published in 2003."I'm not depressive," said Isaac, a lawyer in New York. "But I thought, I can't live with this for the rest of my life. If I lost an arm, it would heal. But this was unrelenting."All had been prescribed multiple drugs, including antibiotics, prostate-shrinking medicines, anti-inflammatories, antidepressants, anti-anxiety pills, vitamins, steroid injections, even methadone."I consulted with several urologists," said Allen, an internist in Los Angeles. "Almost to a man, they called it chronic prostatitis.""In retrospect, it seems incredible," he continued. "There was nothing wrong with my prostate."Several said surgeons suggested operations, and two had surgery to sever ligaments around the pudendal nerve."That not only didn't help, but I got additional scrotal pain," said Eric, a doctor in Washington. "That really scared me."Another patient had a hernia operation that found no hernia.Others have had a testicle removed, and one patient had his coccyx, or tailbone, removed, Dr. Wise said. Another had a colostomy because defecation was too painful.Several described explosions of agony the first time Mr. Sawyer touched their internal muscles."My pain went through the roof," said Al, who works in financial services in Los Angeles. "But that was a real light bulb going on — that's where the pain was."Trigger point therapy — pressing on knotted muscles to relax them — has been used by physical therapists for decades. (Acupressure, in Chinese medicine, uses similar points.) Dr. Janet Travell, the first woman to serve as White House physician, used trigger point therapy to treat President John F. Kennedy's back pain; Mr. Sawyer studied under Dr. David G. Simons, a protégé of Dr. Travell.The germ of the protocol emerged in 1994, Dr. Wise said, as he visited yet another urologist during a flare-up of what by then was 22 years of pain.While trying to massage his prostate for fluid to test for bacteria or cancer, he said, the doctor pressed instead on the nearby levator ani muscles. "It was probably an accident," Dr. Wise said, "But when I left, I was pain-free for a few days."He began pressing the spot with one of his fingers, which was awkward, and consulted a therapist who treated women. He also used relaxation techniques he was trained in..A year later he visited Dr. Anderson. In an interview in his house on the Stanford campus, Dr. Anderson said he saw patients "who were at their wits' end, while their own urologists considered them a nuisance because they couldn't help them."In a telephone interview, Mr. Sawyer said: "You think: Rectal exams? Jeez, that's not what I got into this business for. But there was a need, and seeing the first 400 patients with internal trigger points convinced me it wasn't crazy."In the beginning, men had to reach their own trigger points, see therapists frequently or ask someone for help. "We taught the spouses," Dr. Wise said, "but it's not the greatest thing for a marriage.""We were the only guys with ties and no tattoos," he said. "But nothing was quite right. There were S-shaped glass things for stimulating the prostate, but they weren't safe. People sometimes had to go to the E.R. to get them taken out."So they commissioned the wand, a two-foot bend of medical-grade plastic with a fingertip-like rubber end and a pressure gauge to keep patients from pressing too hard.Up to 30 attend each California workshop, and several said they previously thought themselves alone in their suffering. "It's not coffee-table talk, and no one's wearing pink ribbons for it," said John, a Memphis lawyer. "But tons of people have it."
SAN FRANCISCO — Over a cup of tea at a downtown Starbucks, Michael Rubio recalled how four friends became H.I.V. positive through unprotected sex, all within a year. The news shocked Mr. Rubio, a 28-year-old gay man, into trying a controversial new form of H.I.V. prevention: a daily pill that studies show is highly effective in protecting people from infection."With my inner circle so affected in the last year, it was a no-brainer to consider this for my life right now," said Mr. Rubio, a front-office coordinator at the Positive Resource Center, a social service agency for people with H.I.V.The very existence of that option represents a startling turn in the too-long history of the AIDS epidemic. Many health experts hoped that the medication — Truvada, a combination of two antiviral drugs that has been used to treat H.I.V. since 2004 — would be exuberantly embraced by H.I.V.-negative gay men. Instead, Truvada has been slow to catch on as an H.I.V. preventive in the 18 months since the strategy's approval by the Food and Drug Administration. In some quarters, the idea that healthy gay men should take a medication to prevent infection — an approach called pre-exposure prophylaxis, or PrEP — has met with hostility or indifference."It's gotten tons of attention at H.I.V. meetings as a new tool for prevention, and I consider it an important option for the right person," said Dr. Lisa Capaldini, a primary care doctor here who treats many gay men. "And yet there's been very little interest among my patients. There's a fascinating disconnect."For 30 years, public health officials have aggressively promoted condom use during every sexual encounter as the only effective method, apart from abstinence, for preventing H.I.V. transmission. Still, 50,000 new infections are occurring annually in the United States; sexual transmission between men accounts for more than half of them, and a disproportionate number among African-Americans and other minorities.Many experts hailed Truvada as an opportunity to reduce new infections among high-risk groups like young gay men, people in relationships with H.I.V.-positive partners, and prostitutes. The F.D.A. called for prescriptions to be accompanied by counseling, frequent H.I.V. testing, and continued promotion of safer sex, although research suggests that daily use of the pill alone confers close to full protection.For many gay men, and for some public health officials, the new option has brought both hope and confusion."We've had several decades of the recommendation to use condoms," said Dr. Kenneth H. Mayer, a professor of medicine at Harvard University and the medical research director at Fenway Health, a community center in Boston with many lesbian and gay patients. "Now we're saying, 'Here's a pill that might protect you if you don't use condoms.' So it's flying in the face of community norms."Certainly, fewer people have tried PrEP than many experts had anticipated. According to an analysis by Gilead Sciences, which makes the drug, data from more than half of retail pharmacies nationwide indicated that 1,774 people filled prescriptions for Truvada for H.I.V. prevention from January 2011 (it could be prescribed off-label before the F.D.A. approval) through March 2013. The numbers did not include the thousands already receiving the drug as research participants.Almost half of the prescriptions were for women, a surprise to those who expected gay men to be the early adopters. Dr. Deborah Cohan, an obstetrician and gynecologist at the University of California, San Francisco, has prescribed it to several women with H.I.V.-positive partners, including one seeking to get pregnant."It's beautiful that we have this intervention that works for women who need it," Dr. Cohan said.So why haven't more gay men signed up?Some men have reported receiving negative reactions from their health care providers when they brought it up. Use of the drug as a preventive can be stigmatizing among gay men as well: the term "Truvada whore" has been bandied about on some social networks.And many simply may not know much about the strategy. Gilead has not launched a public campaign to market Truvada for prevention, but has instead sponsored activities by other organizations. Fenway Health, for example, has received Gilead funding for some PrEP-related education and research.Potential side effects like kidney damage and a loss of bone density, although rare, are also a concern. And Truvada is expensive: more than $1,000 a month. So far, private and public insurers, including state Medicaid programs, have generally covered the drug for prevention. (Gilead also provides it to some patients who cannot afford it.)But a generational shift in attitudes toward H.I.V. among gay men may also be playing a role, some experts say. With advances in treatment, many younger men who did not experience the worst years of the epidemic are less fearful of the consequences of infection. Moreover, current medications can lower viral levels in H.I.V.-positive people to the point where the risk of transmission is negligible, further reducing the perceived need for PrEP among H.I.V.-negative partners.Damon Jacobs, a New York psychotherapist, began taking Truvada following the breakup of a long-term relationship. "I found that I was no longer as consistent with condom use as I had been in earlier days, and that scared me greatly," said Mr. Jacobs, 42, who maintains a Facebook page promoting PrEP. He said that he has not missed a dose in two years; he also acknowledged that he was now much less likely to use condoms.That sort of acknowledgment makes some health care experts nervous, despite Truvada's efficacy when used daily. The AIDS Healthcare Foundation, a major H.I.V. services provider based in Los Angeles, lobbied against F.D.A. approval of Truvada for H.I.V. prevention, arguing that men taking the medication would be likelier to pursue riskier sexual practices.Certainly, "condom fatigue" among gay men is real. The proportion who reported unprotected anal sex in the previous year rose to 57 percent in 2011 from 48 percent in 2005, according to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.But a recent study found that men in a large clinical trial who believed they were taking Truvada rather than placebo did not increase their risky behavior. For his part, Mr. Rubio, the San Francisco coordinator, said he remained "adamant" about using condoms. "For me, this is a whole other layer of protection," he said.Adherence to the drug regimen is another thorny issue. The major trial that confirmed Truvada as an effective H.I.V. preventive among men who have sex with men, also found that many participants did not take the pill every day, leaving them more vulnerable to infection.Michael Weinstein, president of the AIDS Healthcare Foundation, warned that drug adherence will continue to be a problem, likely leading to more infections and the emergence of drug-resistant H.I.V. strains. "If you don't take the medication every day and you don't use condoms, and you're highly sexually active, you're going to get infected," Mr. Weinstein said.Advocates for PrEP argue, without substantial evidence to date, that people now taking and starting Truvada for prevention may be more likely to follow instructions because they know that it works, unlike participants in the early clinical trials.In any event, the protocol for pre-exposure prophylaxis is itself likely to undergo significant changes as findings emerge from current and upcoming research into other formulations of Truvada such as gels or injectables, less frequent dosing regimens, and the use of other medications altogether."People are not lining up, but I'm not pessimistic," said Dr. Mayer of Fenway Health. "It's going to take time. It's really early days."
